Volume 12

#551 - Retreats To Start!


However, that white light actually as before stable and rigid continuation revolves and drills into inward. The rapidness of the speed, making one praise to the heavens. Sends out cutting teeth sour fricative.

Rays rapid in the direction of this spoken parts light well up from imperial palace, tries to destroy it directly.

But is also this short time, the white light coagulated suddenly. It looks like a flying shuttle sinks to below suddenly, although has not bored through, but actually card on Soul Guidance Protective Cover of Bright Capital City imperial palace.

Soul Engineer that while in the imperial palace is responsible for guarding relaxed, suddenly, the slender white light drills from its state-of-art place together suddenly, falls into the imperial palace instantaneously.

A solid palace under it, it is actually a drill enters, has not sent out including a sound.

“It is not good!”

Xu Tianran has stood in front of own imperial palace witnesses all changes that in the sky is having, when that spoken parts light instantaneous flash, but below instance, he felt that was not wonderful.

The intense purple light bursts out from him suddenly, Purple gold color Humanoid Soul Guidance Device has almost covered his whole body instantaneously. Meanwhile, purple ray puts greatly, Xu Tianran roll up suddenly, is protected oneself by Purple gold color light barrier that on oneself sends out.

All these really came are too quick, quickly to degree eyes cannot take it all.

In Xu Tianran makes the flash after body rolling up movement, earth-shaking power!

“Bang!”

Fierce thundering bursts out from the underground of imperial palace directly, the Bai Se (White Color) light beam has shot up to the sky from the ground together.

This light beam just started is not big, only then the arm is thick or thin, but it actually at an exceptional pace outward expands. Moreover is centered on it, just like the mighty waves Bai Se (White Color) halo overlapping bursts out and spreads outward.

In the imperial palace, each building shone guard shield golden light, tried to resist the impact of this white light.

However, the might of this white light was really too strong, just like easily accomplished general, swallowed in which buildings.

These palace bodyguards. In the face of the striking power of its this terror, does not have the means resistance, instantaneously vanishes in puff of smoke.

However, at this time. Sun-Moon Empire background also appears.

light shadow shine unceasingly in imperial palace, these light shadow anything color has, but actually all shoots toward the white light mighty waves of that proliferation. Changes into barriers, full is weakening the white light terror prestige energy.

Meanwhile, imperial palace Soul Guidance Protective Cover also inward contracts. That 16 golden light beams also toward the white light strangle to death, but, changes into another barrier, many white light mighty waves will prevent.

Position that this white light drops, is the Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace Core Area territory.

Xu Tianran feels at this time, is incomparably sharp terror Soul Power is attacking own body.

On him the rays explode unceasingly, that is Sun-Moon Empire Worship Hall Soul Engineer for various Defensive Soul Guidance Device of his careful manufacture.

Although Xu Tianran had been swept by that Bai Se (White Color) mighty waves. But is relying on the defenses of these force eventually, in addition Humanoid Soul Guidance Device escaped.

But when he drills from the white light, Humanoid Soul Guidance Device presented many fissures. Whole body dust. His pair of artificial leg, because withstands the huge explosive force to burst, making him only be able to crawl to crawl.

Outside Bright Capital City city.

The Huo Yuhao body somewhat sways is giving He Caitou the huge silver artillery tube on shoulder.

“Retreats!”

300 heavy artilleries rapid well up toward 18 Gate of the Dead. Meanwhile. A golden halo also from both sides bright, changes into together light barrier, covers all heavy artilleries and 18 leaves of Gate of the Dead completely.

Huo Yuhao bites the tip of tongue, hits mind. Tang Wutong pours into Soul Power to his within the body unceasingly, this stabilizes lives in his body condition.

Mermaid Princess Li Ya quietly appears, she released Mermaid Control once again, distortion halos proliferated from her. Protects in Soul Guidance Protective Cover all completely becomes slurred.

While they complete these, the distant place, rays raised from the Bright Capital City direction, covers toward here.

Here must unexpectedly be Bright Capital City! Sun-Moon Empire capital, now first under heaven big city.

After suffering one after another serious attack, the counter-attack of Bright Capital City came finally.

Although they do not have the direction of upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device. Did not have the means to find Huo Yuhao their exact location, but installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball lift-off from former 14,400 successively surely the direction, can judge probably. Therefore, gives Huo Yuhao them, is the rug bombardment. The goal must suppress them. In order to guard against them to continue to attack again.

But all these, actually all within the computation of Huo Yuhao, the linkage defense guard shield, come from that side Soul Guidance Array place to Sun-Moon Empire East Sun City as well as grabbing of Bright Struggle Mountain Range.

The self-satisfied work of this linkage defense Sun-Moon Empire, at this time with the support of milk bottle, actually gives the Tang Sect people to protect.

Heavy artillery Soul Engineer Corp removes first, fort Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer and Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer is responsible for bringing up the rear. Huo Yuhao they finally.

Rug covered the attack no doubt to cover here big piece region, because attacked extremely scattered, was naturally impossible to attack anything with emphasis.

Occasionally thunder to appear above the linkage defense guard shield, is actually not able its vacillation.

300 heavy artilleries passed Gate of the Dead rapidly.

18 leaves of front doors, made the speed that they retreated promote one time. Only takes ten minutes, they can all evacuate. As for other people, speed of evacuation will be faster.

In the Bright Capital City imperial palace, under that large explosion, is one piece in confusion. Over one-fifth imperial palaces turned into ruins.

light shadow separately from imperial palace direction lift-off, three, directly soared Tang Sect to fly. The rapidness of speed, just like thunder.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection has been covering the Bright Capital City direction. Regarding each response in Bright Capital City aspect clear is grasping.

Feels these three forms to lift off, his look also one cold. On these three, is sending out extremely powerful Soul Power fluctuation.

Nine levels of Soul Engineer! Sun-Moon Empire Worship Hall nine levels of Soul Engineer!

gold and silver bi-color light beam does not have the omen falls together from the distant place upper air suddenly, outrageously bombardment above Tang Sect here linkage defense guard shield.

Immediately, the entire guard shield was exaggerated the gold and silver bi-color. Linkage Defensive Soul Guidance Device makes grating sound immediately, Soul Power that in the internal milk bottle stores up collapses.

This is......

Sun-Moon Divine Needle.

Starry Sky Douluo Ye Yulin came!

Huo Yuhao brow micro wrinkle, but actually happy does not fear.

He already judged, this offensive starts suddenly, they are away from Sun-Moon Empire Bright Capital City also to have ten li (0.5km) again. This distance, regarding the powerhouses of nine levels of Soul Engineer ranks. In a flash. Therefore, they retreat, might be attacked very much.

This also why a Tang Sect powerhouse keeps the final important reason.

Huo Yuhao sinking sound track: “The opposite party has three nine levels of Soul Engineer. I and Wutong block Starry Sky Douluo Ye Yulin. First Senior Brother you are responsible for left that nine levels of Soul Engineer, Third Senior Brother. You are responsible for right that. Fifth Senior Sister and Ji brother, you assist First Senior Brother. Guyi and Qiuqiu, you assist Third Senior Brother. Fourth Senior Sister, you take charge everybody to retreat. Second Senior Brother, artillery fire cover, momentarily reenforcement. Walks!”

Three nine levels of Soul Engineer destructive power, must absolutely over three Titled Douluo. One-to-one, Titled Douluo does not fear. But if gives the Soul Engineer full distance and time, their destructive power will be extremely terrifying. Therefore cannot see that they wantonly attack. Otherwise Soul Guidance Protective Cover was broken, does not know that many Soul Engineer will die in their hands.

Now regarding Shrek three Soul Engineer Corp. Most important is the time. Huo Yuhao can certainly order Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp to accept a challenge. Three nine levels of Soul Engineer possibly are not the legion matches who 200 Soul Engineer compose.

But now actually hardly does not spell, once tied down, wants to walk to be possible again without enough time.

Must know that this distance, was that side Bright Capital City in the attack range of nearest Soul Guidance Array place. Therefore. Huo Yuhao took the bull by the horns, leads everybody direct selection the frontage fight.

Although three nine levels of Soul Engineer are strong, but their strengths absolutely are not weak. Who won whom defeated/carrying is very difficult saying that only then they carried on the fight the words, withdrew to be easier. After all everybody is coordinating together for many years, was already tacit fully.

Ye Yulin complexion solemn looking out not far away below that ray distortion light barrier. The situation in light barrier cannot see clearly completely, although inside has the light shadow twinkle. Can distinguish to have many people, but actually could not see that actually they are making anything.

Ye Yulin has not approached, although this formidable Starry Sky Douluo has the self-confidence to oneself very much, but attacked from before including the imperial palace defense can puncture him to understand that the overall strengths of these sneak attack were not absolutely weak. A that final white light, is nine levels installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball inevitably surely. Moreover specifically aims at of safety mask. Otherwise, by the prestige energy of imperial palace safety mask, possibly was bored through?

However, because just that nine levels installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to use the massive energies in puncture surely, after entering in the imperial palace. The might that erupts has not reached the true nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely the might, otherwise, loses can only be more serious.

He flies with another two nine levels of Soul Engineer, the most vital duty is to constrain these people, so long as and other Bright Capital City here have traded the hand, can launch attack whole-heartedly to them, must catch the whole lot in a dragnet the enemy who these take to the Bright Capital City heavy loss.

Said honestly that in the Ye Yulin heart too many angers, the loss has not been a country, he consecrates. What he is more is curious, is actually curious is who can actually organize the so powerful offensive, has the surprise attack to Bright Capital City. These people have almost wiped out Bright Capital City above all upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device! Suppressed Bright Capital City four Soul Guidance Array have not been able to move. In a moment ago during that time, use installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball quantity surely absolutely over a thousand. This is not the small influence can achieve, perhaps is the strength of country.

But the Sun-Moon Empire aspect completely ignorants regarding a such strength unexpectedly, was shipped these many to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball by others unclear to Bright Capital City by surely, launches this attack, even if the use installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, cannot certainly be away from Bright Capital City to be too far. Actually do these people how achieve?

Under Sun-Moon Divine Needle strikes, Ye Yulin also starts from the sky through absorbing the milk bottle restores Soul Power. His Sun-Moon Divine Needle might is extremely powerful, but also has its issue, that was the consumption is too big. Also at this time, he saw several forms to fly suddenly from that linkage defense guard shield, two people welcomed in their direction.

coldly snorted, the Ye Yulin right hand to airborne flings, dozens ray rapid lift-offs, these rays as if general that grows voluntarily from him. After each ray rises into airborne, rapidly increases, changes into bunch of glares, just likes Star Dou is ordinary, float above the Ye Yulin top of the head.

The Starry Sky Douluo name is not Bai Jiao, by battle efficiency. During Ye Yulin in Sun-Moon Empire all consecrates is existence of being among the best.

Dozens Star Dou from the sky condense, his Spiritual Power has locked the enemy.

But at this moment, suddenly, intense warning omen raises in the heart. Saw that in that two people, in person eyes the Purple gold colored light glow dodges.

Triggering mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device has almost had the function instantaneously. The Ye Yulin chest place, a necklace erupts the dazzling glare, the mind barrier appears before his body together instantaneously.

“Clang!”Intense metal clangour resounds, Ye Yulin subconscious lowering the head looks that what making him be surprised, on oneself that nine levels of sober necklace, presented many chaps traces.

Good strength big mind attack.

Although his sober necklace has blocked the most attack, but in the Spiritual Power rebellion complementary waves that flash produces. Made Ye Yulin lose the ability of fixed match temporarily. But that two matches erupt the unequalled speed, arrived in his hundred meters range in a flash.

Ye Yulin is excels at fight nine levels of Soul Engineer, is not flustered facing this situation, a right hand forward finger. Immediately, dozens rays burst out from his top of the head star light. Weaves a big net in his body front hook, blocks the path that two people all can go forward completely.

Meanwhile, Ye Yulin own body instantaneously explodes draws back, speed wonderful quick incomparable, changes into together the remnant shade unexpectedly, during breath, arrived at about 500 meters.

Defense, strain and fending. This is one excels at the quality that Soul Engineer of long-distance attack must have.

Fires into Ye Yulin, without doubt Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

Huo Yuhao kept in Mermaid Princess Li Ya Soul Guidance Protective Cover, manages the Spiritual Disturbance domain, keeping outside these nine levels of Soul Engineer from seeing truly the portrait of own army.

Their several flushed.

Ye Yulin is very strong, rays that spreads across, are flooding the formidable destructive power. Huo Yuhao does not dare to rush hardly. Only can draw Tang Wutong to stop slightly. Ye Yulin in light of this has also spread out with them.

The Tang Wutong back wings opens, in airborne float stop. Huo Yuhao does not have to pursue Ye Yulin again. In the eye the god glittering, Spiritual Detection locks on this Starry Sky Douluo completely.

Tang Wutong behind is holding the position of Huo Yuhao Extreme Ice Battle God Armor waist, simultaneously the back wings bursts out innumerable bright sphere, directly soars airborne these star light bombardments to go.

Ye Yulin in distant place stable under personal appearance. In the eye is shining, goal has locked instantaneously them, Sun-Moon Divine Needle in upper air starts the sufficient energy.

He can also certainly see, these two to oneself close Soul Master are the Titled Douluo levels, particularly that wears dark blue Humanoid Soul Guidance Device is makes him be surprised.

On the volume, Humanoid Soul Guidance Device that this person puts on study Sun-Moon Empire is smaller. Actually does not represent might to be weak small size. The aura that on this person lends, making him have the feeling of palpitation. Moreover, at his eyesight, actually also cannot see on this person completely this Humanoid Soul Guidance Device material quality is anything. Profound and insightful, just likes the gem carves. But actually cannot feel existence of any Soul Power fluctuation. As if all are hiding, but also anytime may eruption.

Therefore, Ye Yulin prepares to attempt to destroy them with the strongest attack. He very much wants to have a look now, the outcome in below that light barrier hiding is anything. They want here, unable to be inescapable. Own reinforcements arrived quickly.

At the same time is thinking, Ye Yulin through subpoenaing Soul Guidance Device sent out the digit of a series of representative position. He believes that quick, distance here recent Soul Guidance Array will take to him the long-distance support. The target is not these two people at present, but is that guard shield.

In this time, suddenly, Ye Yulin surprised seeing, one group of red-orange rays are projecting from below light barrier suddenly.

This red-orange ray speed is extremely fast, but actually unceasingly twists and is fluctuating in the entire flight.

This is......

The Ye Yulin pupil has contracted fiercely, is this Guided Shot?

Did these people study unexpectedly including Guided Shot? This discovery, making him be surprised.

Guided Shot specifically aims at the formidable Soul Guidance Array place. This Guided Shot itself has to have extremely intense Soul Power fluctuation, can attract all reconnaissances instantaneously. But most Soul Guidance Array in interception Soul Guidance Device are triggering, because only then the trigger response is quickest.

Therefore, this Guided Shot most vital function, initiates the Soul Guidance Array attack, consumes their strengths. Meanwhile does to conceal to the true attack.

Is direction of this Guided Shot launch, not just the Bright Capital City distance the recent Soul Guidance Array place?

These fellows, is the preparation so unexpectedly sufficient?

Really such as Ye Yulin expects. After that Guided Shot launches next one flickers, jet black such as the shadow of black ink also instantaneously drills into together airborne, if not Ye Yulin is extremely paying attention to that side sound, perhaps could not have seen.

May so. After that black shadow drills into airborne, vanishes in the line of sight of Ye Yulin immediately.

This......

It is not good! Ye Yulin almost instantaneously toward subpoenaing Soul Guidance Device drinks to make noise greatly, “defense, defends fully. Careful Guided Shot and surprise attack. First here do not attack.”

Tonight the time attacks was too sudden, actually will not make clear to present all Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer this time attacks to be how the intensity, but also there is any following. Therefore, for them, what is most important protects Bright Capital City. Kills the enemy in the secondary place.

Has the powerful offensive of beforehand surprise attack, making Ye Yulin has to be careful! What to do if is one round shells?

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth place outlined together the attractive arc, but hid in the Extreme Ice Battle God Armor mask, nobody can see.

The right hand lifts. Dark blue light blade edge quietly appeared during he grasps, above is congealing pure white ice dew.

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath, Morning Dew Knife.

Tang Wutong holds his waist armor, from the sky revolves suddenly 360 degrees, then has wasted Huo Yuhao. The goal refers. Starry Sky Douluo Ye Yulin.

The body of Huo Yuhao was flung hundred meters instantaneously, his whole body burst out the intense white light, the whole person turned into bright sphere unexpectedly, from the sky erupted the unequalled speed, flew to shoot to go toward Ye Yulin with lightning speed.

Ice Meteor! This is Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White) entrusts with the Huo Yuhao ability. Instantaneously when own speed promotion to according to Soul Power flight three times of maximum speed, the flight time cultivate with Soul Master oneself to continually related. Simultaneously own Absolute Ice total quantity in erupting strengthens one time. The defensive power strengthens one time.

Ice Meteor most intrepid is this hits. Also be only this hits. Really just like at top speed general. By Huo Yuhao strength, uses this Ice Meteor the time can also own striking power promote to the Absolute Ice Titled Douluo level. Let alone present he was also wearing Extreme Ice Battle God Armor. This quite therefore Transcendent Douluo struck fully!

Therefore, Huo Yuhao here Ice Meteor Soul Ability just sent out, another side, Ye Yulin feels an intense sensation of asphyxia. As if before that Ice Meteor has hit oneself body.

On the face reveals a color with amazement, this person so is unexpectedly formidable. Clearly is existence of Transcendent Douluo level!

Ye Yulin is proud to oneself very much, he always does not think one meet unable with Transcendent Douluo to contend. But the premise is, distance!

Soul Engineer wants to display own strength, must have the distance to make the guarantee. But Soul Master generally speaking, does not have this limit.

Therefore in certain distance range. Is the Soul Master world.

Saw that rapid enlargement of that group of white lights in oneself eye, Ye Yulin almost want not to think, immediately starts had just completed to gather the strength Sun-Moon Divine Needle.

Sun-Moon Divine Needle undergoes his unceasing transformation, the striking power became stronger and stronger, Transcendent Douluo how? My this Sun-Moon Divine Needle sends out, must make you unable to eat surely to capture walking. At least can also from airborne shoot down you.

The gold and silver bi-color light beam drops from the clouds instantaneously, that seems like in not the strong ray, actually embodiment unequalled terrifying prestige energy.

Meets the tough head-on with toughness? Some problem talents and Sun-Moon Divine Needle meet the tough head-on with toughness.

Narrows the eyes when Ye Yulin eyes, waits to look at this Transcendent Douluo and result of Sun-Moon Divine Needle collision.

Suddenly, that white light is quietly has been defeated and dispersed, the people in Bai Se (White Color) light group appear.

Is he doing? The protection of that formidable Soul Ability, hasn't this been must commit suicide? In the Ye Yulin heart has filled puzzled.

However, at this moment, he noticed that person waved toward oneself unexpectedly.

Not far away . Moreover the two sides fights comprehensively have also launched. And one side, is Eternal Defense Xu Sanshi is bringing Sacred Angel Ye Guyi and disappears the fight of rouge Nan Qiuqiu.

Although Xu Sanshi is only eight rings Soul Master, is not Soul Engineer. But after his Martial Soul since completely evolution is Black Tortoise Shield, its defensive power, at least at present known Martial Soul, second to none.

Is relying on the full defense of Black Tortoise Shield, is protecting him and Ye Guyi, Nan Qiuqiu toward that nine levels of Soul Engineer speedy approaches.

Although is not Soul Engineer, but actually does not affect them to equip Soul Guidance Device!

After three people, does not have Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong that nine levels of Flight Soul Guidance Device. That thing cannot make in a short time too comes. However, Soul Guidance Thruster after three people have.

Formidable Soul Master. Wants far ultra Soul Engineer in the body intensity, they are also. Therefore, the propelling force that Soul Guidance Thruster that they use is erupting instantaneously is extremely astonishing.

Xu Sanshi starts, his body intensity is strongest. Therefore, behind him is three eight levels of Soul Guidance Thruster. Advancement speed that erupts suddenly, making him meet the supersonic standard instantaneously. Keeps off through Black Tortoise Shield before the body, looks like another meteor in battlefield, has pulled closer among the distances with that nine levels of Soul Engineer instantaneously.

But this nine levels of Soul Engineer strength, the book is in three nine levels of Soul Engineer weakest one.

Judges these nine levels of Soul Engineer strongs and weaks, Huo Yuhao does not carry on the determination from Soul Power, because nine levels of Soul Engineer Soul Power are very difficult to judge, on them has various Soul Guidance Device to carry on amplification and auxiliary, the attack also uses Soul Guidance Device. Therefore. Through the Soul Power judgment is inaccurate.

The judgment of Huo Yuhao, bases on Spiritual Power. This nine levels of Soul Engineer Spiritual Power is in complete three weakest one. But Soul Engineer cultivates later, wants to become more formidable, Spiritual Power is important.

Under the function of Soul Guidance Thruster, Xu Sanshi leads two females to rush to this front not far away instantaneously. This Soul Engineer had a scare immediately. Soul Guidance Device continuous attacks. Tries to block the step of Xu Sanshi advance.

However, the Xu Sanshi Eternal Defense title is not Bai Jiao, the Black Tortoise Shield surface ripples ripples, the bombardment, but to various Soul Guidance Device prestige can be melted immediately most, before has not affected his potential, flushing slightly.

That nine levels of Soul Engineer fight experiences are very similarly rich, at the same time launches the attack, prevents the impact of Xu Sanshi. Also opened Soul Guidance Thruster of oneself chest place, counter pushes oneself body, flying upside down, tries to spread out among with Xu Sanshi backward.

During the arrangement of Huo Yuhao, Beibei that group of people must be more formidable, Beibei, Xiao Xiao and Ji Juechen. Three people all are the powerhouses of eight rings Soul Douluo rank, moreover is not general Soul Douluo. Three people add, absolutely be stronger than Titled Douluo. Xiao Xiao excels at the control and defense, Ji Juechen is good at attacking, Beibei is most comprehensive. Three people collaborate. Even if Huo Yuhao has not defeated their assurances.

But Xu Sanshi, seemed seemed to be weaker, can in fact, really weak?

Ye Guyi through previous and a Myriad Souls Douluo war, after closing up, some time ago just from depth meditate sobered. Her battle efficiency strong, only then in the Huo Yuhao heart had the judgment indistinctly. Her Soul Power has been 80 levels of degrees, what is defective is only eighth Soul Ring.

Sacred Angel Martial Soul, is now one of the most top Martial Soul deserving, is relying on this formidable Martial Soul, the strength that Ye Guyi can show is extremely powerful. Repairs to achieve eight rings, means that this Sacred Angel has awakened truly. In the future once is the nine rings Titled Douluo level, its strength is not inferior to a Absolute Martial Soul owner.

Although Nan Qiuqiu is weaker in the strength, but also had the Soul Saint boundary, don't forget, she was the Annihilation Martial Soul owner, the great strength of Rouge Dragon, with promoting also to have shown to the Soul Saint boundary. Moreover, her body, has Extreme Ice Battle God Armor. Although this Extreme Ice Battle God Armor with not having Ice Spirit Extreme Ice Divine Crystal builds, does not carry on the direction with Spiritual Power. But in defense, Xuan Ziwen actually promoted Absolute this set of Humanoid Soul Guidance Device. Nan Qiuqiu even early attain this set of Humanoid Soul Guidance Device compared with Huo Yuhao, the use has had at one's command.

But in this group of three people, what is most important is Xu Sanshi, Xu Sanshi individual strength, even must surpass Beibei in the role that in the battlefield can play. Ability that because his Black Tortoise Shield can display in association fight, was too powerful.

Like this time.

When that nine levels of Soul Engineer release their Soul Guidance Thruster personal appearance to explode draws back. Black Tortoise Shield in Xu Sanshi hand is actually the ray greatly puts. Appearance that Golden Hawksbill Turtle is quietly behind him.

On that Black Tortoise Shield, the halo suddenly became illusory. That nine levels of Soul Engineer felt that their body seemed held by a big hand, stiffly to returning to draw. Has not waited for him to respond that the surroundings are dizzy, he also appeared in front of Xu Sanshi.

This is the Black Tortoise Replacement promotion version, the Black Tortoise summon. After Black Tortoise Martial Soul awakens truly, strong capability that Xu Sanshi has. Catches in front of the match oneself instantaneously, moreover establishes absolutely. Regardless of the match is formidable. When he displays this move, so long as the match in his hundred meters range, is unable to resist.

Like Black Tortoise Replacement, this is also divine skill general existence! Especially regarding defense system Battle Soul Master is so. To fellow soldier. Can help the partner be out of danger instantaneously, to the enemy, can draw the match before the body instantaneously. Coped with Soul Engineer can be said as the easiest-to-use ability.

But the Black Tortoise summon of this Black Tortoise Replacement promotion version, even if were Huo Yuhao mind Engraving Engraving, had Xu Sanshi to use.

That nine levels of Soul Engineer have a big shock immediately, first opened oneself Soul Guidance Protective Cover and Paragon Protecting Cover. A layer upon layer ray own gable just likes a giant light cocoon is ordinary.

Xu Sanshi while starting the Black Tortoise summon, fifth Soul Ring has also shone. Back, Golden Hawksbill Turtle fuses with his main body instantaneously. His whole person looked like turned into great turtle, hit maliciously in this had been entrained by pulling to nine levels of Soul Engineer light barrier before body above.

Turtle God Strike!

Xu Sanshi fifth Soul Ability.

This Soul Ability striking power is extremely powerful. Also is Xu Sanshi itself few attack Soul Ability, or is an attack and defense build.

Before the fierce shake and was just entrained the predicament to match body by pulling, making in this nine levels of Soul Engineer hearts not present the fear on own initiative. But he discovered quickly that the striking power of match is not too formidable, eight rings is eight rings!

That layer upon layer light barrier. Protected his body eventually. Moreover, he also hit flew, has spread out among with Xu Sanshi three people.

Regarding Soul Engineer, oneself has not been injured in fight, but also has spread out among with matches, how regardless to say that is a big good deed.

However, this thought has not appeared completely. The surrounding all once again become the distortion, are not real.

The ray dodges. That was hit nine levels of Soul Engineer that flies to disappear from the scene, vanished baseless. Displaces, is together dark blue form, is not just Huo Yuhao?

“Bang”gold and silver bi-color light beam, bombardment maliciously in midair. That position, should be Huo Yuhao. Remove Ice Meteor Huo Yuhao. May at this moment, appear there, shouldered Sun-Moon Divine Needle to strike hardly fully, actually before turning into Xu Sanshi, hits that flew.

Yes, all these radically during the computation of Huo Yuhao. His Spiritual Detection and Sharing. Does not cover in oneself here battlefield, is covering also other two sides!

When Xu Sanshi full speed overruns toward that nine levels of Soul Engineer, Huo Yuhao told Xu Sanshi his operation plan through Spiritual Sharing.

Does Shrek Seven Devils coordinate the what kind tacit understanding? Xu Sanshi summoned with Black Tortoise that nine levels of Soul Engineer drew before the body, Ye Guyi and Nan Qiuqiu have not attacked him. But first was hit to fly with Turtle God Strike by Xu Sanshi. To coordinate Huo Yuhao!

Turtle God Strike delivered to that nine levels of Soul Engineer has been away from Huo Yuhao near place, Black Tortoise Replacement that Huo Yuhao mind Engraving came, has exchanged the position with this nine levels of Soul Engineer. Sun-Moon Divine Needle that thereupon, should he withstand, fell on that nine levels of Soul Engineer.

All these said slowly, may in fact, but after both sides contact mutually, among the electric light flint occurred.

When Starry Sky Douluo Ye Yulin discovers the incorrect time, his Sun-Moon Divine Needle has shelled maliciously.

Sun-Moon Divine Needle was known as that present age the striking power does place first five nine levels of Soul Guidance Device can it be that to have unearned reputation? Huo Yuhao beforehand judgment that nine levels of Soul Engineer that right, Xu Sanshi they face truly are in this three people weakest one.

On him various guard shields under the bombardment of Sun-Moon Divine Needle, were almost instantaneously on completely to shatter. Guard armor Defensive Soul Guidance Device is also changes into fragment everywhere to dance in the air.

However, what has to acknowledge, nine levels of Soul Engineer survival capabilities were too strong. When this nine levels of Soul Engineer in body must be embezzled by Sun-Moon Divine Needle shortly, the body shone the silver suddenly light, then the whole person is transmitted together 30 meters away. Is runs away finally tribulations.

But so, on him presented the big piece burnt black, a blood is also the inevitable craziness spurts.

A bright ray in this flickers to cut the expansive sky, the Purple gold color giant light beam appeared, has illuminated in a kilometer range the jet black nighttime sky.

--------------------------------------------------

The three-in-one big chapter, asked recommendation ticket.

When our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire tour later newly-opened clothing/taking time changes to 13 : 00 pm, this more convenient everybody plays in the daytime. Joins us to play the simplest way directly to click on the following hand tour to download the button in the prestige and platform.

Today will play will have new edition to join, increases is amusing, the thing of interaction, hopes that everybody will like.

Joins the platform, asking everybody to use prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increased friend - search public number - searched Tang three few, had the authentication, was our families!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-551





Volume 12

#552 - Linkage! Guiding Artillery


That just rejoiced one run away nine levels of Soul Engineer that assigns even to link a pitiful yell with enough time not to send out, the person had been swallowed by this intense Purple gold colored light glow. On him surplus many defensive measures, has not prevented this Purple gold colored light glow the possibility.

Attack plan of Huo Yuhao,

Also few Tang Wutong? Dragon Dance Brillant Sun! Finally strikes.

Under several people collaborate, nine levels of Soul Engineer such stiffly were killed by striking.

The discovery attack has made a mistake Starry Sky Douluo Ye Yulin of object at this time the complexion embarrassedly just likes the bottom of the pot is ordinary, when particularly he looks helplessly that nine levels of Soul Engineer perished under Dragon Dance Brillant Sun, in his eyes also revealed a hesitant color.

But at this time, the distant place Sun-Moon Empire Soul Guidance Array place surface, has not presented him to imagine thundering.

Has gone bad, was swindled!

Ye Yulin first understands that he was fall into trap. Before two light shadow that raised from below, first Guided Shot real, behind that shadow actually at all was not formidable Assault Soul Guidance Device. But oneself presented the mistake in the subconscious judgment, the Soul Guidance Array attack does not have first to cover to here.

Ye Yulin just wanted to inform Soul Guidance Array that side, a huge pressure, has actually headed on.

Dark blue light shadow, delimits an exquisite halo in the nighttime sky, directly soars his direction. Terrifying speed that erupts instantaneously, is nine levels of Flight Soul Guidance Device can achieve absolutely.

Ye Yulin could not attend to pondering that now why in these enemies will have such formidable nine levels of Soul Engineer. He almost does not have hesitant any, turns around runs.

Sun-Moon Divine Needle launches two, to his own Soul Power consumption is quite huge. Let alone. Ye Yulin looks helplessly own companion died in battle. But the opposite party five people in rapid are encircling toward oneself. Although he is proud very much, but has not been proud to think the strength of own oneself can also resist these five strength powerful matches.

Therefore, his turning around without hesitation runs. Nine levels of Flight Soul Guidance Device he also has!

But at this moment, rays in not far away airborne crack, in the air, had the strange fluctuation of big piece indistinctly.

Bastards! In the Ye Yulin heart cursed angrily one, he knows certainly that this was any gadget. This type of Soul Guidance Cannon ball does not have aggressively any. Its name is Obstructing Bullet. After the explosion, can have the intense disturbing wave, made all communication Soul Guidance Device and Surveying Soul Guidance Device time-limit failure.

Here does not have Surveying Soul Guidance Device, the opposite party goal is very simple, must block his communication Soul Guidance Device! In fact. He also just planned to inform Soul Guidance Array that side.

Ye Yulin this time complexion already, was not only ugly, has several points of alarmed and afraid. Planning of enemy was really too accurate, even was it can be said that exquisite. Every one step just arranges in front of oneself. He does not dare to neglect, this little while could not attend to leaving behind these enemies, first runs away the life is most important.

That nine levels of Soul Engineer that moreover that side, by Beibei three people of coping are not shortly wonderful, is empty shakes one move, erupts a series of powerful attacks, compelled to draw back the Beibei three people, oneself also similarly were launches nine levels of Flight Soul Guidance Device to turn around runs. Naturally. Route that he escapes, similarly in the Obstructing Bullet coverage scope.

Huo Yuhao eight people symbolic pursued. Then rapidly returns, fell toward below linkage defense guard shield.

After their this interception, with the former collision, most heavy artilleries has withdrawn undead Demi-plane.

Three nine levels of Soul Engineer. Two run falls from the sky. This collision is nothing less than splendid. The Tang Sect people smile. Huo Yuhao was concentrates Spiritual Power to hurry to maintain already somewhat illusory 18 leaves of Gate of the Dead.

Before these Gate of the Dead is also maintaining by Mermaid Princess Li Ya, she somewhat could not support shortly, Huo Yuhao returned luckily promptly.

Two nine levels of Soul Engineer broke through the range of Obstructing Bullet release finally. They relate Soul Guidance Array immediately that side. The Soul Guidance Array long-distance fire sufficient energy, the goal, points to Shrek Academy here linkage defense guard shield.

This time they, are running against the time. Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace, had more forms to leap in airborne. Flew toward the city outside.

Just like such of Huo Yuhao judgment, this time, Sun-Moon Empire imperial Soul Engineer Corp is not at luckily, otherwise, imperial Soul Engineer Corp joins the fight, they are absolutely impossible to be inescapable.

Distant place. Bright Capital City! The dazzling incandescent light beam shoots up to the sky together instantaneously. That intense ray has almost illuminated entire half Bright Capital City instantaneously. The white light soars to the heavens, will even have the feeling that a dark night and daytime invert instantaneously to near person.

Surrounding all shone white gloomy, has not completed the evacuation Huo Yuhao several people of faces is also so.

Huo Yuhao complexion big change, at this time, retreated to carry on the last act immediately. Heavy artillery Soul Engineer Corp all retreats, the present is fort Soul Engineer Corp and Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer retreats in the collective, but also requires time.

Although Huo Yuhao and the others do not know the white light prestige that distant place that raises instantaneously can be formidable, but a little he is at least clear, this spoken parts light, definitely was Bright Capital City protects a side Soul Engineer Corp linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device to assume an awe-inspiring pose. Under from that Xuan imposing manner, this shoots down, surely is earth-shaking. Even if no assistance of High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, perhaps is not good to withstand.

The sky turned into Bai Se (White Color), the clouds turned into Bai Se (White Color). Distant place Bright Capital City that side Bai Se (White Color) light beam vanished, but Bai Se (White Color) in sky even more is intense.

Huo Yuhao both eyes like the electricity, are staring at the distant place upper air. In the upper air, one group at least has diameter hundred meters huge Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere, is drawing together the astonishing parabola, flew toward them.

“I go!”Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection and Sharing has been connecting partners, he saw, the partners naturally also saw. Xu Sanshi is almost without hesitation must soar.

In Shrek Seven Devils strongest defense system Battle Soul Master, Black Tortoise Shield as well as the owner of Golden Hawksbill Turtle spirit, he knows that he is duty-bound.

The heart of Jiang Nannan almost clutched to tighten instantaneously, she also prepared simultaneously to jump. At this time, she was impossible to prevent Xu Sanshi, she also knows that she could not prevent absolutely, cannot prevent. Then, she accompanies him together!

“wait a moment.”Huo Yuhao moves sideways, arrived at behind them, both hands hold on the arm of Xu Sanshi and Jiang Nannan separately, has not made them fly.

“Yuhao!”The Xu Sanshi startled anger occurred simultaneously bellows. Can hesitate at this time? Once hesitant, likely is the ruinous disaster.

“Point of descent is not right!”The Huo Yuhao sinking sound shouted to clear the way.

In this time, that huge Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere has been dropping from the clouds, entrains an enchanting Bai Se (White Color) tail smoke to directly soar them to come, the speed is not quick, but the oppression strength of that terror, actually the command was in everyone in linkage defense guard shield to feel the huge pressure.

Almost is several garish free time, that huge Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere has dropped from the clouds, hit maliciously in being away from Tang Sect linkage defense guard shield ground about 200 meters away.

The earth first is slight shakes, presents fierce shivering, the Tang Sect people at present are snow white. Not fierce thundering, ground and terror that shock-wave only then melts.

Just likes raging waves great wolf general Bai Se (White Color) shock-wave hit maliciously on Tang Sect here linkage defense guard shield, making the safety mask burst out intense ripples.

“DDD!”Grating alarm sound along with it resounding, this is the linkage defense guard shield carrying capacity was close to the limit the signal.

At this time, the fort Soul Engineer Corp also remaining last people must retreat, Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp and Shrek Seven Devils and the others also in against rain shade.

“The Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp preparation, listening to me to direct, the linkage attack preparation starts! Other people accelerate to evacuate! First Senior Brother, you walk first.”The Huo Yuhao sound spreads to everyone ear instantaneously.

The Beibei anger shouted to clear the way: “It is not good, Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp is I directs, you walk first.”

Huo Yuhao has turned round suddenly, the double pupil stares at Beibei, dignified [say / way]: “First Senior Brother, I can stay behind with Dong'er, direct Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp, please believe me, I will not crack a joke with my lover. Only then I stay behind, can bring Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp to be out of danger. Believes me, now Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp not in Bright Capital City.”

The apprentic brothers many years, Beibei is intelligent, he understood instantaneously the meaning of Huo Yuhao, deep staring his eyes, “we were waiting for you. Everybody removes with me.”At the same time was saying, he several other person of as well as Ji Juechen and the others waves toward Shrek Seven Devils, returned to the body to fire into 18 leaves of Gate of the Dead.

Also at this time, the Bright Capital City direction, is an intense white light shoots up to the sky. That dazzling halo illuminates Bright Capital City once more, the terrifying oppression strength also instantaneously appeared in Tang Sect here linkage defense guard shield.

Everyone knows, Tang Sect linkage defense guard shield without the support of Soul Engineer, and itself quality was also inferior of opposite party Soul Guidance Array place, is impossible to support this has struck.

That a moment ago reason that struck the deviation, because did not have locking of upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device, can only be simple sent out by the judgments of several nine levels of Soul Engineer. The erroneous 200 meters, this time, was only impossible to hit again leaning.

“Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp, lifts off along with me.”Huo Yuhao gives a loud shout, holds the hand of Wang Dong'er to jump instantaneously, flies toward the upper air.

-------------------------------------------------

First apologized to everybody, yesterday cartoon sent in afternoon, was really sorry. Everybody transmits: Peerless Tang Sect 123, can consult the cartoon in our prestige platform.

Also, yesterday was three chapters of salvos, when everybody engaging in fierce battle monthly ticket, I only want to ask the recommendation ticket, but must trouble everybody to support. 11 times, will have the persistent eruption. 10.1 my symbol, has thanked everybody's support diligently, therefore, requesting earnestly everybody to recommend the ticket and monthly ticket supports the point. Thanks.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-552-part-1





Volume 12

#552 - Linkage! Guiding Artillery


Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp, is in Shrek Academy three Soul Engineer Corp most formidable one, not only equips well, cultivates for is also highest, completely comprised of six rings above Soul Master. Moreover is Shrek Academy direct subordinate is. Regarding Huo Yuhao, they, not only respects, has the respect of being filled with. Especially in the beforehand fight, Huo Yuhao has been leading their victorious enemies time and time again, therefore, when Huo Yuhao issues the order, although they look that the light beam of distant place raised once more, nobody hesitates, all lifts off under the Spiritual Detection direction of Huo Yuhao instantaneously.

Rises into airborne, Huo Yuhao has not escaped immediately, but looks out huge bright sphere that Bai Se (White Color) light beam lifts off later condenses becomes.

Under, Soul Guidance Array, a Tang Sect numerous high level broke in 16 leaves of Gate of the Dead with fort Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer at the final moment.

“Linkage Guiding Cannon, preparation!”

Each Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer have made the uniform movement, a yellow small artillery shoulders on the shoulder.

“Centered on me, guiding intensity 100%.”

Huo Yuhao shoulder, similarly many a like this small artillery, stated differently, this caliber seems, only then less than 100 millimeters small artillery is actually the golden color.

golden light suddenly to launch, actually lifted off less than 30 meters, from the sky stagnates, in this golden light beam peak, congealed rapidly golden bright sphere.

At this time, that the distant place Bright Capital City direction launches rolled Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere to rise the peak, started to fall toward here.

200 yellow color rays almost launch in two seconds completely, not toward Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere that drops, but all falls above bright sphere of that golden light beam peak, in Huo Yuhao has launched.

In the Huo Yuhao eye the god glittering, this flickers, his mind intensity promotes Absolute instantaneously. The small artillery that the shoulder carries moved instantaneously. Immediately, the caliber surpasses ten meters bright golden color light beam electricity to shoot together.

Bai Se (White Color) and golden color, are almost from the sky blend instantaneously, compared with huge Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere, that golden light beam seems nothing. However. When the golden light hit above the white light, that Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere from the sky has stopped unexpectedly. Above were many a golden light membrane.

The cheers are almost resound Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp instantaneously.

Huo Yuhao crosswise flings, that rolled Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere by far to fly. Directly soars the Bright Capital City direction to fly to shoot to go.

Yes, this is Guiding Cannon. One of Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device. Formidable Guiding Cannon, its existence, more to cope with these tops installs the soul big shell surely. But this time, Huo Yuhao actually resists linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device of enemy with it.

Guiding Cannon itself not any striking power, but is also most has tough one Soul Power manifestation most gently.

Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere of that terror directly soars at the same time that Bright Capital City flies, Huo Yuhao then looked down a ground.

From the airborne bird's eye view is most direct-viewing, he noticed that is terrorist attack strength that first Bright Capital City linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device erupts. A central depth exceeds 200 meters, the diameter kilometer. Only has the endocrater that beforehand Tang Sect the linkage defense guard shield range has.

“Walks!”Huo Yuhao waves, bringing 200 Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer to turn around walks. But at this time, following 16 leaves of Gate of the Dead just closed.

All within the computation of Huo Yuhao, when he leads Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp to lift off, has been separated from Bright Capital City Soul Guidance Array to launch that bright sphere attack category. Is impossible to be attacked.

But if he chooses retreats from Gate of the Dead immediately. Actually absolutely impossible before the second round of terrifying shell falls retreats.

That side Bright Capital City, the biggest problem does not have formidable Soul Engineer Corp to exist now, without them, does not have the pursuit strength. But the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp strength perhaps and Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp has the disparity, but compared with general Soul Engineer Corp, wanted to be too many formidable. Moreover, Bright Capital City majority of upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device was destroyed. The detection ability is limited. Huo Yuhao can definitely bring Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp to escape, why this was also he a moment ago said to Beibei, Sun-Moon flower country Soul Engineer Corp not, Beibei agreed immediately he remained. Because only then he stays behind, can have the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp true evacuation.

The terrifying Bai Se (White Color) light group directly soars Bright Capital City to go, Huo Yuhao deeply believed. The might of this gadget can compare favorably with one nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball absolutely surely. Bright Capital City Soul Guidance Array place, is he has seen absolutely most formidable.

If this gadget falls in Bright Capital City, that......

In this time, is the Bai Se (White Color) light beam shoots up to the sky together, moreover is flies up at angle spatially into. That flying shoots at the Bright Capital City direction Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere. Instantaneously by this spoken parts light hit.

“Bang!”The large explosion resounds in the upper air, the sky turned into an incandescent color completely, this time, entire Bright Capital City was illuminated.

“Was a pity!”Huo Yuhao depressed claps the palm of the hand, helpless shaking the head. Cannot give Bright Capital City that side bigger attack eventually.

However, after this strikes, for them, the time was also enough. Locks without upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device, but the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp retreating speed is extremely also fast incomparable, Bright Capital City Soul Guidance Array impossible to pose the threat to them.

As for also has high level Soul Engineer to pursue, that possibly has. However, a moment ago Guiding Cannon strikes to be possible, not only to direct that Bai Se (White Color) bright sphere, is a deterrent! Formidable Soul Engineer Corp takes to the deterrent of match.

Nine levels of Soul Engineer of any rank, even if Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, sees that to say the Guiding Cannon light beam, has to consider whether own strength can resist formidable Soul Engineer Corp linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device.

Huo Yuhao draws Tang Wutong to raise in airborne of high position, making 200 Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer fly first toward the distant place, they fall on the rear bring up the rear.

Spiritual Detection comprehensively launches, covers to the Bright Capital City direction, whether monitors some that side people to pursue.

Facts showed that formerly that terrifying upper air collision had had extremely huge shock-wave. Although shotpoint not in Bright Capital City, but that large explosion has almost also blocked sky over entire Bright Capital City. Even if some people want to pursue, in this case also has to choose the self-preservation first. But upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device that these just lifted off also completely vanishes in puff of smoke in this large explosion, does not remain the sediment, in this case, wants to continue to monitor Huo Yuhao their whereabouts, is really too difficultly and is too difficult.

Until at this moment, Huo Yuhao finally relaxed, this draws Tang Wutong to pursue front Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp to depart.

After having departed about hundred li (0.5km). After multiple changes, did not determine after any Surveying Soul Guidance Device and pursuing troops exist, Huo Yuhao then leads everybody to fall into woods. Is suppressing weak feeling on the mind, recited the Gate of the Dead incantation again. Just. He really cannot support nine leaves of front doors now, with the help of Mermaid Princess Li Ya, releases three leaves of front doors in the incantation.

Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer file, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong also enter. Although this war does not have the personnel to lose finally, but they also too need to rest.

Sky over Bright Capital City the incandescent color has continued for nearly ten minutes, completely is gloomy. But entire Bright Capital City, at this time is actually completely during a piece is scared.

The loss of common people are not actually big, when the initial terror thunders resounds, the aristocrat is also good, common people. All was actually awakened from the sleep, after being awakened, although they do not dare to go out, but observes outside all from the window.

Therefore, they saw the airborne ever emerging strange picture. Listens to that terror to thunder, what is more important, they also saw imperial palace direction that large explosion.

Is nearer from the imperial palace, person who more has the status in Bright Capital City. Although nearby the imperial palace does not permit the construction high-rise construction, but can see very clearly from the distant place. Nine levels of that terror installed Soul Guidance Cannon ball puncture stiffly the imperial palace layer on layer to defend surely, finally attacked in one of the imperial palace Core Area territory, shocks person who all saw.

Where is imperial palace that? Is the Sun-Moon Empire Bright Capital City true core is at! Although shortly after Xu Tianran just ascended the throne. But after he ascends the throne. Sun-Moon Empire progresses day by day, has seized the big piece Sky Soul Empire land, particularly some time ago just announced that Sky Soul Empire extinguishes the country thoroughly, after the domain integrates the Sun-Moon Empire rule completely, the Xu Tianran prestige in Bright Capital City elevates the extremely terrifying status. Even has been honored as one generation of enlightened emperors.

But under such premise, their this one generation of enlightened emperors actually has faced the so direct attack, everyone not clear this enlightened emperor is also living, in imperial palace situation actually how, how can also not be scared? This eventually becomes a sleepless night.

In Bright Capital City. The alarm sound, explosive sound and noise, the rays of various Soul Guidance Device twinkles, unceasingly various fragments and detritus that from airborne falls, suddenly, this first under heaven city has messed up completely. This attack takes to the Bright Capital City influence by far the destructive power be stronger.

Bright Capital City imperial palace.

Xu Tianran this time complexion is very ugly, palely like the paper, in the double pupil besides the strong anger, is dim atheistic.

It can be said that since this has been he ascends the throne the most serious attack, Xu Tianran has not thought that is in Bright Capital City imperial palace, has the king in strongest Soul Guidance Device country as the world now, will face the direct attack of Soul Guidance Device unexpectedly.

That installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to make the extremely profound impression on him surely, the puncture ability of that terror, was not any nine levels of Soul Guidance Device that currently Sun-Moon Empire has can have absolutely. Although from the overall might, seems not too strong, but wants to guess to obtain with the foot heel, this type installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball specially to develop to cope with the Sun-Moon Empire linkage defense guard shield surely.

----------------------------------------------

Well, Magic Chef of Ice and Fire swims me to favor many people not to hit the abyss! Hitting the abyss can accumulate that to the material that the partner breaks through. Hey, friendship prompt. The abyss I projected on fifth to close.

Downloads our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire tour, welcome to prestige - platform, under the click platform button is good.

For these days the peerless Tang Sect cartoon sent to Little Huo to enter Shrek Academy finally, to let him saw Wang Dong as soon as possible, I will send with a sense of urgency.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-552-part-2





Volume 12

#552 - Linkage! Guiding Artillery


The imperial palace, Xu Tianran almost can affirm at this time luckily that any sole linkage defense guard shield is at present impossible to block that to strike. In other words, if that type installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to have surely enough, subverts the Sun-Moon Empire rule sufficiently. This is the most fearful place.

This type installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely not from Sun-Moon Empire, then, inevitably from belonging to the Douluo Continent three countries, when did that belong to the Douluo Continent three countries has so formidable Soul Guidance Device R &amp\; D capability?

Side Xu Tianran, stands is wearing Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui of black long gown. Ye Xishui itself also lives in the imperial palace, therefore, when that large explosion appears, she is also the earliest possible time responds. Stated differently, Xu Tianran lives in the imperial palace core place, but she actually lives in the corner of imperial palace, therefore, has not come under the most direct attack.

She has not gone to trace the enemy, at this time, anything compared with preserving a Xu Tianran life more important matter.

Holds on to the throne with Xu Tianran, is Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui also more and more discovered that this king in fact more and more had not been controlled by oneself, the strength that he shows is also getting stronger and stronger. Sun-Moon Empire background, imagines her by far is much deeper.

However, in this case, Ye Xishui also can only continue to make Holy Spirit Cult develop like this. Xu Tianran is her half apprentice, in the meantime, Xu Tianran is also in Imperial Family the firmest Holy Spirit Cult supporter, at least the present is so. At present, Sun-Moon Empire to belonging to the Douluo Continent three countries resorts to arms, critical moment. If Xu Tianran died at this time, the new to go on stage king has not known to Holy Spirit Cult what kind of mood.

The Ye Xishui originally thinks one are can grasp all these. However. She actually started not to think now, because of Sun-Moon Empire aspect developed latest Soul Guidance Device, has made her also feel the fear. The Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp overall strength, Ye Xishui does not have any assurance to resist completely.

But that Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp actually takes orders in Emperor Sun-Moon Empire.

Therefore, under many benefit ponders, Ye Xishui can only fully support Xu Tianran, simultaneously finds the way to continue to Sun-Moon Empire to deepen the seepage. Therefore, she has not gone to pursue.

“!”Xu Tianran coughs two, immediately has the bloody foam to spout from his mouth. Nearby in waits on to hurry the clean towel to deliver.

Xu Tianran complexion changed ugly. Pats the flying towel, has wiped a lower jaw with the hand.

He cultivates the talent is extremely good, because competed for the throne time interval to go to the both legs with the brothers long ago, injuring of enormous degree the vitality, affected the display of his talent. Afterward had used various best medicines, this can cultivating to push to rise to the Titled Douluo level. May in fact. His true strength and Titled Douluo compare have the disparity.

Innate Body Douluo Du Busi takes the life to initiate to him as the price attacks fatally that time, has taken to him the quite serious injury, although has been recuperating, actually throughout cannot to heal and recover completely, but this time, he received nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely the baptism. It may be said that is in the wound adds the wound, within the body injury already very heavily. Although just had carried on the treatment by cure system Soul Master. But the effect is not quite good. His Martial Soul source as well as Spiritual Source are damaged seriously, needed to recuperate for a long time has the possibility of reply. Moreover, he breaks the influence of both legs, to the huge load of his body.

The court physicians do not dare to tell him the truth, but Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui actually explicit told him, even if there is a Heaven and Earth Treasure support of most top, perhaps he also lived is about 50 years. But he is also less than now 40 years old. 50 years, i.e. he exactly is less than 100 years old. This to one is the king of Titled Douluo rank, was really too short.

In this case, Xu Tianran mood possibly good?

More and more forms appear side Xu Tianran, everyone is very silent. Bright Capital City this time, it can be said that suffered the unprecedented huge attack. Even must surpass that underground arsenal large explosion. Although that time large explosion has affected half Bright Capital City, the common people lose seriously. But that time must unexpectedly be from inside to outside, is not Bright Capital City defensive power is insufficient.

But this time, directly attacked is actually the imperial palace! Only in significance entirely different, moreover broke through the imperial palace defense. The kings are injured directly, this makes attack that at heart Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer come under huge.

The body of Xu Tianran leans on completely on the chair, he actually completely has hit mind now. At this time, he very clear cannot get down absolutely but actually, the good phase of otherwise, just building, will possibly come under the fatal blow.

“Did prime minister come?”Xu Tianran asked with the somewhat hoarse sound.

“Your majesty, the old minister just arrived.”The prime minister walks from behind, arrives in front of Xu Tianran, salutes respectfully, in eye actually somewhat startled color.

Xu Tianran coldly looked at his one eyes, “is this sea high-speed change direction enemy who you said?”

On the prime minister face the look full is bitter and astringent, “feudal official knows the crime.”

Xu Tianran coldly [say / way]: “You stand first one side.”Courteous reception that prime minister time, has not sat down again.

The ministers immediately have caught up, at this time incessantly was the table loyal important moment, what was more important, they must confirm the situation of king, once Xu Tianran died in this attack, then, they must carry on other to operate.

What the Imperial Family members come is earliest, initially and Xu Tianran struggled that several imperial princes, although saw the first sovereign. But is Xu Tianran, will be impossible sovereign all male offspring to exterminate first completely, that will be the Imperial Family ancestors and relatives does not permit. If he dares to do, perhaps will not be hesitated all lagging behind thrones by these people.

Therefore, is hoping Xu Tianran dies, not only but a person.

“Can crown prince be well?”The Xu Tianran sinking sound asked.

Worship Hall consecrates the half step to go forward, “crown prince crown prince the palace has the Eternal Star Field protection, all well, asking your majesty to feel relieved.”

“Um.”Xu Tianran nodded. How he can not know that side the crown prince has any Soul Guidance Device to protect, Eternal Star Field is honored as Sun-Moon Empire strongest Defensive Soul Guidance Device, is the protection in his imperial palace. But before this Ju Zi(orange) goes to battle, did not feel relieved to the safety of crown prince extremely, to let her feels at ease, Xu Tianran has then delivered to that side Eternal Star Field the crown prince as the defense.

Before that nine levels installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely the striking power, although was strong, but was also not enough to break through the defense of Eternal Star Field, the crown prince naturally was safe and sound.

Xu Tianran works as all people to ask that i.e. gives certain people to listen.

Hears the crown prince to be all right, really the complexions of many people slightly change. So long as the country has the crown prince, even if were Xu Tianran died, was not one's turn them to inherit the throne.

The Xu Tianran corners of the mouth place reveals color of the teasing. Asked to old man: “Old Kong, how long imperial does Soul Engineer Corp also come back?”

Was called Old Kong by him, the body is very big, a grey Bai Se (White Color) short roots of the hair root stands erect, the body puts on unexpectedly is the bright yellow long gown, this is only then Imperial Family can wear, but can see from his surname, this is not the Imperial Family member.

He has stood another side of Xu Tianran, complexion quiet like water, as if before, all that all has have nothing to do with him, but if will carefully observe will discover that his body will have an invisible strength to send out, will cover Xu Tianran, will look like the Xu Tianran protector is ordinary.

Position that Old Kong stands, even be away from Xu Tianran to be nearer than Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui. But he stands there, in the imposing manner, does not lose to Ye Xishui many unexpectedly.

Xu Tianran listened to his words, nods the head slightly, said: “Passes on me to order, not to hesitate at all costs, searches for the enemy trail. Can Old Ye once come back?”

“Your majesty, old minister in this.”Not far away, two people walk quickly toward here. Sky over the imperial palace forbids to fly absolutely. Even if Worship Hall consecrates to be no exception.

Ye Yulin complexion, is more unattractive than Xu Tianran many, Xu Tianran experiences personally heavy wound, he is depressed.

When that large explosion erupts, Ye Yulin in airborne, he was almost similar to the stray cur turned around to fall at that time generally, even if this, was certainly affected, has destroyed the treasures of two guard, this can is well.

Airborne energy storm makes him not have the means to trace the enemy trail. He saw before falling that the distortion ray in distant place that piece of light barrier is changing pale, some inside as if many Soul Guidance Device appear, does not have anybody's trail.

“Old Ye, who is, investigated thoroughly?”Xu Tianran has not lost one's temper at this time, maintains very calm, even be usually calmer.

The anger bursts oneself, his present physical condition was not very good, in this crucial time, he is calm, otherwise did not match to be called one generation of fierce and ambitiouses.

Ye Yulin sinking sound track: “Enemy strength is very strong, should from belonging to the Douluo Continent three countries, they have more than one Soul Engineer Corp.”

Hears these words, the surroundings people hold breath cold air.

More than one Soul Engineer Corp, what does this mean?

If this attack is 12 draws support from formidable Soul Guidance Device to create personally, this can also understand. Because the Sun-Moon Empire upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device blockade ability is strong, always has the fish slip through, but, if were entire Soul Engineer Corp touches around Bright Capital City not to be discovered that this issue may be big. Moreover is more than one Soul Engineer Corp!

Ye Yulin sinking sound track: “Your majesty, I have sent for going to that side to continue to examine, please temporarily do not attack. These enemies should retreat, but also has left some traces.”

Xu Tianran looks at Ye Yulin, said: “Old Ye, said in detail that these enemies are any situations.”

-------------------------------------------------

11! The big eruption starts! Um, our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire tour also has the massive good activities to send out, everybody do not forget the attention.( To be continued. If you like this work, welcome you to cast the recommendation ticket and monthly ticket, your support, is I biggest power.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-552-part-3





Volume 12

#553 - Attack From Shrek?


Ye Yulin eyes narrows the eyes, said: “The origins of these enemies are without a doubt, surely from belonging to the Douluo Continent three countries. I first rush to that side, what sees is Soul Guidance Protective Cover, in other words, these people have established Soul Guidance Array place outside the Bright Capital City city, is used as the protection. But some time fishy that this Soul Guidance Array establishes, as if happen to presented that time of chain explosion in our upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device, if all were calculate, that was too fearful. In other words, these that upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device explodes, is these people creates.”

Xu Tianran takes a deep breath, suppresses in oneself heart forcefully the anger, “who can tell me, situation why our upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device will have the chain explosion? If the enemy does, then, how they do let our upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device explosion?”

Another Worship Hall consecrates saying: “According to the observation and judgment of feudal official, our upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device very likely from exploding. If there is an enemy to launch the attack to carry out attack, we will immediately certainly discover that simultaneously will intercept by the Soul Guidance Array that side, is what kind, also almost all upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device will not be annihilated.”

“From exploding?”The eye of Xu Tianran stared instantaneously, the chest transmits an intermittent severe pain, making him have to the second rolling trig own anger again.

That consecrates the forced smile saying: “From then situation, looked like from very much exploding. If from exploding, then also has another possibility. That was our upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device is installed demolishes the installment surely. Only then so, can make them explode under control continually. In other words. These enemies very probably had one type to conceal our Surveying Soul Guidance Device, touched carries on the ability that the timing bomb installed to our Surveying Soul Guidance Device by.”

Peaceful, such remarks, the surroundings immediately are similar to deathly stillness general calming down.

This analysis was really too astonishing, if the invading enemy can touching arrive by upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device, that said that he can also touch into the imperial palace? Wants why to do what?

This time nine levels installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to break through the defense to explode surely, if the enemy did install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball immediate packing one nine levels surely in the imperial palace? This situation is unable to imagine simply.

Ye Yulin nodded, said: “Old Shen said is reasonable. The feudal officials also think very strangely. Enemy that Soul Guidance Array, the ray twists, does not have the means to see clearly by my eyesight and Spiritual Power is actually any situation. We were three people went together at that time, in the enemy also presented 78 people to cope with us. The strengths of these people are very strong, at least is also cultivating of Soul Douluo rank is, their actually majority are not Soul Engineer. But is Soul Master. Each Martial Soul is very formidable, particularly is one person, the body puts on, probably is also Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, above is sending out the extremely intense cold air. They coordinate extremely tacitly, and surreptitious......”

At that moment. When Ye Yulin fight narrated facing Huo Yuhao and the others him in detail. Listened to his description, made most Sun-Moon Empire high levels feel confusingly. Such match. It is not general formidabe!

“......, From then situation, if makes me judge, I think that these enemies should grasp one type has been similar to stealth Soul Guidance Device and so on thing, can therefore make so numerous Soul Engineer unconscious touching actually not be discovered to Bright Capital City nearby. And some powerhouses even can shield the most Surveying Soul Guidance Device survey strength. Meanwhile, they have very strong Soul Guidance Device attack capability. Before at least 2000 intermediate surely installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to suppress our Soul Guidance Array place. Perhaps such strength, wants that to belong to the Douluo Continent three countries collaborates to take. Perhaps this is they finally copes with our cards in a hand.”

“In frontal battlefield. They are not the War-God Empress matches, has found out the means of this removing firewood from under the pot. While our country behind void. Launches the attack. The old minister is not clear, why they can the thousand li(500 km), in the south, arrive around Bright Capital City in a flash suddenly suddenly. Even if they all comprised of Soul Engineer, is impossible to equip over eight levels Flight Soul Guidance Device.”

Xu Tianran brow tight wrinkle, being lost in thought. This situation is is truly unreadable. Everyone is almost confused. Because of until now, them has not seen clearly the true situation of enemy.

Is the unknown enemy is fearful, this point everyone understands.

“Your majesty!”In this time, remained silent Ye Xishui has been opening the mouth suddenly.

“Um?”Xu Tianran changes Ye Xishui, on the face look immediately becomes respectful, but Ye Xishui Limit Douluo, discussed only cultivates personally is, she in Sun-Moon Empire absolutely was topest existence, let alone she was also controlling Grim Reaper Soul Guidance Device.

“You said.”Xu Tianran has not called Ye Xishui directly, because between he and Ye Xishui, has the relations of deeper level in private, but everyone knows that Ye Xishui is Holy Spirit Cult truly control, therefore, is being numerous ministers, he naturally cannot call.

Ye Xishui said: “Can have this strength, not necessarily is belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries, your majesty has forgotten, a place, has probably such strength.”

In the Xu Tianran heart moves, complexion instantaneously changed, “what you said that Shrek Academy?”

Ye Xishui nods the head slightly, “good, is Shrek Academy. Your majesty thinks, that side main battlefield, Sky Soul Empire destruction, but Shrek Academy gets rid, may also rescue some Sky Soul Empire finally remnants in the frontal battlefield, does not have what achievements. background that this and Shrek Academy for ten thousand years saves has to be incompatible. It is not their true strength manifests. No doubt is because Shrek Academy will possibly retain, but similarly, why Shrek Academy possibly is not because true main force not in reason?”

“According to our news, Shrek City has been expanding for these years, moreover relates closely with Star Dou Forest Soul Beast. That named Huo Yuhao boy, after founding Spirit Transferring Pagoda, lets relations between their Shrek Academy and Star Dou Forest is no longer hostile. But several years ago, Star Lou Empire recaptures Bright Struggle Mountain Range that to fight, Huo Yuhao showed has been similar to the stealth ability. At that time, he touched my mind barrier to be discovered. He even can borrow the Beast God Di Tian strength to come with me to resist. This child afterward also had appeared that side the main battlefield, causes the losses of our many upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device. From this time situation, likely is he gets rid. New-style Soul Guidance Device that if Shrek Academy studies comes commander by him, I do not return to feel odd.”

Listened to a Ye Xishui saying, Xu Tianran also to think, but he as before was the brow tight wrinkle, “this really possible? He how old? Initially, he represented Tang Sect came Bright Capital City to participate in Great Continental Soul Master Academy Fighting Spirit Competition the time. Less than 20 years old, although passed for several years, is twenty years old.”

Regarding Huo Yuhao, the Xu Tianran impression is very deep, because not only Huo Yuhao own strength is very strong, is because. Initially Huo Yuhao also sits the wheelchair to appear. This point makes his impression profound.

Ye Xishui coldly snorted, “anything is impossible. He is Dragon God Douluo Mu En final disciple, is in itself Twin Martial Souls. Ye Yulin said match who a moment ago he faced wore Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, simultaneously the body sent out the intense cold air, I looked, likely was this boy. He has Absolute Ice Martial Soul.”

Xu Tianran somewhat is as before unbelievable. Said: “But, Old Ye said. The strength of that person arrived at the Titled Douluo standard absolutely. If not depend upon enough formidable Soul Guidance Device, he can defeat the opposite party not necessarily.”

Ye Xishui sighed, said: “Your majesty, cannot be hoodwinked by representation. Moreover, on this world, has the talent to exist eventually. By the current situation, can threaten our country truly. No longer is belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries, or is both countries. But is that Shrek Academy. Sees according to the old body, your majesty only needs to order to give War-God Empress, however her storm Shrek City, destroys Shrek City, the instigator of Bright Capital City this matter also will collapse then of itself. To that time, regardless of they are fighting with any way, definitely will turn back in order to help friendly forces Shrek City, in the frontal battlefield, they are impossible to have any achievement.”

“May not.”The prime minister has stood, sinking sound track: “Old minister believes that now is also not and Shrek Academy official resistance time. Asked your majesty three to think.”

“Prime minister please say.”Xu Tianran signals by nodding to him, hints him to say own idea. Although the tactic of this prime minister had the problem. May also be because this time match is extremely strange. That is not the way things should be can judge. Xu Tianran after calming down, mood changed for the better several points. To this brilliant prime minister, he is really to have a high opinion. But he is between clear Ye Xishui and Shrek Academy these gratitude and grudges, therefore thinks unavoidably the idea of Ye Xishui has the selfish ingredient in inside.

Prime minister sinking sound track: “Just the remote antiquity consecrated also said that Shrek Academy has ten thousand years of background, ten thousand years ago, they are Continent's First Academy. In that Shrek City, actually to hide the how formidable strength, at present we are unable to judge. From recent Shrek City that side war, came from Star Dou Forest beast tide. Inhabit region of Star Dou Forest on strongest Soul Beast as Continent, Ten Great Ferocious Beasts has five, has Beast God Di Tian commander. Of overall strength, absolutely is extremely terrifying. May be this, under their attack, Shrek City as before is whole-heartedly as stable as the rock of Gibraltar, according to our news, that side Shrek City even used some special strengths to make Beast God Di Tian directly not appear in the battlefield from beginning to end.”

“Remote antiquity consecrated also said a moment ago that Huo Yuhao can reply on the Beast God strength. What does this mean? Once we change to Shrek City the main attack direction, might bring in collaboration of Shrek City and Star Dou Forest very much. To that time, was not good, will bring the ruinous disaster to our armies.”

“Old minister believes that Shrek Academy after all on Continent is quite neutral, although it because of the region reason, will favor belonging to the Douluo Continent three countries, moreover once for them and I for enemy. But this situation is different. Sky Soul Empire was extinguished, if we can rout again Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire. Then, Shrek City does not want, can only choose the compromise. But the premise is, we do not shake the Shrek City basis. At least judging from the present situation, we cannot be the main battlefield Shrek City. Otherwise, Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire, can be centered on Shrek City, resists our country army together, if adds on the Star Luo big forest again Soul Beast, then, is hard to imagine finally.”

“farting!”Ye Xishui drinks one coldly, “you are not understanding. Can Star Dou Forest collaborate with Shrek City? You simply are dream of a fool. Spirit Transferring Pagoda that although Huo Yuhao organized has relaxed the relations between two, but, do not forget that the contradictory number between human and Soul Beast by ten thousand years, Soul Beast will send out to help humanity massively? Simply laughable. They looked forward to humanity to kill one another, die were good. Such will not have humanity to need Soul Ring. Your this analysis, simply is incomprehensible nonsense.”

Prime minister cold [say / way]: “Old man considers for the country completely, asking the remote antiquity to consecrate to pay attention to your words. Shrek Academy regarding belonging to Soul Master of Douluo Continent three countries', is sacred place. Moreover, regarding some hidden world clan/sect is also so, they relate closely, maintains several thousand years. Once we aim at Shrek Academy, quite therefore makes entire belong to the Douluo Continent three countries as well as three border all clan/sect in all unites copes with us. Is this favorable for the country really?”

Listened to the words of prime minister, Xu Tianran to nod, the prime minister said right, significance of Shrek Academy on entire Continent was extraordinary. Initially, Shrek Academy called from a high place, unites massive Soul Master to coordinate to belong to the Douluo Continent three countries defeats Sun-Moon Empire several thousand years ago, thus integrated in Sun-Moon Empire as well as Sun-Moon Continent the Douluo Continent domain.

But this time, Sun-Moon Empire started, in a short time has seized swiftly and violently and Sky Soul Empire suddenly. But belongs to Douluo Continent three countries' Soul Guidance Device strength judgment to the Sun-Moon Empire is insufficient, has caused the important reason of this disaster.

Shrek Academy entered the war now, but this Sun-Moon Empire aspect is actually bigger in the Soul Guidance Technology superiority. Currently speaking, Shrek Academy at least completely has not invested into the war.

--------------------------------------------------

Guarantees a minimum second, directly is 4000 characters, sincere. Also waits for anything, quickly votes. When next again 400 tickets, in fact only needs 200 tickets.( To be continued. If you like this work, welcome you to cast the recommendation ticket and monthly ticket, your support, is I biggest power.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-553





Volume 12

#554 - Confucius And Laozi


Ye Xishui said: “Shrek Academy will enter the war sooner or later, sooner or later will have what difference? Moreover this time matter, clearly has the close relation with Shrek Academy. Attacks Shrek Academy, is simplest direct effective. Also wants to neglect fundamentals and concentrate on details? Do you have the good means?”

Prime minister sinking sound track: “Feudal official thinks that at present we have seized Sky Soul Empire throughout, at this time, consolidated very important. Can ask War-God Empress to lead some powerhouses to turn back in order to help friendly forces temporarily, first solves, then continues to start the war, in the meantime, we can also draw support from these days, consolidates in the rule of Sky Soul Empire, simultaneously draws support from the wealth that Sky Soul Empire brings, strengthens the research and manufacture of Soul Guidance Device. For on, your majesty, rear area stabilizes safely very importantly! Does not have War-God Empress to protect, feudal official some do not feel relieved your safety.”

The Xu Tianran complexion slightly changes, “I have not needed the woman to protect. Has Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp to turn back in order to help friendly forces fully. However, as soon as possible actually must investigate thoroughly these to penetrate our country enemies where. Which love minister has the good means?”

His vision has swept from numerous Sun-Moon Empire high levels face, during most people are lost in thought.

Ye Xishui cold sound track: “Your majesty, the opinion of old body does not have any private grudges ingredient definitely. That Huo Yuhao oneself carries on the stealth by Spiritual Power. If he cultivated the Titled Douluo level in the several years, then, was Titled Douluo of Absolute Martial Soul owner, in the future surely is the national big trouble. Must in eradicate him most in a short time is good. Has not studied stealth Soul Guidance Device including us at present, Shrek Academy is impossible. In my opinion, that sneaks our country Soul Engineer Corp, likely depends upon being similar that Huo Yuhao had in the community stealth ability. Attacks Shrek Academy, at least must directs to cope Huo Yuhao and his Soul Engineer Corp, is the best means.”

“If your majesty wants to unify Continent. Then, sooner or later must cope with Shrek Academy. The we and Shrek Academy contradictions between are irreconcilable. Definitely will have outcome. Also can raise the tiger to create disaster inadequately? So long as War-God Empress by Myriad Great Thunder certainly that Shrek City thorough destruction, then, Continent Soul Master inevitably becomes loose sands. Believes by the War-God Empress military wisdom. Certainly will have the means to achieve this point. So long as your majesty agreed. The old body is willing to lead personally to protect country Saint to teach to go, coordinating War-God Empress to move.”

“Your majesty may not.”The prime minister called out hurriedly: “Your majesty. As the matter stands, again did not have the leeway of swivel. Once is not successful, we all efforts will possibly put to the running water before! Asked your majesty three to think. At present excellent situation, when is primarily steadily.”

Ye Xishui got angry finally. The ice-cold chill in the air jumps to shoot from her double pupil suddenly, the surroundings temperature drops, the terrifying oppression strength is almost erupts from her instantaneously.

A god of death anger, world discoloration. All people felt that terrifying pressure comes, as if must rip fragment their bodies.

But at this moment, has also stood in Xu Tianran Old Kong goes forward one step, on him has the green ray twinkle faintly. A gentle strength blooms outward, has covered toward the body of Ye Xishui unexpectedly. Collides with the formidable power and influence on Ye Xishui bursting out suddenly together.

Ye Xishui coldly snorted, Old Kong was upper body slightly rocked, although slightly occupied leeward. But has not eaten anything to owe.

Old Kong light looks at Ye Xishui, turned side Xu Tianran by the advance party first to this Grim Reaper Douluo.

Two big powerhouses each other confront, is the slightest does not let.

Ye Xishui just erupted time, prime minister original complexion became pale, but this Old Kong got rid, the surrounding all returned to normal, Old Kong did not drop the wind by strength of the facing Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui unexpectedly. This grade of strength, if passes on, shocked Soul Master and Soul Engineer sufficiently.

Ye Xishui coldly snorted, “Kong Deming, can you oppose inadequately with the old body?”

Old Kong Kong Deming sinking sound track: “Here is an imperial palace, is working as in front of your majesty, remote antiquity for inviting dead weight.”

Ye Xishui turns head to look to Xu Tianran, “your majesty, is this your meaning?”

Xu Tianran coughs, “remote antiquity consecrates, please be patient. I know you for the empire. But this matter must need further consideration. Involves too broadly. Military affairs minister where?”

The military affairs minister hurried to walk from the one side, “your majesty, feudal official.”

Xu Tianran said: “Said your suggestion.”

Ye Xishui stands in the one side, looked at Xu Tianran one silently, has taken back oneself imposing manner, the eyeground deep place is actually the cold brightness twinkle, she felt more and more Xu Tianran did not receive own control.

Who that Kong Deming is, Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui is very clear. Kong Deming Sun-Moon Empire Worship Hall Hall Master. The body has one-fourth Imperial Family bloodlines, only loyal in Imperial Family, is in itself Sun-Moon Empire first Soul Engineer.

Right, Sun-Moon Empire most formidable Soul Engineer, is not Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, but is this on ranks second outwardly, may in fact Ye Xishui also probably acknowledge that ranks first formidable existence in the Soul Guidance Device aspect.

The Kong Deming age has surpassed 150 years old, is the heads of Sun-Moon Empire numerous position nine levels of Soul Engineer. 94 levels of Titled Douluo. But few people know that this 94 levels of Titled Douluo are Twin Martial Souls. Not only is in itself formidable Soul Engineer, is formidable Soul Master.

If were not he all uses own most energy to Soul Guidance Device in the research, he is not necessarily able to be inferior in the achievement that the Martial Soul aspect cultivated in Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao these Limit Douluo.

This is to also be honored as most approaches existences of ten levels of Soul Engineer.

Ye Xishui is in itself not profound regarding the research of Soul Guidance Device, she eventually is Soul Master. Her Grim Reaper Soul Guidance Device, important constituent is Kong Deming manufactures for her successfully. Therefore, even if Ye Xishui, has scruples to Kong Deming. Her very clear this most approaches ten levels of Soul Engineer to be formidable.

If makes Ye Xishui appraise Kong Deming, she will use the immeasurably deep four characters. Because at least had 50 years, nobody saw Kong Deming to get rid. No one knows his true strength strong. But Long Xiaoyao or Ye Xishui, when facing him, cannot win the assurance. Only from this point, has proven his strength.

Kong Deming did not appear in Worship Hall, used the entire energy to Soul Guidance Device above the research. Until recently, after him finally developed successfully Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, this appeared in the line of sight of people.

Absolutely those who let Ye Xishui unable to think, Kong Deming supports to Xu Tianran unexpectedly, stood side this king completely. Thus makes Ye Xishui be cautious about harming evildoers lest the innocent be hurt, the manner to Xu Tianran also has to have the new face. Some Kong Deming side Xu Tianran, Ye Xishui know that they did not have the life that the ability threatens this king.

Just the large explosion approached, Kong Deming is conducting the Soul Guidance Device research indoor own research, if he side Xu Tianran, Xu Tianran will not be injured.

Kong Deming stands, all Soul Engineer releases naturally own aura, coincides with him. This is the status! The true Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer first person. Even if Bright Virtue Hall Master Jing Hongchen before this plane, must hold the disciple etiquette. Ye Yulin is also so.

Kong Deming sees Ye Xishui to take back oneself imposing manner, at this time returned to side Xu Tianran, own aura has also replied normally.

Military affairs minister spoke, while had a look at these two, particularly Kong Deming, saw that Old Kong did not have what to indicate that this continued.

“Your majesty, the feudal official thinks. The remote antiquity consecrated with the prime minister says was reasonable, but had biased. The feudal officials think that by the current situation, is extremely radical and extremely conservative, is not the best coping style.”

“?”Xu Tianran somewhat surprised looks at this military affairs minister, called him, to mediate, has not thought that this military affairs minister as if also really some good suggestions, actually have given the Xu Tianran not small pleasant surprise.

The military affairs minister said: “Prime minister Sir the plan of maintaining the accomplishments of one's ancestors no doubt right, but at present front form, our army piece of Light. If asked War-God Empress to return at this time, perhaps will miss the golden opportunity. But coped with Shrek Academy at this time, feudal official thinks that the conditions were still not ripe. Therefore, some two issues.”

Prime minister coldly snorted, ridiculed: “Little here smooths over differences, if you have the means that said.”

The military affairs minister looked at prime minister one eyes, he and prime minister disagrees, everyone knows. Moreover a continuously suppressed side, after all regardless of the ability and qualifications, he must be inferior in this prime minister, the only superiority was the age.

The military affairs minister confident [say / way] of: “Your majesty is inferior to this, informs War-God Empress the situation that Bright Capital City as well as recent home have, asking the war-god empress to decide. The enemies this uses diversionary tactics now, and attacks Bright Capital City tactical some unable to see clearly. But in the military aspect, besides your majesty, only has the empress to be strongest. Might as well judge by the empress or makes the suggestion to your majesty. The empresses are in the front, is also clearest regarding front situation. If the empress thinks that now this time should attack Shrek Academy, then, your majesty can also set firm resolve.”

The military affairs minister most intelligent place, is he between the judgment that Xu Tianran and Ju Zi(orange) relate.

Is the king, is willing to give a person the military authority, this has affirmed its trust degree. Let alone, now Crown Prince Your Highness is the empress empress, nobody will suspect War-God Empress to the country and to your majesty loyalty. So far, simply has not competed for of crown prince match with the crown prince. In this case, doesn't Xu Tianran possibly trust the only wife?

-------------------------------------------------

400 ticket in addition arrive! Not places an upper limit on the eruption to continue, sets no ceiling limit. When next one is at 800 tickets. Quickly throws! Monthly ticket quickly to bowl in!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-554-part-1





Volume 12

#554 - Confucius And Laozi


Therefore, military affairs minister, although does not have any good means that but actually pushes 265, advanced on the issue Ju Zi(orange) directly. Moreover his analysis is also very reasonable. Therefore, this means are not own ability strong, but is political wisdom enough performance.

Really, listened to his words, prime minister complexion changed changed, could not say the words of opposition.

Another side, Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui is also the brow micro wrinkle, then nodded slowly.

Reason that they have approved the words of military affairs minister, besides the necessity of Ju Zi(orange) to Sun-Moon Empire loyal, was the strength.

Ju Zi(orange) has directed initially to Sky Soul Empire the war of broken bureau. Ye Xishui joined that motion. After attacking Bright Struggle Mountain Range, actually suddenly turns around to change Sky Soul Empire to initiate the storm, simultaneously blocks off the flow of news. This a series of motions come the pen just like the god, has taken away the decisive strategic tactics to then war.

Later, under Ju Zi(orange) commander, Sun-Moon Empire pushed directly into, has seized the Sky Soul Empire big piece territory. Even some people have said that if not crown prince of War-God Empress under for the birth, perhaps now unified Continent.

Xu Tianran listened to the words of military affairs minister, on the face the look also became attractive. Yes! Solicited the suggestions of Ju Zi(orange) to be very necessary at this time, after all, she effectively was keeping abreast of the front situation, how should cope at present the situation clearly.

Xu Tianran turns head to look to Kong Deming, said: “Old Kong, what do you have to suggest?”

Kong Deming light [say / way]: “Match this time sneak attacks successfully, has certain lucky ingredient. Meanwhile, should have channel to know our imperial family Soul Engineer Corp not in Bright Capital City. Let me judge, could increase. That is the match is very possible, not only mastered the stealth ability, even also has the space ability.”

“Space ability?”Hears these four characters, Xu Tianran is startled terrified. Ye Xishui is also same.

If this saying said from others mouth, they will only close with a smile. But Kong Deming is different, he now has existence of deepest attainments in the Soul Guidance Device research.

But the space ability presents in all people, only then Ye Xishui browsed slightly, only then to Limit Douluo that level. Truly will contact space ability. Kong Deming is not good. The current Soul Guidance Technology metric space ability also has the insurmountable gap.

Ye Yulin listened to the Kong Deming words, looking pensive is thinking anything.

Xu Tianran said: “Old Kong. You said in detail.”

Kong Deming nodded, said: “Small leaf narrated the entire process a moment ago, but has actually leaked a point, he judges the match is two Soul Engineer Corp. However. He in fact saw withdrawal has one, then, another? Another Soul Engineer Corp should truly launch massively has installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely. But scale of launch, very possible with the aid of Shrek Academy that side that Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery that clan/sect that called Tang Sect produced. We had also captured Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery from Sky Soul Empire, I have looked simply.”

“Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery of Tang Sect production, the structure is very exquisite, but has the destructive mechanism. Does not have the means to see clearly truly. And has used some non- Core Formation methods. This should be the real cause that Tang Sect can rise. This Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery can carry on launches continually installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, moreover can the huge number. But its volume is not small. In this case, wants to launch over ten thousand, that. At least needs massive Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery to achieve. But this quantity was very important. Because some these many shells can suppress us. But the Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery quantity is over hundred, wants to retreat, relies on invisible Soul Ability of person merely, is absolutely impossible to cover. Perhaps even if Limit Douluo cannot achieve. Therefore, I determine them to have any special space ability, making these Soul Guidance Device retreat, because of these space abilities, they can by the high-speed migration.”

Xu Tianran said with amazement: “To have space Soul Guidance Device to appear unexpectedly? This is how possible. Old Kong you......”

Kong Deming beckoned with the hand, said: “I truly have not studied the related space ability Soul Guidance Device, but actually cannot surely not have such talent on this world. However, at present this time situation, by the current Soul Guidance Technology foundation, perhaps studies space Soul Guidance Device is very difficult. After all, space Chu Wu is the limit, ships the life, moreover so the scale, has not existed. This matter must investigate thoroughly. If is really space Soul Guidance Device, must not hesitate to obtain, this regarding our country the Soul Guidance Technology development, will have the important meaning in the future.”

Nod of Xu Tianran deep to be so, said: “Your meaning?”

Kong Deming said: “First reports here situation to War-God Empress, if the remote antiquity consecrates to say well, the stealth or space Soul Guidance Device, should with that the young people who called Huo Yuhao were concerned, finding the way to get so far as this person, all naturally revealed the truth. I have created spirit to this, organized the young people of Spirit Transferring Pagoda organization is very interested. A little under the god of death crown said is very right, in the future this young people, surely will be the trusted friend big trouble of empire, if cannot subdue, must except that as soon as possible.”

In this time, suddenly, the distant place is hearing an intermittent bellow.

Kong Deming is almost subconscious kept off before the Xu Tianran body, the powerful azure light the Xu Tianran protection, Soul Engineer other on the scene also in abundance went into action instantaneously, immediately offered a sacrifice to oneself strongest Defensive Soul Guidance Device.

The beforehand attack makes them is similar to the frightened person is ordinary, the bellow that this hears suddenly is really somewhat scary.

The Ye Yulin complexion changes, “before sound is, the direction of enemy that Soul Guidance Array place transmits. Did they come back?”

Kong Deming brow tight wrinkle, “is not right. The sound is not right.”

The free time of a while, the news comes, that left behind many Soul Guidance Device temporary Soul Guidance Array to have the chain explosion, Soul Guidance Device that all left behind completely from exploding fragment. But the news that has also has one, that is these Soul Guidance Device all came from in Sun-Moon Empire own manufacture.

Xu Tianran is almost mad once more spouts a blood, immediately announces the conference to end, he must write a letter to War-God Empress personally. Meanwhile, the Bright Capital City entire city declares martial law, investigates rigorously the enemy who may have.

Bright Capital City is frightened by the slightest sound, in undead Demi-plane is actually a delight.

300 Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery withdraw completely, although this time they launched have surpassed install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball that half stored goods surely. But is limited to the loss that Sun-Moon Empire takes away. But, strategic target was actually achieved. Compared with loss and strategic target on commodity, were not anything.

Enough after meditate 12 double-hour, Huo Yuhao fully restored in peak condition.

Does not need to guess that knew around Bright Capital City recently certain tense atmosphere, he not anxiously exiting. Beibei heard that he awoke, immediately asks the person to ask him to meet in the past.

At this time undead Demi-plane may not have a death aura, three Soul Engineer Corp dance with joy. Also no wonder they so, this time, although has launched massively installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely. But they battle in Bright Capital City! After genuine enemy, Core Area territory.

Such fight, can whole body draw back unexpectedly, is hard to imagine simply.

Heavy artillery Soul Engineer Corp or Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp, gained in the substantial experiences in this fight. Although cannot say that is the tough battle, the results that but at that time the tension-filled atmosphere, the direction of Huo Yuhao as well as produced, gave these young Soul Engineer to make the deep impression, will grow to have the great benefit that was hard to judge to them in the future.

On the Huo Yuhao face reveals a light smile, both hands closes up in the front, looks to sit together the partners, greeted after everybody sat side Beibei.

Tang Wutong and he comes together, sits down in his side.

Beibei a happy expression of face, “this time should sound the alarm to Sun-Moon Empire at this time. Our Highest Flatterer were also experiments successfully. Does not know how that Xu Tianran currently the situation, does have by Highest Flatterer wrecking is extinguished.”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “Perhaps is very difficult, various Bright Capital City imperial palace defense arrangement are extremely numerous, moreover some massive Soul Engineer powerhouses. If before is they study Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, perhaps also has the possibility, but now, the possibility is very low. On Xu Tianran is certainly bringing massive Defensive Soul Guidance Device, can maintain life to oneself immediately. But must say that an influence has not had scruples is impossible. This time we have exploded the imperial palace, does not know how they reflect.”

Xu Sanshi said with a smile: “The best situation is immediately repulses the enemy from the front, in that case, our goal has been achieved, moreover in the future can also continue to disturb in Sun-Moon Empire, diverts them, to weaken them. In the near future, perhaps relied on us to be able Sun-Moon Empire to burn out.”

Beibei ill-humored [say / way]: “If so easy, our countries so will be painful? After this time after the attack of Bright Capital City, they specifically will certainly aim at us to take a series of actions. Sun-Moon Empire Soul Guidance Technology is developed, perhaps will study anything to aim at our Soul Guidance Device. Therefore, Yuhao, you cannot go to Bright Capital City to reconnoiter.”

Huo Yuhao has gawked staring, Beibei this was him just the proposal that wanted to put forward overruling, the forced smile said: “First Senior Brother, you know that what I do want to make? Not only I want to take a look at our time result, wants to inquire that the situation of front, that side Bright Capital City, the news should be most unobstructed after all.”

Beibei firm shaking the head, said: “Our motions have take risked, cannot continue to take risk again. The result that we yield was very good, in this case, wants steadily. To know the situation of front, rather much spends the time to go back to have a look. In any case, at your speed, some day the time, flew. Bright Capital City cannot touch again. Here powerhouse are too many, is not good, you fall into, all that we formerly made wasted.”

--------------------------------------------------

800 ticket in addition also come! Quick, to continue, next one when 1200 tickets, waits for you.

Makes an effort to pound the ticket! Today the brother has spelled, diligently in symbol......, Asked the monthly ticket



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-554-part-2





Volume 12

#554 - Confucius And Laozi


Huo Yuhao looks at the firmness that he said that was also not insisting, if he is the brain and inspirational figure in team, then, Beibei is the pillar. Watermark advertisement test

The watermark advertisement test regarding this First Senior Brother, he respects absolutely.

Beibei said: “We then must do is far away, Yuhao, after outside darkness, you exit, then returns as soon as possible. We return to Academy to have a look, goes back here news belt, another, looks at the front that side situation, decides our following motions again.”

“Good.”Regarding suggestion Huo Yuhao not any objection of Beibei. The steady point is also good, what he has not said that before, him must do a matter to be good.

In people, only some unhappy was He Caitou, He Caitou said: “Yuhao, after waiting this time to go back, we again come back on many to sneak attack some Sun-Moon Empire Soul Guidance Array places. This our consumption is also quite many!”

Xu Sanshi said with a smile: “Caitou, when did you turn into a miser?”

He Caitou ill-humored [say / way]: “That may be money! You know how many this time wiped out to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely? Defended Soul Guidance Array also to stay in that side, I loved dearly! Must produce these many things many not to be easy. We may not have the Sun-Moon Empire productivity.”

Beibei said: “Caitou said right, when we will come next time again, no longer attacked Bright Capital City, placed these to have the Soul Guidance Array place place the main targets. As far as possible attacks and destruction. Thus strengthens our own strengths.”

In the He Caitou eye as if there is gold coin ray twinkle, muttered thought aloud: “When if can take by force Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp to be good. If our Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp also exchanges Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, who also fears them! Hey.”

“!”Together everybody disdains snorts contemptuously to him.

Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, that is they can move now?

Only has in the Huo Yuhao eye the ray to dodge, reveals color looking pensive.

Grabs Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp naturally to be unlikely, but if can get so far as Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp that Humanoid Soul Guidance Device in the future. Brings to give the Teacher Xuan words, can perhaps absorb experience? This develops Humanoid Soul Guidance Device to be of great advantage to future Shrek Academy.

After all, although Teacher Xuan also studied Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, and based on Tang Sect mechanism. May at present only then he and Nan Qiuqiu equipped. Moreover is primarily the close combat. Is uncopiable.

Cannot duplicate is unable to promote, this is not the good phenomenon. Huo Yuhao are also nine levels of Soul Engineer. He is also very curious, volume production Humanoid Soul Guidance Device that actually Sun-Moon Empire how achieves. Must know, once Humanoid Soul Guidance Device will promote in the future, Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp on an overall combat capability general again stair. More formidabe.

When the people continue the recuperation, the night falls, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong quietly left undead Demi-plane, reappeared opened in the Gate of the Dead small woods before that piece of them.

The breeze, night is very slowly quiet, in the air brings the light plant delicate fragrance, the insect warbler to call continuously.

Huo Yuhao holds the hand of Tang Wutong to walk from undead Demi-plane. takes a deep breath, the cool night wind gladdens the heart, immediately thought mind inspires.

undead Demi-plane is safe, does not have the comfort of Douluo Continent. This belongs to their places!

Huo Yuhao has not left eagerly, but leans in a big tree.

Tang Wutong visits him curiously, said: “Do you do?”

Huo Yuhao raises up the index finger before the lip, has given a hand signal to her, “breathes out!”Then waves to her.

Tang Wutong arrives in front of him, the look had doubts.

Huo Yuhao draws her to own side, making her lean on own shoulder, gently is stroking her pink-blue color long hair, gentle Spiritual Sharing also shares own mind world with her along with it.

Spiritual Detection and Sharing? Tang Wutong always thought that Huo Yuhao is strange, but under flickers, the big eyes of her double action person on own initiative did not open.

This is......

mind thinks of the feeling to extend infinitely, this is not anything, may, in this mind thinks in the feeling range, is full of the joyful and temperate mood fluctuation innumerably is actually infiltrating her mind world.

That as if has innumerable small lives, was relating to her the happiness of world, was recounting own concern. Her Spiritual Power quantity imperceptibly integration naturally to that joyful sea. But mind thinks of the feeling also toward farther directional divergence.

This feeling was too wonderful, Tang Wutong Spiritual Power may not have Huo Yuhao to be so formidable, therefore, infiltrates, in Huo Yuhao takes to her marvelous Spiritual Sharing, her feeling is also more profound, own Spiritual Power also unceasingly continually sublimates in this feeling.

If there is changed others, Huo Yuhao is very difficult to achieve this point, after all, he can Spiritual Sharing see, feels, actually cannot share the subtle change of mind world. But Tang Wutong is different, their Martial Soul Fusion, has Hao Dong Power, has the most close relationship. Therefore, after Huo Yuhao completely lets loose body and mind, he and Tang Wutong now is a whole, looks like they when displaying Raiment of Light, summoned the Goddess of Light appearance, all that in this state, he can feel, Tang Wutong can the clear feeling.

The sensibility and sublimation, with passing of time, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong as if integrated in the surrounding environment, became parts of these plants, if did not look with the eye that is unable to realize their aura.

When Tang Wutong very natural opening eyes pupil again, the weather the dawn, the insect warbler cry was lighter, the morning dew is moist, is daybreak.

Huo Yuhao also together opens the double pupil along with her, they looked at each other one, on the face reveal the smile, the exchange that the regard no longer needs to say a word interlinked.

The time of how many double-hour, regarding Tang Wutong, are similar to are actually reborn general, that type the mind fusion with plant world, let her to Spiritual Power realizes from experience to promote completely far more than one step?

In this state cultivates Spiritual Power, quite therefore myriad plants are helping, is feeding back, in the meantime, their Spiritual Power also similarly in the help plants, these and they have practiced together the plant, in the future will be definitely easier becomes plant attribute Soul Beast, awakening own wisdom.

Takes out the dry rations, has eaten with Tang Wutong simply, they then once more start off. Through the observation of beforehand Spiritual Power relation plant to outside, Huo Yuhao already judged the environment the security.

Flew a while, Tang Wutong has revealed the color of surprise, “wasn't goes back? This direction is not as if right.”Going back should fly to the East is right, but Huo Yuhao actually clearly draws her to fly toward the West now.

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, said: “I must to a First Senior Brother pleasant surprise, therefore before, had not said. Later you knew.”

Tang Wutong pursed the lips, had not asked again that she closes the double pupil simply, whatever Huo Yuhao draws to fly, but oneself actually continue the feeling that realized from experience these plants to bring last night.

This promotion for her is very important, she is Titled Douluo rank Soul Master, wants to continue to promote oneself to cultivate is, mind cultivates for the promotion has very great significance. This will definitely accelerate the increase of her strength.

Continuously to west, distant unwinding Bright Capital City, although the place visited occasionally will have as before upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device to appear, but Huo Yuhao will dodge ahead of time. His that formidable Spiritual Power, is in itself works as in this life most formidable Surveying Soul Guidance Device to be ordinary, does not need to be worried that was discovered.

Bypassed from the west side, captures a big circle to fly to south again, toward this direction flew, without doubt was away from Shrek Academy to be getting more and more far.

After flying a double-hour, Tang Wutong once more cannot bear ask: “Yuhao, actually we must go to where Ah?”

Huo Yuhao mysterious smiles, said: “Still remembered last night feeling? I must lead you to go my first time to have this feeling place. To there, you will naturally understand. Quick, no rush.”

Also half double-hour, Huo Yuhao holds the hand of Tang Wutong then to fall toward the ground, at this time weather already greatly bright, the sunlight such as flamings, the southern temperature be much higher than the north, the land surface temperature did not lower at this time, nice and warm feeling attack body, but, has the cool aura that on Huo Yuhao lends, all summer heat will be scattered by the nature.

Huo Yuhao draws Tang Wutong to fall to ground, has distinguished simply the surrounding situation, has located the position probably. Then he drew Tang Wutong to lie down on the ground.

mind thinks of the feeling to extend, again outward expands, under amplification of plants, passes on by far.

The time is not long, Huo Yuhao sets out, at this time Tang Wutong somewhat understood, Huo Yuhao has certainly discovered anything, but thing that he discovers, without doubt is very important, otherwise he will not catch up at this time.

Jumps, has not needed Flight Soul Guidance Device, Huo Yuhao to draw Tang Wutong again toward direction barrel. The free time of a while, valley appeared in their line of sight.

“Should be here!”Stands in the valley edge downward bird's eye view, the mountain wall is quite gentle, is growing everywhere Blue Silver Grass of cover, the fragrance of intermittent green grass will move to head on along with the cool breeze, in green grass, but also is mixing with various color florets, is particularly beautiful. Looks, the sea that this piece of Blue Silver Grass and fresh flower compose has spread to valley, entire valley is in the light cyan color is embellishing the innumerable gem general feelings.

-----------------------------------------------

1200 ticket in addition came, our aggressive side leaks delivers everybody one hundred bit word number many big chapters. Continues to ask the monthly ticket, anticipates 1600 characters



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-554-part-3





Volume 12

#555 - On Fall Heart


“Here is quite beautiful. 79 read”Tang Wutong unable to bear to praise sigh free.

Huo Yuhao he he smiles, “! Quite beautiful. Walks, we have a look.”Tang Wutong is jumping, this time again has not actually fallen to the ground, but relies on Soul Power is maintaining the flight altitude, the distance fends, be only one foot, actually does not fall. In so the beautiful scene, is really not cruel enough to trample these vitality exuberant Blue Silver Grass!

More flies to valley, the air becomes is fresh, green grass originally fragrant, but also were many some light flower fragrances. Occasionally has the honeybee and butterfly to fly, picks the nectar and pollen, this completely is a picture of paradise.

Quick, they arrived at bottom of valley, here not big trees, but Blue Silver Grass was actually similar to the rug generally overspread entire valley, has not revealed the least bit land.

Huo Yuhao holds the hand of Tang Wutong, in the pupil light is glittering the light happy expression, from here environment, should find it hopefully.

In the eye the ray dodges again, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power flows swiftly to extend just like the mercury generally outward, this time has not gone with the plant fusion, but is pure searches to observe by oneself Spiritual Power outward.

Once were spread by his Spiritual Power, all in entire valley will not have to hide under his investigation.

In this time, suddenly, in ground originally very tranquil Blue Silver Grass slight trembles, leave of grass as if felt anything to resemble a piece by piece, stood erect. Gets up just like sharp thorn general upward peaks. The original harmonious aura was replaced by the dense chill in the air immediately.

“Extreme nervousness?”Tang Wutong somewhat surprised saying.

Because of the sublimation of last night mind thought that this time she, was especially keen to the feeling of plant aura, she believes that she can feel, Huo Yuhao also certainly.

Huo Yuhao actually maintains composure, is feeling the hostility of these Blue Silver Grass transmitting silently.

That is the pure hostility, reason is also very simple, that because of spying on Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power. Pure Blue Silver Grass naturally does not have this ability. They can achieve so, without doubt one like Huo Yuhao can with their mind link existence, but this existence, when Huo Yuhao with the plant relations and their relations are more intimate.

Huo Yuhao smiled. This time, he confirmed.

The intense enmity of the Blue Silver Grass level ground transmitting just like blotting out the sky general, is affecting his Spiritual Detection, may to all these, Huo Yuhao likely be anything had not actually felt that the whole person as before is maintaining condition originally, Spiritual Power also in the unceasing output outward.

Back, light golden light shadow starts to appear, impressively Emperor Auspicious Beast Three Eyed Golden Lion appearance, at the same time. Eye of Destiny on his forehead also along with it opening, gentle Light of Destiny sends out, Spiritual Power that Huo Yuhao oneself releases also increases by the geometrical multiple violent.

Blue Silver Grass unites in the almost instantaneous to shatter of together hostility in this formidable mind thought that but also at this moment, Huo Yuhao supinely begins. A gentle Bai Se (White Color) ray projects from Eye of Destiny, the injection midair, changes into the innumerable twinkle stars the Bai Se (White Color) luminous spots to drop from the clouds again, looks like the light rain is ordinary, is covering entire Blue Silver Grass valley.

Tang Wutong also similarly bathed in these light rain, her feeling was novel and comfortable, that completely from named the lucky strength in one name. Although cannot directly change anything, but has actually brought the future influence.

Adjudication of Destiny, lucky!

Blue Silver Grass valley rapid peaceful, Blue Silver Grass also again from hardly turned soft, all as if returned to normal. Regarding these, only then the plant of most foundation instinct, their sensations are being directly are also simply keen.

Huo Yuhao took to them to be lucky. The Emperor Auspicious Beast aura makes them excited, the hostility that they just raised also instantaneously becomes nothing left, is unable to have the half minute again.

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, “senior, why not comes out to meet. I do not have the hostility.”

“Emperor Auspicious Beast, on you have the Emperor Auspicious Beast aura unexpectedly. Why?”A low and deep sound from conveys in all directions, as if these Blue Silver Grass all are its loudspeaker, even if unable to feel the position that he is at truly by Huo Yuhao formidable Spiritual Power.

“Because she is my lover.”Even if working as Tang Wutong, Huo Yuhao said such words as before.

Qiu'er for him, has paid own all, how is she Soul Beast? In the Huo Yuhao heart, forever the place belongs to her recollection.

Tang Wutong looks like has not heard, on the face the look does not have the half minute to change, even also revealed gratified. Such man, truly is worth loving!

That sound silent, “may your lover, turn into your ability.”

Huo Yuhao was also silent, then he fell slowly, Blue Silver Grass in ground voluntarily horizontally but actually, making him sit cross-legged to sit down, Tang Wutong sits side him.

Huo Yuhao loosened has gripped the hand of Tang Wutong, the look in eye pupil had some changes, thick sad intent spread.

He is not willing to recall to mind that recollection, is, for Little Ya Teacher, he could not give a thought to that many.

Closed eyes, in his mind, presented Wang Qiu'er.

Handkerchief that was moved by the wind, that sees suddenly, is shocking of Goddess of Light, starts, in he remembers that awakens.

“I called Wang Qiu'er!”The chilly sound, paces back and forth in the ear.

When low and deep thundering, seems she catches up the heroic bearing.

Golden Dragon Spear, transforms innumerable light shadow in her hands, the formidable strength, making her rout enemies.

But her ice-cold the silent gaze, is representing the gentleness of innermost feelings all. Under ice-cold semblance, just like volcanic eruption general passion.

He is evading, but she is dedicated does not abandon, passing, each article, reverberates in the Huo Yuhao mind unceasingly.

Until finally, until that moment, when she, for he lit his all dutifully, changes into the intense ray that offers sacrifices to integrate that moment of his body, he finally knows one made a mistake. Originally in his heart, regardless of how is not willing to acknowledge that already had was her part.

His heart good pain and good pain.

After she offers sacrifices, he also never on own initiative recalls all that had had at that time, because he does not dare, does not dare. He fears this pain, but time that at this moment, this pain raids, he is almost unable to breathe.

The tears, already covered entirely his face. The body of his whole person in fierce is shivering. Light golden ray reverberates in the air, his grievous mood, affected periphery all Blue Silver Grass and flowers.

They like dying of old age had lowered the head generally, is accompanying him to be together sad.

Light golden light shadow behind gradually becomes in him the congealing reality. Before it arrives at his body, before lifting the claw, wants to move him. But it fell eventually, lowered the head, in the eye full is sad with does not abandon.

In this time, a slender and fair palm has been extending, gripped its former claw, Three Eyed Golden Lion has gained ground in consternation, it saw, was a sincere Li face certainly. On the elegant face is bringing light moved.

Three Eyed Golden Lion nodded to her gently, the ray in eye pupil was also gentle.

golden light dodges, Three Eyed Golden Lion light shadow integrated Tang Wutong within the body suddenly, the Tang Wutong body slight dither, has closed eyes.

“Yuhao!”

A summon gently awakens from the immersion Huo Yuhao. He of having tears streaming down the face, opens the tearful eyes dim double pupil slowly.

This summon was really too familiar, that chilly and intonation, making his heart clutch instantaneously tightly.

“Qiu'er, sorry, Qiu'er.”Huo Yuhao was sobbing calling out.

A hand has extended, is slender and powerful., From the Blue Silver Grass level ground entrains of Huo Yuhao gently.

Huo Yuhao has gawked staring, he saw that pair of chilly eye pupil, familiar chilliness, familiar face. Chilly is full of sincere gentle.

“Qiu'er and Qiu'er!”The Huo Yuhao whole person has tarried, the severe pain of innermost feelings changes into the emotion of surge instantaneously. He stretches out the arms suddenly. Makes an effort opposite she closely to support into to cherish.

Qiu'er, she is Qiu'er.

She walks arm in arm, in he cherishes, in the chilly eye pupil cold intent dissipates gradually, displaces, is incomparable satisfaction. This satisfaction from innermost feelings.

Does not have the strength of seal to shove open them. They such closely are hugging. The pain of Huo Yuhao innermost feelings, gentle melts in that gradually, his whole person has also given full play to the vitality.

“Is Qiu'er, really you? Real?”Huo Yuhao was summoning in a soft voice.

“Is I, Yuhao, is really I. Actually, I continuously with you in same place. Do not be sad, actually, for me, perhaps this is the best result.”

“But......”Huo Yuhao wants to say anything, but in the throat actually once more chokes up, cannot say eventually.

“Not anything good, but. Initially I like this chose, because I think that this is most is good to us. I integrated your body, became your part, does not have any strength to be able us to separate again, this is I wants to obtain! But my spirit Soul Power quantity and source strength, by me with the aid of the control of Power of Destiny, integrated at that time also Dong'er within the body in deep sleep, therefore, when she restores to remember, the time of sobering, simultaneously had me and Dong'er ability, quite therefore I and Dong'er ability union. My soul in your within the body, my ability on Dong'er. Therefore, I have not left you really!”

--------------------------------------------------

Today also thinks three, to thank everybody's support, in the evening also two, whether to request the monthly ticket and recommendation vote support? Thanks politely everybody.

Peerless Tang Sect has written about the later period, it is expected that by the end of the year finished, in these months, hopes finally specially can have the book friends' great support, supports me to use the best condition to write the peerless Tang Sect result.

The peerless Tang Sect cartoon, passes on five pages newly, Old Mu enters the stage. Then was one's turn Wang Dong to enter the stage officially. Everybody transmits in our prestigious platforms: Peerless Tang Sect 124, consult.

Joins our platform to be very simple: Prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is our Tang Sect family|home, there, can examine our cartoons easily. Transmission peerless Tang Sect adds the capital letter figure then. For example: Peerless Tang Sect one, to: Peerless Tang Sect 124, all have cartoon to correspond, will reply automatically.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-555-part-1





Volume 12

#555 - In Fall Heart


“Yuhao, I am quite happy, do you know? At this moment, my first time true feels you to my love, this was for me enough. Well and Dong'er in the same place, regardless of she is Dong'er or Tang Wutong, she is your most loves, but I am part that you most love. From the beginning when incarnation for her appearance, actually I lost, I will never defeat Dong'er. I love you, she loves you, but in your heart has one to be in love to me, but your entire heart is her. The present result, is most perfect. Later like this should not be again sad, your this, I will be sadder. Thinks my time, holds Wutong, you and she in the same place, were I in the same place. I and she, and you, already shared everything.”

Huo Yuhao dull listens to Wang Qiu'er to narrate, he understands finally why after Wang Dong'er turns into Tang Wutong, Martial Soul will have such variation, why she can also use Golden Dragon Spear, originally, in within the body, really really has to belong to the Wang Qiu'er strength! Source and soul.

“Qiu'er, you pay for me were too many.”

Wang Qiu'er shows a faint smile, said: “In I offer sacrifices before you, are you willing to pay with your life for me? Although you were deliberately bad because of the Dong'er deep sleep at that time, but I satisfy as before. Yuhao, I love you, treasures itself well, remember, I throughout side you, your here.”

At the same time was saying, she lifts hand, gently is stroking Eye of Destiny on Huo Yuhao forehead, his entire forehead.

Yes! In there, the position that Three Eyed Golden Lion Destiny Skull is.

The light golden color, from the Tang Wutong within the body separation, integrates in the Huo Yuhao body, Huo Yuhao feels, is one beyond description heads on gently. Is smoothing the pain and sadness of his innermost feelings.

Tang Wutong walks arm in arm as before, in he cherishes, has not set out. But the Huo Yuhao tears also stopped. Yes! Qiu'er continuously in my within the body.

Long time!

The tear stains on Huo Yuhao face are finally dry, lower the head to have a look at bosom people, gently is stroking that pink-blue color big wave long hair. Huo Yuhao summoned in a soft voice: “Wutong.”

Tang Wutong gains ground. Gives him to smile.

“Sorry!”Huo Yuhao said in a soft voice.

Tang Wutong wicked is looking steadily at him, “I must give you to punish.”

“Um?”Huo Yuhao stares.

The mild red lip kissed his flowery lips at this moment. That gentle touch, the light delicate fragrance, is mixing being in love of Dong'er and Qiu'er, is attacking Huo Yuhao all instantaneously.

But under flickers. golden light sticks out suddenly, the body of Huo Yuhao flies accordingly, from the sky puts an exquisite path.

Back Flight Soul Guidance Device opens, the Soul Power output, reluctantly controls own personal appearance.

Dong'er somewhat cares about emotion between him and Qiu'er eventually, penalty that but this kisses, is actually such **. In that flickers. He as if feels, is two is in love.

Controls own personal appearance, the double pupil of Huo Yuhao also became Pure Brightness. Tang Wutong eye including profound meaning visits him, he smiles. Flies back to Tang Wutong side, has held on her hand.

“world of humanity, is really complex. Has not thought that you can actually obtain being in love of Three Eyed Golden Lion, Emperor Auspicious Beast!”Before the low and deep sound voiced intermittent opinions.

“Do you believe now?”Huo Yuhao light asking. Innermost feelings most painful was initiated sadly, but also made him see Wang Qiu'er, understood then all finally, this for him, not only the pain, was an extrication, making his Spiritual Consciousness more insightful.

“Um. You look for me, what wants to make?”The low and deep sound said.

After Huo Yuhao has hesitated one next, said: “I have a very important friend, she was affected by Evil Soul Master, the body source receives heavy wound, but her Martial Soul, is Blue Silver Grass. Wish makes her restore, needs your strength. Therefore, I hope that can obtain a piece of your leave of grass. Naturally, I will not take something for free, you can put forward the condition, so long as is I can achieve, certainly does everything possible. I want to exchange with you.”

Low and deep sound silent, “you are very formidable, from you, I can feel the intense danger. But you have the assistance of Emperor Auspicious Beast, you completely are capable of routing me, then brings my corpse to depart. Why not?”

Huo Yuhao sincere [say / way]: “I had pledged, only if self-defense, otherwise, no longer on own initiative strikes to kill any Soul Beast certainly. Therefore, I only want to exchange with you.”

The low and deep sound somewhat is obviously surprised, “you as human Soul Master, actually pledged that doesn't kill our Soul Beast?”

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “Yes! I established the spirit system, can thus not kill Soul Beast also to obtain the strength.”At that moment, he narrated his spirit system simply, and most direct has released Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass.

Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass is also plant attribute Soul Beast, regarding the inductions of these plant Soul Beast obviously is most direct.

Really, sees Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass, listened to narration of Huo Yuhao again, that low and deep sound obviously became gentle.

“Thank you, can consider for our Soul Beast. Only this point, I believe that I can help you. However, I......”

Here, that low and deep sound silent several points.

Huo Yuhao heart one tight, found this with great difficulty, if it does not want, Huo Yuhao because of the reason of pledge, but also cannot force it, in that case, can be good? Little Ya Teacher also waits for its strength to treat!

“You have any awkward place saying that if possible, I whole-heartedly help certainly you solve.”Although Huo Yuhao also know that their expression was too anxious, is, for Tang Ya, he makes no mistake.

That low and deep sound sighed, said: “I survived for 190,000 years on this world. However, I eventually am only Blue Silver Grass lineage/vein, even if I became sovereign, but the reason of itself talent, making me simply not have any possibly to break through the following day to punish. Therefore, my life must come to the end. Perhaps, your means that will take to me freshman.”

Huo Yuhao hearing this great happiness, but he said: “But you can choose the road of repairing! Hasn't Soul Beast to the bottleneck, been able to repair?”

“You have made a mistake, that is 100,000 years of time. Has wanted 100,000 years, some time does not have the choice to repair, is unable to take that road again. But I approached 200,000 years of category now, therefore, I cannot. Perhaps some formidable Soul Beast can think of other means that is, I am not good! This is the background reason of itself bloodlines.”

Huo Yuhao then suddenly, Blue Silver Grass must unexpectedly be Blue Silver Grass, even if became Blue Silver Emperor, own background will have the issue as before. In this case, it does not have the means like Snow Emperor, repairs in tall Xiuwei. Thinks is also, by Snow Emperor initially the Ice Heavenly Snow Woman talent, 700,000 years of strong overhaul was, can only be the choice becomes the embryo, caused afterward to meet with the disaster, finally became the own first spirit, this Blue Silver Emperor strength, compared with Snow Emperor, must miss was too far.

Huo Yuhao said: “So long as you want, this naturally is not the issue, I can lead you to go back, let you and my friend fuse. You can feel relieved that my friend talent is extremely high, is only slightly longer than me two years old, has eight rings to cultivate. If can in soon in the future become her ninth Soul Ring by you, believes her in our humanity world, will become most top powerhouse.”

“Um, good, that troubled you.”Blue Silver Emperor satisfied saying.

Also at this moment, Blue Silver Grass in valley slight trembles, this time no longer is the fear and hostility, displaces, is excited and excited.

The distant place, in Huo Yuhao mind world feels to be similar the pythons to appear general, from collects in all directions in his here direction.

Thick blue vines along with it raising up, gather finally. Each vine seems is such glittering and translucent carving, insightful is ordinary just like the blue crystal, the interior has to be similar to the leaf vein common fluctuation circulation.

These vines coil around fast in the same place, unexpectedly changes into the face appearance, he toward Huo Yuhao nod of gently, then hovers toward Huo Yuhao, coils around in his side, changes into the human form gradually.

However, its this human form may not be the Ferocious Beasts rank powerhouse truly changes into the human appearance, humanity that but becomes by the vine accumulation, looks like, but the thick vine that weaves all contracted changes is small, changes into, only then thumb thick or thin appearance. It seems grotesque.

“I follow you.”Blue Silver Emperor said.

Huo Yuhao nodded to him, said: “Thank your trust.”

Blue Silver Emperor grinning, seems is smiling, “actually, I am believe that Emperor Auspicious Beast vision, its choice cannot be wrong.”

Tang Wutong somewhat curious looks at Blue Silver Emperor, at this time she understands completely Huo Yuhao came this place the goal, but, she looks that the Blue Silver Emperor vision was also clearly containing some special meaning.

Huo Yuhao nodded to Blue Silver Emperor, said: “That invited you with us together.”Is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, the launching, simultaneously he also reached Blue Silver Emperor his mind antenna slowly.

At the beginning, Blue Silver Emperor has also hesitated, but quick Blue Silver Emperor on the surprised discovery, in the Huo Yuhao mind antenna, actually contained is being the mind fluctuation of plant to exist, although that was only his Imitation comes out, but this feeling was actually such well-meaning and kindness, subconscious, it also released her Spiritual Power and Huo Yuhao is connected.

Each other mind interconnection, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection and Sharing opens immediately, transmits through all that Spiritual Detection feels to Blue Silver Emperor.

---------------------------------------------------

Second, behind also has.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-555-part-2





Volume 12

#555 - Under Fall Heart


The Blue Silver Emperor whole body shakes slightly, transforms a pair of blue eye pupil that becomes with the vine surprised looks to Huo Yuhao, “has not thought that your Spiritual Power so is unexpectedly formidable.”

The intense mind fluctuation also releases from Blue Silver Emperor along with it, feeds back Huo Yuhao. Huo Yuhao feels, is actually in entire valley each slight change, Blue Silver Emperor unexpectedly by oneself as the medium, helping him relate on valley all Blue Silver Grass.

Person of Soul Beast, smiled, to feel each other that sincerity, the simultaneous acceleration, rose to the upper air.

Blue Silver Emperor somewhat was sighing the [say / way]: “If your Martial Soul and I can agree with, perhaps, I returned to choose you. You are very formidable, although my talent and formidable Soul Beast compares is not anything, but our Blue Silver Clan sensation is actually very keen, from you, I will feel a future beyond description.”

Huo Yuhao he he smiles, said: “You saw friend of mine, will not be certainly disappointed, her Martial Soul is in itself Blue Silver Grass, you should know that in our humanity, can by the person of Blue Silver Grass practice, really be very few, but the true practice upper dog, actually once one was the true big energy. That, is my senior.”

Blue Silver Emperor nods the head slightly, said: “I know what you said is.”

“?”Huo Yuhao somewhat surprised looks at Blue Silver Emperor, “do you know?”

Blue Silver Emperor nodded, said: “Our Blue Silver Clan, although is small and weak, but the vitality is almost all plants is most exuberant, is on entire Douluo Continent the quantity has most one plant. Our root systems and Spiritual Power each other are connected, therefore, has any Blue Silver Clan important matter, our these Blue Silver Clan powerhouses will be able to feel.”

“The practice of our Blue Silver Grass, and your humanity has Blue Silver Grass Martial Soul Soul Master to be equally rare. Must have the big destiny, obtains strength of in addition world to hold has the possibility of practice. I once received heavenly thunder baptism three times. Within the body has the strength of thunder spirit, thus is reborn. That I who you said also know that she is actually pure of bloodlines, is the true Blue Silver Clan Imperial Family bloodlines. Your human big energies. Is her child. Finally is separated from the limit of this world, true to turn into a god.. Being in direct line of that Blue Silver Emperor room, I must call one on main.”

Huo Yuhao has not thought that this Blue Silver Emperor and initially the Tang Sect ancestor Tang San mother really also had such relation, this obviously is the good deed. Everybody's distance has also hauled.

“That looked like origin between we and senior was very deep, my companion, was Tang Sect present age sect master that ancestor Tang San established. Then, is comes down in a continuous line with the ancestor. It seems like that our Tang Sect and your Blue Silver Clan also really have the fate!”

“? Unexpectedly is so? That was really good.”Blue Silver Emperor was also high-spirited immediately. Formidable Spiritual Power that after experiencing Huo Yuhao has released, it was very confident to this line. plant attribute Soul Beast to the animal is Soul Beast, the thought wants to be simpler. But their sensations are keener, from Huo Yuhao, he felt good and healthy tendency, in addition Emperor Auspicious Beast reason. Therefore he has not considered to make the decision, now one hear, thought immediately one decided that is very correct.

At this time, they went down to the upper air, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong start to accelerate.

The flight obviously is not the ability that Blue Silver Emperor most excels, but this has not related, a Huo Yuhao hand is drawing Tang Wutong, another hand is drawing Blue Silver Emperor, bringing it to fly together, to a Blue Silver Emperor stronger confidence, Huo Yuhao promotes the speed, is extending south Sun-Moon Empire, directly soars the Star Lou Empire direction to fly, speed just like with lightning speed general, quick has exceeded the speed of sound.

Sun-Moon Empire after former a series of attack, the defense strength has contracted Bright Capital City, even can say that temporarily gave up the defense to surrounding city, does not have too many upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device to monitor, this also wants smooth many compared with the expectation, because is far away from Bright Capital City, troubles has not bumped into. Quick enters in Star Lou Empire, then directly soars Shrek City to go.

The Sky Soul Empire border, the flag flies upwards, army eyes cannot look at the boundary, on giant flags, gold sun silver moon design light shining in all directions.

The army continuously about hundred li (0.5km), set up in an array in the original Sky Soul Empire border. Or sets up in an array in the Sun-Moon Empire border, because Sky Soul Empire already thorough vanished from Continent.

This continuous hundred li (0.5km) army, total quantity close 700,000, Sun-Moon Empire major part elite all here.

Looks from the distant place, the army just likes a big dragon, lineup of arrangement extremely complicated, so long military compound battleline perfectly will actually protect.

Even if from upper air bird's eye view, is unable to see clearly in this big camp, actually how much Soul Guidance Array places. Only what can affirm, here is almost human forbidden area general existence.

Here is a border, not only actually Sky Soul Empire border, in the meantime, is Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire border. But here boundary corner, in distance army being stationed place only then less than 200 inside and outside, is that entire Continent is quite famous, city that even has been able to place on a par with Bright Capital City, Shrek City!

Golden red commander tent reaches as high as ten meters, in huge commander tent, can simultaneously hold thousand people of conferences, but obviously is not crowded. But at this time, in this commander tent, actually only then few several people.

Ju Zi(orange) sits on the position, wears the flame color to fight armor, fights on armor the Fire Phoenix design to be lifelike, this is not ordinary war armor, but customizes for her, gets rid by Kong Deming Humanoid Soul Guidance Device that personally manufactures to complete. This Soul Guidance Device does not pay great attention to attack, will actually defend to achieve Absolute. Kong Deming has told Ju Zi(orange), even if Limit Douluo gets rid, within three strike, is unable to break this phoenix to protect the defense of Humanoid Soul Guidance Device.

Under Ju Zi(orange) the head, is standing six people, youngest also passes the middle age, three old men, on each, faintly have the formidable aura to bloom, but they stand below, is actually entirely still, occasionally looks to the Ju Zi(orange) look, even is also having the color of respect.

In the Ju Zi(orange) hand is taking letter paper, among under that six people, but also on one knee is kneeling down a person, the letter paper was this came from the Bright Capital City messenger just sent.

The letter is not long, quick looked, put down the letter, the Ju Zi(orange) attractive delicate eyebrows actually wrinkled, then has stood from the position slowly.

She stands up, below is standing six powerhouses subconsciously retrocede one step, lets the middle circuit is bigger.

A person for a long time occupies the superior, particularly commander hundreds of thousands of armies, control now world most formidable strength, dignified, unceasingly will increase imperceptibly. Ju Zi(orange) is also so.

After she attains War-God Empress, the makings of whole person started to have the change, became more reserved, was more dignified. Although she in fact is also less than 30 years old, may in many person eyes, actually already neglect her age.

Gradually walks, Ju Zi(orange) unceasingly paced and ponder in the big account.

In the big account does not have the least bit sound, the vision of all people visit her, static waiting.

A moment later, Ju Zi(orange) stops the footsteps, asked to that messenger: “What does your majesty have to tell?”

The messengers said: “Reply War-God Empress, your majesty said that all are decided by War-God Empress.”

Ju Zi(orange) eyes narrows the eyes, nodded, said: “Good, you get down. After this Commander must consider carefully, replies your majesty again.”

“Yes.”The messengers such as the Mongolian pardon, hurry respectful setting out, bends the waist to draw back. No matter what who waited for in six nine levels of Soul Engineer that will suffer the huge pressure! He looks forward quickly to leave here.

Ju Zi(orange) returns to own position to sit well, sinking sound track: “Your majesty spreads the news, the empire internal bitter experience unclear enemy attacks. More than ten cities were broken successively, was plundered. Even was attacked including Bright Capital City, the enemy used the special method to submerge to Bright Capital City, launched over ten thousand preliminarily to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to Bright Capital City surely, as well as round of nine levels installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely. The imperial palace defended is broken, has caused not the small losses. Sought for these enemies because of imperial Soul Engineer Corp by the external assignment, not in Bright Capital City, therefore cannot hold these enemies promptly. Now the enemy disappears from the scene, where does not know, sentences initially in advance, at least has two Soul Engineer Corp military strength. Old Kong said that these enemies might master the stealth and space ability.”

Listened to the Ju Zi(orange) words, following six nine levels of Soul Engineer complete discolorations.

The armies battle outside, what most fears is what? Most fears is rear area is not steady! The normal condition, the rear area is not steady, the supplies will have problems. They have now seized the Sky Soul Empire big lands, although does not fear the supplies to cut off, but the empire is unstable, regarding the front, will be influential.

Stands in the old man sinking sound track in left first place: “Marshal, this matter cannot pass on, must block off the flow of news.”

Ju Zi(orange) nodded, said: “Leaves my mouth, enters your ears, will not have other people to know. Does everybody, see?”

The old man who just opened the mouth said: “Unbelievable, this is impossible!”

In the Ju Zi(orange) look reveals a strange color, “I also think impossible. The empire border area, some massive upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device exist, blockade reconnaissance, blocks the enemy. Perhaps two Soul Engineer Corp strengths belong to the Douluo Continent three countries take, but, even if can take, will not be absolutely strong. Masters the stealth and spatial technology? This simply is a joke. Cannot develop including our country, why do they study?”

The old man in right first place said: “Marshal, can be some formidable Soul Master does?”

Ju Zi(orange) said: “The analysis of Old Kong said in the heart, if only the stealth, formidable Soul Master may also achieve through Soul Ability, but if were rapid at least carries Soul Engineer Corp of 300 heavy artilleries to evacuate two in a short time, was not the stealth ability can achieve. Actually at present also not completely clear enemy how achieves. The strength of this gang of enemy is not anything, but troublesome in unexpectedly, moreover is hard to judge their whereabouts. This time, is one's turn us, because the detection wasn't in place to withstand the painful result?”



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-555-part-3





Volume 12

#556 - In Fearful Orange Open Intrigue


Yeah, why Sun-Moon Empire can win one victory after another, finally captures Sky Soul Empire, besides own absolute effective strength, was the formidable reconnaissance and counter-surveillance ability.

The war when just started, Sky Soul Empire has strength of the war, after all, as the established powerful nation, the accumulation of Sky Soul Empire is also quite abundant, itself also has the support of Innate Body Sect, the overall strength is greatly strengthened.

But when, they facing Sun-Moon Empire, powerful nowhere causes radically, the fist hits, often falls on the vacancy, but the attack of Sun-Moon Empire, actually can find the Sky Soul Empire most important weakness, continuously for a long time hence, Sky Soul Empire will be eventually difficult to run away to extinguish the destiny of country's.

But attack that this time, the Sun-Moon Empire interior suffers, simply is war of Sun-Moon Empire and Sky Soul Empire of micro version. From commencing of action now, where truly has not confirmed the enemy.

However, on that letter paper, Ju Zi(orange) actually saw made she incomparably familiar name, Huo Yuhao!

In news that Bright Capital City spreads, can be quite definite only, is this name.

Is Yuhao, really you?

Although in the Ju Zi(orange) heart is thinking like this, but in the surface actually throughout is maintaining calm.

Left first old man sinking sound track: “This truly is a major problem, must clarify the outcome as soon as possible what's the matter, otherwise, we do not have the means judgment. Marshal, at this time, we cannot draw back! Just had seized Sky Soul Empire throughout, our army recuperation ten days, are the imposing manner most abundant time, which direction regardless to attacked, were the best moments, at this time, if came under the domestic situation influence, greatly will possibly reduce our army this time achievement. The present is a series Continent best opportunity.”

Ju Zi(orange) nods the head slightly.

The right first old man also nodded, said: “Your majesty side has the imperial Soul Engineer Corp protection, so long as imperial Soul Engineer Corp in Bright Capital City, Bright Capital City has been possible to guarantee the no worries. These Soul Engineer enter in our country, but the population is limited, they can achieve can only be the destruction. But they have two Soul Engineer Corp after all. But we have 1 million mighty armies. Compared with destroying, us missed?”

“Old Su, cautious word.”Ju Zi(orange) brow micro wrinkle, sinking sound shouted to clear the way.

Old Su gives a calm smile. Said: “Monarch will assign to have outside not. Marshal, you must early make resolution, ten million should not be affected by this matter, believes that your majesty can also understand your. Our tactics have formulated, if made the change at this time, was very disadvantageous!”

Ju Zi(orange) sighed one lightly, said: “I know the situation so. But, your majesty has difficult, can I feel at ease at the war of front? Everybody is the Worship Hall elder. My heart is a little chaotic, this matter must need further consideration. Cannot make the decision carelessly. Otherwise, even if was we won at the front war, in the future returns to the empire, will be referred to by the multitude of people.”

“Who dares?”Old Su obviously is a crabby, one step steps forward. Power and influence ascends suddenly, cold sound track: “Marshal does one's best for the country, is in the front to break through enemy lines by the daughter, the wisdom idea is full, has the aspect of today. The hateful countenance old men of domestic these fellows clear, if who dares to question the marshal, the old man kills his family first.”

This word already some treason and heresy. But stands other five nine levels of Soul Engineer in this big account actually turns a deaf ear, even also slightly nods the head, although they do not have the Old Su such short temper, has actually tacitly approved his words.

On the face reveals a light smile, Ju Zi(orange) stands up, nodded to six nine levels of Soul Engineer. “Thanks the support that everybody consecrates. this Commander will make the resolution as soon as possible. This matter cannot spread to the armed forces, but also please six consecrate the security.”

“Yes!”Six big nine levels of Soul Engineer simultaneously bow to comply.

The left first place consecrates to nod, said: “Marshal, you are static first, we get down first. How regardless of you decided. We spare no effort will support.”

“Good.”

Six consecrate one after another, in big commander tent, only remaining a Ju Zi(orange) person.

Ju Zi(orange) sits on the position, the dignity and powerful on face soften gradually, at this time, she really likely was a girl.

Sits is in a daze after there long time, she once more stands up, arrives by commander tent one side sand table, looks at the sand table, in the heart is calculating silently.

At present she is leading the Sun-Moon Empire army, is at a very subtle position. In this position, she can have three choices. Recently was also the most direct choice, attacks Shrek City. But everyone knows that this absolutely is unwise. The issue that the prime minister can see, Ju Zi(orange) naturally can also be able to see. Let alone, Shrek Academy is she most is not willing to move, she is very clear, there is his Reverse Scale!

After passing through matter that the previous son has been taken prisoner, her mood had very big change, before the matters of many regarding as important, instead desalinated now, but before forcefully was suppressed by her in the thing of own heart of hearts, actually gradually gushes out.

On the sand table, some exquisite small flag, these flags are the important board game pieces that she arranges, in the Star Lou Empire border is crowded.

Nobody can find out her true tactical arrangement, that six consecrated a moment ago, although knows, but also has a limited view.

Judging from the present situation, attacks Star Lou Empire obviously is wisest. Because Star Lou Empire and Sky Soul Empire and Sun-Moon Empire border on, if attacks and occupies Star Lou Empire, then, entire Continent surpassed 4/5 area to be received in the Sun-Moon Empire pouch.

Naturally, Star Lou Empire is not Sky Soul Empire may compare absolutely. The Star Lou Empire land area is also almost the same compared with Sun-Moon Empire, is in itself equal to Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire adding together. Had ten thousand years of huge empire. The background actually many, nobody may know.

Sky Soul Empire has Duke White Tiger to assume personal command, now above the border, is 1 million armies spans similarly, makes to accept a challenge at any time the preparation.

The Star Lou Empire border, Ju Zi(orange) altogether has arranged 300,000 people, every 50,000 people provide Soul Guidance Array place, is divided into six footholds to hold the critical position. Let the Star Lou Empire army not dare to act rashly. Meanwhile she also arranged two reorganizing Soul Engineer Corp as coordinating.

Star Lou Empire had carried on the exploratory attack, but every time loses.

That side Dou Ling Empire, the arrangement is similar. Superficially, now the Ju Zi(orange) commander Sun-Moon Empire army has completed the complete defense to original Sky Soul Empire border. Going forward or retreating depending upon circumstances.

These matters, are Ju Zi(orange) complete within the short several months, even before her army goes to battle, many arrangement started.

When her army arrives, that decisive battle seems the gloom that kills, may in fact, actually all in her control range.

Not only Ju Zi(orange) excels with the surprise-attack forces, this time, she has also proven herself the command capability in frontal battlefield. She has used five Soul Engineer Corp strengths, routs Sky Soul and Dou Ling Empire allied armies main force in the frontage, even the powerhouse ability limit of Shrek Academy, does not make them display the true strength.

The Sky Soul Empire remnant armed forces in fact have not been annihilated, but in seeing the matter may not be later, withdrew in Shrek City.

Shrek City after extension, holds these seven and 80,000 remnant armed forces not to be a problem, simultaneously accepts, Sky Soul Empire some powerhouses and elites. But the Dou Ling Empire aspect actually cannot draw back into Shrek City, they have the country to protect! Therefore has to return to Dou Ling Empire, is ready in full battle array in border.

In the short time, in the Ju Zi(orange) mind is reverberating unceasingly at present various situations of front. Regarding Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries, is frightened by the slightest sound, anxious prepares to resist the Sun-Moon Empire army at any time. But what polarity is, under her commander, the Sun-Moon Empire army passes through nearly ten days of recuperation, not only the condition restored best, but also the morale was just prosperous. Completely is in top form.

“Is Yuhao, really you?”Thinking aloud that Ju Zi(orange) muttered, “if were really you, I will not feel absolutely strange. The good move to remove firewood from under the pot!”

“Will Monarch assign to have outside not? This simply is a joke. The Xu Tianran what kind character, how can he not control in front me?”Here, on the Ju Zi(orange) face revealed one to sneer, woods cold sneering. “Xu Tianran, were this time you injured?”

Various preparations that “it seems like, I make is right. Some things, must unveil the veil eventually. Yuhao, thank you, you helped me create this condition actually. I here, wait for you. Really anticipates to see you very much once more, even if in battlefield.”

Whenever she mentioned Huo Yuhao this name time, ice-cold in look rapidly will change into gently, even is also having a satisfied smile.

She extends her right hand slowly, above the sand table, makes a fist slowly. All grasp!

After a double-hour, the order from War-God Empress spreads over the army. All expert regiment level above military officers, commander tent obey orders.

The aura of withering, fills the air in commander tent, a Ju Zi(orange) military garb, wears the pure gold helmet, sits stands one's ground steadfastly on the position. Left side of her, but also sits one person, the whole body covers in a very color long gown. Although he has controlled oneself aura, but meets not on own initiative reveals the gloomy air/Qi.

In this Men in Black behind, is standing a person, if Huo Yuhao here, may recognize her. Impressively Holy Spirit Cult vice- Cult Master, Feng Ling.

Can make Feng Ling stand in oneself behind, the status of this person was vivid, is Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master, Zongli Wu!

Yes, in the front army, has Zongli Wu to assume personal command in this unexpectedly.

Under Zongli Wu and Feng Ling the head, is standing an audiences Sun-Moon Empire powerhouse including Jing Hongchen, as for the Holy Spirit Cult powerhouse, is actually one does not see, does not see actually does not represent them not to exist.

----------------------------------------------------

Continues to plead the monthly ticket support, was anticipating we can increase in the monthly ticket list unceasingly. Thank you, later will have three times, certain, I guaranteed.

Asked the monthly ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-556-part-1





Volume 12

#556 - In Fearful Orange Open Intrigue


But another side, is standing is also a powerhouse, was headed by formerly in the Ju Zi(orange) account that six nine levels of Soul Engineer. Both sides add, in this tent, Titled Douluo and nine levels of Soul Engineer total quantities reaches twenty people.

Except that under these powerhouse crowns, other is in the armed forces the high level, arranges according to the status, separately is Hand of the National Protector four big Soul Engineer Corp assistant regimental commanders and ordinary Commander Soul Engineer Corp, is legion is long, expert regiment chief these people.

These people put together, is at present the Sun-Moon Empire army commanding social stratum.

Ju Zi(orange) looks at the people to nod, said: “After the recuperation, our army fighting intent is soaring at present, is the best opportunity of combat. Passes on our army command, the life, first, third, fifth, third largest legion march forward to the Shrek City direction, assumes the potential of attacking from a pincer-like position to pitch camp, Evil Eye Soul Engineer Corp and Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp coordinate to march forward, march forward hundred li (0.5km), pitches camp. Establishes the Soul Guidance Array place rapidly, prepares for at any time to Shrek City attack.”

“After frontline position establishes completes, other armed forces accompany to go, according to the original lineup arrangement, waits to order.”

Is listening to the Ju Zi(orange) words, sits in nearby Zongli Wu some surprise. In fact, after the army is stationed here the recuperation, he had proposed must to the opinion that Shrek City resorts to arms, Ju Zi(orange) actually show neither approval nor disapproval. Has not actually thought that this War-God Empress actually finally decided at this time must resort to arms to the Shrek City aspect. This regarding Holy Spirit Cult naturally was greatly meddlesome. They have treated as the eye-sore and thorn in the side to regard Shrek City.

Although to Ju Zi(orange) some military order surprise, but clearly, Zongli Wu not any truth of opposition.

The armies set out, vast soup approaches in the Shrek City direction. Has Wu Yun (black clouds) to press the city to want greatly to destroy the potential. At dusk, the entire Sun-Moon Empire army has completed in the Shrek City hundred inside and outside lineups. By the potential of half surrounding remote to Shrek.

The Shrek City direction does not have any response, but the city gate shuts tightly.

The night falls, an artillery made a sound has actually alarmed entire Shrek City.

In the upper air, bunch of enchanting brilliance blast out, compose large characters, can see in Shrek City any corner clearly that “hands over Huo Yuhao, otherwise, in ten day, massacres city!”

Static float in nighttime sky, Huo Yuhao distant looks at airborne twinkle light shadow, suddenly, brow tight wrinkle.

He just flew is away from Shrek Academy not far away, saw this.

In ten day, hands over me?

Does Sun-Moon Empire actually want soldier trapped|sleepy Shrek?

Tang Wutong is also surprised of face, has turned head, some doubts looks to Huo Yuhao, “this Sun-Moon Empire three services isn't commander, Ju Zi(orange)? Is this wants?”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, “walks, we returned to Academy to say first again.”At the same time was saying, he is bringing Tang Wutong and Blue Silver Emperor accelerates once more, flies in the Shrek Academy direction. Is relying on Imitation Soul Ability and Spiritual Disturbance domain, he has not alarmed anybody, fell directly returned to the Shrek City inner city.

Has not gone to Academy first, but returns to Tang Sect, opens the King front door, has directed first Tang Sect numerous high levels.

“This is......”when Beibei sees side Huo Yuhao to stand Blue Silver Emperor, whole person dumbfounded.

Although he has not recognized this is can save the Tang Ya life Blue Silver Emperor, but also has actually guessed correctly 12.

Huo Yuhao sinking sound track: “First Senior Brother, Sun-Moon Empire soldier trapped|sleepy Shrek, we must arrive at that side Academy to ask the sentiment situation first. This is the Blue Silver Emperor senior, I seek in Sun-Moon Empire. Third Senior Brother, troubles you to give senior to arrange a dwelling first. First Senior Brother, we go to Academy first, when had determined after Academy here situation, comes back me to help Little Ya Teacher treat.”

The breath of Beibei somewhat is obviously rapid, front fluctuating was also fiercer, but he must unexpectedly be Tang Sect First Senior Brother, after the short mood drastic fluctuation, is eventually tranquil, nodded, said: “Good, walks. We go to Academy together.”

Leaves is so long, although just came back, but rested at this time cannot give a thought to the rest, Huo Yuhao, Beibei and Tang Wutong three people directly soars Academy to go together, but other people also performed its own functions, these days after processes left the Tang Sect business.

Whirls, the Huo Yuhao three people arrive at Academy fast.

Just now before the Shrek Academy gate, two forms dodged from the both sides, has blocked their way.

“What person?”That is two wears the youth of Shrek Academy school uniform. They asked these words, saw clearly the Huo Yuhao three people of appearances.

They stared in a big way the eye immediately, one of them 's surprised [say / way]: “Huo, Huo Senior Brother?”

Huo Yuhao has selected to them, said: “We must go to Inner Court. Now defends including some evening's person of values?”Must know that beforehand Shrek Academy, absolutely is the model of law and order prevail, never has any defensive measure.

That student nodded, said: “Yes, since Sky Soul Empire extinguishes the country, Academy strengthened the defense, the present is very special period.”

“What?”The Huo Yuhao three people almost simultaneously call out in alarm make noise. They have not known that Sky Soul Empire already the extinguished news, listening to this student saying that immediately was surprised, on three faces revealed color with amazement.

No wonder and no wonder Sun-Moon Empire can the attacking army has reached the city, arrive at outside Shrek City, Sky Soul Empire was extinguished unexpectedly.

Although Huo Yuhao is not the Sky Soul Empire person, but Beibei can actually be, suddenly, three people of hearts become heavy.

“We must enter Academy now, what procedure but also needs?”Tang Wutong asked.

Facing the Tang Wutong Li's appearance, two student some do not dare to look straight ahead certainly, hurry to shake the head saying: “Has not had, three Senior come.”

The Huo Yuhao three people then enter Academy, to the Sea God Lake bank, three people simultaneously jumped, has flown Sea God Island directly.

Sky Soul Empire was extinguished, this news was really too astonishing, initially, Huo Yuhao had been to that side the front personally, his very clear front located the arrangement of Sky Soul Empire. Although cannot compared with Sun-Moon Empire formidable Soul Engineer Corp, but, was insufficient in such a short time to be extinguished the country? Sky Soul Empire was extinguished, means that Shrek City and between Sun-Moon Empire armies, does not have any cushion leeway again. Simultaneously Sun-Moon Empire also finally completed them to unify the Continent first step, then, they momentarily can aim at Star Luo or are Dou Ling Empire. Aspect regarding belonging to the Douluo Continent three countries, is extremely disadvantageous.

Huo Yuhao they stir the wind to stir the rain in Sun-Moon Empire, thinks can play certain role, who knows that in the frontal battlefield, Sky Soul Empire has actually collapsed completely, this made their achievement produce the results to sell at a discount greatly.

Golden Tree is in sight, Huo Yuhao brow tight wrinkle, stops the footsteps, is drawing the Tang Wutong same place, kneels down before Golden Tree, Beibei also together knees down.

“Teacher, we came back, hopes comes back is not late.”Huo Yuhao respectful did obeisance three to do obeisance toward Golden Tree.

In Sea God Pavilion, brilliantly illuminated. When the Huo Yuhao three people enter a building hall, Sea God Pavilion Ancient Elder, besides them, a Huo Yuhao acquaintance. Sky Soul Empire Princess Wei Na.

Saw that three people walk, Princess Wei Na stands up, when with previous time meets compares, this princess was almost old ten years old, the skin did not have the light gloomily, the elegant face was pale, in the look was full of sorrowfully.

“Yuhao.”Wei Na summoned one, in the eye to have the teardrops to tumble immediately.

The Huo Yuhao heart became heavier, Princess Wei Na will appear here, has proven the Sky Soul Empire result. Otherwise, she is impossible to break through the Shrek Academy tradition, arrived here as non- Sea God Pavilion member.

Old Xuan beckons to the Huo Yuhao three people, said: “Just right that you come back, sits down.”

“Yes.”Huo Yuhao respectful complies with one, takes a seat with Beibei and Tang Wutong.

Ancient Elder complexion appears very sinks to congeal, this time, Shrek Academy is going to face, since without doubt has been the origination one of the maximum disasters. Even must surpass beast tide that previous Star Dou Forest starts.

beast tide that time, Shrek Academy faces at least is the traditional fight, but this time, they must face, is actually now on Douluo Continent most top Soul Guidance Technology. Who dares saying that he does have confidence?

Old Xuan looks to Huo Yuhao, “outside fireworks did you see?”

Huo Yuhao nodded silently. Those who made his accident was, he saw a smiling face from the Old Xuan face unexpectedly.

Old Xuan said indifferently: “Can see from this fireworks that you have certainly made not the small noise in Sun-Moon Empire, although cannot make the Sun-Moon Empire army withdraw, but at least also made them anxious, will otherwise not present the attacking army has reached the city. Said, you have made anything.”

Since becoming Limit Douluo, the Old Xuan imposing manner became even more calm. Looks at present Old Xuan, Huo Yuhao even somewhat saw initially the feeling of Old Mu.

In this critical time, Old Xuan does not have the direct discussion to deal with the method of enemy, instead asked about their trip of situations of first, this stable mentality, made the anxiety of all people melt several points.

Huo Yuhao said: “After leaving Academy, I go to Bright Struggle Mountain Range directly, enters Sun-Moon Empire from the Bright Struggle Mountain Range direction......”

Is listening to his narration, numerous position Ancient Elder nod again and again. Especially when they heard that Huo Yuhao is actually bringing three Soul Engineer Corp surprise attack Bright Capital City, and by one nine levels surely installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to explode the Bright Capital City imperial palace the time, terrified changes countenance. Princess Wei Na excited has grasped the table edge.

However, in narrating in process, Huo Yuhao can avoid and undead Demi-plane related part, after all, this is he most important secret, how regardless to say that Princess Wei Na is a bystander.

Asked the monthly ticket, to seek recommendation vote support. Let our double list Qi Fei!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-556-part-2





Volume 12

#556 - Under Fearful Orange Open Intrigue


“......, After fleeing Bright Capital City, we slightly make the recuperation, because does not know here news, therefore came back. The watermark advertisement test watermark advertisement test just actually heard Sky Soul Empire......”

Old Xuan nodded, “this no wonder. You attacked these ordinary cities are not anything, Sun-Moon Empire will therefore not affect the front. But your direct attack Bright Capital City, and was successful, this made that Emperor Sun-Moon Empire have to attach great importance. It seems like that you have shown some something that gives one away, making them guess correctly that this matter is related with you, thus lets the front army to our important people. Within ten days hand over you.”

Huo Yuhao [say / way] looking pensive: “Old Xuan, I thought that is not such simple.”

“?”The Old Xuan look moves slightly, “said your idea.”

Huo Yuhao sinking sound track: “Sun-Moon Empire aspect, if were transmitting orders lets the front army to the Academy important person, I thought that this possibility was very small. After all, in their opinion, I should be right in Sun-Moon Empire. But our Academy was impossible to subpoena in a short time found my. Even to hand over me, not possible!”

Zhang Lexuan said: “Can that be they finds an excuse, is used to attack Academy?”

Huo Yuhao shakes the head once more, “should not, because the time was too long. Ten days of time, had in the Soul Guidance Technology war to be very long the present. They are willing ten days of time to hand over me to us, this likely does not want the direct attack we. Naturally, does not remove them is lulling us, quick will launch the offensive. The possibility that but this situation in my opinion, has is very low.”

[Say / Way] that Princess Wei Na has doubts: “Why?”

Huo Yuhao said: “Now Sun-Moon Empire three services commander is War-God Empress. I know her. Initially, I when Sun-Moon Empire as exchange lived the study, she once is my Senior Sister, studied under a guidance of Teacher, among us also had the quite good relations.”

He said here, below thigh had actually been pinched by Tang Wutong.

Huo Yuhao does not certainly dare to display. Only can endure to continue to say sorely: “My this Senior Sister, in Soul Engineer practice, the talent is ordinary. But in the military aspect, has startled certainly the colorful strong capability. Initially. Deceptive attack Bright Struggle Mountain Range. Actually actually attacks the plan of Sky Soul Empire, is her plan. Thus has produced such results. Has broken through the Sky Soul Empire border. But, she returns to Sun-Moon Empire to give birth to the crown prince, during that time, is the Sun-Moon Empire army is quietest. Now. She came back. Her wisdom idea is always full, never does the senseless matter. She clearly knows that Academy impossible to hand over me, actually uses this reason attacking army has reached the city, certainly has anything to plan to carry on. Regarding direct attack Academy, I believe that the possibility is not big.”

Yan Shaozhe Dean said: “But cannot rule out this possibility. Otherwise, once their all-out attack, the Academy ten thousand years of base industry is likely destroyed in a moment, this is we cannot withstand.”

Huo Yuhao sighed one darkly. Nodded, said: “This is also the Ju Zi(orange) intelligent place. She clearly knows that we have to rescue, therefore, compels us with this way. But at this time, actually regardless of Star Lou Empire or Dou Ling Empire, most is willing to see that Sun-Moon Empire such does.”

“Why?”Sits cannot bear ask in Huo Yuhao Tang Wutong.

Huo Yuhao said: “Is very simple. Sun-Moon Empire launches the attack to us, then, our can Shrek not go to face whole-heartedly? Shrek City became a pivot, here, has our Shrek complete strength, if again centralized Star Luo and strengths of Dou Ling two big empires, is most likely to repel the Sun-Moon Empire army. But Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries are away from us is very near, can transfer in a short time the army, ten days of time, was enough.”

Listened to his such saying, the complexion of people somewhat changed, they also similarly felt plot flavor. No, or this should be open intrigue, attacks the enemy to rescue, can advance or retreat. No one can find out, the Ju Zi(orange) true tactic is anything.

If Ju Zi(orange) launched the offensive, then, Shrek Academy own strength cannot resist obviously. Therefore, must request reinforcements outward. The loss of broken city, Shrek cannot withstand!

But if, came the reinforcements, the Sun-Moon Empire army actually to hold troops at the appointed time really? Or do they have other movements? This deals?

Suddenly, in Sea God Pavilion, is a silence. The complexion of everyone is very ugly. The Sun-Moon Empire army made one to move ahead hundred li (0.5km), and fired some shells from the sky has become the character, made Shrek Academy fall into the aspect of being in a dilemma.

Calm calm Old Xuan, frowned at this time. On the face the look also becomes dignified.

Xian Lin'er said: “Old Xuan, can we reply on Star Dou Forest that side strength? After all recently, we and their cooperation have been very happy. Spirit Transferring Pagoda headquarters also in our city, if can reply on their some strengths, resisted the Sun-Moon Empire attack to be much easier.”

Old Xuan shook the head, said: “The Beast God Di Tian mentality I was too clear, wish makes him help us, that is impossible. He looks forward to our humanity to kill one another, thus weakens the human the strength. Such Soul Beast existing space will be much bigger. Let alone the main force of war is to need Soul Ring Soul Master and Soul Engineer now. Every time dies, to Soul Beast, is the good deeds.”

Qian Duoduo said: “If we do attack on own initiative? Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries after receiving our Distress Signal, certainly at the maximum speed will dispatch troops. In this case, we gather fully, fights a decisive battle with Sun-Moon Empire directly, will have the opportunity? At least this can divert them not to handle other matters.”

Huo Yuhao shakes the head saying: “Frontage decisive battle, is very difficult. Wanted to resist our frontal attack, Sun-Moon Empire these Soul Guidance Array only needs to change to defense to be enough completely. Even if can attack, the price that we must pay is also huge. Moreover the possibility that attacks is very low. Our superiority be only the population in high-end strength, in the overall strength, truly must miss were too many.”

Xian Lin'er delicate eyebrows tight wrinkle, “can that be good? Cannot attack, defends is also very difficult to defend.”

Tang Wutong opens the mouth to say suddenly: “The best means should hold troops. Not requests reinforcements to Dou Ling and Star Luo both countries, making them consolidate own defense line.”

Listened to her to say these words, Huo Yuhao changed her the vision instantaneously, this also similarly was he wants saying that was only, he hesitates.

“? Why?”Old Xuan somewhat surprised looks at Tang Wutong. But other Ancient Elder, majority are the look is bad. Tang Wutong the means that must give up Shrek City simply!

Tang Wutong looked at Huo Yuhao one, snort|hum, said: “Some words, you did not say, I said for you. Reason that I this propositions, are because Ju Zi(orange) attacks the Shrek City possibility to be very small. So long as we make Yuhao exit to make an appearance, making her know that Yuhao truly in city, believes that she will not order to attack Shrek City.”

Yan Shaozhe surprised [say / way]: “Is this possible? Has she feared Yuhao?”

Tang Wutong curled the lip, very some been jealous little girl flavors, “did not fear, but loves. She likes Yuhao. I believe that she will not injure Yuhao. Therefore, so long as knows that Yuhao in city, the possibility that she ordered to attack a city was very low. I looked that she makes us hand over Yuhao, absolutely is a smoke shell.”

“Ah?”noon Ancient Elder hear of her such saying, immediately were surprised. Sun-Moon Empire does War-God Empress like Huo Yuhao unexpectedly? This news is not general unthinkable!

On the Huo Yuhao face reveals to shame the embarrassed color, Tang Wutong after saying these words, realized own mood some are not right, turns head to look to Huo Yuhao, spits the tongue.

Had not opened the mouth Old Song said: “This also too child's play. This war, is Sun-Moon Empire must sweep across the entire Continent aggressive war, that War-God Empress controls the Sun-Moon Empire 1 million armies, will affect her resolution because of the children personal relationships?”

Listened to Old Song this word, numerous position Ancient Elder slightly nod the head. In the Tang Wutong words the jealousy is full, they naturally that hear of coming out. But must say that makes them believe Sun-Moon Empire three services commander will make a decision because of the personal relationships, they are very difficult to believe.

At this time Huo Yuhao was not instead good to say anything again, actually, in his heart, the idea was the same with Tang Wutong. Just saw that fireworks from him the time, he judges, this certainly is the smoke shell that Ju Zi(orange) emits, but, Ju Zi(orange) should not think that he such will quickly return to Academy, happen to was seen by him.

Ju Zi(orange) on fierce on was too fiercely fierce, before 600,000 armies who this smoke shell put pressed, threatens Shrek City, making Shrek not dare not to deal. At this time, if he also proposed that with the Tang Wutong same suggestion, definitely will suffer resisting of numerous position Ancient Elder.

Old Xuan hesitates saying: “This aspect is complex, actually has to guard, in Shrek City has 100,000 garrison troops, happen to Yuhao you also came back. Takes place three big Soul Engineer Corp arrangement as soon as possible, prepares for action. Prepare Soul Guidance Array place. Lexuan, you here the situation will notify Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries, invites they pay attention to the border defense at the same time, prepares to reenforce to us.”

“Yes.”Zhang Lexuan complies with one.

“Yes.”Huo Yuhao has hesitated, complies.

The instruction of Old Xuan, after is two opinions mutually compromise, after all, is Sea God Pavilion Pavilion Master, he must give priority to the Shrek life or death.

Then discussed that was some defense details, Princess Wei Na also said that the Sky Soul Empire remnants of defeated troops will assist Shrek to defend stubbornly whole-heartedly.

The conference was held late at night to end.

Left Academy, Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong and Beibei walks toward Tang Sect.

In the Beibei eye is revealing the color of thinking consistently, “Yuhao, how I thought that some are not right. Has the feeling of planting lead by the nose?”



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-556-part-3





Volume 12

#557 - Comes To Understand


Huo Yuhao sighed, “perhaps, we came back is a mistake. We not only cannot divert the Sun-Moon Empire army, instead was diverted by them in Shrek City. Cannot pose the threat to the Sun-Moon Empire native place, as the matter stands, our original strategies all became the bubble. Moreover, Wutong said right, I believe that by the Ju Zi(orange) wisdom, will not place Shrek City the main objective of attack. Attacking a fortified position, but may also be attacks the two countries whole-heartedly support the firm city, compelling Academy to go all out, this is not the matter that present Sun-Moon Empire should do.”

“Sorry, Yuhao, I should not say, if you analyzes, can perhaps say obedience position Ancient Elder.”Tang Wutong lowers the head, seems like the child of wrong thing.

Huo Yuhao grips her hand, shook the head, said: “Does not blame you, even if me, the result will not change. Ju Zi(orange) is really fierce, this move of open intrigue, compelling Academy to help oneself, no one dares to make the gambling stake with the Academy safety. This is she most astute place. Really is quite fierce!”

Beibei said: “We cannot this way, if certainly wants the means to deal, otherwise, this time was perhaps dangerous.”

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “This, Wutong, you returns to Academy, to Inner Court that side inquired that a deployment of next present Star Lou Empire, where has a look at Duke White Tiger as well as Star Lou Empire main force. First Senior Brother, we go back first are the Little Ya Teacher treatments, then I look for a Duke White Tiger, to his Chen by the stake, making him pay attention to the security. As for Dou Ling Empire that side, I come back to go from Star Lou Empire, that side we only know Heavenly Sun Douluo, can only ask him to help. Can look convince Dou Ling Empire many main forces do not send.”

“Several thousand years ago, under coordination of Academy, concentrates the strengths of three big empires, routs the Sun-Moon Empire main force, thus makes them lose to return, establishes these for several thousand years peace. Feared that this Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries are holding the similar faith, if so, they will definitely turn out in full strength, such troubled. We fell into the subsequent party now, can only be deals passively.”

Here, in the Huo Yuhao heart raised a dilutedness, he discovered that his strength was too tiny, by strength of the, is unable to change the current situation.

Thinks had very good effect in Sun-Moon Empire domestic destruction, who knows, the front, the direction of Ju Zi(orange) to Sun-Moon Empire army is swifter and fiercer, arrived has let his some degrees of being at wit's end.

Not is very formidable!

“Yuhao.”Tang Wutong called him suddenly.

“Um?”Huo Yuhao turns head to look to her.

Tang Wutong stretches across one step, arrives in front of him, she compared with Huo Yuhao also short many, they almost horizontally view. Her vision brilliant looks at Huo Yuhao, said: “Cannot lose the confidence!”

In Huo Yuhao heart one cold, immediately understood her meaning, nods the head slightly, nodded to her.

Tang Wutong said: “Initially, Teacher passed on our legacy, was hopes that we can become the mainstays of Academy in the future, protected Academy, developed Academy. We cannot disappoint Teacher. Yuhao, you thought that individual strength was extremely tiny, looks that the Sun-Moon Empire army threatens the border, our individual strengths have not been able to change the result of this war, feeling that even somewhat is hard to resist?”

Huo Yuhao surprised looks at this Tang Wutong, “Wutong, you are really interlinked with my regard! I really had this thought a moment ago.”

Tang Wutong stern [say / way]: “Right, individual strength, in the face of the collective truly is very tiny. However, after individual effort as formidable as certain extent, is actually not cannot affect the entire war! Others cannot, you also should the energy. Don't forget, you are only Ultimate Soldier that Shrek Academy trains! Moreover, you are not a person are always fighting, you have me, First Senior Brother, our Tang Sect partner, in your back, has the entire Shrek Academy support. Therefore, no matter, you cannot be discouraged. You have the advantageous ability, Twin Martial Souls, undead Demi-plane, if also who can change the course of events, that only then you! Regardless of your me, is not very truly formidable, we must become stronger, can truly become the leader of this war.”

Beibei be with smile on the face looks at Tang Wutong and Huo Yuhao, “Wutong said right, no matter, we cannot be discouraged, even if were defeated finally, again? At least we whole-heartedly, did not remain regrettably.”

Huo Yuhao was silent, a moment ago his heart truly was chaotic, the Tang Wutong words just liked severe warning, awakened from the confusion him.

Saw him to fall into the ponder, Tang Wutong no longer spoke, arrived at side him, gripped his hand, gave him to support with the temperature of oneself palm silently.

In the Huo Yuhao heart mused that Ju Zi(orange) Ju Zi(orange), you gave me to have a huge difficult problem really! How broken bureau, important, once the broken bureau has made a mistake, then likely loses 100 percent.

Sometimes, the plot is instead good to deal, is such open intrigue, moreover open intrigue that oppresses others by the potential, instead is most formidabe.

Wants the broken bureau, must defeat the enemy by a surprise attack!

Individual strength, Ultimate Soldier?

Suddenly, in the Huo Yuhao mind remembered Tang Wutong just to say words, in the mind was similar to has a lightning to pass over gently and swiftly instantaneously general.

In his mind recalled suddenly at the point of death mother before has spoken a few words:

“Yuhao, the future road, can only be you walked, mother cannot accompany you. You must remember, on this world, you can entirely believe person who can completely depend upon, only then you. Only then become formidable, can be you to do, protects you to protect.”

Only then oneself!

Bang

His top of the head above fierce distortion fluctuation that riddle instantaneous to shatter in Huo Yuhao mind, the intense mind fluctuation initiates appears, enters airborne.

The airborne fog will shortly dispel, becomes sunny.

takes a deep breath, in Huo Yuhao double pupil none remaining twinkle, sinking sound track: “First Senior Brother, Wutong, we cannot be chaotic at this time. According to me a moment ago said that Wutong you returns to Academy, inquired that Star Lou Empire that side deployment, must find the place that Duke White Tiger is stationed. Then First Senior Brother troubles you to go personally, sees Duke White Tiger, told him my speculation and here situation, making him probably probably bear, do not send the complete main force, then organized elite legion, prepared to move at any time.”

“Wutong, you go to Dou Ling Empire, only then you same know Heavenly Sun Douluo with me, found him, told him the situation similarly. Said said to Duke White Tiger with First Senior Brother is the same. Good that if I guess, the Ju Zi(orange) true goal is very possible is Dou Ling Empire. Because Dou Ling Empire is smallest and weakest, sometimes, the simplest guess is most correct, because is reverse reverse.”

Tang Wutong said: “You?”

Huo Yuhao hugs into her the bosom, has caressed her pink-blue color long hair, “I give the Little Ya Teacher treatment first, then immediately closes up, attacks Titled Douluo. You said right, if individual strength can change the war, then, this person can only be I. Only then I have to submerge the ability of hostile camp. My this Ultimate Soldier, must achieve Absolute!”

Tang Wutong silent, then makes an effort has selected, turned around to run, directly soars Academy. She is very clear, risk of Huo Yuhao this impact, but, she similarly is also clear, now at this time, this was best to choose. Once Huo Yuhao second Soul Nucleus breaks through, then, he is not Titled Douluo of ordinary significance!

Beibei looks at Huo Yuhao, the look is somewhat complex, “Yuhao, you......”

Huo Yuhao lifts the hand, stops Beibei the words that wants saying that smiles, said: “First Senior Brother, man real man, this forcing up time, cannot be timid. Lets me and Ju Zi(orange), well fights, she leaves the open intrigue, I also leave the open intrigue. Who has a look is can achieve the final success.”

Returns to Tang Sect, other people went to be busy, in the hall only sits one person.

The Tang Ya complexion is as before pale, sits there, looks like a take pity on lily, looks at her appearance, let alone is Beibei, even if Huo Yuhao, in the heart slightly aches. He still clearly remembers own that lively adorable Little Ya Teacher!

Just, this time Tang Ya, on face has the excitement that cannot conceal, sits there, both hands actually grip the tight lower hem corner, somewhat intensely is waiting.

“Little Ya Teacher!”The Huo Yuhao half step enters the hall, Beibei instead slow his some, lip sip tight, in the eye the tears are partly visible.

Several years, although rescues Tang Ya, but Beibei sings in a chorus unable to see, Tang Ya never true joyful.

Her is not joyful, is not because own is not healthy, because Tang Sect under everybody's working as one progresses day by day shortly, but oneself cannot add on any busily, therefore is painful!

Reconstructs Tang Sect, is in her heart had vainly hoped for that for this dream, she initially even chose left Beibei. Obviously this matter in her heart is important. But now, the Tang Sect reconstruction started, and has been developing high-speed, but this sect master actually anything could not do, can only see everybody to bustle about, looks that everybody risked one's life, for her, the suffering of innermost feelings won the pain on body by far.

Is relying on Sword of Life that Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill and Huo Yuhao provide, the Tang Ya present physical condition is stable, but she actually as before is a delicate ordinary young girl.

--------------------------------------------------

The peerless Tang Sect cartoon just uploaded five in our prestigious platforms, Wang Dong enters the stage officially!!!! Has a look quickly. I the group have sent, if after is, joins the book friend in platform, the transmission: Peerless Tang Sect 125, consult, consults the front cartoon, so long as changed Chinese figure to be good, for example: Peerless Tang Sect one, and so on.

Joins the method of our platform to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is our families. Then, the cartoon is Yuhao and Wang Dong splendid match play!

The quickest renewal, non- ball window reading invited.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-557-part-1





Volume 12

#557 - Came To Understand


But in just, Tang Ya heard that Huo Yuhao calmly however looked for Blue Silver Emperor to come back, she finally hopefully restored, can she not be unhappy?

“Yuhao! Thank you. Watermark advertisement test

Watermark advertisement test ”sees Huo Yuhao, Tang Ya stands up at the same time, has wept copiously.

Huo Yuhao hurries saying: “Little Ya Teacher, did not have initially you and First Senior Brother giving shelter, does not have my today, said that thanked is too polite. I immediately start to give you to treat. First cured you said again that was good?”

At the same time was saying, his Spiritual Detection releases, very easy had found that Blue Silver Emperor in Tang Sect.

Beibei arrives at side Little Ya, supporting gently she, at this time, this refined Tang Sect First Senior Brother was a few words could not say. His sentiment to Tang Ya that blazing, is, in recent years, for Tang Ya, the suffering in his heart withstanding even must above Tang Ya!

Waited these many years, healthy Tang Ya must return to side him finally, can he not be excited?

After a little while, Blue Silver Emperor goes to the hall, when its first saw Tang Ya knows that this was own goal. Tang Ya Blue Silver Grass Martial Soul aura was very weak, but actually as before exists, is sovereign in Blue Silver Grass, he naturally can feel clearly.

“Hello! Blue Silver Emperor.”Beibei can say the words to come finally, he very earnest bows to salute to Blue Silver Emperor, Little Ya is also so.

Huo Yuhao said to Blue Silver Emperor: “Senior, this is my First Senior Brother, this is Little Ya Teacher, believes that you also looked, Little Ya Teacher Martial Soul received heavy wound, therefore we needed your help. My First Senior Brother had also pledged, so long as does not come under the Soul Beast active threat, does not hunt and kill Soul Beast on own initiative.”

Blue Silver Emperor nodded, very direct [say / way]: “That starts. First treats the wound to her. Then said other.”

At the same time was saying, Blue Silver Emperor that the arm that is formed by the vine lifts, shakes gently, section of glittering and translucent carving blue vine fluttered. Falls in the Huo Yuhao hand.

Sought diligently was so long. Every one time fails when success seemed within reach, even continuously in the entire Continent dispersion news. allow at the large sum of money, Blue Silver Emperor that cannot find, finally appeared in Tang Sect.

Huo Yuhao turns head to say to Beibei: “First Senior Brother, we look for quiet room. Now starts. The Blue Silver Emperor senior, do you also come?”

“Um, I have a look.”Blue Silver Emperor nodded, after all, Little Ya will be very possible in the future is the load bearing the master of his spirit, he must pay attention.

Looked for quiet room to be too easy, in backyard. Chose quiet room, Beibei protector, Huo Yuhao is the Tang Ya treatment, Blue Silver Emperor looks in the one side personally.

“Little Ya Teacher. You sit cross-legged to sit, then relaxes the body. After I help you Martial Soul awakens, you attempt to start to revolve your Soul Power, should not be anxious, our little. Ok?”

Tang Ya nodded, how she can not be anxious! She even wins the past to the hope of strength now. But she also knows that is certainly calm at this critical moment, otherwise overstated troubles.

takes a deep breath, diligently was been tranquil by oneself, Tang Ya sits cross-legged to sit.

Nearby Blue Silver Emperor lifts both hands suddenly, makes the movement that empty has pressed to Tang Ya. Immediately, a blue misty halo floating falls on Tang Ya.

Strange saying that the Tang Sect people try various types to treat Soul Ability invalid Tang Ya, under the sweep of this blue light, the whole person really has the body and mind peaceful feeling.

Gratitude looked at Blue Silver Emperor, nodded to him.

Huo Yuhao arrives in front of Tang Ya, grasps Blue Silver Emperor that vine in the hand. Pure Mysterious Heaven Skill Soul Power pours into slowly. On this Blue Silver Emperor vine sends out the intense blue halo immediately.

The Tang Ya tender body shakes slightly, she as if felt oneself within the body to have any thing to start to have the fluctuation in the aura of that Blue Silver Emperor vine, because although the vitality of her within the body the Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill reason no longer passed, but will not increase, but at this time, some whole body warm feelings, as if within the body had any thing to be awakened.

Huo Yuhao Soul Power injects the enhancement, “pū”a light sound, that Blue Silver Emperor vine to shatter, changes into the innumerable blue burnishing powders to drift about suddenly in the midair.

At this time, saw the Huo Yuhao formidable controlling force. These burnishing powders do not proliferate under his Soul Power control, but is the even dispersion in the air. Part integrates from the Tang Ya pore place quietly, another part enters within the body with her breath.

The body of Tang Ya starts slightly shivers, the body of whole person has also covered light blue color.

Huo Yuhao relaxed slightly, currently speaking, the situation is at least normal. As for following, must look at Tang Ya own.

The leading role of this Blue Silver Emperor vine, awakens Tang Ya own Martial Soul Blue Silver Grass. Because her Blue Silver Grass Martial Soul was rejected the dark part, therefore itself for weak, but the Blue Silver Emperor aura is formidable enough, so long as awakens its Martial Soul, making Martial Soul have the vitality, then, her cultivating to return slowly, the vitality will therefore also save, is thorough was good.

The Tang Ya tooth fastens to nip, she can feel that the strength of own within the body started to be awakened, was only this summon strength seemed to be weak, although she felt, but actually as before cannot have the source strength with the aid of this summon strength.

In the Tang Ya heart worries! This opportunity is how rare, if were defeated, she cannot want to be finally what kind of.

More worries, she more has the feeling of not being able to make an effort, the aura in within the body does not have the means to be summoned as before, but the Blue Silver Emperor aura and effect with unceasing integration, started to be weaken.

Not and not!

In the Tang Ya heart is greatly anxious, going all out wants to attract that strength, in the anxiety, entered the Blue Silver Emperor energy of her within the body instead to start the disorder to get up.

Huo Yuhao was also startled, he has observed the Tang Ya physical condition through Spiritual Detection, Tang Ya suddenly has within the body aura disorder, he somewhat was also anxious. But at this time, no one could add on her! This is to inspiring of own Martial Soul, is not Soul Power can achieve. But is in Martial Soul strange connection is having the function.

In this time, a blue form quietly is appearing in Tang Ya behind, his both arms lift, slender vines walk randomly quietly, disturbed the body of Tang Ya, his whole body blue light flaminged greatly, the intense aura bloomed outward.

That is not the Soul Power aura, but came from in the Martial Soul bloodlines aura.

Is Blue Silver Emperor!

The body of Tang Ya shivered fiercely, has stabilized then. Can clear seeing, from her dantian position, a small group blue color ray outward diffusion, but vine that Blue Silver Emperor releases, the blooming ray is partly visible, very strange.

Became? Huo Yuhao pleasantly surprised looks to Beibei, Beibei is also so. They were too anxious. But at crucial moment getting rid of Blue Silver Emperor, became most important.

Huo Yuhao can feel that this time should really the success be right.

Really, the Tang Ya aura has stabilized gradually, the body also no longer shivered. Within the body started to have own Soul Power fluctuation.

The Blue Silver Emperor disturbance disperses in her vine quietly, it also returns side Huo Yuhao.

“Martial Soul of her within the body had been awakened, is really our Blue Silver Grass purest lineage/vein. Moreover, in her bloodlines, legitimate Blue Silver Grass emperor's clan bloodlines, thank you, Huo Yuhao. You helped me look for a very good host. In the future if I can fuse your spirit, in within the body, I should be able to help her, she can also help me. Thanks.”

Huo Yuhao and Beibei bow to salute to Blue Silver Emperor together, “is we should be thank you right, without your help, possibly was a moment ago dangerous.”

The Tang Ya aura was finally steady, but the Soul Power fluctuation that her within the body releases also starts to be strengthened. The scope of although increasing is not strong, at this time also looks like ordinary Soul Scholar. But feeling Huo Yuhao of this enhancement can actually feel clearly, and through Spiritual Sharing, enabling Beibei also to discover.

“It seems like, Little Ya Teacher also needs to close up some time. This time, after she closes up finished, Soul Power should be able fully to restore. When the time comes to Little Ya Teacher nutritious good. First Senior Brother, or goes to the Star Lou Empire matter to make Third Senior Brother go. You remain to accompany Little Ya Teacher.”

Beibei actually shook the head, said: “Everybody has everybody's matter, I go to one to be quite good personally. I have the status of Sea God Pavilion member, is easier to win trust. Yuhao, you write to me, I immediately. I look for Nannan and Xiao Xiao first, asking them to help to defend Little Ya.”

Beibei fighting intent in heart is very exuberant at this time. Tang Ya finally restored, for him, on this world all haze as if had been scattered. But is Tang Sect leader First Senior Brother, his mood one good, the mind condition of whole person becomes is different.

“Good!”Does not wait for us, Huo Yuhao could not attend to at this time with Beibei is polite.

When Beibei looks for Xiao Xiao and Jiang Nannan, the Huo Yuhao letter has also written. Gives Beibei, Beibei has not rested, immediately leaves Tang Sect, directly soared Star Lou Empire.

After Huo Yuhao urged Jiang Nannan and Xiao Xiao, entered the Tang Sect Soul Guidance Hall underfloor area. Came to the Xuan Ziwen laboratory directly.

Before closing up, some of his also matters must consult his Teacher Xuan.

“Bang and Bang!”Huo Yuhao knocking on gently on the metal door of laboratory has struck two.

In the metal door did not have any response, Huo Yuhao already to be used to this situation, the pushing gate quietly entered.

Really, Xuan Ziwen in inside, busily is manufacturing Soul Guidance Device, looked that does not look at his one eyes.

“Teacher Xuan. I came back.”Huo Yuhao said in a soft voice.

---------------------------------------------------

During double, asking the monthly ticket to support!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-557-part-2





Volume 12

#557 - Came To Understand


“I knew, heard you Tang Sect production installed Soul Guidance Cannon to shoot to use up surely almost 60%?”

“Has this matter. Watermark advertisement test

The watermark advertisement tests Second Senior Brother to betray me! ”Huo Yuhao helpless [say / way].

Xuan Ziwen said indifferently: “Soul Guidance Device produces to use, has anything to betray. However did your effect achieve really? More than 10,000 install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, one used up. Your this black sheep of the family. You not mixes with some dummy catridges? You clearly know that such attack is impossible to break through the Bright Capital City defense.”

Huo Yuhao smiles bitterly, said: “At that time could not attend, at that time was very nervous. I have made a mistake, Teacher Xuan.”

Xuan Ziwen beckoned with the hand, said: “Our surely installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to be weak, more than 10,000 installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to consume their defense energy surely. Most is makes the High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device energy consumption of Bright Capital City excessive. Is really unworthy. I had adjusted recently, we produce installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to start to classify surely.”

“? How to classify?”Huo Yuhao asked curiously.

Xuan Ziwen said: “Before we, when the volume production installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, almost is primarily the explosion -type. Have the destruction through the high temperature, high fever as well as the explosive force. For this reason, now almost all Soul Guidance Protective Cover also aim at this forms of defensive action. Especially linkage defense guard shield. Just Caitou asked me to report the processes of this fight. The results that Highest Flatterer produces have surpassed my anticipated.”

Highest Flatterer penetrated that nine levels of Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace defense to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, was Xuan Ziwen personally developed.

“Therefore I decided that in following installs in the Soul Guidance Cannon ball production surely, we must produce some types. Must have the range attack, must have the puncture attack. Every so often, the effect of puncture attack is instead better. Recently I developed one type to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely. Is called Child and Mother Puncture Shell. The construction cost installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to want high about one time compared with that you study surely, because must use the rare metal. But destructive power, hey! Before was stepping up to produce. If you exit to take an action again, can take one batch.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Perhaps temporarily we could not get away. At present situation some are not wonderful. I had the new plan.”

Xuan Ziwen lifts the hand, preventing him to say. Said: “Outside matter do not tell me, so long as Tang Sect in one day, I have not left here, I also by all means my research. As for other matters, that is your. You became nine levels of Soul Engineer, I did not have anything to be good to teach you. You try hard. That side volume production Humanoid Soul Guidance Device matter I also heard. Hey, not necessarily certainly is good deed, you and others I ponder over well, after clearing off the mentality, I told you. By current Soul Guidance Technology. Even if Master Kong, is not necessarily able to develop not to have Humanoid Soul Guidance Device of side effect to come.”

“Master Kong? Is who?”[Say / Way] of Huo Yuhao doubts.

Xuan Ziwen shot a look at Huo Yuhao one, said: “Is my Teacher, Sun-Moon Empire Imperial Family Worship Hall Hall Master. Also is Sun-Moon Empire most formidable Soul Engineer, your Martial Ancestor.”

“! Such, how has not listened to you to say Ah?”Huo Yuhao surprised looks at Xuan Ziwen.

Xuan Ziwen stared his one eyes ill-humoredly, said: “That is you are silly. You think that at my age, initially was eight levels of Soul Engineer, if did not have the special reason, can become the Bright Virtue Hall senior research fellow? I am the Master Kong disciple. In Sun-Moon Empire all nine levels of Soul Engineer, has almost half to receive the direction of Master Kong. Master Kong is very fierce, his limit where I do not know. Absolutely is not in any case inferior in any Limit Douluo, is absolutely dangerous existence. I looked that Xu Tianran ascends the throne, had the support of Master Kong, otherwise, where is so easy!”

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth twitched, although is Martial Ancestor, but, this Martial Ancestor actually stands in the hostile standpoint! The enemies have such a powerhouse, absolutely is not the good matter.

“Teacher Xuan, I have closed up, you are busy, but must take care.”Huo Yuhao said.

Xuan Ziwen beckoned with the hand, looks like catches up with fly, “goes, the important matter has not done a bit less to be tired of me. You could rest assured that since has eaten your Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill, I want dead now am not easy. Yeah, you simply are profiteers! Squeezes my labor force.”

A helplessness of Huo Yuhao face, in heart the secret passage, your this temperament, wants, who can squeeze you!

Left the Xuan Ziwen laboratory, Huo Yuhao entered own laboratory. Although he is not at these days, but here people have cleaned, indoor the research is very clean.

Huo Yuhao the sincere iron gate closure, will deadlock from inside, simultaneously turned on inside warner, anybody approaches, will receive him to close up the warning of research.

Here is Tang Sect radically heavy, is peaceful and safe.

Huo Yuhao walked in own laboratory, straightened out own mentality, then jumps, jumped on the Soul Guidance Device manufacture stage, sat cross-legged to sit.

“General situation can only temporarily, whatever the situation developed. Does not present the result truly, Academy Ancient Elder is impossible to change the strategy. Dou Ling and Star Luo both countries, I also made contribution. Now looked how they make a decision. But I must do now, is as far as possible becomes by oneself more formidable, in the crucial time, plays the role of reverse war. I can be good, certainly can be good.”

Thought aloud spoke of here, Huo Yuhao gripped the tight double fist, double pupil slowly closed, the body also started to relax, within the body Soul Power naturally pasted.

Before Tang Wutong, proposed Ultimate Soldier time, Huo Yuhao understood her meaning. His Soul Power card in 89 levels, cannot become Titled Douluo eventually. From the strength, general Titled Douluo is not his match. But regardless of, regarding any Soul Master, becomes the speeding up of Titled Douluo strength enormous degree. Talent higher Soul Master, to promote is also bigger.

Let alone, Huo Yuhao had first Soul Nucleus, once his second Soul Nucleus condenses successfully, the Soul Power essence has not distinguished with Limit Douluo anything, in the future the rapidness of Soul Power winding speed, will be hard to imagine.

Since these days, Huo Yuhao has been accumulating actually, accumulated was very long. When he in the icy seas deep place, obtained oneself Spirit Eyes Martial Soul eighth Soul Ring, after is own sixth spirit Mermaid Princess, spiritual sea once more qualitative change, Spiritual Power suddenly to increase. Later was affected by the plant, comprehended more profound Minute Subtlety boundary. Present he, truly had has attacked the second Soul Nucleus possibility. In the mind controlling force, he is not at least inferior in any 98 levels of Soul Master.

Becoming by oneself more formidable, can have many rights to speak, can have the change battlefield ability. This is place that Huo Yuhao thinks through.

Although individual strength is tiny, but, sometimes, individual can also skid the general situation. Now cannot, powerful, perhaps was OK! Since does not have other good means now, then, strengthens oneself is the best choice.

Huo Yuhao has thought through, therefore he decides to close up.

Moreover, practice way that he must carry on with the Tang Wutong imagination is different.

It looks like in Tang Wutong, present he, cultivates own Soul Nucleus in the Equal Resonance way is the best means. But, Huo Yuhao actually does not think. He knows that in the future must challenge Beast God Di Tian such to exist. If inferior to Di Tian completely, then, oneself achievement possibly does not have. In this case, his only choice, walks with the Di Tian same road, even do him is better, is stronger than him.

Thinks of here, Huo Yuhao has set firm resolve, within the body Soul Power nature circulation, the forehead place, Soul Nucleus is stable, Spiritual Power is centered on Soul Nucleus, is circling similarly.

Huo Yuhao Soul Nucleus, is he now all strengths centers, first around Soul Nucleus, is circling is his Spiritual Power, the surrounding is Soul Power.

If observes from spiritual sea, will discover that has a huge diamond Sun in his spiritual sea, this Sun, is his Soul Nucleus. His Spiritual Power now is existence of close solid state, but also as before revolves Soul Nucleus to circle.

Huo Yuhao then must do, opens own second Soul Nucleus.

According to Old Xuan, this first Soul Nucleus opens is not easy, but actually established second Soul Nucleus to open the relatively easy foundation, because second Soul Nucleus in the dantian, the dantian stored up the Soul Power place, established Soul Nucleus be much easier than in other places in the dantian.

But, Huo Yuhao after these days accumulates, in the heart had other ideas.

The dantian opens Soul Nucleus is very no doubt good, is, not necessarily will be best regarding the development trend.

Because he must choose, is not the Equal Resonance practice way, but must carry on the method of practice Yin-Yang Supplement.

Yin-Yang Supplement, that is the pro and con goes against, practice itself for difficult, once carries on the Soul Nucleus practice by the dantian. First did not say successfully, once he has succeeded, then, in within the body two Soul Nucleus surrounding strengths revolve on the contrary, each other hauling, each other is supplementary. From the dantian to between the eyebrows, is Soul Power and Spiritual Power revolution place.

When then, later Huo Yuhao Soul Power is 98 levels of times what to do?

Perhaps, at that time he had to compare favorably with the Limit Douluo strength, but, that time he, actually as before was not Limit Douluo! To break through to 99 levels, becomes human Absolute, then, must be based on Soul Nucleus to break through. In other words, in the future Huo Yuhao must carry on the condensation of third Soul Nucleus.

As the matter stands, if his first two Soul Nucleus occupied in the Yin-Yang Supplement condition from the dantian to the between the eyebrows complete place, where his third does Soul Nucleus open?



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-557-part-3





Volume 12

#558 - The Masculine And Feminine Elements Is Supplementary, The Second Soul Nucleus


Humanity has three places to open Soul Nucleus, between the eyebrows, chest and dantian. To that time, has wanted between the chest from two big Yin-Yang Supplement Soul Nucleus to open third Soul Nucleus again, simply is dream of a fool. That needs to interrupt two big Soul Nucleus relations originally to be good directly first. In that case, Huo Yuhao directly from exploding.

In other words, if Huo Yuhao chooses second Soul Nucleus opens in the dantian, then, he will not have condensed the third Soul Nucleus possibility in the future, even if formidable, has not become the Limit Douluo strength. In that case, he could not inherit God of Emotion God Position.

Therefore, in the Huo Yuhao heart early some plans, he already had decided that own second Soul Nucleus not only need by form opening of Yin-Yang Supplement, but also the opening position is the chest, vacates the dantian, as the matter stands, he also will have in the future in the dantian opens the third Soul Nucleus possibility. At that time, third Soul Nucleus must face likely only then the chest located the disturbance of Soul Nucleus.

“Ice Emperor, Ice Emperor you in?”Huo Yuhao initiated summon in the heart.

“I, Yuhao, how?”Ice Emperor sound along with it resounding.

Huo Yuhao said: “I prepare to start to practice my second Soul Nucleus, thus attacks the Titled Douluo boundary. I must practice in the Yin-Yang Supplement way. Must trouble you to help me. Because I must establish Soul Nucleus in the chest place. My within the body fused your Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion Torso Bone, your strength is strongest there. But second Soul Nucleus that this time I must condense, is primarily our Absolute Ice Soul Power. I must strip from first Soul Nucleus Soul Power. In this case, once my second Soul Nucleus condenses successfully. Then. Is first Soul Nucleus controls Spiritual Power, second Soul Nucleus grasps Soul Power. Both when each other are supplementary, Soul Power and Spiritual Power nature communication, thus forms the aspect that Soul Power and Spiritual Power fuse. My all Soul Ability and abilities display, simultaneously had two's characteristics.”

Listened to the Huo Yuhao words silent, Ice Emperor, then sighed one lightly, said: “You know that does this to be difficult?”

Huo Yuhao said: “I do not know difficultly specifically. But in any event, I must attempt. Can you help me?”

Ice Emperor said: “I naturally must help you. Has to say. You are the talent different reported, and is extremely intelligent. The road that you choose, is our Absolute Ice lineage/vein, or is in all present age followers, most Absolute one practice way. Moreover whether there is potential completely.”

“Ah?”Huo Yuhao has not thought of Ice Emperor while does not favor oneself succeed, actually also so esteems itself.

Ice Emperor said: “In our Soul Beast world. Truly full of wisdom big energy, what almost chooses is this road. However, succeeds has one. That is, Beast God Di Tian, therefore, it is present age strongest Soul Beast.”

In the Huo Yuhao heart moves. Said: “Said that you also did choose have practiced like this?”

Ice Emperor said: “No. I did not have this qualifications. Because my strength could not have achieved to be equal to your humanity Limit Douluo level, does not have the means to construct second Soul Ring. But Xue'er truly has tried.”

“Snow Emperor.”Huo Yuhao called one with amazement.

Snow Emperor sound along with it resounding, “! I have tried, if I have succeeded, then, Di Tian is anything, at least my strength not weakly in him. But. I failed, result of failure. Causes my source to receive heavy wound, is unable to try the breakthrough next time bottleneck and heavenly power again. Therefore, can only choose to change into embryo, finally cheap you.”

Huo Yuhao has not thought that also has such twists and turns, in the heart not startled counter- happy, Snow Emperor has tried, that also means that she gained in certain experience, but regarding him, most valuable also these experiences!

Snow Emperor said: “I have tried, therefore I know this way the difficulty. Reason that Di Tian can be successful, is not because his willpower is stronger than many me. But because the body of his Golden Eyed Black Dragon King is tenacious enough. To complete the practice of Yin-Yang Supplement way, lets Spiritual Power and Soul Power thorough separation, fuses again supplementarily. To the load of body is extremely huge. Moreover, but must have the strong controlling force.”

“By your current Spiritual Power, was enough. However, you after all are only humanity, your body intensity, compared or misses with our Soul Beast. Reason that our Soul Beast does not choose the Equal Resonance way to practice, because our body structures are very difficult such choice. Our meridians and your humanity are different, without you that good hole hole. We have two positions to practice Soul Nucleus. This is also doomed we unable one of the to turn into a god reasons. But these two positions do not have the means to have resonating, therefore we can only choose Yin-Yang Supplement. Yuhao, do you want such to do really? If were defeated, the consequence will be very serious.”

Huo Yuhao not any hesitant, with extremely firm expression sinking sound track: “In any event, I must try. If this time has succeeded, we established went to the God Realm foundation. If were defeated......”

Here, he has stopped slightly, in the eye was shining, “only if I died, was not defeated!”

Not the unprecedented courage and spirit, want to attack this human forbidden area general ability, will have the successful possibility?

Snow Emperor and Ice Emperor were silent.

A moment later, Snow Emperor said with the unprecedented dignified sound: “Good, we accompany you to bet this. Our six spirits, help you together, I do not believe that cannot succeed. Yuhao, waits a minute you to practice by all means that does not need to manage us, we whole-heartedly, must not remain regrettably.”

“Um.”Huo Yuhao has selected, closes eyes.

He does not have to start immediately, but starts to adjust own condition, only then makes the condition maintain at best, can succeed. Is this crucial time, more cannot be anxious.

Rays separate from Huo Yuhao within the body.

First appears, is Snow Emperor and Ice Emperor. In six big spirits, is these two most formidable.

Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass and Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White), Daydream Ice Silkworm as well as Mermaid Princess Li Ya also successively appears.

Six big spirits, all encircle side Huo Yuhao.

Snow Emperor looked at other five big spirits, said: “The Yuhao words you heard a moment ago. This closing up, is very important to him, to us, is similarly important. We in Yuhao within the body, are based on his body is surviving. If he had problems, that also means that all our spirits had problems. Once he succeeds, that was also we succeeds. Therefore, this time, I request everybody, does not hesitate at all costs, how regardless of must help him get through the difficult time. Do not be worried about our own consumptions, once Yuhao has succeeded, can make us benefit all one's life by the Soul Nucleus exchange that the method of Yin-Yang Supplement forms. Moreover, like him said that once this time succeeds, truly will establish us to accompany his to turn into a god possibility in the future. After this is also we become the spirits, the true goal.”

Five big spirits also nod. Daydream Ice Silkworm is a stimulated color of face, “was good, I and other this day waited to be very long. Yuhao must take the footsteps toward that place finally. I fully support certainly him.”

Snow Emperor shot a look at his one eyes, said: “Daydream, I must warn that your, others can fully, you actually not use. You when Yuhao previous time has problem, including own source with him fused in together, this time, your convergence point. We can.”

Daydream Ice Silkworm gawked staring, the vision looked to nearby Ice Emperor, Ice Emperor actually left goes not to visit him excessively.

Snow Emperor ill-humored [say / way]: “You look at anything to look. Bing'er loves dearly you, good.”

The body of Daydream Ice Silkworm shivered slightly, has not said any colored words to come, nod of gently.

The Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass gigantic Octagonal leave of grass rocks gently, spreads own thought. Must say that in six big spirits, weakest was he.

Snow Emperor also said: “This Yin-Yang Supplement Soul Nucleus condenses, Soul Nucleus that Yuhao must establish is Absolute Ice attribute, in this case, needs the Absolute Ice strength specially to be formidable. Li Ya, you are responsible for spiritual sea that side mind Soul Nucleus, you must do, is assists Yuhao together to maintain that side stability, that side the necessary time, delays to our here disturbances.”

Li Ya nodded, although shortly after she just joined, but is Mermaid Princess, she has to surpass the ordinary human the wisdom, naturally understands that this time matter is important.

Snow Emperor continues to arrange the duty, sinking sound track: “Daydream, you assist Li Ya in that side, Yuhao Spiritual Source and your degree of polymerization are very high, your source also, controls more convenient. Meanwhile, you must pay attention to observe the Yuhao body condition, certainly cannot let his body collapse, understood?”

Daydream Ice Silkworm nodded.

Snow Emperor holds up the hand of Ice Emperor, said: “Bing'er is the main force, Yuhao this time must condense the Soul Nucleus place in the chest place, that is also your Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion Torso Bone in the position, I will assist you. Xiao Bai (Little White) and Octagonal, your also same place. Our four are the Absolute Ice Soul Power owners, we help Yuhao whole-heartedly, condenses Soul Nucleus. Octagonal, you are mainly responsible for stabilizing, Xiao Bai (Little White), you are responsible to the protection of Yuhao body. Transfers Soul Power to give me and Bing'er.”

“Yes!”Three big Absolute Ice spirits simultaneously comply with one.

During Snow Emperor short several words, has arranged all appropriately.

Snow Emperor looked at a five big spirit finally, “this time, allow Chenggong, cannot only be defeated. Let us work as one.”

“Works as one!”Five big spirits simultaneously lowly drink one.

Snow Emperor arrives at side Huo Yuhao, has patted gently his shoulder.

“Thank you, Snow Emperor.”Dialog Huo Yuhao between six big spirits all heard, he opens eyes, in the eye had the mist twinkle.

--------------------------------------------------

On Monday, three chapters of salvos asked monthly ticket and recommendation ticket.( To be continued. If you like this work, welcome you to cast the recommendation ticket and monthly ticket, your support, is I biggest power.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-558-part-1





Volume 12

#558 - The Masculine And Feminine Elements Is Supplementary, The Second Soul Nucleus


Snow Emperor gives a calm smile, said: “What thanked? Your this body, already incessantly was your, but was our. A our seven body, but also there is a matter that what cannot make? However, before start, you go to take carry back Life Guardian Knife, the huge vitality that it contains should be useful to you. Initially, Di Tian can condense Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus, in filling the Lake of Life lake water of life aura completed. Believes you can also use.”

Huo Yuhao eye one bright, yes! How one forgot this matter. Little Ya Teacher started to restore, Life Guardian Knife was useless to her, but perhaps to oneself, can actually play the enormous role.

The Huo Yuhao hurrying body, opens the laboratory front door, ran to look for Tang Ya.

Six big spirits, in such short distance, they temporarily have not left Huo Yuhao not to have any issue.

The Snow Emperor volt said several anything in the Ice Emperor ear. In the Ice Emperor blue beautiful pupil reveals the color of shock, fierce turning head looks to Snow Emperor, “Xue'er, you......”

Snow Emperor shows a faint smile, in the eye pupil, full is proud intent!

“I although in the past cannot succeed, but this time, in any event, must help Yuhao succeed!”

Ice Emperor nod of gently, “Snow Emperor, I understood.”

Snow Emperor elegant face one red, “what did you understand?”

Ice Emperor “pū”smiles, “understands that understands, I did not say!”

In the free time who they spoke, Huo Yuhao from outside was coming back, in the hand was grasping Life Guardian Knife.

Since absorbing that Gold of Life that initially Golden Hawksbill Turtle brought, Life Guardian Knife turned into Sword of Life. On the aquamarine sword blade is sending out the rich vitality. The secret room gate closure, indoor the entire research has filled with the strong life aura.

Although this life aura to having Huo Yuhao of body is useful, but regarding Spiritual Consciousness of six big spirits, there is a certain nourishing function. Therefore on their faces also revealed the color of satisfaction.

Snow Emperor nodded to Huo Yuhao, said: “Preparation starts. I will tell you my experience. Let you little detour, you said according to me does.”

“Good.”

Huo Yuhao condition originally adjusted was similar, brings back Sword of Life, under that rich life aura moistens. His body condition has also achieved best.

Sits cross-legged to sit. Huo Yuhao the Sword of Life keep flat above own knees, closed eyes. Soul Power is revolving along with the Mysterious Heaven Skill operational route slowly.

He in six months ago, Soul Power cultivated to reach 89 levels. Although cannot break through, but he had not stopped and practice between Tang Wutong, Soul Power is quite deep.

At this time Soul Power revolves. Similar to in within the body the ocean waves rushes generally turbulently. Viscous is full of the sense of reality.

A week Sky Soul strength revolves, within the body has produced the results of growing continually. The Spiritual Power full, naturally revolves, Soul Power to the forehead, by the Soul Nucleus nature attraction, will be circled and compressed in side.

Six big spirits all integrate Huo Yuhao within the body, Li Ya and Daydream Ice Silkworm guard spiritual sea. Other four big spirits arrived in Soul Power of Huo Yuhao chest position, is feeling his Soul Power change silently.

The Snow Emperor sound resounds in the Huo Yuhao mind, “Yuhao, you must first do. Reassigns from Soul Nucleus own Soul Power, only maintains that side Spiritual Power.”

“Good.”Huo Yuhao complies with one, revolution Soul Power, through lead of Soul Power, locates Soul Power that around Soul Nucleus compresses to lead between the eyebrows outward.

This is not an easy matter, because his body bearing capacity is limited. After having Soul Nucleus, Soul Nucleus helps him compress Soul Power, thus makes him be have many Soul Power. His transfers Soul Power, these Soul Power will flood in his meridians, quick, his meridians already full not any crevice.

“Yuhao, continue, do not stop.”The Snow Emperor sound conveys once more.

Meanwhile, the Huo Yuhao clear feeling, oneself chest and back skeleton tremble slightly, on the skeleton sent out the aquamarine ray. These savings are started to absorb by this Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion Torso Bone in huge Soul Power of his within the body immediately, enter in Torso Bone, making his meridians have the idle place.

In Huo Yuhao heart one happy, he somewhat understands that Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor must make anything. At that moment does not dare to neglect, controls Soul Power that in mind Soul Nucleus is compressing to output rapidly outward.

What all these carry on is very smooth, Soul Master consumes Soul Power is very normal matter, in the fight can frequently so. That side mind Soul Nucleus focusing on Spiritual Power, closest Soul Nucleus, is highly compression Spiritual Power.

Therefore, after Soul Power was transferred, Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus obviously became more active, spiritual sea started to revolve rapidly, Spiritual Power release outward naturally.

If the normal condition, Spiritual Power that these release outward naturally will inspire heaven and earth elemental energy, after attracting income within the body, changes into Huo Yuhao Soul Power, supplemented his consumption.

This is also the Soul Nucleus formidable place, so long as gives its enough time, does not carry on meditate, can help Soul Master restore Soul Power.

Just, at this time, Huo Yuhao obviously did not need Soul Nucleus to help him restore Soul Power now.

A light halo appears in the Huo Yuhao skin surface, this halo is Bai Se (White Color), what getting rid is Daydream Ice Silkworm.

The most familiar Huo Yuhao body, is his Brother Daydream!

Huo Yuhao initially bumped into Daydream Ice Silkworm, Daydream Ice Silkworm and he fuses, becomes his first Soul Ring. At that time, Huo Yuhao also likely is a white paper. These years, the Huo Yuhao ability has been growing, is Daydream Ice Silkworm looks that he walks step by step. Therefore, Brother Daydream is naturally familiar with his situation.

Does not need Snow Emperor to tell that Brother Daydream has handled the most correct matter, transfers Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power, has blocked his own mind Soul Nucleus and communication of outside heaven and earth elemental energy. As the matter stands, will not have heaven and earth elemental energy to enter around Soul Nucleus, formed Soul Power.

Spiritual Power that mind Soul Nucleus releases outward will strengthen naturally, the resistance of outside also similarly is the power that promotes it to revolve.

Li Ya also moved at this time, gentle Spiritual Power revolves Soul Nucleus, slows down the speed of Soul Nucleus revolution, carries on certain suppression.

But Huo Yuhao as far as possible speeds up Soul Power that reassigns in Soul Nucleus to compress.

The rebound of Soul Nucleus reassigns Soul Power to surpass 70% after Huo Yuhao started. The formidable suction made Daydream Ice Silkworm arrange outside mind barrier starts to drag, but Li Ya was controlling with every effort, but also made this suction produce was slightly slow.

This is the great strength of Soul Nucleus! Once Soul Nucleus forms, is the fountainheads of Soul Master all strengths, so is can it be that easy to vacillate?

The Huo Yuhao will is quite firm, although feels this change, does not have the meaning that any changes itself to move, as in whole-heartedly reassigns own compression Soul Power.

At this time appeared the Mermaid Princess superiority, the Li Ya priority did not make the revolution of Soul Nucleus reduce speed, but maintained the stability of Soul Nucleus.

This makes Huo Yuhao unnecessary diverts attention. Must know that Soul Nucleus is not steady, has the possibility of explosion, although has formed Soul Nucleus, the resisting force is strong. But, Huo Yuhao this going all out reassigns the procedure that does not let now restore, will make Soul Nucleus turbulent, at that time, he needs to consume energy to maintain. But this matter, Li Ya helped him do.

Daydream Ice Silkworm also increased to reassigning of Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power, to continue the foreign isolation.

At this time, no one dares to keep the strength, all in whole-heartedly was carrying on.

Time one minute one second passed, Huo Yuhao can feel clearly own spiritual sea under the reassignment of Soul Nucleus unceasing trembling, is wanting to release to help him Spiritual Power restore Soul Power. But matter that Li Ya handles now, looks like firmly grasps Soul Nucleus, does not make Soul Nucleus vibrate. But Daydream Ice Silkworm wraps the body of Huo Yuhao from outside, making him isolate with world of outside.

Another side, four big Absolute Ice spirits did not have what sound, but Ice Emperor is controlling Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion Torso Bone unceasingly, absorbs Soul Power that Huo Yuhao shifts.

At this time, the great strength of Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion Torso Bone appeared, from start to the present, it has almost absorbed Huo Yuhao 50% Soul Power, as before has not actually arrived at end. Itself becomes lush green, has not made Huo Yuhao feel slightly full.

Process Huo Yuhao that the help of six big spirits, at least this just started felt that is quite relaxed. At present has not come across the difficult problem.

Soul Power absorption many of more and more, terrifying Soul Power fluctuates every time to tremble, Huo Yuhao Soul Nucleus will become the even more wild several points. Li Ya deals started becomes difficult. To control mind Soul Nucleus, quite in the Huo Yuhao formidable Spiritual Power resistance.

“Yuhao, controls Soul Nucleus, making him slow.”Snow Emperor said.

The Huo Yuhao thought moves, own mind Soul Nucleus restores immediately under oneself control. Entire Soul Nucleus wild became has also stabilized.

Li Ya was liberated immediately, rests in his spiritual sea. But has controlled mind Soul Nucleus Huo Yuhao, now cannot divert attention to reassign own Soul Power again.

He is suppressing the Soul Nucleus instinct now. The Soul Nucleus instinct suppressed result, will make the rebound more intense.

A powerful suction transmits from the dantian position, pulls out to Huo Yuhao Soul Nucleus around final Absolute Ice Soul Power. This strength naturally from Snow Emperor, she finally got rid.

Huo Yuhao can feel faintly that the diamond ice crystal appears in own dantian position together, is having very strong suction, all absorbed the past own Soul Power, and in the process of absorption, was compressing these Soul Power unexpectedly, was playing and Soul Nucleus similar role.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-558-part-2





Volume 12

#558 - The Masculine And Feminine Elements Is Supplementary, The Second Soul Nucleus


Aura that on that ice crystal transmits, is Snow Emperor. Watermark advertisement test

Watermark advertisement test

What Snow Emperor is this is making?

Huo Yuhao is very clear, is Snow Emperor of spirit, can control Absolute Ice, but do not have the means absorption, she such compresses, will be will be very certainly big to own Spiritual Consciousness consumption.

However, in opportunity that this time he simply has not asked. Started, cannot stop.

Spiritual Power circulation, air in slight is shivering. Huo Yuhao is mind Soul Nucleus control, he controls before Li Ya the control effect was much better . The mind sinks to mind Soul Nucleus, making it enter to half dormancy condition, whatever Soul Power were reassigned. Part integrates nearby dantian Snow Emperor that side diamond crystal, another part, was controlled Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion Torso Bone suction by Ice Emperor.

Soul Power of Huo Yuhao within the body, starts becomes fewer and fewer.

Finally, has not known how long, around mind Soul Nucleus did not have any Soul Power fluctuation to exist finally again. All Soul Power entered the body of Huo Yuhao.

But at this time, the snow and ice two emperors have not actually stopped, but continues to absorb, absorbs the place that Soul Power oneself are at unceasingly. Soul Power of Huo Yuhao within the body gradually was also found time.

Huo Yuhao gradually had guessed correctly now the snow and ice two emperors must do, had them to help, to condense this second Soul Nucleus really to save the massive energy to oneself! Must succeed!

Snow Emperor and Ice Emperor are almost simultaneous acceleration absorb, Soul Power of Huo Yuhao within the body is vanishing at an exceptional pace, quick, all was inhaled that two places. Huo Yuhao own body is empty. Even has the intermittent weak transmission. But mind Soul Nucleus shivers was also fiercer. It longs to the absorption of energy, although it is mind Soul Nucleus, may absolutely not be small to the hope of Soul Power.

The Snow Emperor sound resounds, “Yuhao, I must start. Then, will have the pain to arrive. When me starts to condense second Soul Nucleus for you. The resistance of your side mind Soul Nucleus will be greatly strengthened. Because it can the feeling of subconscious some people probably destroy its domain, definitely will stick out suddenly the counter-attack. You must do, is in any event must stand firm it, makes it to me do not disturb as far as possible. Li Ya. You are ready. When necessary helps him. Daydream, you continued to protect outside on the line.”

Huo Yuhao transmits to a Snow Emperor affirmative thought. Simultaneously hits own Spiritual Power.

One restrain their body instinct, is not a comfortable matter. Accomplishing a task with ease when Huo Yuhao actually makes now, this is the formidable mind controlling force.

In the Huo Yuhao empty body, quietly presented Soul Power.

This Soul Power. By the dantian position, the diamond ice crystal place of Snow Emperor incarnation transmits.

Around the diamond ice crystal, Absolute Ice Soul Power just likes the galaxy circles generally, extreme congealing reality. After branching out this, does not have any influence.

This Soul Power surfaces the boat slowly, has hovered to the Huo Yuhao chest position, first has stopped there. Then starts to revolve quietly.

Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus according to clockwise has revolved, but this Soul Power, after the stop, changed into, only then millet grain of rice big little. Position of stop center the Huo Yuhao chest, but direction that he revolves, is actually anti-clockwise.

Slight revolving, has not caused anything to fluctuate.

However, behind this little Soul Power, is actually connecting a Soul Power silk to dantian, there, before is Snow Emperor, absorbed past Soul Power.

In other words, is revolving this point Soul Power, constantly strengthens under the control of Snow Emperor.

Its velocity of whirl is not fast, the self-energy amplification speed is not fast, revolving is very steady and is very steady. But at this time, on Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion Torso Bone under Ice Emperor control, the green jade light clear twinkle, forms an insulation, has isolated the sensation of outside to this chest place energy slightly.

“Yuhao. We cannot isolate counterclockwise rotation Absolute Ice Soul Power completely, in that case, once the isolation opens, your mind Soul Nucleus will have the eruption -type conflict with it, your body cannot withstand absolutely, will explode directly. Therefore, we can only make your mind Soul Nucleus continually adapt to its existence, from repel to acceptance formation. This process, is most difficult. The impact must start immediately, you are ready.”

“Good, come.”Huo Yuhao complies with one, he completely does not manage the situation in oneself dantian and chest place now, completely mind will centralized above own mind Soul Nucleus.

Absolute Ice Soul Power revolving of chest place starts to accelerate, Huo Yuhao, mind Soul Nucleus as if started to feel that is not right. It first is slight is trembling, then starts to struggle in the thought control of Huo Yuhao.

This is own Soul Nucleus, the Huo Yuhao naturally feeling it must do, it wants the extreme twist, dares to challenge the dignified fellow that by oneself formidable Spiritual Power to tear into shreds thoroughly.

Huo Yuhao controlling force also along with it enhancement. Trembling of mind Soul Nucleus also started to be getting more and more fierce. Absolute Ice Soul Power of chest place increased to gradually had the grain of rice size.

The Huo Yuhao strong control, is not making mind Soul Nucleus disturb.

That side Snow Emperor, very stable is continue increase the condensation of Absolute Ice Soul Power, does not accelerate. Such that just like it is said, she is making mind Soul Nucleus gradually adapt. Just, this adaptation starts from the intense repel.

The dizzy feeling was getting more and more intense, oneself resist their mind Soul Nucleus, is resisting own Spiritual Source!

Huo Yuhao mind world starts to present illusion, although he in strong control, but this control start has made his spiritual sea also shiver.

At this moment, the interesting to listen to singing sound resounds, Li Ya Spiritual Power releases quietly outward. Her Spiritual Power was full of the charming confusion might, charming confusion spiritual sea has been stabilizing, charming confusion was making the Huo Yuhao pain reduce, Soul Nucleus to struggle to weaken.

Revolving of Absolute Ice Soul Power, is not only strengthening, but also the velocity of whirl is also increasing.

Assistance of Li Ya, but let Huo Yuhao tranquil a while, the powerful impact feeling once more has transmitted.

“Yuhao, you can relax points the control to Soul Nucleus, cannot suppress completely, this is disadvantageous to the later fusion.”

“Um.”

Relaxes? After Huo Yuhao such has done, he discovered that like this makes the consequence that causes, even be more difficult than to resist beforehand hermetic mind Soul Nucleus.

After having a slit. Spiritual Power surge, does not dissipate outward, but directly soared the chest place impact in the past, attempted there was revolving the grain of rice size Absolute Ice Soul Power smashing.

green jade light dodges. The chest position was blocked completely. Ice Emperor got rid. Absolute Ice Soul Power resists Spiritual Power outside. Protects the central source.

When Spiritual Power and flash of Absolute Ice collision, the Huo Yuhao whole body fiercely shivered. The whole body bloodlines in that flickered as if are the adverse current generally, discomfort that could not say.

Huo Yuhao lets loose slit mind Soul Nucleus to start the crazy rhythm to get up, wanting many Spiritual Power to release, attacks the protection of Ice Emperor. But Huo Yuhao must guarantee that has the Spiritual Power output. Also must control cannot be too many. Compares the beforehand blockade, immediately became more difficult.

The Ice Emperor defense, Snow Emperor is continue control. The speed of Absolute Ice Soul Power output, finally started to increase.

Absolute Ice Soul Power of grain of rice size quickly turned into the yellow pisolite size. But that Spiritual Power, is also the defense of even more crazy impact Ice Emperor.

The fierce pain continuously appears, Huo Yuhao must bear the body pain, but must control mind Soul Nucleus. Also must withstand the weak feeling that spiritual sea transmits unceasingly.

He is relying on the formidable willpower, under so pain, unexpectedly insistence stiffly, moreover does not have the tremor of half minute.

Tenaciousness of Huo Yuhao. Also has given six big spirit full confidence.

The light Bai Se (White Color) halo starts to appear above the skeleton and meridians of Huo Yuhao whole body, the cool feeling made the stabbing pain that the impact brought be weaken immediately.

This was from the Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White) strength, Xiao Bai (Little White) starts is Huo Yuhao protects his body.

The pain reduces slightly, Huo Yuhao does not have the least bit to relax, because of mind Soul Nucleus in congealment of Absolute Ice Soul Power along with chest, but promotes continually.

Defends stubbornly the mind thought that the Huo Yuhao confidence is also getting more and more full, oneself have the help of six big spirits, if was unable to succeed, that is unfair to favoring that ascends the sky?

The mentality is stable, as if makes the pain that he feels also reduce. Condensation Spiritual Power silently, is controlling mind Soul Nucleus, making its operation even more slow, but output Spiritual Power also stabilizes to continue, quietly impact.

Because Absolute Ice Soul Power of chest place main body is increasing unceasingly, its velocity of whirl and absorbs the Absolute Ice Soul Power speed to be also strengthened. It, started to take to the feeling of Huo Yuhao pain.

That must be is reversing unexpectedly! The feeling of this reversal directly appears on oneself, Huo Yuhao must withstand, is the dual pain.

The intense pricking transmits from the front unceasingly, has the feeling of suffocation gradually. But this pain regarding Huo Yuhao is also not anything.

However, he has discovered quickly the surprised matter. In own dantian position, Snow Emperor that diamond ice crystal, started slow upward to increase unexpectedly.

This diamond ice crystal and Absolute Ice Soul Power of chest place condensation forming, has had the Soul Power relation, but this time mutual attraction had the transformation, instead likely is above under the absorption, that small Soul Power has affected Snow Emperor strength elevation unexpectedly.

This......

What is Snow Emperor this is making?

Huo Yuhao some are not clear, but at this time, the trust was all foundations, he will certainly not ask that will not question.

-----------------------------------------------------

The peerless Tang Sect cartoon launches in salvos, Wang Dong enters the stage to present, met with the Huo Yuhao dormitory. Everybody consults in our prestige platform. Joins the book friend in platform to transmit newly: Peerless Tang Sect 126 consult. Before 125 triggering keywords increased, sorry. Can examine. Transmission: Peerless Tang Sect 125. A consult earlier cartoon, changed the figure on the line. From peerless Tang Sect one, starts.

Joins our prestige platform to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number, has the authentication, is our families. Watches the charming cartoon quickly! Listens respectfully to the third child newest condition quickly. Later, we will have the exclusive short story to deliver, for example, beyond Douluo Continent! Hey.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-558-part-3





Volume 12

#559 - Mu Protects


Is upward with the Snow Emperor ice crystal, the Soul Power condensation speed of his chest place also starts to be strengthened, the body pain is strengthened, mind Soul Nucleus struggles even more is also fierce. Two feelings put together, that is not one plus one equal to two so is simple!

The strength defense of Ice Emperor is very as before stable, Huo Yuhao is centered on the vertebra, the front and back rib is a support, the whole has formed a safety mask. But Huo Yuhao actually discovered that Ice Emperor also starts no longer to prevent complete Spiritual Power outside, but puts one, a small silk, wants slender hundred times compared with the hair silk. Let this Spiritual Power fall on that Absolute Ice Soul Power.

This Spiritual Power falls on above, the Absolute Ice Soul Power velocity of whirl is affected, absorbed Soul Power to want compared with before slowly, but as before was firm and is revolving continually, that Spiritual Power received its hauling, by unceasing impact.

This is true each other approaching, develops to the fusion from the resistance. Just, this two's collision, takes to Huo Yuhao, only then more intense pain.

Soul Nucleus is increasing, Spiritual Power that Ice Emperor releases is also strengthening, the speed of but strengthening wants to be slower to the speed that Soul Nucleus increases. But the pain that Huo Yuhao bears even more was also fierce.

Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White) is releasing own strength continually, is consolidating the meridians and skeleton of Huo Yuhao. The skeleton is better, has Ice Emperor Torso Bone as the support, affects not in a big way. But in the chest, is human body lung and heart site, numerous main meridians. These are receiving two high pulse energies of reversal to attack continually, can be imagined to the pain that Huo Yuhao brings.

The Snow Emperor ice crystal in rising that slightly rolled Soul Power also to the distance less than three cuns (2.5cm) place to stop, stopped under the chest gallery along position. As the matter stands, her input speed to that Soul Nucleus is joyful.

After the Absolute Ice Soul Power volume increases to having the elliptical size, temporarily stopped increase of itself volume, but actually becomes in unceasing revolving more and more bright.

Now even if observes Huo Yuhao in the outside, can discover that his torso position is the aquamarine. But the chest place, a small group blue Bai Se (White Color) ray is strengthened continually.

The pain is promoting, but Huo Yuhao control is very as before steady. Has traded general Soul Master, must be hard to withstand to this degree at present. At least did not have the means to control such well. But he actually as before is maintaining, without any tremor.

While Huo Yuhao closes up. Entire Shrek City also starts to bustle about, in Shrek City, various arrangement started. The assistance from Tang Sect is also many.

“What? Did Yuhao close up? That Shrek three big Soul Engineer Corp? Where?”Xian Lin'er stands in front of Xu Sanshi, in eye is revealing the anxious color.

“This......”Xu Sanshi somewhat was also dumbfounded. Just returned to Academy time, Huo Yuhao has put them, three big Soul Engineer Corp also recuperation in his undead Demi-plane.

At this time Huo Yuhao closes up, Beibei and Tang Wutong are not, in fact, Xu Sanshi does not know that what happened.

Xian Lin'er aura obvious some are not uniform. “Does Yuhao this boy become so is not when reasonable? This when? Also closes up unexpectedly? Is this must do?”Xian Lin'er air/Qi is pacing back and forth same place.

Xu Sanshi somewhat is also helpless, Beibei and Huo Yuhao are not, Tang Sect only then he has managed a household, but he actually must face the Xian Lin'er anger.

“Walks. Leads me to look for Yuhao to go, if his closing up degree is not deep, first makes him make three Soul Engineer Corp, our good to arrange. Do you know that now outside Shrek City hundred li (0.5km), the Sun-Moon Empire main army 600,000, Soul Engineer Corp at least eight, eyes covetously there, has anytime to us launches the attack the possibility.”

Xu Sanshi stayed, he has not known. Listened to a Xian Lin'er such saying, thought immediately scalp got goosebumps, “but, Dean Xian, Yuhao was closing up. If disturbs him, what to do causing him to overstate?”

Xian Lin'er was even more depressed, her concern to the Huo Yuhao has been extremely numerous, is, at this time, the Huo Yuhao choice evaded closing up, and has not released Shrek Academy three big Soul Engineer Corp, can she not be anxious?

Huo Yuhao actually also is really not intentionally, he forgot. At that time, he was in the innermost feelings culmination person to battle, had been pondering how must cope at present the aspect. After having found out the law of broken bureau, immediately starts to take action, has actually forgotten three big Soul Engineer Corp regarding the Shrek City importance.

“I have not known that he does close up importantly? But, arrived at the Academy critical moment now. If Sun-Moon Empire attacks a city, we do defend to be understrength, what to do?”Saying that Xian Lin'er ablazes with anger, “this Huo Yuhao, is he up to mischief? Beibei and Tang Wutong are not, is their three this must go crazy?”

“Dean Xian, do not worry. This matter perhaps anxiety can serve no purpose at all.”Nearby Jiang Nannan opened the mouth. She arrives in front of Xian Lin'er, said: “Dean Xian, is inferior to this, we lead you place that goes to Yuhao to close up to have a look first. Takes your cultivating as, certainly can feel the condition that he closes up. If you thought that his condition can awaken, we first awaken him. If cannot, I believe that you will not insist. After all, if Yuhao overstated, he has no way to recite that incantation to communicate undead Demi-plane, when the time comes is the same cannot make three big Soul Engineer Corp come back.”

Xian Lin'er stamps the feet, “also can only so. Led me to have a look in the past.”

If changed others to present this careless mistake, by the Xian Lin'er temperament, already flushed. But to Tang Sect, she also somewhat has no alternative.

The Tang Sect these years development, have the extremely vital significance to Shrek City, without Tang Sect Soul Guidance Device, Shrek Academy in beast tide that in that Star Dou Forest starts is very difficult to insist. Therefore, status of Tang Sect in Shrek City continuously in to develop according to the situation.

Let alone, before more than one year, Huo Yuhao refined Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill with various Heaven and Earth Treasure, actually selfless put out part to give Academy, this made Old Xuan be able to break through smoothly, became Limit Douluo, she and Yan Shaozhe have also consolidated own foundation, had the future shock Limit Douluo possibility. These favours they in heart!

Therefore, even if Huo Yuhao gives her feeling now is not reasonable, Xian Lin'er also has to suppress own anger.

Under the leadership of Xu Sanshi and Jiang Nannan, Xian Lin'er followed them to arrive in Tang Sect underground Soul Guidance Hall.

Huo Yuhao laboratory where, Xu Sanshi and Jiang Nannan clear. Quick, they arrived here. However, not close, was blocked. Blocks their, is He Caitou.

“Sanshi and Nannan, why is your this goes? Little Junior Brother closes up indoor that side research, no one can approach, accidentally what to do otherwise disturbs him?”

In the Xuan Ziwen surface closes up to Huo Yuhao shows neither approval nor disapproval, may in fact, Huo Yuhao just now start to close up, another side, he has informed He Caitou. He Caitou puts down in the hand immediately all matters, here arrives for his protector.

The Xu Sanshi forced smile said: “Caitou, left the important matter. Sun-Moon Empire army attacking army has reached the city. Little Junior Brother forgot that put three big Soul Engineer Corp. Dean Xian then looks. What degree does Little Junior Brother close up to now?”

He Caitou has gawked, having a look at angry-looking Xian Lin'er, the forced smile saying: “I do not know that he closes up to any degree. However, cannot disturb him. You can feel silently, the aura that the Little Junior Brother that side lends are very fearful.”

At the same time was saying, he has referred to behind the gate of not far away Huo Yuhao laboratory.

Xian Lin'er eyes narrows the eyes, Spiritual Power releases quietly, draws close to the direction of Huo Yuhao laboratory.

Xu Sanshi and Jiang Nannan stand side He Caitou, although in the surface has not made anything, but is subconscious, with He Caitou together, has actually blocked the Xian Lin'er way. If this Dean Xian has a fit of temper, plans to overrun to look for Huo Yuhao, they also well stop.

At this critical moment, oneself brothers forever are most important.

However, their these movements did without charge obviously. Felt slightly, Xian Lin'er is the complexion big change, even retroceded subconsciously one step.

The seal of that laboratory is very good, the sincere metal door has almost isolated inside most aura, but, even if there is little aura to release, by the Xian Lin'er Transcendent Douluo strength, can feel inside change indistinctly.

Yes, inside aura is very fearful, the fearfulness of disorder!

“How can so the disorder? What is Yuhao making? Did he overstate inadequately?”Xian Lin'er loses one's voice to call out in alarm said.

Her such saying, the He Caitou three people were also the complexion change, if Huo Yuhao overstated, that was the entire Tang Sect disaster.

Xu Sanshi anxious [say / way]: “Overstated? Dean Xian, is your judgment accurate?”

Xian Lin'er stayed, the brow tight wrinkle, to continue to feel silently. Is the feeling, her complexion changed is bigger, a moment later, her look suddenly changes, “I know that he was doing. This boy is attacking second Soul Nucleus unexpectedly. No wonder and no wonder can so aura disorder. His is feeling of this impact not quite how same as Old Xuan?”

Has changed others, perhaps was unable so to affirm, but Xian Lin'er is different, don't forget, she closed up with Old Xuan together, when felt Old Xuan has attacked Limit Douluo aura change personally.

At that time the Old Xuan choice let her and Yan Shaozhe accompanies itself to close up, because they will be most likely to attack that level in the future. Takes Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill is the best effect.

Therefore Xian Lin'er can judge indistinctly at this time.

-------------------------------------------------

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. Today is double monthly ticket last day, whether everybody inspects the ticket warehouse, has a look also to have the monthly ticket, if any, adjuration support, thanks.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-559-part-1





Volume 12

#559 - Mu Protects


Huo Yuhao had mind Soul Nucleus this matter, in Shrek Academy, only then few several people know. The watermark advertisement test watermark advertisement test regarding this, Old Xuan naturally has not concealed to Yan Shaozhe and Xian Lin'er. After all, they and Huo Yuhao are the mainstays of future Academy.

Speed that recently for these years, Huo Yuhao grew was really too quick, to must approach their this generation of degrees quickly.

At this time attacks second Soul Nucleus? If attacks successfully, Huo Yuhao very probably in history first has the second Soul Nucleus person when into Titled Douluo!

In this case, he in the future definitely becomes 98 levels of Transcendent Douluo . Moreover the time needed will be very short. To Transcendent Douluo that level, will not have any bottleneck to prevent him. Can affect him to go forward only, has 98 levels attack 99 levels of times, because at that time he will need third Soul Nucleus, unprecedented third Soul Nucleus.

No one knows that Huo Yuhao can succeed at that time. But Xian Lin'er is very clear, once second Soul Nucleus establishes, regardless of Huo Yuhao Soul Power is many levels, when the time comes will have the Transcendent Douluo strength. Moreover Absolute Martial Soul Transcendent Douluo. Repairs to even be possible to exceed her.

In the heart the anger returns to normal gradually, Huo Yuhao breaks through second Soul Nucleus, this matter regarding Shrek Academy, has the extraordinary significance similarly! His present aura so disorder, what to do if overstates?

Xian Lin'er brow tight wrinkle, said: “Yuhao is certainly attacking second Soul Nucleus, but his present situation I a little cannot understand. You well are defending here, do not make anybody approach him, do not disturb him. Soul Master attacks second Soul Nucleus time, the situation will be complex, fast changing. I invited Old Xuan immediately, only then he had enough experience in this aspect.”

Xian Lin'er is always the vigorous and resolute style. Said that walks.

Breaks through second Soul Nucleus?

He Caitou, Xu Sanshi and Jiang Nannan also look at each other in blank dismay. They now are also 80 multistage Soul Power, but also has the disparity from the Titled Douluo level. But they when attack Titled Douluo, only needs first Soul Ring.

At present in Shrek Seven Devils, Beibei and Xu Sanshi is away from 90 levels of recent. Then is He Caitou, Jiang Nannan and Xiao Xiao.

Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill really has the energy of universe good fortune. They took to be very long, but until now. The Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill effect is continuing the effect as before. The speed that therefore the Tang Sect people practice must be faster than general Soul Master.

He Caitou sighed, said: “Yuhao widens our disparities is becoming more and more greatly!”

Xu Sanshi also similarly smiles bitterly, “now I still remember, initially when first time met. When he was trampled to fly the appearance by my foot. But that time was blackmailed by Beibei that fellow.”

Jiang Nannan elegant face one red, said: “Did you also feel all right to say? Blackmails you to be light, should punch your.”

Xu Sanshi hey said with a smile: “Do you give up? Actually at that time had you secretly also liked me are?”

“Hello, is concerned about face? At that time hated you also without enough time, was good.”

Xu Sanshi said: “Hoping Little Junior Brother can be successful. If this time he has succeeded, our Tang Sect strength is really different. Wutong is Titled Douluo, if Little Junior Brother is also. Then. They collaborate, battle efficiency continually will be enhanced. In my opinion, perhaps surpassed ordinary Transcendent Douluo directly. Even attacks Limit Douluo that to cultivate to have possibly.”

Old Xuan comes quickly, after Xian Lin'er walks, is less than ten minutes. With Old Xuan together hurriedly caught up.

Old Xuan stands in the Huo Yuhao laboratory entrance, is feeling silently. No one has him to be experienced, in attacking the second Soul Nucleus this process, Old Xuan experienced too has been defeated repeatedly. Therefore is also familiar with this type of aura.

Stands in the time of there quarter, Old Xuan has turned around. On the face the look is dignified, “right, Lin'er said right, Yuhao is attacking second Soul Nucleus. From now on, I for his protector, no one must approach personally here, no one must disturb him. Even cannot make the too big sound in the nearby.”

At the same time was saying, Old Xuan sat cross-legged to sit in the Huo Yuhao laboratory entrance place unexpectedly.

Xian Lin'er is surprised, looks at Old Xuan saying: “Old Xuan, that side that Academy what to do? Sun-Moon Empire attacking army has reached the city!”

Old Xuan sighed one lightly, said: “Lin'er, haven't you looked clearly? Judgment Yuhao that during the meeting Wutong makes is the approval. Because of the Academy reason, he has not said that the Academy safety we looked heavily, we cannot believe his judgment. He knows that he could not make anything, therefore then came back to close up the practice. As for three big Soul Engineer Corp matters, he has two possibilities not to have it to put. One type is he in spiteful, but I believe that this possibility is very low. As for another type, he for must preserve the effective strength.”

[Say / Way] of Xian Lin'er doubts: “It is not right. If his judgment is correct, Sun-Moon Empire will not attack us. Three big Soul Engineer Corp naturally will not be damaged.”

Old Xuan shook the head, said: “Your vision is not very long-term. I asked you, if Star Luo and Dou Ling two big empires helped, at this time, their one of them was attacked. Then, can Academy sit by and do nothing? To that time, we have simply had no reason not to dispatch Soul Engineer Corp to exit to assist. Has the strength not to dispatch, with simply does not have Soul Engineer Corp, that is two matters. Yuhao such does, certainly has the meaning of deep level.”

How Old Xuan knows that time Huo Yuhao has not thought these many, he real, forgot......

Xian Lin'er lowered the head, silent after long time, “Old Xuan, but we cannot be negligent. Even if only then 1/1000 possibilities, we must be ready that deals with fully. Academy ten thousand years of base industry!”

Old Xuan said: “You go back. In Academy, by you and Chancellor Shaozhe. I must defend here, if Yuhao can break through completes, then, perhaps, all will be easily solved.”

In the Xian Lin'er eye flashes through one to be startled, can the Huo Yuhao breakthrough be easily solved? This possibility? How to say again that he is also only a strength of person! It is not good by the Old Xuan Limit Douluo strength, he has Dual Soul Nucleus, cannot compared with Old Xuan.

However, she has not said doubts in oneself heart, saw that the Old Xuan will must remain firmly, she can only quickly go back, told other Sea God Pavilion members here situation.

Xian Lin'er walked, the Xu Sanshi three people were also expelled by Old Xuan. Old Xuan sit out Huo Yuhao, on the old face is revealing the disappointed color.

Yuhao Yuhao, you may really be bold. You chose unexpectedly took that road!

By the understanding of Old Xuan second Soul Nucleus, how also unable to see that Huo Yuhao is not using the method of Equal Resonance to practice! The polarity, he looks is very clear.

Yin-Yang Supplement, will cause aura such disorder. However, in the disorder, has a firm strength to support as before. In other words, danger that at least currently speaking, Huo Yuhao has not overstated.

Although Old Xuan had not practiced the method of Yin-Yang Supplement to condense the Soul Nucleus possibility again. But regarding this practice way, he has filled the hope and curiosity, therefore he decides to remain. Moreover, a moment ago he said also right. If Huo Yuhao can practice successful second Soul Nucleus by the method of Yin-Yang Supplement, then, he in the future likely is another Beast God.

Comes compared with the talent, Huo Yuhao does not have Beast God Di Tian to be so formidable **, but, he has the excellent talent that Soul Beast does not have, Twin Martial Souls and Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, once succeeds. Old Xuan believes that even if Huo Yuhao is unable to break through the Limit Douluo level in the future, but was limited in 98 levels, his strength also as before may overtake Beast God.

Don't forget, Huo Yuhao excels at the hideaway, formidable Spiritual Power quantity that he has, perhaps really has the change entire war possibility!

Really intelligent young people! In is so chaotic and is under the passive aspect, can make the most correct choice as before. Worthily is Old Mu final disciple. Old Mu, you may know that I envy you very much.

Huo Yuhao does not know regarding all of outside that present he, the body actually neared the brink of collapse.

The chest place, the speed of Absolute Ice energy revolving is getting more and more fast, Ice Emperor put that Spiritual Power of past not to have the means to prevent it, instead also turned into reversion revolving under its lead.

As the matter stands, Spiritual Power itself started to twist, mind Soul Nucleus was touched, started the angry eruption.

Although Huo Yuhao in doing utmost to prevent, Spiritual Power that but in mind Soul Nucleus bursts out even links his willpower not to have the means to prevent completely.

Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor actually maintain stable, was maintaining formerly condition. But Huo Yuhao actually felt that own body as if must be torn into shreds by these two terrifying strengths. That pain, nondescriptive. But has when actually surpassed initially he and Ice Emperor fused the feeling absolutely.

Can I unable to support really? The huge pain, making the Huo Yuhao willpower first time present some vacillations.

This time he, if observes from outside, certainly will make people feel very terrifying. The skin surface, seeps out the close blood bead unceasingly, but these blood beads just appeared, immediately freezes changes into the ice dregs to drop.

In the entire laboratory, the aura becomes extremely chaotic and wild, various rare metals that around the laboratory piles up make noise.

The temperature in laboratory, dropped a hundred degree celsius below zero about. Even starts to have the ice flower to dance in the air in the air.

Insisting! In any event I must insist!

Huo Yuhao bites the tip of tongue, by the stabbing pain on tip of tongue transmitting, making own mind promote. Once again suppressed the eruption of oneself mind Soul Nucleus forcefully.

--------------------------------------------------

Insisting! Must shoulder. The plea monthly ticket and recommendation vote support, the new week, Tang Sect needs everybody's joint effort!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-559-part-2





Volume 12

#559 - Under Mu Protection


His Soul Nucleus enough has stabilized, the intense counter-attack in this provoked situation, itself actually had not been vacillated. This is also unfortunate lucky.

Mermaid Princess Li Ya has done utmost is assisting Huo Yuhao, her singing sound somewhat hoarse, but is actually continuing. Has her extra help, can make Huo Yuhao own mind will all use in the control.

Huo Yuhao does not dare to imagine, if before oneself and Mermaid Princess fuses, tries method of practice this Yin-Yang Supplement to be any situation. But what he can affirm, he is impossible to insist at present this step.

The intense ray glitters on him unceasingly, Absolute Ice Soul Power that Ice Emperor releases is extremely exuberant and strong, every time is stiffly prevents the Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power major part.

This incessantly is the Absolute Ice strength, Ice Emperor Spiritual Source strength, only then holds through the Spiritual Power in addition, such smooth that she can resist.

Snow Emperor ice crystal surrounding Soul Power outputs continually, she exceptionally is stable. At this time, she as if has neglected pain that Huo Yuhao might withstand. Is handling own matter in oneself completely.

The Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White) quick close limit, his strength has also been protecting the meridians, skeleton and the internal organs Huo Yuhao. But, that two reversion revolutions strength, impact is really extremely intense!

That side Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power can also insist, but his body actually started some to unable to shoulder.

Although his body after the improvement of Gold of Life, is having the huge vitality of far supernormal person. But in within the body cruel strength is not the human body can shoulder eventually.

Within the body meridians as if must start to break, the internal organs must collapse in the extrusion and distortion. But Huo Yuhao now besides insisting, anything could not do, his corners of the mouth place started to have the blood to overflow, this was the sign that the tiny blood vessel burst. This way, his body directly was likely torn into shreds by the strength in within the body. But own mind Soul Nucleus will therefore also produce the large explosion.

The Snow Emperor ice crystal has glistened quietly, while it prepares to take an action time.

Suddenly, the Huo Yuhao dantian place has shone, a golden ray rapid in to rush forth by dantian, spreads to the Huo Yuhao whole body rapidly.

Spiritual Power that in mind Soul Nucleus releases, is the Absolute Ice strength of chest place, cannot prevent the emergence of this golden strength.

Because, this golden energy integrates completely in the Huo Yuhao bloodlines. The time that several times breathe, the meridians of Huo Yuhao within the body completely turned into the golden color, the blood is so. The internal organs are also so.

Looking from outside, Huo Yuhao buddhist image is dignified at this time, whole body golden light blooms. Moreover, in his body surface, starts to present a close scale, the scale is the golden color, pure golden color. The close scale increases gradually, covers the whole body. Only the face is also maintaining human appearance.

This scale, is dragon scales! Right, dragon scales, Light Sacred Dragon dragon scales!

Within the body fierce pain one relaxed. Huo Yuhao are also very surprised, actually this golden color came from where. This golden injection, lets his meridians, skeleton and internal organs, becomes even more formidable. Moreover, these golden color are still carrying on the most direct fusion with his body, becomes his true part.

This strength is......

This pure Light aura, that familiar. It is not Wang Qiu'er that gold Dragon Power, does not come from Three Eyed Golden Lion. But is......

Light Sacred Dragon, yes! This clearly is Light Saint Dragon Power.

Moreover, this is also not Light Sacred Dragon Martial Soul that First Senior Brother can transform, purely and vigorous than the First Senior Brother strength. Is this, this is the Teacher strength? But, is this possible?

Shrek Academy, Sea God Island, Sea God Pavilion, Golden Tree!

Gentle golden ray, on the Golden Tree tree trunk slight is blooming, that gentle fluctuation of energy made everyone on entire Sea God Island be able to feel clearly.

Numerous position Ancient Elder go out of Sea God Pavilion in abundance, arrives in front of Golden Tree, these also included just hurried back soon Xian Lin'er.

One group of golden light, raise from the Golden Tree tree trunk suddenly, float above Sea God Pavilion.

“That is......”the Old Song vision concentrates, although she cannot see in golden light is anything, but, can actually feel in golden light that familiar aura.

golden light in airborne has stopped slightly, seems is greeting to Ancient Elder, that golden light changed into together the flowing light, flies toward Shrek City and in the Tang Sect direction.

Old Xuan sitting silently is protecting out the Huo Yuhao laboratory, when Huo Yuhao within the body that golden color strength bursts out. Old Xuan sat outside also immediately feels.

This is......

Good strength Light strength. But, when did Yuhao have the strength of such strong Light?

Huo Yuhao will certainly not give his answer, in the Old Xuan eye is revealing the surprised uncertain color.

In this time, suddenly, an auspicious aura is heading on. The golden light twinkle, light shadow emerges out of thin air together in front of Old Xuan.

“Old Mu?”Old Xuan is almost the instantaneous body, surprised looks at front light shadow.

Old Mu shows a faint smile to Old Xuan, nodded to him, then floats to him in front, has patted his shoulder gently. A thought also spreads to the Old Xuan mind.

“After Shrek, depended on you. Xuan Zi, takes care.”

Has not waited for Old Xuan to say anything, Old Mu the golden form has passed through from him, submerged in his behind metal front door.

The body of Old Xuan shivered fiercely, one unlucky premonition also appears. Could not bear lose one's voice to call out: “Old Mu!”

He has turned around suddenly, looks one behind the gigantic iron gate, suddenly, the mood somewhat are unable to restrain oneself.

Old Mu golden light shadow quietly appears in the laboratory, appears in front of Huo Yuhao.

Looks that sits cross-legged to sit Huo Yuhao that insists there with hardship, on his face reveals a genial color.

“Child, you have chosen the most difficult path. However, for Shrek, for we belong to the Douluo Continent three countries. What you do is right. Humanity wants to complete method of practice Yin-Yang Supplement, is almost impossible, makes Teacher help you, steps onto one.”

golden light dodges, Old Mu changed into golden bright sphere, broke in the forehead of Huo Yuhao directly.

Gentle and warm, spreads over the Huo Yuhao whole body instantaneously. Just incomparably fierce pain, but at this moment, actually such as met the timely rain.

Huo Yuhao big relaxing, on mind relaxes instantaneously makes him nearly faint. But that warm genial strength the gable lives in his Spiritual Power immediately, making him be able to maintain the present condition. Spiritual Power returned to normal immediately.

“Teacher, is really you!”

When Huo Yuhao sees Old Mu in own spiritual sea, mood immediately fierce surges. The Spiritual Power condensation forming, changes into his form, to the end does obeisance.

Old Mu smile looks at own final disciple, shows a faint smile, whatever he has done obeisance. Before the personal appearance flutters, arrives in front of Huo Yuhao, gently is touching his head, “child, gets up.”

Huo Yuhao stands up, looks at Old Mu, the mind body is unable to sob, but on him actually spreads the immeasurable joy the mood.

The people when are most painful, suddenly saw the most intimate person, that feeling, does not have the means to describe. Some Teacher in the side, that is a protected feeling!

“Teacher......”the Huo Yuhao sound sobbed.

Old Mu said with a smile: “Do not make this little children condition. Yuhao, you have grown up. You do is very good. Compared with being better that also in the Teacher imagination makes. Teacher, takes you as the honor.”

“These years, although Teacher not side you, matter that but, has on you, my majority heard from Xuan Zi there, saw personally. You do is very good.”

“Teacher.”Huo Yuhao summoned again.

Old Mu said: “This time, you choose the method of practice Yin-Yang Supplement, although was rash. However, in some sense, actually not wrong. Shrek needs one to be able by the powerhouse who strength of the changes the course of events. Such powerhouse, had not appeared for a long time. Ten thousand years ago, ancestor Tang San, changes the course of events by strength of the, the double god fights the double god, has established the Shrek ten thousand years of base industry. But ten thousand years later, I believe that you have such potential.”

“If were not you have inspired within the body Dragon Pill strength, I have not known that you can achieve this step. Since you have done, Teacher helps you walk a regulation again.”

“Dragon Pill?”Huo Yuhao surprised looks at Old Mu.

Old Mu nodded, said: “Should be Xiaoyao helps you take. You should see him one time to be right before.”

“What you said is Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao?”Huo Yuhao surprised looks at Old Mu.

Old Mu said: “Yes! Is I asks him, at proper time, gives you Dragon Pill.”

Huo Yuhao said: “But, isn't he Holy Spirit Cult person? Is that side Evil Soul Master. How to help us?”

Old Mu shakes the head saying: “Xiaoyao is not Evil Soul Master, he is also a poor man. Was stranded by the sentiment. I have to the past from clashes, but his continuously actually settlement in. Some wrong things that because he initially did, chose have forgiven. Therefore can so. However, he after is we belongs to Soul Master of Douluo Continent three countries'. Before I initially ** suffers a defeat and flees, had seen one side him, gives him Dragon Pill. Then makes him take to you at proper time. Also makes him in having the possibility situation, protects your safety.”

“Protects me?”Huo Yuhao also deep remembering, initially pain in that nine blade ten Badong!

The Old Mu smile nods the head, said: “If he wants to kill you, you already died. If not he protects in secret. Perhaps Holy Spirit Cult copes with you are not the present this. In the future you will understand. As for Dragon Pill......”

----------------------------------------------------

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket.

The quickest renewal, non- ball window reading invited.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-559-part-3





Volume 12

#560 - The Secret Of Long Dan


Old Mu has stopped, said: “Dragon Pill was I from an ancient times vestige discovered in the past accidentally, was a light attribute big dragon Soul Beast corpse. If the watermark advertisement test watermark advertisement test I have not misread, that should be a White Dragon clan, with the Black Dragon clan that Beast God Di Tian is the mortal enemy. After that big dragon dies, essence strength congeals Dragon Pill. Because the strength in this Dragon Pill is extremely overbearing, our humanity does not have the means directly to absorb.”

“After I obtain that Dragon Pill, has worn on the body. Although does not have the means directly to absorb it, the huge energy of but in Dragon Pill containing very much has the advantage to my practice. My talent, with its help, afterward the winding speed significantly sped up. To my 98 levels, ultimately forms second Soul Nucleus in the method of Equal Resonance, in fact has also replied on this Dragon Pill strength. Otherwise, I must be not necessarily able Xuan Zi to be shorter than in the time that 98 levels stay.”

“Can say, birth of each Limit Douluo, with big destiny. I am so, Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui are also so.”

“I once had also attempted, helping other people with this Dragon Pill, but, is not good. Their strengths are not enough to withstand the overbearing aura in Dragon Pill, itself Martial Soul is inappropriate. Therefore cannot absorb the strength of Dragon Pill. Later I Dragon Pill warm and nourish in my within the body, come the unceasing improvement with my own Light Sacred Dragon Soul Power it, rubs off its edges and corners, making its internal energy change gradually, this process is long. That Dragon Pill in my within the body, enough warm and nourish hundred years.”

“Afterward matter you also knew, I and Innate Body Sect then sect master, is the Du Busi big brother fights, I received heavy wound. At that time because some special reasons, I wanted to look for Xishui. Therefore restores eagerly, moreover at that time Dragon Pill I also already warm and nourish a long time, in my opinion. Should not have any issue. Therefore, I attempt to start to absorb the Dragon Pill strength, hopes that absorbs it completely. I guessed, if I can achieve. Perhaps has the opportunity to inspire the God Realm attention. Thus obtains to enter the God Realm opportunity.”

“Was a pity, before I underestimate a big dragon at the point of death, Dragon Pill that the complete essence pours into. Shortly after starts to absorb. I have discovered the issue. In my heyday, this Dragon Pill strength is not enough to cause the damage to me, I also think that its vicious tendencies vanished. But who knows that the vicious tendencies in this Dragon Pill hid unexpectedly. When I start to absorb, after it feels my weak, unexpectedly erupts rapidly, wreaks havoc in my within the body.”

“My cultivating originally is be higher than the Du Busi elder brother, although heavy wound, but is actually not the wound and source. But, absorbs Dragon Pill this mistake. Makes my source receive heavy wound truly, will turn into afterward appearance. I barely escape, completely suppressed Dragon Pill with great difficulty, but the vicious tendencies in Dragon Pill actually also completely integrated my body. In the later dozens years. I in fact am have been struggling and contended with this vicious tendencies. Until me ** declining.”

“But, after my hundred years of warm and nourish, in addition the Dragon Pill vicious tendencies thoroughly suction by me, the strength in this Dragon Pill also became especially pure. Can by Non- dragon be the person absorption of Martial Soul. Originally, I planned that gives Beibei it, has its help, in the future Beibei will become Limit Douluo should the issue not be big. But, at that time, I run into you. When I discovered you are having Absolute Martial Soul, I changed the mind. Because I know that the Absolute Martial Soul practice, early is very difficult, the intermediate stage will be rapid. But to the final time, broke through Limit Douluo condenses second Soul Nucleus the time, specially will be difficult. When by your strength, your body is very merely difficult to bear the second Soul Nucleus condensation impact. Therefore, I kept Dragon Pill, after deciding to observe you, said again.”

“Your performance and potential make me shocking . Moreover, you have a good heart, itself knows diligently. Before me, I decided passes to you at the point of death finally this Dragon Pill. However, the Dragon Pill strength eventually is too overbearing. Directly was absorbed by you not possibly, at that time you did not have to absorb its ability. Therefore, I look for Xiaoyao, making him help me take care of you, and at proper time gives you Dragon Pill.”

“If I have not guessed that wrong, your previous time meets his time, certainly by the body nearly failure that he punches. That is not he must cope with you, but must make your within the body as far as possible maintain the elusive condition. The strength in this Dragon Pill, does not integrate your Soul Power, but must integrate in the bloodlines to be best, making your body have the ability of certain dragon, is separated from the human category. Your talent, this Dragon Pill, completely has the opportunity to create a human miracle in addition.”

“But, what making me not think, on this day can come is so quick, moreover your choice has also surpassed our plan. Yin-Yang Supplement! The child, you also are really brave. You may know how many walked Transcendent Soul Beast of this road to end in failure, to run away finally difficultly the destiny of death? By matter that the body of Soul Beast cannot achieve, you actually must achieve by the body of humanity. This courage and faith, worthily are my Mu En disciples. Since you have chosen this road, then, as Teacher, I how, regardless of must help your. Now the Dragon Pill strength had been initiated because of your reassignment. You continue to practice, I help you control it to integrate your bloodlines completely, making you have the body and spirit of dragon, as the matter stands, your successful possibility will increase.”

“Yes! Thanks Teacher.”In the Huo Yuhao heart has filled nice and warm, Teacher ** died, has actually been worrying about him, already spread the road for him, this sentiment, he can only repay in the future on Shrek Academy!

Now does not say, Huo Yuhao felt that the energy impact of own within the body became more intense. But Dragon Pill integrates strength some in oneself bloodlines not to be as if unstable.

Does not dare to delay again, he hurries to return to spiritual sea the thought that fully control own mind Soul Nucleus. Controls mind Soul Nucleus is all beginnings, is most important.

The control of mind Soul Nucleus was very smooth, obtains moistening of Dragon Pill, the pain that the body bore reduced greatly, this made him be able more centralized mind.

The Old Mu aura is very temperate, the gentle aura integrates in the Huo Yuhao bloodlines quickly, Dragon Pill starts strength of not the steady golden bloodlines under the guidance of Old Mu, starts to flow voluntarily in the meridians of Huo Yuhao. And the meridians and internal organs of some strange strength and Huo Yuhao start to fuse.

The speed of fusion is quick, Huo Yuhao scale starts to present the edges and corners gradually, becomes thicker and enchanting.

After this Dragon Pill initially Long Xiaoyao integrated Huo Yuhao within the body, in fact in receiving his strength warm and nourish, under a moment ago intense stimulation. Erupts. Already somewhat adapted to the body of Huo Yuhao, moreover Huo Yuhao actually also continuously in absorption of influencing subtly it.

Old Mu makes Long Xiaoyao give his time Dragon Pill, to want, when he condenses second Soul Nucleus uses. But he and Long Xiaoyao has not thought that Huo Yuhao such quick can use this Dragon Pill strength.

The gentle Soul Power fluctuation pasts in the air. The aura in entire laboratory because of the appearance of Dragon Pill becomes gentle.

Snow Emperor meaning that the ice crystal has not erupted again. But Absolute Ice second Soul Nucleus that continues to control Huo Yuhao stably condense, to continue to absorb the Absolute Ice strength. Resolutely is operating with Huo Yuhao that mind Soul Nucleus turn over.

The strength of mind Soul Nucleus output was limited by Huo Yuhao. Throughout cannot disturb the formation of Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus truly. Itself was also towed, bursts out the fierce mind fluctuation unceasingly, is attacking the body of Huo Yuhao.

The Dragon Pill strength is truly tyrannical, Huo Yuhao only thought at this time one have been full of the strength. Made him feel that the body wants the to shatter strength, now attacks on the body, withstood to be easier. Although as before severe pain, but at least did not have the feeling of collapse.

Time one minute one second passed, on the Huo Yuhao face the look also becomes affable.

The Old Mu aura vanishes quietly, the Huo Yuhao whole person turned into the insightful golden color.

Soul Nucleus of chest place increased one time, itself also turned into the glittering and translucent carving blue ice crystal appearance. Own velocity of whirl starts to accelerate continually.

Because Huo Yuhao body carrying capacity is enhanced, the speed of Snow Emperor to this condensation naturally also has promoted. Quicker completes, the pain that the Huo Yuhao body bears is also smaller.

This gentle condition has not continued too for a long time, the pain is intensifying throughout. The strength in mind Soul Nucleus looks like inexhaustible general, starts even more intensely to attack Huo Yuhao second Soul Nucleus. But the pain increases again, before letting Huo Yuhao returned, that feeling.

Teacher has helped itself go against through the Dragon Pill strength has plundered, how regardless of must insist.

Huo Yuhao clenches the teeth, diligently carries on the shoulder. However, his control also became more and more difficult. Because must complete the Yin-Yang fusion, two big Soul Nucleus in fact want unceasingly communicates. With the energy strengthen of second Soul Nucleus, Ice Emperor Spiritual Power that requests Huo Yuhao to output must stiffen. But as the matter stands, Spiritual Power that output from mind Soul Nucleus strengthened, Huo Yuhao must control it to be also more difficult. That side mind Soul Nucleus, has to have the problem anytime the possibility. But passes through stimulation that continues, originally stable mind Soul Nucleus, started to present trembling, so was no longer stable.

What to do? At this time, Huo Yuhao also started to be nervous. Everybody has made that many efforts, if this time were defeated, then, not only will receive heavy wound, in a short time does not have absolutely possibly again comes one time. Even, oneself will pay directly with the life the price.

The fierce pain engages in factional strife in the chest and forehead mutually, the intense dizzy feeling as if anytime may make Huo Yuhao fall into to lose consciousness. But once, he to lose consciousness in the past, mind Soul Nucleus will lose control.

“Child, protects good Shrek for Teacher. Protects good Tang Sect. Teacher, takes you as the honor.”The Old Mu old sound resounds in the Huo Yuhao mind. Extremely intense Spiritual Power bursts out from Huo Yuhao spiritual sea suddenly.

This Spiritual Power to the feeling of person unexpectedly is the Huo Yuhao a common origin, Huo Yuhao only thought that own controlling force is enhanced suddenly, but around own mind Soul Nucleus, presented golden sea.

This golden sea are not his spiritual sea, but completely is external Spiritual Power. After these Spiritual Power appear, mind Soul Nucleus that struggled fiercely has stabilized immediately. Moreover, it greedily is still absorbing in this golden sea extremely pure Spiritual Power. In the process of absorption, its own eruption was weaken.

It looks like the powerhouse who an originally wants the to get rid of enemy has met Heaven and Earth Treasure suddenly, making him let off the enemy temporarily, first absorbed this Heaven and Earth Treasure strength.

mind Soul Nucleus stabilizes, the Huo Yuhao dizzy feeling and pain naturally were also weaken. He discovered with amazement that he control to Spiritual Power becomes is much easier. After mind Soul Nucleus falls into that golden sea, was docile, he must be how what kind. Moreover it as if could not feel oneself Soul Nucleus regarding the intense contradiction of chest Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus. At least at this time, he could not feel.

“Yuhao, this is Teacher can help finally your, the future road, must walk by you. Teacher believes that you can certainly find your road. Teacher went back first.”

The golden light twinkle, in the Huo Yuhao sensation, Old Mu goes quietly.

Teacher......

If can burst into tears, Huo Yuhao already had tears streaming down the face at this time, the selfless help of Teacher, making him get through the difficult time once again.

Golden light shadow overflows from the metal front door quietly.

Old Mu appears in front of Old Xuan.

Old Xuan has been waiting for in out of the door anxiously, looks at Old Mu to come out, he relaxed greatly. Before the Old Mu words, making in his heart be full of the unlucky premonition, regarding him, the Old Mu also master also friend, before he was knows that Old Mu warm and nourish Spiritual Consciousness in Golden Tree, otherwise, his pain certainly will not compare Huo Yuhao to be few.

Old Mu be with smile on the face looks at Old Xuan, on the old face full is genial with the thorn, “Xuan Zi, Shrek, gave you. Do not tell Yuhao, when I, but also in Golden Tree......”

The voice falls, Old Mu golden light shadow is defeated and dispersed quietly, changes into the innumerable pale golden luminous spots, disappears from the scene in the air.

Old Xuan stayed, has not responded immediately.

The Old Mu aura, vanished!

Old Mu and Old Mu!

Old Xuan staggers is retroceding several steps, by his Limit Douluo strength, nearly falls down unexpectedly. The body of his whole person fierce shivers, he wants to call, but, does not dare to scream.

-----------------------------------------------------

Welcome everybody to play our hands to swim Magic Chef of Ice and Fire together, only needs to join our prestige - platform, clicks on following Magic Chef of Ice and Fire and hand tour to download the button, can directly enter downloads the page to download according to the direction.

Joins the method of our prestige platform to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is our families.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-560





Volume 12

#561 - Practices Crazily


Sun-Moon Empire, Bright Capital City and imperial palace.

A confidential letter appears on the Xu Tianran table. Confidential letter seal, is a very adorable Ju Zi(orange) design.

Sees this confidential letter, on the Xu Tianran face reveals a smile, the Ju Zi(orange) letter, finally came. Does not know how she will cope with such aspect.

For these days, the comprehensive searche, did not have the trends of these enemies as before. They after attacking Bright Capital City, looked like flew away baseless generally, has not left any trace. This is completely inconceivable.

Thinks spatial technology that Old Kong said that Xu Tianran on some creepy feeling. If the opposite party mastered the spatial technology, the next attack, likely will appear then in Bright Capital City!

Disassembles the letter, Xu Tianran takes from inside the letter paper. This letter has also used the Soul Guidance Technology seal, if not know the opening mail method, inside content will change into the flying ash immediately.

On the letter paper, full is the Ju Zi(orange) beautiful small character, the character writes is very neat. Between the lines has been full of respectful flavor.

Looked at the character well, the Xu Tianran mood several points. In the heart mused that the previous child's matter, the injury to Ju Zi(orange) somewhat grew. At that time, oneself perhaps really should display positive. However, how regardless to say that oneself has given her the military authority, this trust believes also enough reports back her to own was loyal.

At the same time is thinking, Xu Tianran starts to look at the content on letter, more looked that look change on his face is bigger, has amazed, but more acclaimed. Yes, acclaimed, acclaimed for Ju Zi(orange).

Unexpectedly, she can actually find out the good means to melt the present aspect like this, is really, worthily is War-God Empress! Worthily is Ju Zi(orange) that most trust.

Ju Zi(orange) the letter, subject has two characters.

No! Attack!

Encircles Shrek not to attack, transfers Shrek all relations, completely centralized in Shrek City. In the surrounding arrangement defense line, defends by linkage Defensive Soul Guidance Device. The non- active threat, to a Shrek long deadline, making them hand over Huo Yuhao. Once the military strength centralism of Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire in the past, the goal achieved. As for the true target, can actually be ever changing.

If in empire that enemy and Shrek Academy aspect has the relation, once knows that Shrek Academy presents the so enormous crisis, they also definitely reckless return, will turn back in order to help friendly forces Shrek, at least two Soul Engineer Corp strengths, very much have the function in the battlefield. Such one, regardless of they have what kind of strength, can only collides in the frontal battlefield and Sun-Moon Empire army. But the front impact, Sun-Moon Empire is almost invincible existence.

“Good, good and good!”Xu Tianran continually said three good characters, injury has as if relaxed several points. Immediately edits a book one, the order under urgently escorts to the front.

He told Ju Zi(orange), front all, were all decided by her the rear area does not need to be worried. Imperial Soul Engineer Corp has turned back in order to help friendly forces in the Bright Capital City city, surrounds and protects the imperial palace. Anticipated that the front victory report passes on again.

Ju Zi(orange) won Xu Tianran many trusts with own wisdom once again. Xu Tianran as if saw that Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries also successively fall into oneself hand, to that time, even if Shrek is strong, he is also only a city, wants to rub to pinch inadequately?

Xu Tianran does not want to ruin Shrek City actually, what polarity is, what he hopes to obtain is from submitting to of Shrek, that will take to him the most intense conquering pleasant sensation.

Shrek Academy that Continent's First Academy reputation, regarding also young Xu Tianran, hasn't never yearned? But if in the future Shrek submits to empire, Xu Tianran is happier. To that time, all Shrek have studied, is the Soul Master secret, belonged to Sun-Moon Empire. Perhaps, they through the Martial Soul deep meaning, have any means to help itself restore the body, particularly that the ability of man......

Thinks of here, heart of Xu Tianran unconscious is earnest. Thinks Ju Zi(orange), in his heart has filled intensely **. Can he not like being so attractive and able War-God Empress? That is his empress! May not have the means to go on the body to conquer, such pain, is fatal regarding any man. Even if Xu Tianran such one generation of fierce and ambitiouses is no exception.

Outside Shrek City, hundred li (0.5km), Sun-Moon Empire army, commander tent!

Ju Zi(orange) sits on the position, looks at reconnaissances in hand to report that on the elegant face is revealing the light smile.

Shrek? Why do I want to attack Shrek? This Academy is in that man heart the most important place, in any event, I will not destroy Shrek easily. However, this actually does not affect me to attack Dou Ling and Star Luo, particularly, Star Luo!

Although in the Ju Zi(orange) heart, the past hatred desalinated gradually, but desalinates actually does not represent to put behind that what polarity is, she currently had the feeling that all grasped, anticipated arrival of that day.

Was the Star Lou Empire army has destroyed own homeland, was turned into orphan all alone by oneself, if not so, will meet Xu Tianran?

In any event, in the future must destroy Star Lou Empire, only then so, can dispel the innermost feelings most profound hatred.

Just, her goal, is actually not Star Luo.

“empress!”Appearance that the jet black form is quietly together in commander tent, anybody has not notified.

Regarding his arrival, Ju Zi(orange) as if already had been used to it, stands up, be with smile on the face [say / way]: “State Master, you came.”

“Um.”Zongli Wu nodded, gradually arrives from the Ju Zi(orange) not far place stops the footsteps, “empress, when does the preparation attack Shrek?”

Ju Zi(orange) said: “Is away from the deadline eight days that we give, State Master do not worry.”

Zongli Wu desolate [say / way]: “empress, do you plan and a Shrek lecture of prestige really? Full Continent that believes now the Shrek Academy praying for rescue letter send. Soon, the reinforcements from Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire will arrive. At that time, we paid more prices to be able them to rout compared with the price. Doesn't empress consider the casualty situation of officers? At our present military strength, may trample flat Shrek anytime.”

Ju Zi(orange) shaking the head of gently, said: “State Master should be most familiar to Shrek Academy. Then, State Master believes that if our present storms, how many prices the victory does need to pay?”

Zongli Wu has gawked, he said: “Shrek Academy accepted Sky Soul Empire remnants, in addition city defense force, most also 100,000 people. Even if some Defensive Soul Guidance Device, the quantity will not be many. But our 800,000 armies, have eight Soul Engineer Corp. Only Soul Engineer Corp strength, sufficiently broken city.”

Ju Zi(orange) said: “No, is not simple. Material that obtains from currently us, Shrek Academy had has produced nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely the ability. As for producing many us was not clear. Moreover, in Shrek Academy, powerhouse like clouds. In Sea God Pavilion each Ancient Elder has almost the strength of Transcendent Douluo rank. Once compelled anxiously them, this had ten thousand years of accumulation formidable Academy, has not known that must burst out many energies. Regarding us, encircles not to attack now is the best means. As for reinforcements that you said that is actually I most wants to see that the reinforcements came, to us is the genuine big good deed.”

In the Zongli Wu eye the cold brightness dodges, he is not a fool, listened to the Ju Zi(orange) words, what has realized, “empress, illuminated you saying that this time you didn't plan to attack Shrek?”

Ju Zi(orange) said: “Now is also not the time. Emperor Dragon and Evil Tyrant two Soul Engineer Corp at night the day before yesterday already. Our army tents are invariable, but had 50,000 people to evacuate the camp successively, coordinating two Soul Engineer Corp to move. The front, we only needed to attract the attention of Shrek Academy to be OK. Attacks truly is also not the time, but deceptive attack words, actually yes.”

Zongli Wu aura some are not uniform, sinking sound track: “By our present strengths, even if attacks Shrek Academy really whole-heartedly, can certainly break the city, even if they can revolt, we didn't have strong enough striking power? Once Shrek City were broken, then, Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire mind pillar vanished, when the time comes series Continent is just round the corner. I do not understand why empress must delay!”

Ju Zi(orange) light [say / way]: “State Master, please do not forget own status, you are Army Supervisor, is actually not commander. Strategic tactics, must be own master. If you have any discontented, can propose to your majesty. If your majesty did not agree that my course of action, I am willing to change.”

The breath of Zongli Wu is somewhat rapid, regarding Ju Zi(orange), why does not know, in his heart actually a little fears. Naturally is not the frightened Ju Zi(orange) strength. In his opinion, takes cultivating of Ju Zi(orange) as, he can pinch easily him. But, this Ju Zi(orange) was really too fearful, she in direction of army, must be blessed by God simply.

The Zongli Wu age is not small, but he actually completely cannot completely understand tactical arrangement of Ju Zi(orange) when army command. Not only one time, when he is puzzled, the Ju Zi(orange) god came the pen to achieve the decisive success.

Therefore, he has not dared to offend Ju Zi(orange) really completely. Let alone, side Ju Zi(orange) also has the support of numerous nine levels of Soul Engineer. The Holy Spirit Cult powerhouse who he brings although quantity are many. But on the other hand, fearing of Soul Engineer to Evil Soul Master, does not have Soul Master to Evil Soul Master is so serious.

“Snort! empress puts best into it.”Zongli Wu flings the robe sleeve, turns around to go.

Ju Zi(orange) looks at his back, gives a calm smile, “does not deliver.”

--------------------------------------------------

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket, our peerless Tang Sect cartoons, have transmitted the peerless Tang Sect cartoon newly, everybody transmitted in our prestigious platforms: Peerless Tang Sect 127, consult.

Joins the method of our platform to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication.

The quickest renewal, non- ball window reading invited.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-561-part-1





Volume 12

#561 - In Crazy Practice


In any country historical, the marshal and Army Supervisor very difficult thought to be unified, otherwise Army Supervisor was also useless.

Zongli Wu this Army Supervisor naturally is not Xu Tianran wants to send, but the Holy Spirit Cult potential is big, he has to such do. Holy Spirit Cult wants in the thought in the army seeping not to be a day two days.

However, continuously by the present, the effect is not good. After all, Evil Soul Master makes most people repel eventually, Soul Master or Soul Engineer, are so.

Gazes after the Zongli Wu form to vanish outside the tent, a Ju Zi(orange) pair of beautiful pupil narrows the eyes slightly, both hands surround in the front.

These repugnant Evil Soul Master, have them to impede, own plan is very difficult to implement perfectly. If there is an opportunity......

The Holy Spirit Cult present function became getting smaller, after Innate Body Sect was ruined thoroughly, the Holy Spirit Cult only function, in fact resists the Shrek Academy powerhouse. If not because in Holy Spirit Cult has existences of two big Limit Douluo, perhaps Xu Tianran already found the way to surrender them thoroughly.

Copes with Holy Spirit Cult, actually Ju Zi(orange) and Xu Tianran common idea. This Evil Soul Master clan/sect, will rebel in the future surely. Once the Continent unification, perhaps they can do everything possible captures the domination of country, how as to do, these surreptitious Evil Soul Master have certainly their method.

In the future this unification entire Continent country commanding general is own son, Ju Zi(orange) how, regardless of not to make Holy Spirit Cult prevail.

Thought of the son, the body of Ju Zi(orange) slightly shivered, the look also became gentle.

Before departure, she asked a Sun-Moon Empire top powerhouse to protect oneself son, the goal of aiming, not the enemy who might present, but Holy Spirit Cult! She most feared that now, is Holy Spirit Cult in secret starts to own son Xu Yunhan, that is most fearful.

War in the frontal battlefield must quickly end is good, only then all in frontal battlefield had finished, after oneself return to the empire, can carry on the next step plan.

Wipes the light chill in the air to appear in the Ju Zi(orange) eye pupil, matter that she must carry on, not only but unifies Continent to be so simple. Moreover, unifies Continent, does not need to complete quickly.

Shrek City, Tang Sect.

“Buzz”mind Soul Nucleus shivers fiercely, making Huo Yuhao within the body burst out extremely intense mind fluctuation outward.

Eye of Destiny in voluntarily opened, in inside profound darkness, mind Soul Nucleus ray twinkle, but has actually been shivering in unstable fierce.

On the Huo Yuhao face is revealing color resolutely.

Old Mu left his these to control mind Soul Nucleus liquid Spiritual Power to vanish, after having absorbed these Spiritual Power, his mind Soul Nucleus also became more formidable. However, was Huo Yuhao has won many precious time similarly.

Now his Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus of chest place was stronger, the velocity of whirl also arrived at the naked eye the degree that is difficult to distinguish.

With the help of Old Mu, Huo Yuhao do not know how long has insisted, but Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus of chest place at least increased three times in this time.

At this time although that Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus has not formed, but not like initial time was so frail, it became strong, really congealed just liked together the ice crystal, the velocity of whirl also started regarding the influence of mind Soul Nucleus becomes bigger and bigger.

Both each other collide, Huo Yuhao autogenous control that initiates continues to shiver.

Snow Emperor and Ice Emperor showed their formidable strengths, to present, they maintains unusual was stable.

Under the function of Dragon Pill, the Huo Yuhao body intensity also increased, at least so far can also insist.

Octagonal does not have the sound, Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White) actually to assist Huo Yuhao throughout, consolidates the meridians and internal organs of Huo Yuhao by his strength.

Mermaid Princess Li Ya in Old Mu Spiritual Power since later, temporarily has rested, now is also ready that momentarily again has gotten rid.

The method of Yin-Yang Supplement cultivates present this stage, Huo Yuhao to be unable to back down, he is very clear, once is defeated, oneself perhaps was not only injured was so simple, because the Absolute Ice energy group of chest place already quite formidable, inside absorbed has been equal to oneself normal time about 30% Soul Power.

This degree of Soul Power is also not enough to form Soul Nucleus, but that compresses to the Absolute energy, once explodes, actually sufficiently integrated the body scrap of Dragon Clan bloodlines him.

Stands firm the mind, to continue is maintaining the current condition, Huo Yuhao after these days tempering, the mentality was gentler.

Six big spirits add the help of Old Mu, if was unable to succeed, the future will not have the least bit successful possibility.

Therefore, in any event must insist that accomplishes the whole task at one stroke.

mind Soul Nucleus is rotating crazily, the mind energy that Old Mu injected before no doubt is temporary sluggish it, but similarly, has very big nutritious effect . The energy at this time in this mind Soul Nucleus bursting out is becoming more and more powerful. Is attacking the Huo Yuhao willpower time and time again.

mind Soul Nucleus is now wanted by Spiritual Power that under the Huo Yuhao control releases to distance that Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus, will come under the influence of Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus, to shatter and being defeated and dispersed, were absorbed suddenly again by mind Soul Nucleus. Is this, mind Soul Nucleus is the anger. Some people contend for the domain, can it look on?

In the laboratory, the temperature started to continue to reduce, Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass was quietly has braved from Huo Yuhao within the body, iced on the blue leave of grass to release the gentle ray, started to bloom to belong to its strength outward.

Octagonal Ice Source Concentration!

In the air, the Absolute Ice aura was absorbed by it rapidly, then injects into Huo Yuhao within the body, the Absolute Ice energy that it absorbs transmits to Snow Emperor directly, is consolidating the Snow Emperor strength.

Huo Yuhao oneself cannot feel these, his energy completely immerses on own Spiritual Power. The condition of whole person also in that side.

Has not known how long, fierce painful and mind Soul Nucleus wreaked havoc crazily makes him probably unable to support finally. After obtaining Dragon Pill moistens the body, starts to present that type to be torn the general great suffering.

Mermaid Princess Li Ya invested to his assistance during. But to this stage, crazy mind Soul Nucleus is not she can contain, can only help Huo Yuhao return to normal reluctantly slightly energy in the mind Soul Nucleus.

Iced the blue air current to sweep across at this time on.

The Snow Emperor ice crystal, moved finally once again, as before is upward float. The Snow Emperor mind aura looks like Huo Yuhao ice Xue Nu god sigh general ice-cold is hard, stabs instantaneously Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus, lets that mind Soul Nucleus crazy seemed sprinkled trough cold water, has stopped.

Snow Emperor melts the ice crystal to explode suddenly, changes into complicated, toward Huo Yuhao that extreme twist the Absolute Ice energy group has twined.

Snow Emperor!

Although Huo Yuhao at this time is in the condition of being in deep sorrow, all he but who Snow Emperor is can the clear feeling.

Although he does not know that Snow Emperor does this will have what kind of injury to her, but he actually felt of snowy area resolutely.

Snow Emperor she!

“Buzz”chest place, the Absolute Ice energy group erupts in fierce shivering, the fluctuation of energy of surge jumps to shoot just like the blowout generally outward.

Huo Yuhao only thought that chest place suddenly one tight, these plunged mind Soul Nucleus Spiritual Power of chest position, is defeated and dispersed instantaneously, the pain on his body bearing also temporarily vanished.

These Absolute Ice energies that the Snow Emperor ice crystal explodes, is such pure, just like ice belts, quietly in disturbance Absolute Ice energy group.

These ice belts twine, not only has not made the speed of Absolute Ice energy group revolving reduce, instead a about step promotion its revolving. During the extreme twist, the Absolute Ice energy rolls itself to burst out buzz the whining noise unceasingly. Internal Absolute Ice energy was being compressed crazily, the formidable feeling also outward spreads from the Huo Yuhao chest place along with it.

That Absolute Ice energy group almost during the time that in short several times breathe expanded ten times, when it almost fills in the Huo Yuhao entire chest cavity, actually suddenly contracts, was suppressed by a strange strength is changing the beforehand size.

Soul Nucleus color had the change directly, turned into the insightful dark blue, around this insightful shuttle depth molded blue color energy group, presented one piece jet black such as the nighttime sky general silent darkness.

Soul Nucleus? Is this Soul Nucleus appearance? At least is beginning to take shape Soul Nucleus.

Huo Yuhao is surprised. Must know that in his judgment, at least must maintain three times of time like the beforehand condition, but also needs extremely huge Absolute Ice energy, has the possibility to condense Soul Nucleus! But Snow Emperor launch of suddenly, made the Absolute Ice energy of his chest place take shape toward the Soul Nucleus direction congealment directly. This is strange so is incessantly simple, simply is the miracle!

Snow Emperor, actually have you used what kind of strength?

mind Soul Nucleus after receiving Snow Emperor Spiritual Power attacks the short stagnation, erupts once more. This time, Huo Yuhao cannot block completely. Powerful incomparable Spiritual Power, directly soared Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus that the Huo Yuhao chest place just took shape to hit the past. That crazy mind fluctuation, must eliminate it to be then quick that Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus without doubt.

However, at this time, Huo Yuhao felt is not the pain, but is cool of chest place.

That crazy Spiritual Power when will soon hit Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus, a formidable thought is mixing the Absolute Ice strength suddenly, counter- volume on. Froze that crazy Spiritual Power unexpectedly instantaneously.

Yes, freezes. Can Spiritual Power also freeze? Huo Yuhao was shocked completely.

----------------------------------------------------

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket.

The quickest renewal, non- ball window reading invited.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-561-part-2





Volume 12

#561 - Under Crazy Practice


Ribbon Absolute Ice strengths rise upwardly, has spread to mind Soul Nucleus, that feeling, seems like counter-attacking general.

What Huo Yuhao cannot see, because at this time Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass of his outside the body displayed Octagonal Ice Source Concentration to arrive at the Absolute condition, itself fierce was shivering, each leave of grass seemed transparent in the general, entire room, the cold wind howled, innumerable Ice Element crazy entered to his within the body to rush forth.

Protecting and sustaining of Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White) to Huo Yuhao body suddenly had also finished, the innumerable Bai Se (White Color) tiny energy groups' toward Huo Yuhao Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus well up under its control, dissolves with that Soul Nucleus as one.

Ice Emperor is controlling the Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion Torso Bone aquamarine flows, a little bit deep green liquid, unceasingly to that Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus in seepage and spread.

“With my name, the spirit of Ice Heavenly Snow Woman, friendly!”

“Bang”

Huo Yuhao whole body big change, he only thought own chest as well as the entire body have blasted out in this flash completely. Shortly, in the brain a blank, the thought stops, the thought of whole person also as if by unequalled devastation, with his mind Soul Nucleus same place, fell into a blank.

......

Star Dou Forest. Central area, Great Ominous Land.

Lake of Life tranquil looks like a giant emerald. Surrounding is growing each plant, has filled with the life aura. Even if here breathes, can feel life energy that it brings.

What a pity, here regarding almost all has the strength biology, is the life-forbidden zones.

“Bang”fierce thundered to blast out, broke the tranquility of nature. Since the jet black form from the Lake of Life center, brings the innumerable lake water together instantaneously.

The lake water changes into the mist, is coiling around by that black form absorption, the black form also on that hovering in the midair.

The long hair lets fall from the face by, in the jet black eye pupil spills over the golden brilliance, but in his eye pupil deep place, is actually revealing the surprised uncertain color at this time.

“What's the matter? Why couldn't I feel his existence?”Thinking aloud that handsome black clothed man muttered.

As the present age first powerhouse, the head of Ten Great Ferocious Beasts. Beast God Di Tian always has the enormous confidence regarding oneself.

Humanity is formidable, does not have any humanity to shake him the status of powerhouse on Continent.

The floating body falls the shore, in the Di Tian eye is revealing color looking pensive.

His right hand draws strange arcs in void, quick, black rune emerged out of thin air.

The black mist fills the air, in the Di Tian eye golden light dodges, but under flickers, the look in his eyes becomes sinks to congeal.

Could not feel. Why?

Can awaken from the deep sleep him, naturally had the extremely important matter, but this matter relates to the Star Dou Forest future.

The aura of that person disappears.

In a moment ago, him clearly felt that has Huo Yuhao of oneself Reverse Scale attachment, the aura vanishes suddenly. Has not left any trace.

The aura vanishes, has a situation, that is, death! At least looks like in Di Tian, should be this.

But, his Reverse Scale, not only supervises Huo Yuhao, is also protecting him. Once he encounters the danger, own Reverse Scale will send out warning omen immediately, is Beast God he, can save Huo Yuhao immediately.

Although Di Tian appreciates Huo Yuhao very much, was Huo Yuhao has created the Spirit Transferring Pagoda organization, at least temporarily has relaxed the relations between human and Soul Beast. But, in his heart, Huo Yuhao eventually is only a humanity, has the humanity of use value.

He cannot make Huo Yuhao die, that is because has Destiny Divine Beast Three Eyed Golden Lion Power of Destiny in Huo Yuhao within the body. Only then he is living, the aura of that destiny has been caring for Star Dou Forest. Although not like former Three Eyed Golden Lion, when is so formidable, but at least has certain function.

But similarly he cannot make Huo Yuhao formidable, this humanity is having the extremely high talent, if one day, his to turn into a god goes, Star Dou Forest similarly will also lose caring for of that Power of Destiny.

Therefore, Di Tian closely has been monitoring Huo Yuhao change. When Huo Yuhao has triggered the attention of God Realm, he immediately seal without hesitation his strength, having kept him from communicating with God Realm. How to see as for Huo Yuhao that was not the issue that he can ponder.

Can a humanity, again formidable how? One have reached this world limit, humanity is how regardless of being unable to defeat own.

But, is in this case, his aura actually suddenly vanished. This has gone beyond the Di Tian cognition category completely.

Di Tian is very confident to own Reverse Scale, that Reverse Scale is not the ordinary scale, but is equal existence of his doppelganger. By Reverse Scale, he can accurately locate, some strengths transfers by the space deep meaning that oneself control.

But he not only now cannot feel existence of Huo Yuhao, even could not feel including oneself Reverse Scale aura, how can not make him be startled?

Cannot feel existence of Reverse Scale, he cannot his strength transmission in the past, examine the Huo Yuhao situation.

It is not right, certainly has any incorrect place. Di Tian eyes narrows the eyes, he cannot make Power of Destiny be separated from his control.

That side Huo Yuhao had certainly problems, should be he uses any ability to shield itself temporarily and induction between Reverse Scale, thus is unable to induce him. Since he has such done, certainly has the goal.

It is not good, must have a look, position that Reverse Scale induces finally, in Shrek City.

The worst result, has abandoned this boy, then forever keeps in Star Dou Forest, finds the way to continue the life for him again. Although such one, Power of Destiny may have problems, but must compared with losing many.

One step steps forward, Di Tian vanished baseless, when the personal appearance appears again, arrived above a kilometer upper air. The personal appearance dodges again, airborne has as if ripped open an opening, he one step enters into, opening closed, this formidable Beast God vanished.

After Shrek City extension, among the distance with Star Dou Forest was very near and was very near.

After one minute, when the Di Tian black form appears in the midair, in Shrek City has sounded the grating warning immediately.

Tang Sect Soul Guidance Device as well as the development of Shrek Academy Soul Guidance Hall is quite quick. Surface-to-air Surveying Soul Guidance Device and upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device also had. But compared with Sun-Moon Empire, in the survey effect in the quantity, has not the small disparity.

Airborne are suddenly many a person, Shrek City here Surveying Soul Guidance Device had discovered immediately that in the ground and city wall, numerous Soul Guidance Device have locked that black form immediately.

When the discovery has a person, in the Shrek City defense force, ten Soul Engineer lift-offs, encircle immediately rapidly toward the airborne shadow.

“Snort!”Cold snort|hum resounds, the entire sky as if fiercely shivered. That several forms just lifted off, immediately felt a terrifying power suppresses from the sky, was holds back in the ground them unexpectedly directly. Because of some altitudes, several people have therefore broken.

“Called Huo Yuhao to come out, this King had the words to ask him.”Di Tian double hand back after behind, float in midair he, completely has disregarded Shrek all defensive systems.

The alarm sound changes instantaneously, by beforehand turned into rapid continual resounding gratingly, this has the signal that the powerful enemy invades.

The Shrek Academy direction, several form lift-offs, the leader, is Shrek Academy Martial Soul Faculty Dean, Yan Shaozhe!

The Yan Shaozhe side, Xian Lin'er, Qian Duoduo, Cai Mei'er and Zhang Lexuan several people follow.

When they see float in Beast God Di Tian in midair, the complexion slightly changes.

This is not affable! Initially, spirit of Old Xuan and Old Mu collaborated, the reluctant seal he some time, after finally Huo Yuhao convinced is departed, otherwise, that time, Shrek City was dangerous.

“Beast God has been well since last meeting. Does not know that comes my Shrek, what behavior?”Yan Shaozhe both hands at the airborne point, the incandescent color brilliance bloom, change into two pieces of giant wings, has ripped open the airborne oppression strength unexpectedly stiffly, leading the people to rise into the upper air, arrives with the Di Tian similar altitude quickly.

Di Tian somewhat surprisedly looked at his one eyes, “Yan Shaozhe, your strength progressive quick!”

Yeah, now this Martial Soul Faculty Dean, Soul Power cultivated for approached initially Old Xuan is becoming the Limit Douluo beforehand standard. Although has not arrived at 98 levels officially, but also is 97 levels of peak boundaries.

Rapidness that such Transcendent Douluo can also promote, has stemmed from the expectation of Di Tian.

Yan Shaozhe itself Martial Soul is the top, in addition help of Heaven and Earth Good Luck Pill, rapidness that such can therefore promote, most several months, he can reach 98 levels again. As for the future whether to break through to 99 levels, must look at the destiny and his perception.

Even if so, he at present the strength also has surmounted Old Song, becomes first person of Shrek Academy excluding Old Xuan. Although Old Song is the senior 97 levels cultivates is, but must unexpectedly be agility-attack system Battle Soul Master, by Martial Soul background, has a disparity with Yan Shaozhe.

“Beast God overpraised, compared with you, the strength of my this fine powder is the light of glow. Beast God so aggressively arrives at my Shrek, to help my Shrek altogether imperial foreign enemy?”At the same time was saying, Yan Shaozhe has also referred to the direction outside city.

Di Tian is gawked that he said that turned head to look at one toward the city outside. Although Sun-Moon Empire army beyond hundred li (0.5km), but naturally can see clearly by the Beast God vision. His pupil has also contracted, because outside Shrek City these human armies made him feel the danger unexpectedly. In other words, in that side, has any strength to threaten him.

“I am not help your. Your humanity their matter are solved. I am look for Huo Yuhao. Let him come out, I have matter to ask him.”Saying of Di Tian coldly . He will not be swindled. He does not have favorable impression to any humanity.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-561-part-3





Volume 12

#562 - In The Powerful Of Beastly God


Yan Shaozhe has as if gawked, “Yuhao? Did he come back? I do not know! Some time ago he left Academy, went to Sun-Moon Empire to carry out the task. Afterward again did not see him.”

Xian Lin'er behind showed the whites of the eyes in him, this person, talks nonsense does not bring to have the rough draft, really spoke thoughtlessly. Owed he is also 97 levels cultivated for the person.

“Nonsense, I clearly felt his aura in Shrek City.”In the Di Tian eye the cold brightness twinkle, “Yan Shaozhe, do not feign ignorance with me. I give you ten breaths time, making Huo Yuhao come out. Otherwise, do not blame this King not being impolite.”

“How Beast God this is must impolite law Ah?”old sound resound, the yellow luminescence shoots up to the sky together. Before the formidable imposing manner, the Beast God Di Tian arrangement in the airborne oppression strength, cracks-up unexpectedly completely. Suddenly the free time, arrived in front of Di Tian.

“Um?”Di Tian looks to appear in oneself front Old Xuan, once more is startled. The promotion of Yan Shaozhe has made him be surprised, but 97 levels of strengths also insufficiently look before him. But, Old Xuan is different, he clearly felt on the Old Xuan second Soul Nucleus aura.

This generally does not exist to have, is true second Soul Nucleus, second Soul Nucleus of Limit Douluo strength!

In Soul Beast, these have practiced several hundred thousand years of Transcendent Soul Beast, by the strength, can compare favorably with human Limit Douluo, the Soul Power total quantity is not inferior. But on the other hand, really facing on Limit Douluo, achievement possibly is small. The reason was Limit Douluo had second Soul Nucleus, but Soul Beast wanted to condense second Soul Nucleus is extremely difficult, can only use the method of Yin-Yang Supplement, can succeed.

In Ten Great Ferocious Beasts, has completed second Soul Nucleus truly successfully, in fact only then he and Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler. This is also why initially Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler dared to come to challenge his reason.

Naturally, after Ferocious Beasts completes second Soul Nucleus, will become incomparably formidable, Di Tian even believes that even if on this world all Limit Douluo will gather, will not be his match.

However, this idea, although exists, but same, Di Tian also fully realizes the great strength of Limit Douluo. He is capable of defeating Limit Douluo, but to kill Limit Douluo, his oneself must pay certain price. Therefore, after he feels Old Xuan became Limit Douluo, is surprised. He is very clear, Old Xuan has stopped many years in 98 levels of that levels, by the physical state of humanity, not too possibly again breaks through according to the truth. But he actually broke through.

Di Tian coldly [say / way]: “Xuan Zi, you believe that you break through into Limit Douluo, can contend with this King?”

The Old Xuan vision is cold, “can, that probably try to know. For these years, our Shrek to your Star Dou Forest well water not interfering with river water. Also vigorously promotes the Spirit Transferring Pagoda organization. Thus greatly reduced in hunting and killing of Soul Beast to your Star Dou Forest. I do not know that actually your today's goal is what, but, you provoke like this our Shrek, thinks really we did take you not to have the means? Di Tian, you do not give me today a view, we have not ended.”

Occupies the truth, Old Xuan comes up to grasp the initiative in own hand.

The Di Tian look slightly has also glittered, truly, the Star Dou Forest aspect and Shrek City truly were in the honeymoon for these years, both sides acted in harmony, the Star Dou Forest Soul Beast death quantity greatly reduced. Especially previous Huo Yuhao, Beibei, Xu Sanshi, Jiang Nannan and the others pledged in Spirit Transferring Pagoda, no longer injury any Soul Beast. This matter touches Jade Swan Jade Woman. Thus about one step has also pulled closer each other both sides' relations.

But this time, he because feels Huo Yuhao change, comes the important person rashly, truly does not stand in the principle. Was turned the powerful by Old Xuan excuse, making Di Tian somewhat have nothing to say in reply.

The peace both are favorable for both sides, but oneself today wants to look for Huo Yuhao, without doubt before will affect, peace picture that has built.

But if, does not look for Huo Yuhao, can he be resigned? He knows eagerly that actually what happened on Huo Yuhao. Why could not feel including oneself Reverse Scale aura.

“Xuan Zi, my this time comes, but there is a matter to inquire Huo Yuhao, with your Shrek for the enemy. You called him, I asked that his several words walked.”Although Di Tian is strong, but also similarly has the scruples, he biggest scruples, are the subjects in Star Dou Forest. His expression also softened several points.

Old Xuan sighed, said: “Beast God, Yuhao this child, because resisted the powerful enemy before, experiences personally heavy wound. At this time suffocated. In him the one powerful offensive of enemy. If Beast God is really good for him, that should help us resist the powerful enemy together.”

“Was injured by the enemy formidable attack?”Listened to a Old Xuan such saying, Di Tian also really to believe several points. If some specially formidable attacks, before for example, he had seen that Grim Reaper Douluo with the aid of the attack of Grim Reaper Tower, but may also make his Reverse Scale lose the effectiveness really temporarily. If so, passing of explanation.

He will not help the human solution humanity fight. However, in some sense, Star Dou Forest is also considered as now is the Shrek Academy ally, cannot know that is a matter. Was informed in the presence of everyone does not say does not help.

Di Tian has hesitated, said: “By Shrek ten thousand years of background, resists this small and weak enemy also to have the issue? After these, said again that I have a look at Yuhao first. If his injury is serious, I find the way to help him treat. You should understand that I do not hope similarly he died. After all has Emperor Auspicious Beast Three Eyed Golden Lion Power of Destiny on him. Leads me to go.”

In the Old Xuan heart criticizes, really becomes a ghost old, this Di Tian was also too difficult to handle. Does he possibly make Di Tian see Huo Yuhao?

Beast God arrives suddenly, Old Xuan naturally understands that is because Huo Yuhao is breaking through the second Soul Nucleus reason. Although he does not know how Beast God is the sensation, but reason also only then possibly is this. Di Tian rushed at this time, had proven a matter, that is, Yuhao likely must succeed. At this critical moment, Old Xuan is how regardless of not to make Di Tian disturb Huo Yuhao.

Sighed one lightly, Old Xuan some, but also firm shaking the head, “Beast God, perhaps was not good. The Yuhao injury has processed, now is resting, our doctors urged specially, anyone, cannot disturb him. Is inferior to this, in your present Academy lives, waits for Yuhao to be slightly good, I lead you to visit him again.”

“Um?”In the Beast God eye the ray dodges, he also felt that is not right, coldly snorted, “Xuan Zi, you in protracted time. Let Huo Yuhao come out, or leads me to see him. Otherwise, do not blame this King not being impolite. this King lived several hundred thousand years, the acrobatics of your humanity I have seen were many, wants to deceive me, dream of a fool.”

Old Xuan is also the complexion changes, sinking sound track: “Beast God, you must violate our beforehand contracts, can with our humanity be the enemy?”

Beast God complexion one black, he truly only wants to have a look at the Huo Yuhao situation, that side the Spirit Transferring Pagoda organization actually not to be affected, that must unexpectedly be to the entire Star Dou Forest advantageous matter.

Hesitated slightly, Beast God had set firm resolve. After all, Power of Destiny is more important, that was he can pass the important guarantee of next bottleneck day tribulation.

“Xuan Zi, do not make me say one again. My patience has the limit.”

The Old Xuan heart also sinks, looks at the Beast God ice-cold look, he knows that this time did not have the swivel leeway.

“Good, since Beast God does without sparing anyone's sensibilities, that comes. To disturb Yuhao therapy, you crossed first my this close said again.”

In the Beast God Di Tian eye the ray dodges, does not get angry from the prestige, the back black hair flutters slightly, “do you want to challenge to me?”

Old Xuan laughs, “after old man breaks through into Limit Douluo, had not found the appropriate match to try the hand, since Beast God arrives at this today, actually that happen to tries me and Continent's Number One Expert disparity big.”

“Is very good. this King not for oneself, you, if can under my offensive insist that half double-hour, that this King turns around walks. Otherwise, this King does not injure your Shrek City people, you lead me to see Huo Yuhao. Does not affect us to cooperate.”

In the Old Xuan eye the ray dodges, “hit had said again.”At the same time was saying, Old Xuan is gets away, flew toward higher airborne.

The Beast God Di Tian personal appearance is motionless, the shadow only dodges, arrived compared with a Old Xuan higher place, static waiting.

Yan Shaozhe, Xian Lin'er and the others with, instead have not been draws back far, the fight of Limit Douluo level, is not they can affect, but sensibility in this fight will promote to have the advantage to them in the future very much.

Two forms increase unceasingly, to stopped from a ground five kilometers altitude.

Soul Ring bloom from Old Xuan, the dignified imposing manner made the entire sky turn into the yellow.

Di Tian proudly float in midair, is feeling Old Xuan Soul Power fluctuation silently. The corners of the mouth place reveals color of the disdaining, “Xuan Zi, as before is Equal Resonance second Soul Nucleus of your humanity, although I do not know how you succeed. But you should understand that you before me, the opportunity are not many.”

Old Xuan coldly snorted, how “does not try to know. Asked Beast God to advise.”At the same time was saying, his right hand lifts, toward Di Tian, when the chest pats.

The entire sky fiercely shook, the intense yellow color ray congealed a height to surpass kilometer huge Gluttonous Divine Bull of behind Old Xuan, the light shadow twinkle, splendid sight.

--------------------------------------------------

Our peerless Tang Sect cartoon fifth volume, on the 15 of the month the nation went on the market, everybody transmitted in our prestige platform: The fifth volume, three characters, can obtain the automatic reply, first sees the title page and complimentary gift. Asks to your surrounding bookstores quickly when receipts. Hey. Extremely fine.

Joins our prestigious platforms to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is our families.

The quickest renewal, non- ball window reading invited.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-562-part-1





Volume 12

#562 - In The Powerful Of Beastly God


To their this levels, any simple movement is the extremely formidable attack, simplifies, Soul Ability instead was not that important.

Di Tian stands there minute as before quite motionless, the black ray locates from his chest together to rush forth, Old Xuan that palm lays out, only thought that front air fierce distortion, a terrifying suction transmits suddenly instantaneously. Unexpectedly is that clean of palm strength absorption he lays out.

“Um?”In Old Xuan heart one startled, “Space Power?”

Di Tian said indifferently: “this King enters this level, was earlier than for several hundred thousand years you, realizing from experience in this aspect, your also difference was too far and is too far. Although the God Realm limit, our Soul Beast cannot to turn into a god, but on Douluo Continent, in your humanity, never possibly some people are my match.”

Old Xuan coldly snorted, both hands in front, back Gluttonous Divine Bull erupt one to roar suddenly dreadfully. Above both hands of Old Xuan, presented one group to congeal thick brown bright sphere.

This group of bright sphere seem extremely strange, the interior seems the entity shape, the place that above float are actually dividing, each is sending out the strange brilliance, including part also likely is the wave flows.

“Um?”This time was one's turn Di Tian to be surprised, “you in Imitation Continent?”

Old Xuan light [say / way]: “Meets my one move, day shouts should.”His both hands brace forth slowly, the movement is very slow, that yellow bright sphere flies slowly, flies in the Di Tian direction with the extremely slow speed.

But also at this time, mysterious appeared, in their grounds, Shrek City, is outside the city the broad plain, even is the direction of Sun-Moon Empire big camp. In the ground starts to send out a yellow luminescence, toward airborne flies to shoot to go. In an instant. The line of sight may and in the range, the earth has as if awakened generally, releases that rich earth attribute energy, crazy toward airborne flies to swing to go.

Sun-Moon Empire big camp. When two big powerhouses rise into the upper air. Sun-Moon Empire was alarmed.

Ju Zi(orange) arrives at outside under the numerous nine levels of Soul Engineer guards, appears with her outside similarly. Holy Spirit Cult numerous powerhouses.

When Old Xuan behind transforms kilometer huge Gluttonous Divine Bull, the first discoloration, is Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master Zongli Wu.

“Limit Douluo? Shrek Academy Sea God Pavilion Master has Xuan Zi been the Limit Douluo level unexpectedly?”In the Zongli Wu eye full is shocking.

Evil Soul Master compares in ordinary Soul Master no doubt has the superiority, but. After this superiority to the Transcendent Douluo level, did not exist. Limit Douluo appears means anything, he is clear. Must know, now Holy Spirit Cult two big Limit Douluo both not here.

But the Limit Douluo strength, is not general Soul Guidance Device can injure. Zongli Wu first time thought that War-God Empress Ju Zi(orange) does not attack the strategy, as if also some truth. This Shrek Academy background truly is behind. After Old Mu dies, this how long. New Limit Douluo appeared.

But, who is his match?

Di Tian together black form, has not shown his aura, therefore Sun-Moon Empire. All people were suspecting that can as a Limit Douluo match, who that be able to be?

Ju Zi(orange) brow tight wrinkle, she does not know that what happened, Shrek Academy presents Limit Douluo unexpectedly, this is the important matter, but his also match, both sides as if must spell hardly, this somewhat is also strange. If these two powerhouses of Limit Douluo levels are Shrek Academy, perhaps, her plan really might have problems. Must know, symbol that existence of Limit Douluo that level, almost does not die. If determined to do the destruction, perhaps oneself really somewhat troubled.

In this time, the earth is starting to ascend that piece by piece close yellow color luminous spot, sees this, Zongli Wu is also the complexion big change. He is also existence of Transcendent Douluo level, very clear this means anything.

“Xuan Zi, not only became Limit Douluo, moreover mastered oneself Martial Soul true meaning. This is the phenomenon that the Martial Soul feedback world presents. How he comes up to use like this big move, is his match, actually who?”

Was in this time darkly, the sky suddenly. Old Xuan released the horizon that the yellow color ray illuminates, became cloudy. A resonant dragon roar sound gets up. Behind that black form, a big dragon outrageously appears.

Compared with Gluttonous Divine Bull light shadow that Old Xuan releases, this big dragon height also exceeds the kilometer, but, its body actually must concentrate solid many. It looks like a real dragon arrives simply general. Even but if is the real dragon, does not have the so huge volume!

The light shadow twinkle, the real dragon arrives. The terrifying aura also outward bursts out. In the sky, purple black halos drop downward, seems like raining general. After these purple rays descend to certain extent, naturally melts, becomes deep purple halos, was prevents on the earth to ascend unexpectedly, but the yellow color luminous spot, did not let any rose into airborne.

This is......

“Was Uncle Long comes? Is this Black Dragon, Uncle Long's Darkness Sacred Dragon Martial Soul? But......”in the Zongli Wu mouth exclaimed in surprise, but he felt quickly was not right, because, he saw a pair of golden eye pupil.

“No, this is not Uncle Long. This and this are......, This is Beast God Di Tian, Golden Eyed Black Dragon King, now world most powerhouse, control of Star Dou Forest, Beast God Di Tian!”

Such remarks, Sun-Moon Empire, immediately a silence.

Although from the judgment, they knows that Star Dou Forest Soul Beast will not involve among humanity the war. But, the Beast God Di Tian given name was really too resounding. On this world, he is the known most powerhouse.

Initially, in Bright Struggle Mountain Range, Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui facing Beast God that drawing support from the Huo Yuhao strength and Reverse Scale arrived, cannot profit unexpectedly, how obviously the Beast God Di Tian strength has been the degree.

But at this moment, airborne black form obviously is not a projection of Beast God, but is the true Beast God arrival. No wonder, no wonder is Limit Douluo Old Xuan unexpectedly is coming up whole-heartedly, must display the strongest ability to resist. Facing Beast God, who dares to retain?

The terrifying aura from the sky reverberates, Sun-Moon Empire has to plant to keep silent unexpectedly the general feeling.

In the Zongli Wu heart has a crazy sound to shout, Beast God has gotten rid to Shrek City unexpectedly, what does this mean? Means oncoming of their opportunity! If Beast God can break the city, the strategy that their anything does not attack is unimportant. To that time, Shrek City must break. Nobody can in this case not be enticed.

But, the thought in heart, although is crazy, stands is a character cannot say there Zongli Wu. Because in the sky that dreadful pressure, was makes him also be full of the fear unexpectedly.

This is the pressure that the top powerhouse creates, the pressure that Beast God Di Tian creates!

The powerhouses are the powerhouse, person the shade of famous tree, when Sun-Moon Empire these people hear airborne that black form unexpectedly are Beast God Di Tian, their first response is the subconscious backlash, but does not want to cope with Shrek City while this opportunity.

At this time, the Ju Zi(orange) chilly sound resounded, “passed on the this Commander order, all Soul Guidance Array preparations. Long-distance can linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device prepare launch sufficiently.”

Her voice is not loud, but actually through amplifying Soul Guidance Device spreads outward, enabling each Soul Engineer on the scene to hear clearly.

These receive Soul Engineer that frightens, almost shakes, then responded, even if were Zongli Wu, in heart secret ashamed, at this time, a oneself unexpectedly might as well little girl.

However, he explained to himself in heart quickly, the know-nothing party is dauntless, she definitely does not know Beast God strongly.

At this time, the sky and ground, completely is a magnificent picture. Purple black and yellow, two types the luminous spot that has been full of the energy engages in factional strife mutually. But before the Old Xuan body bright sphere that promotes has been away from Di Tian to be getting more and more near.

Di Tian coldly looks at Old Xuan, “Xuan Zi, do you want to go all out with me really? You should know, if Shrek Academy has been short of you, is impossible to resist outside these enemies ** team.”

Does not participate in the human warfare, actually on behalf of Di Tian does not know that this war is any situation.

Old Xuan said indifferently: “It is not I must go all out, but is Beast God must come to provoke, is the Shrek Academy protector, do I want not to manage? Beast God also has no need to take pleasure in others'misfortunes. My Shrek City was extinguished, has the advantage to your Star Dou Forest? The Sun-Moon Empire potential is big, excuse me, if one day, Sun-Moon Empire really has ruled entire Continent, they will let off Soul Beast in your Star Dou Forest? To that time, you are also the Sun-Moon Empire back gardens, what Soul Ring others want, goes to your there to take and that's the end. By that time, perhaps you could not make anything.”

“Bold!”Di Tian shouted angrily, the sudden fist rumbled.

His fist in rumbling instantaneous, Golden Eyed Black Dragon King light shadow in upper air is also face upwards to exude one to roar.

Old Xuan refuses to admit being inferior, the double pupil turned into the crystal yellow instantaneously, before Gluttonous Divine Bull suddenly clashes, collided with that Golden Eyed Black Dragon King outrageously in one.

Previous time facing Beast God Di Tian time, Old Xuan with the help of Old Mu, has inspired the gluttony bloodlines of Gluttonous Divine Bull within the body, thus made the gluttony swallow Di Tian, keeping him from participating during the attack of that beast tide. Has won enough enough time to Shrek Academy. But present Old Xuan, became true Limit Douluo, what a pity, he does not have the means to rely on his strength to inspire Power of Gluttony as before.

The collision almost simultaneously appears in huge Martial Soul that they transform as well as they.

--------------------------------------------------------

Welcome everybody to play our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire tour, joins our prestige platform, under has the button directly to enter downloads the page, comes the same place quickly.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-562-part-2





Volume 12

#562 - Under The Powerful Of Beastly God


The sky presses suddenly, is Light greatly puts. The terrifying Soul Power fluctuation dispels to the surroundings in upper air in an instant. In over a hundred square kilometers range, all fog will shortly vanish into thin air, but the sky actually as before does not see the sunlight, yellow and purple black that only then engages in factional strife mutually.

But that terror Xuan imposing manner, made all people shocked sufficiently.

Shrek City and Sun-Moon Empire army, is looking at this earthshaking one. Really understands the person who meaning are not many. But everyone actually deep awareness, this fight regarding Shrek Academy, important.

Zongli Wu arrives at side Ju Zi(orange) quietly, asked in a low voice: “Marshal, when attacks?”

Ju Zi(orange) shaking the head of gently, said: “Now is also not the time, when both sides branched out outcome to say truly again. And must act according to circumstances. State Master, I asked your matter.”

“Um? You said.”Zongli Wu doubts looks to Ju Zi(orange), in his memory, this empress as if little has the modest inquiry the time.

Ju Zi(orange) said in a low voice: “From your perspective, this Beast God Di Tian is big regarding our threats?”

“Big, naturally is big.”Zongli Wu is almost saying without hesitation, “Beast God Di Tian was known as that present age the first powerhouse, has him, Star Dou Forest has the pillar, anyone, enters Star Dou Forest to search Soul Beast to hunt and kill must be careful. Even if my mother is no exception.”

Ju Zi(orange) shows a faint smile, said: “Was a pity that State Master had ninth Soul Ring, otherwise, perhaps this is one its good opportunity of hunting and killing. If some people can obtain Beast God Di Tian Soul Ring, must replace him becomes present age the first person.”

Regardless of how Zongli Wu has not thought that Ju Zi(orange) actually will say this, suddenly dumbfounded. Takes own Soul Ring by Beast God Di Tian? Even if this matter is he, has not thought. Or in human Soul Master, only if the lunatic, otherwise no one has to ponder this possibility.

That is, Beast God Di Tian!

Person ** is infinite, is greedy. Before Ju Zi(orange) has not mentioned, he does not think. But, heard Ju Zi(orange) to say this possibility, the heart of Zongli Wu, almost instantaneously scalding hot.

“Soul Ring is impossible. But if can add on the main body to refine the puppet with Beast God Di Tian part of souls greedily......”**, is ordinary just like myriad insects, is gnawing the heart of Zongli Wu.

“Marshal Sir, I do not need regarding Di Tian Soul Ring. If possible, can give to your majesty him actually. Most advanced Soul Guidance Device that our Holy Spirit Cult secret technique, Soul Engineer study in addition, has the possibility to preserve for a long time this Beast God Soul Ring. Although your majesty also arrived at the Titled Douluo level, but Crown Prince Your Highness did not have! Moreover, Beast God Di Tian will produce Soul Ring incessantly, definitely will produce Soul Bone. This Soul Ring and Soul Bone, leave Crown Prince Your Highness, in the future crown prince is now the first under heaven person.”

Listens to the Zongli Wu words, in the Ju Zi(orange) heart also to move, but is quick, she awakens, sneers secretly. One entice him, he instead also in turn enticed. Beast God Di Tian Soul Ring? Snort, but also not necessarily suits my son.

Only then Ju Zi(orange) are clear, his son, is impossible to have Xu Tianran that dragon class Martial Soul, but Di Tian attribute is dark, in addition his Soul Ring surely is extremely formidable, suits oneself son's possibility to be very small is very small.

However, in heart, although is thinking like this, in the surface Ju Zi(orange) actually revealed the earnest color, “Sir State Master, this was not perhaps good. Beast God Di Tian most precious is Soul Ring and Soul Bone, how can give us Imperial Family? To strike to kill Beast God Di Tian, but also needs State Master your support!”

Zongli Wu shows a faint smile, said: “Marshal Sir does not need to be polite. We accord to his need and that's the end. I want this Beast God corpse, his corpse Imperial Family cannot use in any case, on the contrary is, has given us, can some functions.”

Ju Zi(orange) [say / way] without hesitation: “If can strike to kill this Beast God, not only establishes the distinguished merit, so advantage. All depend on the State Master opinion office.”

Zongli Wu subconscious has gripped the fist in the sleeves, if he very clear can obtain the skeleton of Beast God Di Tian, how will have the situation. So long as retains the part of Beast God soul, then, he can refine the Golden Eyed Black Dragon King puppet. At the Beast God Di Tian body intensity, to that time, genuine unmatched in the world is he! Even he can also rely on this puppet, attacks the Limit Douluo level directly.

However, Zongli Wu is also the experienced and careful generation, in the heart, although already extremely stimulated, [say / way] that in the surface actually maintains composure: “To cope with Beast God Di Tian, we cannot be irritable, must wait till the best opportunity to get rid again. We hope that Old Xuan can its heavy wound. Best is he also dies on Beast God. To that time, we have been able to kill two birds with one stone. The marshal felt relieved that our Holy Spirit Cult spared certainly no effort at that time.”

Ju Zi(orange) said: “Good, I will order all Soul Guidance Array places Assault Soul Guidance Device to coordinate State Master. We first wait.”

After Zongli Wu slightly makes the thinking, said: “Marshal, this matter is important, I prepare first.”

“Good, State Master does as you please.”Ju Zi(orange) hurries to comply.

Zongli Wu walked, is bringing Feng Ling as well as audiences Holy Spirit Cult Evil Soul Master turns around to go rapidly.

Looks the back that they depart, on the Ju Zi(orange) face appears gradually a smile, is having the smile of cold and gloomy murderous intention.

State Master, I may good luck.

“Marshal, can help Holy Spirit Cult obtain the Beast God Di Tian corpse really?”Old Su arrives at side Ju Zi(orange) quietly, asked in a low voice.

Ju Zi(orange) gives a calm smile, said: “That was natural. So long as we can kill Beast God.”

Old Su has gawked first, quick, on his face also revealed a smiling face. The good move to drive the tiger to swallow the idea of wolf! The marshal really worthily is a marshal, in the so short time, has given under Holy Spirit Cult the wrap. The formidable enticement regarding the greedy Holy Spirit Cult audiences without doubt is the best open intrigue.

In the sky, two forms separate suddenly, Old Xuan has withdrawn to own Gluttonous Divine Bull that pair of buffalo and cow horns, stabilizes lives in the personal appearance. But the Beast God Di Tian formidable strength has appeared, he from the sky retrocedes more than ten meters.

On the Old Xuan face raises wipes blood flushes, in the heart actually in secret panic-stricken, this present age first powerhouse is really not Bai Jiao, Beast God strength, but must surpass his judgment.

When he and Beast God Di Tian collides, only thinks the Di Tian strength such as the deep pool like the prison. Cannot feel has existence of end. This terrifying strength, one has destroyed his attack. But Di Tian as if also has retained, he can the whole body draw back.

“Xuan Zi, you should be able to feel that present you, are too big with my disparity. Goes, comes out the Huo Yuhao belt, I only need to ask that his several words, will not be what kind of him. I do not want to kill you.”Di Tian light saying.

Old Xuan coldly snorted, “do not think that you won.”At the same time was saying, he treads forward one step, in the back Gluttonous Divine Bull mouth exudes one low and deep stuffy. The body of Old Xuan baseless vanished, but the Gluttonous Divine Bull illusory form also becomes congealed to be solid.

This is true Martial Soul avatar and Gluttonous Divine Bull.

The sky and earth, the darkness and earth, are engaging in factional strife as before mutually, but the earth attribute strength was suppressed completely, is unable to leave from a ground hundred meters range.

Before Gluttonous Divine Bull that bidirectional, above silique that gives birth, yellow color halos shine, it in airborne accelerates suddenly, directly soars Di Tian and his Golden Eyed Black Dragon King hits.

Gluttonous Divine Bull dashes about wildly, in the sky as if there is intermittent rolling thunder to resound the common, terrifying bellow, as if must trample to shatter the entire sky.

Decadent halos expand from the Gluttonous Divine Bull under foot, is covering the body of Golden Eyed Black Dragon King, that is Gravity Control. Huge gravity crazy is tearing the body of Golden Eyed Black Dragon King, tries to imprison it.

Di Tian sighed, “since you must court death, that this King gave you a lifelong unforgettable lesson.”At the same time was saying, he has turned around suddenly, the right hand presses to behind Golden Eyed Black Dragon King top of the head, then the arm brandishes.

Strange appeared, that height surpasses kilometer huge Golden Eyed Black Dragon King, just likes swallows up absorbing water to collect unexpectedly generally toward the right arm that on Di Tian moves.

When the arm of Di Tian has flung the top of the head, in his hand were many a handle great sword.

Only this handle great sword the sword hilt has three chi (0.33 m), the sword blade is eight chi (0.33 m). The sword hilt is the black, is a Black Dragon appearance, the sword blade edge is actually the dull purple, the instance when it presents, that terror Sword Intent, the sky rips open a huge opening. Di Tian behind, presented huge black halos, looks like black hole, must swallow all.

In Shrek City, the Tang Sect people also similarly look in the upper air in the courtyard this war.

Sword Mad Ji Juechen in seeing Beast God Di Tian takes itself to melt light shadow as that flash of sword, the body shook shaking suddenly, in the mouth stuffy snort|hum, in the oronasals had the blood to flow out.

Jing Ziyan hurries to support him, “Juechen, you how?”

Ji Juechen shaking the head of gently, in the eye is actually revealing color resolutely. Only then he knows that had anything a moment ago. In that flash, he feels Di Tian Sword Intent with own Sword Intent, will therefore have such situation.

Good strength big Sword Intent, is this Sword Intent of true top powerhouse? Sword Intent is his Martial Soul, is his dreadful thought that and also has the Absolute terror strength.

During the thinking, Ji Juechen is sitting cross-legged to sit down directly same place, enters in meditate. This moment realizing from experience, was too for him important.

He by the card in the Soul Douluo boundary, is unable to break through. Is because does not have means condensation own Soul Nucleus. His practice way is different to all people, must find own that road, can really become the Titled Douluo rank powerhouse.

The quickest renewal, non- ball window reading invited.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-562-part-3





Volume 12

#563 - The Masculine And Feminine Elements Is Supplementary, The Rain Goes Out Vast


Black Dragon sword!

The purple light, changes into the startled day rainbow, the vertical stroke cuts under. That flash, the sky was cut completely. All gravity shortly will be stirred crushes. The Gluttonous Divine Bull huge form unexpectedly cut sky attracts to absorb instantaneously, is unable again the advance slightest, but that terror Black Dragon sword, actually in arrived at its pair of buffalo and cow horns instantaneously.

“Bang”thunders to resound through sky fiercely.

Sees only among Old Xuan that pair of buffalo and cow horns, two yellow color rays circle alternately, has blocked Di Tian this sword unexpectedly. But its huge body also from airborne instantaneously drops. Fell two kilometers altitude from five kilometers directly. In addition height kilometer, shortly must crash into Shrek City.

Gluttonous Divine Bull exudes one to roar shocking, an under foot yellow cloud dispels, cradling stiffly his body.

Di Tian float in position originally, in the hand the great sword refers to Old Xuan as before slantingly. The vision is dense, is ordinary just like the demon god.

This is the strength, present age the strength of first powerhouse.

Some Old Xuan weak feelings, Di Tian has controlled Space Power suddenly, what is more important, he after is facing Di Tian truly, fully felt Equal Resonance second Soul Nucleus and disparities between Di Tian that Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus. The Di Tian Soul Power congealing thick degree, he cannot compare. The dark aura of that terror is continuously in crazy is swallowing his earth attribute energy.

However, he knows that he cannot draw back. Cannot make Di Tian disturb Huo Yuhao at this time. Otherwise, perhaps the breakthrough of Yuhao forever is unable to be completed, will die directly.

eyes closed, in the Old Xuan mind is reverberating Old Mu before parting urging earnestly. His that huge Gluttonous Divine Bull body to airborne has not flown directly, but is static stopping there.

light shadow circulation. Gluttonous Divine Bull vanishes, Old Xuan, reappear there. The imposing manner as if also vanished.

On the Di Tian face reveals a light smile, in his opinion, Old Xuan must compromise.

Gives up including Martial Soul avatar, but why also to resist with him?

However, the quick Di Tian complexion once more becomes ugly. Did Old Xuan compromise really?

From Old Xuan, a permanent ancient remote aura dissipates slowly. Low and deep dragon roar sound also along with it resounding, at the same time, faint yellow flame regarding the body ascension of Old Xuan.

That vicissitudes ancient aura, that endless Dragon Clan is dignified, even if Di Tian, is in the heart slightly one tight.

This type of aura he is not first meeting, in the previous time. Star Dou Forest starts beast tide time, he once by oneself had felt. Even if by his strength, in the face of that strength, used several days of time to complete the breakthrough.

Yes, he feels at this time from Old Xuan, is Power of Gluttony.

“Xuan Zi. Were you insane? Do you want to go all out with this King unexpectedly?”Saying that the Di Tian startled anger occurred simultaneously, “this King shows mercy repeatedly, you so are ignorant of the proper action to take unexpectedly, thinks really I don't dare to kill you?”

By Old Xuan own strength, is unable to inspire Power of Gluttony in bloodlines. However, when he starts to burn his Soul Power. When the strength in Soul Nucleus stimulates completely, all these turned into the possibility.

To Limit Douluo this level, combustion Soul Power was not fatal, so long as Soul Nucleus is not broken, all have the possibility of restoring. But burnt Soul Power, the vitality has damaged severely is inevitable. At this moment, Old Xuan in burning his Soul Power, thus summoned in the bloodlines that pure Power of Gluttony?

With is Dragon Clan, Power of Gluttony to Beast God Di Tian, has the possibility of restraint. Can limit him, making him not have the means to seek the trouble of Huo Yuhao in a short time.

Old Xuan does not know how long one can insist, but he must not hesitate all many wins some time to Huo Yuhao.

Di Tian saw that Old Xuan did not reply, the complexion was also gloomy, if before, he was also only the guess, he had concluded now that Huo Yuhao was certainly handling any unknown matter. But Old Xuan definitely knows that what he is making, so at risk of life mutually, what means? From the benefit perspective, at least also means the matter that Huo Yuhao handles can compared with a Limit Douluo price.

Di Tian is the kings of ten thousand beast, in the bone is the Golden Eyed Black Dragon King bloodlines of law of the jungle,

Although has not known that genuinely what happened, but a little he can conclude that this matter regarding Star Dou Forest, is not the good deed, otherwise, Old Xuan so will not evade itself.

Thinks, after he before all scruples already the brain of throwing, in the eye spills over dense golden light gradually. Familiar Di Tian Soul Beast knows that Beast God under this condition absolutely is most fearful. Because he moved has killed heart.

The huge Black Dragon sword mentioned slowly, in the sky the blustery, purple black thick cloud made to become does not have the light greatly gloomily, but Beast God Di Tian in the midair, actually gradually turned into the deep purple, the whole body just liked that sword blade edge general color.

Behind him, appeared unexpectedly on the 1st the strange picture of January, day is the black, the moon/month is the purple. The Sun-Moon connection, complements each other fresh splendor. Di Tian terrifying the extremely imposing manner unexpectedly is at an exceptional pace was selecting for promotion. In a sky Wu Yun (black clouds) to the person as if must fall, felt entire earth crush to become Jifen generally.

Yan Shaozhe, Xian Lin'er and the others the complexion big change, this is now the first under heaven powerhouse Beast God aura! Di Tian, was this must whole-heartedly? By their strengths, really has the feeling of planting definitely is unable to contend with.

Old Xuan made the phenomenon that the sky presented actually happy not fear facing Di Tian, proudly float in midair, the body surrounding faint yellow flame also started becomes more and more powerful. Behind him, strange phantom appears slowly.

This phantom has not to have the body greatly, the chimera person surface, the head extremely. Dragon God nine child, gluttony! In Gluttonous Divine Bull that is the bloodlines of gluttony, finally had been initiated by Old Xuan.

Came under the influence of gluttony aura, Beast God in sky, the imposing manner weakened several points slightly. After all, the bloodlines strength of gluttony has the obvious suppressed effect to his Black Dragon bloodlines.

The previous time, is Old Mu and Old Xuan collaborates, stimulates the gluttony strength his seal. That time situation he still deeply remembers. But this time, he actually does not allow the same matter to occur again. He does not know the matter that Huo Yuhao handles how long also needs to complete, what to do if were completed by the process of seal in him?

Beast God coldly snorted, suddenly, under being a focus of public attention, this first under heaven powerhouse, actually kneels down toward Star Dou Forest direction on one knee now, appearance that in the hand the Black Dragon sword also counter- hand back after behind, unexpectedly is saluting . Moreover the courtesy very likely is the military salute in human army.

Is he doing?

All people have tarried, to have what to exist on this world is worth Di Tian kneeling down and bow respect with both hands clasped? This simply was too inconceivable.

Old Xuan similarly is also amazed, he is stimulating to movement the gluttony the aura to engage in factional strife to Di Tian, suppresses his Golden Eyed Black Dragon King aura. What is Di Tian making? Why he must kneel down and bow respect with both hands clasped in the Star Dou Forest direction. Does he have what other goals to be inadequate?

In this time, distant place, the color outbreak of sky strange change. That direction, is Star Dou Forest.

That side sky, does not have the omen turned into seven quietly colored, seven color halo circulations, just like must have the deity to arrive general.

These seven color halo one, are links the purple black fog that Di Tian releases to be exaggerated unexpectedly. Then Di Tian imposing manner had the earth-shaking change instantaneously.

His imposing manner is extremely overbearing, but comes under the influences of these seven color light clouds, the imposing manner of Di Tian whole person becomes is unexpectedly noble and dignified. When he stands up, the golden eye pupil turned into the silver, although the sword in hand has not changed, but around his body, in a kilometer range, suddenly presented silver has been similar to the domain general spatial variation.

What is this?

Let alone is Old Xuan, perhaps is the Shrek Academy all previous dynasties powerhouse comes back to life, does not recognize the strength that at this time Di Tian uses is anything.

Old Xuan can distinguish is only, this is not Di Tian my strength, but was he has replied on any strength. But, what he borrows is what?

In he is shocked, suddenly, a Tao heavenly power pressure drops from the clouds. Behind the Old Xuan huge gluttony form shivered unexpectedly fiercely, then transmits to the impulsion that Old Xuan it must lie prostrate in worship.

Is this impossible? This is the first thought in the Old Xuan heart having.

Initially, he and Old Mu worked as one, has suppressed Di Tian by the aura of gluttony. By Dragon God nine child dignity, making Golden Eyed Black Dragon King Di Tian have to concede on the bloodlines.

May at this moment, all as if in turn, be Dragon God nine child gluttonies, must prostrate oneself unexpectedly airborne Di Tian. Is this possible? Di Tian draws support, is actually what kind of strength Ah?

Change that this flickers, not only Old Xuan shock, Shrek City as well as Sun-Moon Empire army, all powerhouse also all shock changing colors of amazement.

Although they do not know between Old Xuan and Di Tian mutually the relations of restraint, but can also see from the Di Tian present appearance, this Beast God, can unexpectedly from Star Dou Forest with the aid of other strengths. This was really too fearful. Does Star Dou Forest have the powerhouse in hideaway or is the most precious object is inadequate?

Di Tian coldly looks at Old Xuan, in hand the Black Dragon sword holds up slowly excessively.

Old Xuan discovered that the earth element of having at one's command controlled, some trends of out-of-control, they are dreading suddenly, unexpectedly on the aura that dreading Di Tian lends at this time. As if lower position saw that superior is common.

dark attribute Di Tian, why can affect earth element Ah?

The heart of Old Xuan, sinks to the valley, he knows that oneself this time displays to swallow again, impossible seal Di Tian, but Beast God following strikes, inevitably is earth-shaking.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-563-part-1





Volume 12

#563 - The Masculine And Feminine Elements Is Supplementary, The Rain Goes Out Vast


“Beast God why loses one's temper, since you are look my, has the matter to come to me is. Huo Yuhao in this.”The clear and bright sound does not have the emergence of omen suddenly in the midair. This sound one sounds not to be big suddenly, but, in entire battlefield, Emperor Sun-Moon including hundred inside and outside ** camp, is actually everyone can clear hearing.

Huo Yuhao!

These three characters spread to everyone ear instantaneously. But listens in the ears of different person, to the feeling of person is actually entirely different.

The look dim Old Xuan, the double pupil suddenly greatly was bright, the body is burning the Soul Power flame is put out instantaneously, back gluttony also along with it disappearance.

Restored Gluttonous Divine Bull Martial Soul him, instead comes under the influence of Di Tian to be much smaller.

Similarly is this name, listens in the Ju Zi(orange) ear of distant place, was another type feels. She only knows that originally Beast God Di Tian comes looks for Huo Yuhao unexpectedly, but Huo Yuhao, unexpectedly really in Shrek City. Suddenly, in her heart is also five senses mixed Chen, all wisdom, as if after hearing this name, has vanished into thin air.

green jade light dodges, the form skyrockets from Shrek City together. The aquamarine gloss ascends to heaven instantaneously. Facing the terrifying power and influence on Di Tian sending out, is actually similar to does not have the thing to be ordinary.

The light shadow twinkle, green jade light arrived airborne, stagnates side Old Xuan. This comes the person, is not just Huo Yuhao?

This time Huo Yuhao, dark blue Extreme Ice Battle God Armor takes possession, but in the armor, actually sends out the light deep blue colored light to be dizzy. He arrives at side Old Xuan, Old Xuan felt that pressure one light, was divided half by Huo Yuhao suddenly.

Old Xuan pleasantly surprised inexplicable looks at Huo Yuhao. Asked in a low voice: “Succeeded?”

“Um.”Huo Yuhao has selected under.

Old Xuan laughs, said: “Good, good and good! This was really good. Di Tian, do not see Yuhao? Yuhao in this.”

The Beast God Di Tian complexion also slightly changes, looks at Huo Yuhao, in his eyes reveals the surprised uncertain color. He discovered surprised that he could not completely understand unexpectedly again this young people, could not see his cultivating to be what kind of degree.

“The Di Tian senior, has been well since last meeting. Has a thing I to give back to you. Thank your years aid.”At the same time was saying, the Huo Yuhao wrist|skill shakes. Shoots to go toward the Di Tian electricity together.

The Di Tian right hand in airborne one move, imposing manner also weakened several points.

Does not need to look with the eye that he also knows the one who falls into oneself palm is anything. Initially he had given Huo Yuhao, is used for the seal and observes Huo Yuhao when necessary, Black Dragon Reverse Scale.

He can actually let my Black Dragon Reverse Scale exsomatize, what does this mean? Means him at least once in the flash. Own strength has been and my similar level can achieve.

Limit Douluo? No, this is how possible. Soon before, I also felt that his cultivating is unable to break through before Titled Douluo for the stagnation! Does he possibly in such a short time become Limit Douluo?

Ju Zi(orange) in the distant place looks that questioned similarly appears in her heart.

The previous time in the Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace sees Huo Yuhao, she felt that by that time she is very formidable. Even but if, is formidable. Does not have to this degree formidable! When he, can actually in Limit Douluo facing existence that in the battlefield of present age first powerhouse happy does not fear. Moreover Beast God. As if became because of his appearance anxious.

On the Huo Yuhao face the look is very tranquil, light looks at Beast God, nods the head to him slightly expresses best wishes.

“You can actually work loose my Reverse Scale, if I have not guessed that wrong, that had a possibility.”Beast God Di Tian after short shock, already gradually calm.

Huo Yuhao shoves open own surface armor, gives a calm smile. Said: “Beast God, but dares to fight otherwise?”

What?

Hears these words. Shrek, is that side Sun-Moon Empire, all people are all shocked. Knew that the Huo Yuhao person are quite many, but hears him to challenge Beast God unexpectedly, present age first powerhouse Beast God. Suddenly, all knew that his person petrified.

He how old? What is he cultivates is? Why does he challenge Beast God Ah? this is not courts death?

Still made in behind that they were shocked, Beast God Di Tian unexpectedly nod toward Huo Yuhao, in the hand the Black Dragon sword pointed at Huo Yuhao, “good, made me have a look, you comprehended anything.”

In the Huo Yuhao double pupil, the ray glitters. In an eye pupil, golden light is deep, in another eye pupil, sent out the blue halo unexpectedly.

At this moment, in his heart has been full of confidence, he does not know, present formidable to what kind of degree.

Yes, he succeeded. With the help of all partners, with the help of Old Mu, he succeeded.

......

“Ice Spirit fusion!”

“Bang”

When the thought of Snow Emperor spreads to the next quarter in Huo Yuhao heart, he only thought that the whole person as if by irrelevant to shatter that a terrifying strength exploded.

In that flash, he cannot feel existence of oneself mind Soul Nucleus and body completely, as if all changed into the blank.

This feeling does not know how long has continued, he gradually had the consciousness.

An extremely familiar strength is wrapping his mind Soul Nucleus, but mind Soul Nucleus itself, presented many close fissures unexpectedly.

Existence of this strength, makes it not have real to shatter, at this time is healing at the extremely quick speed voluntarily.

Strange strengths transmit unceasingly, the fountainhead of strength came from own body. When Huo Yuhao looks again, he discovered that all of oneself within the body as if had the change.

The chest place, glittering and translucent carving Bai Se (White Color) Soul Nucleus is revolving quietly, its volume even be bigger than mind Soul Nucleus, but in this Soul Nucleus, the person's shadow is glittering unexpectedly.

This is......

Snow Emperor?

Huo Yuhao has recognized quickly that form identity, in that Soul Nucleus, is not just Snow Emperor?

Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion Torso Bone ray also already completely dim, at this moment, his skeleton presents after completely by Dragon Pill moistens the golden color. The Ice Emperor aura becomes extremely weak, even several inaudible.

Huo Yuhao does not know that had anything, but at this time, he actually discovered that oneself did not have the means and Snow Emperor and Ice Emperor even is Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White) as well as Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass they communicates. Mermaid Princess Li Ya also fell into the deep sleep.

“Brother Daydream!”Huo Yuhao sobers finally, has recognized regarding around that strength in own mind Soul Nucleus, that clearly is Daydream Ice Silkworm!

His summon, as if made Daydream Ice Silkworm sober, that marvelous strength along with it depreciation, Daydream Ice Silkworm changed into one group of rays, sifted in his spiritual sea, was hidden does not see.

Hence, six big spirits, lost the contact unexpectedly completely.

Two Soul Nucleus, mind Soul Nucleus turned into the bright color golden color, Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus of chest place is glittering and translucent carving Bai Se (White Color).

Two big Soul Nucleus are revolving in the opposite direction, but the strength that they release blends at the central point. That place, became Huo Yuhao all strengths. Small whirlpools produce after the strength collisions of two big Soul Nucleus, change over to his meridians, these pure compression Soul Power and Spiritual Power, at the extremely quick speed, are patching Huo Yuhao even to be able with the body that broken described.

Sword of Life is lending rich life aura, is infiltrating the body of Huo Yuhao naturally. At this moment, just like freshman.

......

The memory dodges to pass in the mind, in fact, Huo Yuhao do not know how he succeeds. Six big spirit complete deep sleep, he even wants to look for one to ask that now cannot achieve. He only knows that he has succeeded, can guess, for own success, six big spirits has certainly paid the huge price.

After his fully recovers, he saw abscission Black Dragon Reverse Scale, felt above the upper air, Beast God Di Tian!

Therefore, he came out, he arrived here, facing Beast God, at this moment, he fearless fearless.

The Huo Yuhao personal appearance dodges, left side Old Xuan, when the personal appearance dodges again, is about dozens li (0.5km), has been separated from the Shrek City category.

Beast God Di Tian coldly snorted, void, one step steps forward, detained before the Huo Yuhao body. In the hand the Black Dragon sword mentioned, in an instant, world discoloration. The thought of as if entire world controls for him, has extruded the past to Huo Yuhao crazily.

Huo Yuhao presses down surface armor on oneself face, in Extreme Ice Battle God Armor bursts out the blue halo, a handle short blade edge appears during he grasps. The arm raises side the body, from that short blade edge, is four chi (0.33 m) blue blade glow suddenly bright, above that blade glow, really also has light mist.

The sky has as if stagnated suddenly, that Absolute chill in the air, even if in dozens inside and outside Sun-Moon Empire army military compounds can the clear feeling.

The Di Tian eye pupil contracts suddenly, in hand Black Dragon sword already not gaudy divided to cut toward Huo Yuhao.

Purple black sword glow cuts instantaneously void, a huge fissure, directly soars the Huo Yuhao overhead to divide to fall.

This may, not only the dark strength, has the space strength. Fuses own dark attribute and Space Power, this is the Beast God deep meaning. But in this moment, why does not know, he strength that replied from Star Dou Forest has been similar to the tide removed before unexpectedly generally.

Huo Yuhao has not fended, in the hand the short blade edge brings the blade glow, is moved forward to meet somebody toward the Di Tian sword glow unexpectedly. Before that is, strength that Old Xuan is unable to contend with directly!

The screams, behind resound in Old Xuan, Yan Shaozhe, Xian Lin'er and the others arrived at side Old Xuan.

When Huo Yuhao presented challenge to Beast God Di Tian, each of them was scared, they were not fully correct completely, Huo Yuhao this was must do. Can challenge Beast God by his strength?

“Bites!”Clear resounding from airborne transmits. Strange appeared.( To be continued. If you like this work, welcome you to cast the recommendation ticket and monthly ticket, your support, is I biggest power.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-563-part-2





Volume 12

#563 - The Masculine And Feminine Elements Is Supplementary, Under The Rain Goes Out Vast


The black slit that in the sky, that splits suddenly, has covered a misty white gloss unexpectedly, all belongs to the space strength, was isolated unexpectedly instantaneously. It looks like the opening that splits is stucked, is unable to burst out its strength again outward.

The body of Huo Yuhao from the sky flies upside down kilometer, stabilizes lives in own personal appearance. But he was so is stable. But on Beast God Di Tian, has actually covered incorruptible. The body shakes, these incorruptible changes into the fragment to drop downward. To the ground, concentrates not to be loose.

Yes, Huo Yuhao fell on leeward, compared with Beast God, he also appeared immature. But, each observing subconsciously has covered own mouth. What did they see? Saw a 20-year-old humanity, has blocked Beast God unexpectedly directly strikes.

Di Tian brow tight wrinkle, nobody felt to this collision him a moment ago is more profound. Body surface incorruptible, although to shatter. But, he can feel clearly that the speed of oneself bloodlines circulation slowed down obviously several points, this is that Absolute creates coldly.

He can actually block my space force, and feeds back Absolute Ice to me on?

Huo Yuhao does not feel better similarly, his body is glittering the purple black light mark, the deep blue colored light that but in Extreme Ice Battle God Armor releases faints, these purplish black colored light marks get down quickly dimly. Has the mask of this Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, nobody knows that he now is any condition.

light shadow dodges, Huo Yuhao vanished suddenly baseless. Even if before is, has locked his Beast God to feel in the air to twist slightly, Huo Yuhao got rid of his locking.

The Di Tian look became sinks to congeal. He knows that he to the judgment of Huo Yuhao, was eventually more defective.

This young people, imagine him are much more formidable.

He, really success.

Right. Was definitely successful. Otherwise, takes him also cultivating of Limit Douluo as, why also to resist that to strike a moment ago.

Yin-Yang Supplement, he by the body of humanity. Has completed Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus unexpectedly. It is not good. In any event, cannot make him continue to go forward again. Otherwise. Future he, becomes completely will not be steerable.

Beast God takes a deep breath, in the hand the Black Dragon sword holds up once more slowly, then he has closed his eye pupil. In his heart has not killed intent. Because he will not strike to kill Huo Yuhao, but, he must take away this boy today in any event, imprisons in Star Dou Forest. Strength that disintegrates have his, forever keeps Star Dou his person and Power of Destiny.

When the Huo Yuhao body appears again, already airborne behind Di Tian. On Extreme Ice Battle God Armor bursts out the enchanting blue tail flame instantaneously, instantaneous acceleration. Made him one stretch across ten li (0.5km) distance. Became approaches Sun-Moon Empire army direction.

“It is not good!”Ju Zi(orange) calls out in alarm one, shouted to clear the way loud: “All Soul Guidance Array preparations.”

Yes, she must prepare. Huo Yuhao flies toward here, without doubt wants source of trouble Tungyin. He not collision tape of destruction to Shrek. But will bring certainly to the Sun-Moon Empire army.

Huo Yuhao can shoulder Beast God to strike, even if not Limit Douluo cultivates is, perhaps is also extremely close, but that Beast God Di Tian, is the present age first powerhouse, among them the collision, how ruinous disaster Ah? the army will bring to one's own side

Di Tian is somewhat strange, he has not pursued, but stands in same place, in the hand the Black Dragon sword is grasping as before single-handed, looked like the whole person coagulates there has resembled.

Huo Yuhao is still actually running. Dozens li (0.5km) distance, to his present cultivating is, but is several sprints. Sun-Moon Empire army, already under foot.

Illusory light shadow sends out suddenly from Huo Yuhao, his personal appearance also vanishes to disappear, displaces, is a halo of piece of distortion.

Spiritual Disturbance domain. Disturbs under not to have anybody to catch his exact location.

The attack of Soul Guidance Array place, in this case does not have possibly immediately to erupt. Only can look helplessly. All Surveying Soul Guidance Device powers have arrived in a big way, to seek for the Huo Yuhao form.

In this time, Beast God was moving suddenly, his movement is succinct and graceful, in airborne personal appearance half revolution, in hand Black Dragon sword by formerly gripped to turn into both hands single-handed. Great sword startled day. The purple black sword glow in airborne dodges to pass together.

What strange is, seems Beast God whole-heartedly sends out strikes, after cutting into airborne, vanishes to disappear unexpectedly.

The entire sky therefore twisted, but originally by the earth that the purple black cloud cluster covers, will shortly return to normal. The sunlight shines the earth once more, but, all people actually cannot feel warm.

Old Xuan only thought own heart leaked instantaneously jumps has patted. But cuts Beast God of this sword, regained formerly the tranquil condition, but, he had turned around, looks at the direction of Sun-Moon Empire big camp.

Huo Yuhao appeared, but, he presents again time, already not in midair, but in ground. In the Sun-Moon Empire military compound.

He stands in the ground silently, he as if also felt anything, both hands grasped to stop the short blade edge, the whole person became solemn and respectful.

The surrounding Sun-Moon Empire soldier has discovered his existence immediately, but, actually nobody dares to clash to attack him. Even if some Soul Engineer does not dare.

Can with existence that Beast God Di Tian contends with, can it be that can they contend? Nobody is a fool.

Is centered on the body of Huo Yuhao, in a diameter kilometer range, the temperature plummets instantaneously. His whole person Extreme Ice Battle God Armor of turned into the blue color completely. In the hand Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife is sending out the magnificent brilliance.

In Bai Se (White Color) Bing Wu (ice mist), the cold current surges. Huo Yuhao behind, the form also slowly reappeared together.

This form has a bright golden color long hair, silently float in Huo Yuhao behind, in a eyes pupil, is having the light happy expression, has the different colors. An eye pupil is the black, an eye pupil is Bai Se (White Color).

“Hey!”Morning Dew Knife in Huo Yuhao hand makes the movement that in selects suddenly.

This movement is very brief, is powerful.

But the order of Ju Zi(orange) also spreads over the army in the previous quarter, “all Soul Guidance Array places, linkage Defensive Soul Guidance Device, opening, does not hesitate all fully.”

Also luckily Sun-Moon Empire. All Soul Engineer already prepared for started Soul Guidance Array place, the linkage defends Assault Soul Guidance Device and Defensive Soul Guidance Device has imitated can finish.

Through amplifying Soul Guidance Device and subpoenaed the order that Soul Guidance Device issued, first was implemented.

Rapid opening of enchanting light barrier in military compound, is covering a piece by piece giant region.

Also at this moment. Before Huo Yuhao body. It seems a common fissure quietly appears together. From that fissure, purple light dodges to pass together.

In the Huo Yuhao hand Morning Dew Knife, happen to selects above that purple.

“Bites”

The clear sound resounds. The Huo Yuhao whole body such as was been common by the thunder stroke, fierce dither. Terrifying knockout strength. Spreads to his whole body each corner instantaneously.

In that flash, Yin-Yang Supplement two Soul Nucleus of his within the body as if stagnated. The thought of his whole person also stagnates.

“Buzz”Morning Dew Knife sends out clear and melodious buzz cry, knife edge fierce shivers, was trembles unexpectedly the remnant shade.

On Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, ripples dark blue small eddy currents, is centered on the body of Huo Yuhao, the earth starts slight shivering. Small eddy currents unceasing drops from Huo Yuhao Extreme Ice Battle God Armor in the place, spreads toward the surroundings.

But Huo Yuhao, what feels was within the body all as if stagnated, then is being conducted into the terrifying power in within the body to tear by the Black Dragon sword. As if must oneself thoroughly smashing.

This feeling is uncomfortable, even incomparable terror.

Behind him, two groups of light shadow appear slowly.

These two groups of light shadow seem actually very much thinks with light shadow that beforehand Beast God Di Tian behind presents, was on the 1st in January, stated differently, Di Tian was black sun purple moon, but Sun-Moon that behind Huo Yuhao raised, day was the bright golden color, but the moon/month was the brilliant blue color. gold sun blue moon.

After they appear, Huo Yuhao within the body also naturally presented a strange strength, this strength looks like the bond is ordinary, combines spaces that his within the body was divided.

Di Tian looks in distant airborne, if he a moment ago were also only the guess, he completely has affirmed now.

Sun-Moon phenomenon, Yin-Yang Supplement. He has built Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus unexpectedly. Miracle that the achievement humanity the achievement had not always crossed.

Even if it, felt a fear. This young people, speed of growth was really too quick. Although Di Tian does not think Huo Yuhao can through condensing third Soul Nucleus in the future becomes Limit Douluo. But even if present he, made Di Tian feel a threat, this regarding Di Tian, cannot allow to exist absolutely.

In the Di Tian heart sighed, in the Sun-Moon Empire army camp also had the change of terror.

Releases that small vortex that falls from Huo Yuhao, after landing, at an exceptional pace outward extends instantaneously, but in process that extends, they rise suddenly simply against the wind, change into giant tornado, wreaks havoc to the surroundings.

The colors of these tornado are the dark blues, said accurately that is the black and blue entanglement and blending.

This inside has to belong to Huo Yuhao Absolute Ice, there is Di Tian dark attribute. Ice Dragon of volume darkness.

The collision of Huo Yuhao and Di Tian, has formed so terrifying one.

In all tents from kilometer range shortly will be assimilated the dark blue recently, then quietly to shatter, changes into the powder powder. Regardless in the tent has any thing, finally is the same.

---------------------------------------------------

Told everybody a good news, it is expected that in early November, our Tang Sect shop must open officially. Will have our Tang Sect books and cartoons to sell, will also have the peripheral product to bestow and sell to everybody.

Later wants to buy the signature book, no longer difficult. Later every month we will promote some signature books to give everybody. The fine peripheral product is manufacturing in Taiwan. When the time comes the first batch simultaneously will meet with everybody.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-563-part-3





Volume 12

#564 - The Beastly Downcast Escapes, On Holy Ghost Bloodshed


The Sun-Moon Empire army pitches camp in fact very much to have tasteful, each stretch of camp regarding Soul Guidance Array place. In this case, when suffers the powerful offensive, the linkage defense of Soul Guidance Array place can protect the camp, is insufficient to be sneak attacked.

When that dark blue tornado expands outward, quick has bumped into the linkage defense guard shield. The nearest four linkage defense guard shields almost turned into the dark blue in the time that several times breathed. Although has not looked like these tent instantaneous to shatter. But internal energy consumption is also straight line suddenly to increase.

Each Soul Guidance Array in Soul Engineer, hurry whole-heartedly pours into Soul Guidance Array Soul Power. They look is very clear, if makes that dark blue tornado enter the Soul Guidance Array place, takes to them, inevitably is the ruinous disaster.

Huo Yuhao has stopped for ten several seconds, restored the ability of motion, the body slightly in a flash, but immediately came to a stop the personal appearance.

When looks at airborne Di Tian again, in the eye pupil completely is the color of fear.

After this breakthrough, had second Soul Nucleus him, in own Soul Power feeling, just did not break through the feeling of Titled Douluo absolutely, the Huo Yuhao self- judgment, oneself at least had 92 levels to 90 third-level Soul Power. Moreover, because Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus completes, his Soul Power had the qualitative change, each Soul Power after compression, perfect integration of Absolute Ice and Spiritual Power. Two big Martial Soul as if again also make no distinctions, does not need specially desirably controls can be the degree of perfect union.

Huo Yuhao self-examined that own strength must surpass ordinary Transcendent Douluo absolutely, in the meantime, don't forget, on him also had Extreme Ice Battle God Armor!

This present age strongest Humanoid Soul Guidance Device is huge to his amplification. After this breakthrough, he also finally can control Extreme Ice Battle God Armor completely cannot completely, as well as Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife some abilities. This is he dares to challenge Di Tian background.

However. After he really and Beast God collides, Huo Yuhao profound understanding, present age the reputation of first powerhouse is not Bai Jiao. Beast God Di Tian of strength, but also by far above he judges.

Did not say other. A moment ago this struck. After striking. If Di Tian pursues to continue to attack again, he died.

Naturally. Old Xuan also in looks at Di Tian that the one side eyes covetously, once Di Tian takes an action, he will not stand by. But this has also proven, strength between Huo Yuhao and Di Tian. Also has the insurmountable disparity.

At his age, can keep off Di Tian to strike, has been good enough to make one feel proud, but regarding Huo Yuhao, he thinks also insufficient, but also is far from enough.

Some respites, Huo Yuhao is staring at airborne Di Tian slightly. In the hand Morning Dew Knife holds up slowly. Within the body Soul Power pours into to Morning Dew Knife in unceasingly, returns to his body again, in the air all and cold related element, feeds back oneself instantaneously.

Although the help of few big spirit. But Morning Dew Knife has actually made up for this point, feels its might truly, Huo Yuhao knows that this Divine Tool is fearful. If were not Morning Dew Knife and Extreme Ice Battle God Armor melted Di Tian that to strike at least over 70% strengths for him a moment ago, he also similarly must be finished. Di Tian mixed the terrorist attack of darkness and space, so is easy to contend?

“Bang and bang!”

Two linkage defense guard shields are almost simultaneously to shatter, that two Soul Guidance Array in all, were swallowed by the dark blue tornado.

Must know that this at least is 50,000 soldiers! Moreover there are two Soul Guidance Array places, with several hundred Soul Engineer.

However, has impediments of these Soul Guidance Protective Cover luckily, the surplus dark blue tornado gradually vanish and are defeated and dispersed.

Why Huo Yuhao has not continued to attack in doubts Di Tian, suddenly, a strange strength emits from the Sun-Moon Empire big camp quietly.

That is together the dark red ray, is very slender, but is very long. It in two Soul Guidance Array suddenly destroyed next one flickers the appearance, the flash when it presents, this dark red slender ray from the sky stops.

Indistinct within as if can see, some innumerable ferocious Wraith Soul, have been full of the frightened soul, as well as its crazy speed condensed the past toward that dark red ray. That dark red ray unceasingly is also inflating at the naked eye obvious speed. From the sky turned into a handle lance.

“Um?”The Beast God Di Tian complexion concentrates, vision looked to that dark red lance.

Huo Yuhao also similarly looked to that lance. By his formidable Spiritual Detection, naturally can feel, that handle lance direction, impressively airborne Beast God Di Tian.

Meanwhile, hides in the big camp Core Area territory, biggest Soul Guidance Array Ju Zi(orange), coldly [say / way]: “Attack, concentrated fire power, Beast God Di Tian! Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp preparation.”

Rays, startled day from the Sun-Moon Empire big camp, changes into the purest glare, directly soars the airborne Beast God Di Tian concentrated fire to go.

This, what has been shocked first is the Shrek Academy powerhouses, they will think how clearly, why Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp will not attack Beast God. Isn't this looks for trouble to oneself? Does Sun-Moon Empire have facing the noble character that Soul Beast shares a common hatred? Is impossible. This is not the Sun-Moon Empire style!

Naturally is impossible, Ju Zi(orange) coax Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master Zongli Wu to start from the beginning, orders all Soul Engineer Corp to get rid to the present, in view of Beast God Di Tian, but is not Huo Yuhao. The reason has one. That to help Huo Yuhao!

Ju Zi(orange) had not planned must attack Shrek Academy, since previous Huo Yuhao returns the son to her, in her heart, the revenge is not on this world she thinks the matter of primary importance. For her, most important has two men, one is son Xu Yunhan, another, naturally is......

Therefore, when Huo Yuhao suddenly appears in the battlefield, Ju Zi(orange) has made the decision. She was not getting rid anxiously, plans should better to let Beast God Di Tian and a Holy Spirit Cult powerhouse is mutually wounded best. But now she could not attend. A moment ago Di Tian to Huo Yuhao cut that sword the time, she only thought that her heart must jump from the chest. That feeling, is not wonderful!

At this time she does not have any hesitant immediately has issued the order of attack, for does not make Di Tian attack Huo Yuhao again.

Naturally, can see this thoughts, the audience links a person not to have. Even if Huo Yuhao of authority cannot. Because nobody thinks that Sun-Moon Empire commander for a man, will handle such matter unexpectedly. Moreover Ju Zi(orange) issues in time time of order is very ingenious, happen to while Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master gets rid, this quite therefore is coordinating with the Holy Spirit Cult aspect, nobody can say a non- character absolutely.

Reason that Beast God Di Tian has not continued to attack Huo Yuhao, one is because Old Xuan eyes covetously in the one side, another is also because his present thoughts a little are also chaotic, how cannot find out to come facing Huo Yuhao. Kills, cannot kill. Words that stresses, is very difficult.

After Huo Yuhao has the Yin-Yang has balanced second Soul Nucleus, in addition Shrek Academy these powerhouses, he want to seize Huo Yuhao, the difficulty was big. Cannot hit, Huo Yuhao can also run. The Shrek Academy powerhouse is numerous, in addition Limit Douluo Old Xuan. Di Tian has not grasped can seize Huo Yuhao.

In his scruple free time, Sun-Moon Empire Soul Guidance Device attacked.

Di Tian coldly snorted, the big hand wields, the front are many immediately together black light, this black light looks like enlarged together dragon scales, above edges and corners were distinct, have blocked these concentrated fire, but to linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device.

However, blocks is actually only flash.

The jet black scale has stagnated slightly, on the facial features solemn Di Tian face revealed an amazed color. He instantaneously same place was disappearing. Ten several rays pass through, behind him void smashing that rips.

Di Tian reappears beyond several hundred meters, the complexion became very ugly, he cannot find out, the attacks of these humanity unexpectedly so will be why formidable, to has surpassed his judgment formidable. Actually is that what strength? The energy total quantity has far exceeded his strength. This was too fearful. Is ordinary humanity, or human Soul Master unites in together, can send out such strength?

Initially to Shrek City started beast tide time, Di Tian had experienced the Soul Guidance Device destructive power. At that time although he had to be vigilant, but in his opinion, these Soul Guidance Device might were too small.

But these time is different. These Soul Guidance Device might, distinct can threaten his safety. This was too fearful. Such weapon exists, means that Star Dou Forest may be hit by the total destruction anytime!

The glare that linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device projects has not vanished, but sweeps away instantaneously, ten several glares pursue the Beast God personal appearance to sweep, but. Forcefully attack.

This opportunity Huo Yuhao will not let off, naturally, his does not let off is not attacks Di Tian, but quickly runs.

The personal appearance dodges, he went into hiding in the air, has been separated from Emperor Sun-Moon rapidly ** camp range.

He also has communicated meanwhile the Shrek Academy people through Spiritual Power, relies on Spiritual Detection and Sharing to help everybody run away in the Shrek City direction together.

Can ruin two Soul Guidance Array places with the aid of the Di Tian strength, Huo Yuhao was well satisfied. That quite therefore entire Sun-Moon Empire army 1/10 strengths.

Moreover, Beast God and Sun-Moon Empire hit, this good deed, they look in the distant place quite well.

The linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device destructive power was too strong, if were hit, will not have anything to affect to Di Tian, but these several linkage attacks, if all falls on the body, even if by its Golden Eyed Black Dragon King body and spirit, somewhat cannot withstand!

-----------------------------------------------

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-564-part-1





Volume 12

#564 - The Beastly Downcast Escapes, In Holy Ghost Bloodshed


Therefore, the Di Tian personal appearance from the sky glitters unceasingly, passes itself to avoid the attacks of these linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device to the control of Space Power. The watermark advertisement test watermark advertisement test simultaneously, the Black Dragon sword in his hand also lifted.

These hateful humanity, dare to attack me unexpectedly, that makes them pay the price.

In this time, suddenly, a sad and shrill severe howl is resounding, the dark red ray in airborne dodges to pass.

When this dark red ray vanishes, the sky suddenly changed, turned into red, is ordinary just like the scarlet sea, the red cloud surges.

The Di Tian look concentrates, he one step steps forward, actually cannot escape once more into the space. His surprised discovery, the surrounding space was blocked unexpectedly. He is unable to act willfully through the breakthrough space barrier unexpectedly again.

Is free time of this stop, that several linkage attacks have swept.

Di Tian after is Di Tian, while amazed, he immediately has also made dealing. In the hand the Black Dragon sword sweeps away, stiffly cuts forcefully one side space. Swallowed over two-thirds linkage attacks actually. But another one-third swept on him.

black sun purple moon appears behind him suddenly, the body of Di Tian in airborne has stopped slightly, that several linkage attacks have swept, his aura actually instantaneously becomes powerful. In a eyes pupil golden light puts greatly, obviously, this Beast God had been enraged.

Magnanimous //3.

But also at this moment, wipes dark red not to have the emergence of omen suddenly before him, direct thorn to his chest.

That is a handle monster different scarlet lance, its color looks like has the blood to drop. Red infiltration person, red fearfulness. What is more terrifying, it in appearing the flash, around the Di Tian body turned into a piece of bloodshed, is coagulating his body. To fend is unable to achieve.

Was it has sealed up the space! Di Tian first understood. But this red lance comes is really too sudden, but Di Tian just by linkage attack hit, in this case, that red lance already stabbing maliciously in his front.

The Di Tian body wants hard many compared with any rare metal. By stabbing at the same time. In his mouth exudes one to drink severely, the Black Dragon sword sweeps away.

In grating fricative. The scarlet lance was cut two, but front actually suddenly drills into Di Tian within the body. The innumerable sad and shrill pitiful yell sounds from the sky reverberate. Bloodshed crazy has swallowed toward Di Tian. The linkage attack finally has also stopped at this time. The attack of this intensity cannot continue one time too for a long time, will otherwise present Soul Guidance Device to be overheated, even damages. However. Their functions obviously displayed was enough. That scarlet lance is can truly heavy wound Beast God strikes.

The body of Di Tian from the sky shivered, in the hand the Black Dragon sword angry cuts in the following direction.

The bloodshed by ripping open stiffly, in the long dragon roar sound, in the Sun-Moon Empire big camp, a linkage defense guard shield instantaneous crack of Soul Guidance Array place, the purple black sword glow was dodged together to pass, falls to a tent.

The blood light emits from that tent together instantaneously. Swallows the sword glow.

In the tent, altogether 12 sit cross-legged to sit there Evil Soul Master, four people simultaneously spout a blood. Sits in the Zongli Wu complexion of first place is also one white.

The Di Tian severe howl spreads over hundred li (0.5km), in the hand the Black Dragon sword in airborne cuts once more. Stiffly has ripped open a space crack in the bloodshed once again, he clearly is knowing unexpectedly space already in blocked situation, escapes as before into that space crack, vanishes does not see.

The bloodshed surges, from the sky paces back and forth. But after a while, it likely had not actually found her goal, was defeated and dispersed gradually voluntarily.

The Zongli Wu complexion is somewhat ugly, “did this also make him run unexpectedly? However, in him the bloodshed Wraith Soul lance, received heavy wound surely. Follows me, goes to Star Dou Forest.”At the same time was saying, he sets out rapidly, bringing audiences Evil Soul Master to run out of the tent, goes in the Star Dou Forest direction.

By Zongli Wu their strengths, even if 12 people collaborates, is unlikely to injure to existence of Beast God Di Tian this level. However, that struck a moment ago, not only actually their these Evil Soul Master strengths, but also borrowed several thousand new dead Wraith Soul, burns these souls thus to change into the bloodshed Wraith Soul lance, the instantaneous closed room, has given Di Tian numerous strikes. Although is not the bloodshed Wraith Soul lance submerges Di Tian within the body completely, but the part has completed the breakthrough, these terrors resentment crazy wreaks havoc in within the body, until swallows it thoroughly.

Therefore Zongli Wu so will be anxious. If can massacre Beast God Di Tian, then, Holy Spirit Cult can keep off nobody, he also becomes first under heaven powerhouse who replaces Di Tian!

Huo Yuhao and Old Xuan and the others have looked at this, is relaxed. Beast God walked finally. At least temporarily will again not threaten the Huo Yuhao safety.

Huo Yuhao lifts oneself Extreme Ice Battle God Armor mask, Old Xuan then sees, his complexion paleness.

“!”In the Huo Yuhao mouth spouted a blood, the body shook shaking, has not sat under supporting of Old Xuan falls to the ground.

“We went back to say first again.”A Old Xuan hand is supporting by the arm Huo Yuhao, stimulates to movement Soul Power, goes in the Shrek City direction. Yan Shaozhe and the others followed.

A moment ago this war, was really thrilling extremely. Meanwhile, made them see the terrifying strength of Sun-Moon Empire army truly.

Even if cultivating of Beast God Di Tian this level is, when facing linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device, will suffer unexpectedly also a loss. Moreover Sun-Moon Empire also has existence of Holy Spirit Cult, Holy Spirit Cult injured Beast God unexpectedly, making him have to retreat.

Huo Yuhao just broke through the exhilaration that second Soul Nucleus brings not to release with enough time, the heart of people becomes heavy.

Old Xuan brought Huo Yuhao to return to Sea God Pavilion directly. Before Golden Tree, Huo Yuhao routine knees down, has done obeisance to Golden Tree.

“Teacher, many thanks your helping, I finally broke through, has completed second Soul Nucleus. You could rest assured that I well protect certainly Shrek, does not make Sun-Moon Empire destroy Academy.”

Old Xuan stands side Huo Yuhao, do not go excessively. He knows certainly that Old Mu could not hear the Huo Yuhao sound again. Is he cruel enough to tell Huo Yuhao the truth?

After Huo Yuhao has done obeisance, this talent and Old Xuan same place, return to Sea God Pavilion.

“Are you what kind of?”Old Xuan asked. Huo Yuhao also had second Soul Nucleus now, the way of but cultivating and he is entirely different. Did not have the means to search to observe his physical state through Soul Power including Old Xuan.

Huo Yuhao said: “I am all right, because resisted Beast God formerly that to strike, the body received the shake of certain extent. However the self- repair capability of my body as if compared with before, should quick good.”

Old Xuan nodded, said: “That is good. Congratulates you, Yuhao. You had second Soul Nucleus finally. Moreover is Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus. Believes, soon, you can surpass me, becomes our Academy first powerhouse, even has to challenge the Beast God strength. Di Tian should be felt that you must break through, therefore asks you to trouble. Went against luckily. This Beast God also is very troublesome, I saw a moment ago that one crowd of Evil Soul Master in the Star Dou Forest direction. Di Tian should the injury be heavy, they are hunt and kill Di Tian.”

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth place appears to wipe to sneer, “these Evil Soul Master really overreach oneself. Hunts and kills Beast God, owes they to think.”

Nod of Old Xuan deep to be so, said: “Star Dou Forest, not only Di Tian, Jade Swan, Bear Ruler, Myriad Monster King and other powerhouses, these Evil Soul Master are not necessarily able to flatter.”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “The Jade Woman senior they could not perhaps have blocked these Evil Soul Master. These Evil Soul Master collective reassignment strengths, before should absorb, dies under me and Di Tian collision complementary waves the souls of these soldiers, this severe wound Di Tian. Their such strengths, at least have Evil Soul Master of book title Transcendent Douluo level to exist. However, perhaps they cannot think that Beast God injury they have not imagined are so serious.”

“?”Old Xuan somewhat surprised looks at Huo Yuhao, “isn't serious? But how I felt that strikes very fearfully.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Is very fearful. That strikes to flood the resentment that several thousand Wraith Soul combustion souls are having, has the extremely powerful destructiveness. However, Di Tian is also has Yin-Yang to balance Dual Soul Nucleus, has this Dual Soul Nucleus, he is very difficult to receive heavy wound.”

Old Xuan curious [say / way]: “Says quickly, your this Yin-Yang balance Dual Soul Nucleus, actually to have what marvelous place?”

Huo Yuhao said: “After Yin-Yang balances Dual Soul Nucleus forms, two Soul Nucleus strengths each other will blend, or after collides mutually, combines, baptism and concentration my own strength, enabling my own Soul Power simultaneously to have Spiritual Power and Absolute Ice characteristics. Meanwhile, brand-new Soul Power that produces also became the swirl. Soul Power of this swirl inevitably is Spiritual Power and Soul Power assembly. Has the greatly strengthened destructiveness. Also compressed Absolute Soul Power. I can feel, after I break through, before my present Soul Power total quantity at least is three times. Moreover, after is the compression. Battle efficiency compared with before least five times.”

The brand-new Soul Power that “Yin-Yang Supplement produces, has the greatly strengthened resistance regarding any external strength. Although that resentment is powerful, but I believe that finishes these many years Yin-Yang to balance Soul Power by Di Tian, melts is not a problem. Let alone he is primarily dark attribute. Is injured is inevitable, but injury absolutely does not have Evil Soul Master to think heavily. In these Evil Soul Master thorough Star Dou Forest, does right in the Beast God domain and Beast God. Will not have any good end.”

Magnanimous

Listened to a Huo Yuhao such saying, Old Xuan also to hold breath cold air, yes, the Beast God strength, contended by the Soul Master level, was really not easy!

Sought the monthly ticket and recommendation vote support.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-564-part-2





Volume 12

#564 - The Beastly Downcast Escapes, Under Holy Ghost Bloodshed


Although along with the development of Soul Guidance Device, the Soul Engineer status continually is promoting, even must substitute for the Soul Master direction to develop toward the future. The powerhouse of watermark advertisement test watermark advertisement test but truly most top, still stood in the apex of Pyramid.

For example Beast God, regardless of facing many Soul Engineer, if Beast God is determined to run. That does not have anybody to stay behind his. But his truly whole-heartedly attack time, absolutely be more fearful than any Soul Engineer Corp.

Thought of Soul Engineer Corp, Huo Yuhao also remembers had reason Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, that was really a terrifying strength. If they bump into Beast God directly, does not know that can strike to kill Beast God? But in the future wants to contend with Sun-Moon Empire, sooner or later will face this present age most formidable legion.

Old Xuan said: “Yuhao, do not say first, quickly therapy. I give you protector. You just broke through, but must consolidate your present strength. If there is Wutong because to be good. You broke through, the words that you collaborate again perhaps, really can contend with Di Tian.”

Huo Yuhao is smiling bitterly shaking the head, said: “After my this breakthrough, I and Wutong Martial Soul Fusion will perhaps have the issue. My Soul Power nature had the earth-shaking change, perhaps does not have the means and her Soul Power fuses in together. But our Martial Soul Fusion techniques should also be able to use. Has her, we estimated that can protect oneself.”

“Did Wutong this girl do? Such important time, she how not side you?”Old Xuan asked.

Huo Yuhao said: “Old Xuan, I am also open about the facts you, I made her go to Dou Ling Empire. We hope that she can convince Dou Ling Empire that side powerhouse, do not send the army to come Shrek City.”

Old Xuan has not revealed the surprised color, sighed, said: “Yuhao, you may know that you such did. If makes everybody know, how can?”

Huo Yuhao lowered the head, said: “clear(ly) knew is a trap, I hope that they do not tread. But I understand actually. This is also only completely the human affairs. Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire are very difficult to let off this and us unite resist the Sun-Moon Empire opportunity together. But they, once did. Perhaps......”

Old Xuan sighed one lightly, “Wutong words of that day, although was somewhat indignant. But I can also hear, this possibility is very big. But, you should understand that this possibility is big. Academy cannot take risk. Opportunity that because we have not been defeated, at this time, we have to be selfish, gives priority to a Academy ten thousand years of foundation.”

“Today a war, no doubt under your inspiring, making Sun-Moon Empire lose seriously. But similarly, made us see this army true terror place. Even if the powerhouse of Beast God that rank must evade its sharply, say nothing of we. Spells truly, you think how many chances we can have?”

Huo Yuhao nodded, “I understand your place of feeling embarrassed. Therefore I also can only completely human affairs. I have closed then up, attempt breaks through. We hope that can depend on my strength, can pose certain threat to Sun-Moon Empire that side. Old Xuan, after my injury restores, I want to go to that side the Sun-Moon Empire big camp to walk.”

The Old Xuan look moves slightly, “good, you go. Now actually good opportunity.”He had not asked that Huo Yuhao must go to do, after previous time listened to the Tang Wutong words, he also indistinctly understands that perhaps between Yuhao and that War-God Empress, really a little have not talked clearly, unclear relations. But now Evil Soul Master went to that side Star Dou Forest, is the best opportunity.

Old Xuan returns to him Huo Yuhao the room personally in Sea God Pavilion, and assigns the person to go to Tang Sect, told Tang Sect people Huo Yuhao normally all.

Sits cross-legged to sit, an innermost feelings tranquility of Huo Yuhao, in his mind, endlessly duplicates to have the feeling that he and Di Tian collide that to strike.

That strikes, Beast God was really close whole-heartedly. His Power of Darkness is not too fearful, but, after unifying Space Power, becomes incomparably formidable.

Within the body Yin-Yang balances two big Soul Nucleus to start to revolve, Soul Power of small vortex shape flows, strange that could not say in the meridians.

Before Huo Yuhao, although received shakes wound, because there is existence of Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, the injury is not too serious. Moreover, he has absorbed Dragon Pill completely, in the body intensity, already was not the human category.

These unified mind and Absolute Ice two's whirlpool Soul Power revolve according to the Mysterious Heaven Skill route under his control, after several sidereal revolutions, the injury in his within the body vanished.

Practices second Soul Nucleus with the method of Yin-Yang Supplement, although the process is very difficult, but after the success, the effect also was really too formidable.

Huo Yuhao are unable to weigh the Soul Power total quantity that can control at present to have many completely. But if now, even if no Tang Wutong, he also has confidence in the one-to-one situation facing the powerhouse of Yan Shaozhe that rank.

Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus, making him have far ultra has Soul Nucleus Titled Douluo even is the Transcendent Douluo resilience. The Soul Power intensity or the toughness, in addition Soul Power double attribute nature, is the huge superiority.

Di Tian Soul Power is also double attribute, but his pair of attribute, unified the darkness and Space Power, Space Power does not belong to his strength, but is he for several hundred thousand years, constantly under accumulates, oneself to the comprehension of Space Power. Then and own Power of Darkness fuses it. Replaces his oneself not specially formidable Spiritual Power by Space Power. As the matter stands, Di Tian Soul Power in fact is equal to the three branches of the family fusion, but mind level strength if slightly some.

Huo Yuhao knows that the also very long roads must walk. After having second Soul Nucleus, quite therefore opened a leaf of front door, but after this leaf of front door, more splendid world.

The Extreme Ice Battle God Armor deep meaning he just now starts to control now, but Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife, he actually just touched.

Morning Dew Knife is true Divine Tool! Today blocked Di Tian that to surmount the space a sword, Morning Dew Knife helps him melt the most strength, otherwise, he at least must receive heavy wound. However, merely is heavy wound, Huo Yuhao can feel that Di Tian has not killed intent to oneself.

Naturally, he will therefore not feel grateful Beast God, why he is very clear Beast God not to kill him.

The curtain of night hangs down, the Huo Yuhao stretch body gently, falls gently from the bed in the ground. When he extends the back, whole body lends a powerful aura, is simply ordinary on such as the big dragon, the strength of Golden Tree powerful vitality aura is unable to cover completely.

Completed the practice of second Soul Nucleus, Huo Yuhao also officially walked into the forest of powerhouse, even if in the Shrek Academy this powerhouse numerous places of were also so.

The nose suction port shouted, the air current circulated in within the body, when exhaled once more, the air slightly presented for the cyclone shape. Although does not have Soul Power to blow out, but Huo Yuhao has the feeling that plants to grasp at this moment.

After with a Di Tian war, in addition just realized from experience through the practice, he grasped to oneself current physical condition basically.

From the Soul Power boundary, his present Soul Power should is about 92 levels standards. But the actual Soul Power total quantity, is probably equal to 96 levels of Transcendent Douluo boundaries. Stated differently, his Soul Power is the double attribute, forms through the Yin-Yang balance. Meanwhile, his Soul Power also has restores, tough stronger characteristics high-speed. In addition his Twin Martial Souls, even if facing 97 levels of Transcendent Douluo, only on Soul Power, he will not fall leeward. If bumps into Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao such powerhouse again, hits certainly not to hit, but at least was also insufficient not to have the strength of resistance.

The thought moves slightly, does not need to go to display Soul Ability desirably, he integrated in the nighttime sky.

This clearly is the ability of Transcendent Douluo level, after becoming Transcendent Douluo, own Soul Ability completely will fuse with the body, the thought, Soul Ability naturally can display, but does not need desirably releases Martial Soul, to stimulate Soul Ring. The speed is faster, the might is also bigger.

Floating left Sea God Pavilion, Huo Yuhao jumped, directly soared the upper air to go, in an instant vanished does not see.

Sits in meditation Old Xuan in own room to open the double pupil, in the eye reveals a gratified color. Old Mu, your no lack of successors to carry on.

The blue sky such as washes, perhaps is reason that because the daytime war scatters the massive fog, tonight dim light of night is very beautiful.

Stars hang in airborne, just likes the diamonds of glistening embroiders on the dark blue velvet, is particularly moving.

The bright moonlight in the sky, making night darkness no longer so gloomy, the line of sight was very easy and far.

Huo Yuhao soaring in midair, before feeling actually, is completely different.

After having second Soul Nucleus, all as if had the change, not only cultivates is, sensation and Spiritual Power, even to realizing from experience of world, became different.

If his boundary is Minute Subtlety, then, now he actually it can be said that comprehensive, regardless of places in what kind of environment, has the feeling that periphery all will grasp.

This feeling is very unusual and wonderful, why Huo Yuhao do not explain can like this. He thought that even if in air a smallest particle, can during his control. But changes along with his thought.

But this world stereoscopic effect originally also turned into the feelings of multiple exsomatize, after having second Soul Nucleus, finally lets him to the spatial concept, had some clear(ly) to become aware. Although could not have gone to the Beast God situation by far, but defers to this condition to realize from experience, he deeply believed that profound that oneself can certainly feel, touches to the space deep meaning gradually.

The flight as if completely has not needed to depend upon Soul Power, as if the air is part of body, the thought moves, then air naturally will be promoting his body advance, the speed also completely in his instant.

---------------------------------------------------

The peerless Tang Sect cartoon electronic version I receive one batch, immediately starts, in our prestigious platforms continue on to pass to everybody to look.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-564-part-3





Volume 12

#565 - Kidnap! On


Originally, after having second Soul Nucleus, did not need Flight Soul Guidance Device unexpectedly. As for the limit of speed, Huo Yuhao has attempted, must exceed the speed of sound absolutely, after the speed is the certain extent, the next quarter, he had must break the feeling of space.

He then understands, ability that originally Beast God that type escapes into the space, is not how unusual, but when the speed achieves Absolute, in addition can achieve to realizing from experience of space deep meaning. He now is not good, but had found the access.

The formation of second Soul Nucleus, quite therefore opened a leaf of brand-new front door for him, but existence of this leaf of front door, makes him advance to this world peak finally truly.

Hundred li (0.5km) are away from, is only in this realizing from experience silently, quick achieved.

Whatever Huo Yuhao Soul Guidance Device of various airborne booths scan their body, was actually not worried that will be discovered. Because he now looks like part of air.

But this point, even if Beast God Di Tian cannot achieve, because Di Tian does not have Imitation Soul Ability, but after having second Soul Nucleus, Huo Yuhao Imitation Soul Ability has actually reached the peak, this no longer is simple Imitation, but just like changing from general. To become anything, can become anything, even is the air.

The tremendous damage that daytime causes, can see as before. From the airborne bird's eye view, the big regions empty completely. Even if in airborne, Huo Yuhao also as before can feel the darkness and Absolute Ice aura that in the ground transmits. This stretch of earth, does not know that wants how much time to be able these energies to melt. But before melting, is infertile surely, even any living thing above, will be affected.

Spiritual Detection opens, just like a big net, covers the entire Sun-Moon Empire big camp completely. Quick, Huo Yuhao had found him the person who wants to find.

Floating falls, falls to that be continuous hundred li (0.5km) big camp.

Ju Zi(orange) is sitting in own commander tent is lost in thought that on the elegant face is revealing the cloudy clear uncertain look, no wonder she so, her present mood is really somewhat complex.

Daytime time, she saw that Beast God Di Tian has given a Huo Yuhao sword. But that is also she sets firm resolve to the key that Beast God gets rid.

The later all, during her control, she were only not clear, was actually the Huo Yuhao physical condition how. He hardly has put together with Beast God, although he became compares obviously was more formidable before. But, Beast God that strikes, can leave behind heavy wound to him?

“Can I come in?”The clear and bright sound resounds quietly, making Ju Zi(orange) be on the rise suddenly.

“What person?”Asked after these three characters, she subconsciously has covered her mouth, because she feels suddenly that sound was not simple conveyed from the account a moment ago, but was resounds in own mind directly.

“Whiz whiz whiz whiz!”Several forms lighten rapidly, enter in the big account.

“Marshal, what matter?”These people that coming are Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, is the flame color, Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer member.

In Hand of the National Protector five big Soul Engineer Corp, besides has equipped Humanoid Soul Guidance Device Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp completely, only then various Soul Engineer Corp vice- expert regiment chief, as well as Ju Zi(orange) 30 personal guard provided.

These protections beside Ju Zi(orange) commander tent, are the elites in Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp elite.

Ju Zi(orange) beckoned with the hand, said: “Anything, I a moment ago possibly have not been a little hearing voices, you exit.”

“Yes.”Although several bodyguards some doubts, but after simply were examining commander tent, has drawn back.

Ju Zi(orange) turned back to sit to own position place, the right hand pressed on the chair arm rest gently, closure that around commander tent, an arrangement complete mind barrier was quietly immediately.

In just that in a short time, whose she heard the sound to belong. Did he come? Was he comes really?

“Ju Zi(orange).”The sound resounds once more, Ju Zi(orange) has gawked staring. Her subconscious and has covered own mouth. Because her surprised seeing, the Huo Yuhao form does not have emerging out of thin air of any omen before her.

“You......”Ju Zi(orange) stayed. Has not waited for her to open the mouth, a Huo Yuhao hand has grasped toward her.

In this flash, in the Ju Zi(orange) mind some innumerable pictures appear suddenly, her subconscious must go according to another side arm rest. However, her hand after was just moving the inch stopped, is not she of Huo Yuhao limit, but was she stopped.

In the heart an intense sad intent upwells, does he want to begin to me finally? Finally set firm resolve?

Smiling that Ju Zi(orange) self-ridicules, has actually closed the double pupil. Some of her innumerable methods can aim at Huo Yuhao obviously. In this commander tent, absolutely is the institution numerous. So long as she in arrangement by commander tent prevents Huo Yuhao slightly, she will have confidence some people to come to rescue immediately.

But, she does not have such to do, or her anything has not done. This flickers, she even some feeling of extrication, if can die in his hands, regarding oneself, perhaps is also a best extrication.

The hand of Huo Yuhao, falls on the Ju Zi(orange) shoulder, behind him, a leaf of jet black front door opens. The ray dodges, he and Ju Zi(orange) baseless disappeared in that leaf of jet black front door.

Ju Zi(orange) only thought that own soul has as if been separated from the body, the surrounding all are twisting, but the strange strengths are actually protecting her, making outside anything not have the means to move her body.

In this time, all were returning to suddenly normal. Ju Zi(orange) only thought that the under foot shakes, is conscientious.

The surrounding all have shone, air slightly somewhat cloudy and cold, when Ju Zi(orange) again opening eyes pupil, discovered one and Huo Yuhao appeared above a small hill unexpectedly. In this hill not far away, a big stretch of camp, there is having many human Soul Engineer to train. But here ray is gloomier than the normal time, but is actually not night.

“Where is this?”Ju Zi(orange) surprised looks to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, said: “This is my place.”

“Your place?”A curiosity of Ju Zi(orange) face, she does not fear death on Huo Yuhao, at this time naturally does not have the fear of least bit.

Some Huo Yuhao pondering visits her, said: “You believe that I will tell you here secret?”

Ju Zi(orange) shook the head, said: “Did not say. You catch me to come, wants to do?”

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, “anything is not dry. We are the friends, I asked you to be a guest to my place, wasn't good?”Walks, we drink the cup tea.

At the same time was saying, when he walks in the direction of camp first.

Ju Zi(orange) has stamped, although in the heart full is puzzled, but followed. Why does not know, she has a feeling, in this place, if leaves side Huo Yuhao, might present the danger.

Ju Zi(orange) has not worn the armor at this time, is only a red long skirt, seems, is more like a young woman of quality.

“commander!”The soldiers who guards the camp see Huo Yuhao, pleasantly surprised goes forward to salute.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Sect people left for sometime, had not come back. Here although has to eat to drink, but really somewhat is also lonely. Shrek these three big Soul Engineer Corp even somewhat have liked now in the Sun-Moon Empire internal fight. That really stimulates . Moreover, grabs each time the thing came back, is they happiest times.

Huo Yuhao behind Ju Zi(orange) is their first time sees, in their eyeground deep places, were many several points of pondering flavor. Although Ju Zi(orange) does not have Tang Wutong to be so attractive, but actually one special makings, but sees, will make the deep impression on the person. Especially her just like the crystal frozen common delicate flesh, was made these Soul Engineer unconscious looked at several.

Huo Yuhao is bringing Ju Zi(orange), has arrived at itself in the place that in the camp lives.

Although Ju Zi(orange) has followed in him behind, but the nimble and resourceful double pupil throughout is actually observing the surrounding all, since has not died, then, for her, here all become important. Makes the observation, became she lives one fixed custom.

Huo Yuhao has not managed her, has not made her look.

Entered the room, some quick people have shown the tea and dessert. After these days handling, this camp already and outside Douluo Continent world did not have what difference.

“Please drink tea.”Huo Yuhao carry the teacup, first has drunk one.

Ju Zi(orange) has not actually moved, is only sitting silently there, stares at him to look.

“Visits me to do?”Huo Yuhao is smiling asking.

“Told me, where was this? Yuhao, has not thought that you really have such big secret.”Ju Zi(orange) stern said.

Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, said: “Was not said to you a moment ago, this was my place.”

The eye pupil of Ju Zi(orange) has shone suddenly, “did you grasp Space Power?”

Listens to her such to ask that Huo Yuhao instead somewhat was startled, “what can you see unexpectedly?”

Ju Zi(orange) ill-humored snort|hum, “my strength, although specially is not formidable, but, do not forget that I now am Sun-Moon Empire War-God Empress, I contact, is the Sun-Moon Empire topmost levels, particularly Soul Engineer of several Grandmaster levels, in story, I am not weak in anybody. I do not believe that by your ability, can actually control such a big piece of space. This already, not only ordinary space ability was so simple. Even if Beast God Di Tian, is impossible to open a piece of such greatly own space. I understood, before across our Sun-Moon Empire was attacked, is really you do. Has this kind of piece of space, in addition your own flying speed, truly can appear in our Sun-Moon Empire any corner in a short time. So will be no wonder nasty, your majesty is attacked injured by you.”

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-565-part-1





Volume 12

#565 - Kidnap!


Huo Yuhao said: “Xu Tianran was injured . The watermark advertisement test watermark advertisement test was a pity that cannot kill him. Otherwise, your Sun-Moon Empire army also collapsed of itself.”

Ju Zi(orange) has smiled suddenly, “I also thought that was a pity very much. What a pity you cannot kill him. However, I must tell you. He died, Sun-Moon Empire similarly will not be chaotic, because in Sun-Moon Empire, I.”

“If you also did die?”The Huo Yuhao sound becomes coldly is suddenly severe.

The smiling face on Ju Zi(orange) elegant face actually became more moving, “little frightened me. Your this move to me, no matter uses. I already completely understood you. If you can decide to kill me, will not bring to come to here me, in commander tent, you began a moment ago.”

At the same time was saying, she holds by the table to stand, gathers in front of Huo Yuhao, aspirates blue such as visits him, said: “You do not hate to kill me, is right?”

Huo Yuhao somewhat poverty-stricken draws back backward, looks at Ju Zi(orange), in the heart some dilutedness. She was really too intelligent. Yes! If can set firm resolve to kill her, will not bring to come to here her.

“Yes, I do not hate to kill you. However, in this place, you, since came, sees I biggest secret, you believe that I will also put you to go back?”

Ju Zi(orange) gives a calm smile, said: “Do I go back not to be unimportant. What is important, if I have been missing, you think that the Sun-Moon Empire army will be what kind of? Wants me to give you to analyze? To imprison me, you miscalculated.”

“?”Huo Yuhao somewhat surprisedly visits her. In fact, he prepares to really the Ju Zi(orange) captivity here, will otherwise not bring her.

In the military aspect, Ju Zi(orange) can be said as the multi- wisdom nearly monster. But did not have her in Sun-Moon Empire army, is a group of people without a leader aspect. To that time, Sun-Moon Empire army civil strife. On the other hand, will cope.

Ju Zi(orange) said with a smile: “I, Shrek City will not have any danger. But once, I was missing. That may perhaps. Even can say. Shrek City was dangerous. You think that we are in the hostile parties now. I have been missing, seizes the biggest possibility me, isn't your Shrek? In this case, Emperor Sun-Moon ** team. My subordinates, the first matter think that must get rid to your Shrek City, to your important people.”

“However I was imprisoned by you here, naturally do not have the means to hand over. They in not being able to find my situation, definitely will initiate the retaliatory nature to attack to Shrek City. You believe that your Shrek can block our Sun-Moon Empire army completely? Today we cope with Beast God Di Tian time. You should see we are formidable.”

Huo Yuhao said: “I can lead you, brings to arrive at Shrek City, making you appear in the top, was seen by the person of your subordinate. At that time, who also dares to attack to Shrek City?”

Ju Zi(orange) sneers, said: “You may think many. On this world, at least two people can order the army attack, one, is my good husband, now Emperor Sun-Moon Empire. I was grasped, they meet first pass to Bright Capital City the news. My that good husband to be able not to want the sons, what was my this empress considered as? Moreover, at that time he more justifiable can begin to your Shrek City. I died, he looks for one again and that's the end. But another person, is Army Supervisor of our Sun-Moon Empire army, that State Master Zongli Wu. Ruthless of Holy Spirit Cult burns you should clear. Has me in the army, I can also suppress them. But once I am not, you should understand that hatred between Holy Spirit Cult and your Shrek Academy, he looks forward to begin to Shrek City immediately. To that time, he will certainly flee to exchange my subordinate, launches the attack. Moreover, he also similarly very much thinks that I die. I died, Sun-Moon Empire can impede his person to be short of one importantly, isn't this big good deed? Kills two birds with one stone and kills two birds with one stone.”

“So long as ruins your Shrek City, even if pays again the big price, Holy Spirit Cult these people can want. But after ruining you, then they about one step will control the Sun-Moon Empire army. Launches the loss of life war. To that time, but also who can prevent they? But you thought that Emperor Sun-Moon under Holy Spirit Cult control ** the team is good, under do I control am quite good?”

Huo Yuhao that Ju Zi(orange) these words, said is dumbfounded. Looks at a Ju Zi(orange) face stern appearance, Huo Yuhao cannot speak for a very long time.

He found the Ju Zi(orange) goal to be very simple today, must through imprisoning her defuses at present the Shrek City crisis. At least must threaten the Sun-Moon Empire army not to dare to act rashly, who then judges the Ju Zi(orange) true target is.

But a Ju Zi(orange) these words saying, in the Huo Yuhao heart hesitated, because each words said by the nature of things.

Ju Zi(orange) carries front teacup, not Xu not vigorous has blown the tone, blows the superficial tea leaves, after having tasted one, on the face reveals the color of feeling relaxed, “drinks the cup hot tea, but also really enjoys. Don't you want to imprison me here? You walk. You could rest assured that I know this is your space-independent, cannot run in any case, I will not run. So long as you made the person give me to send the three meals a day every day on the line. Time that looks forward to be able to rest. I must thank you to be right. Goes, to go, you can walk. A bit faster goes back. Otherwise, your Shrek City was attacked, your this big master is not, is some are not wonderful.”

Huo Yuhao looks at Ju Zi(orange) at a moderate pace drinking tea, sighed, said: “Ju Zi(orange), do you know? Listened to you a moment ago these words, I had the murderous intention to you.”

In Ju Zi(orange) hand teacup slight trembled, gives a calm smile, places on the teacup the table, then faces up to Huo Yuhao, “good! You begin. Dies in your hands, at least you will keep an entire corpse to me, then elaborate funeral I. Actually, I want to live in you. You have killed me, meets the life to be restless, the life remembers me, I satisfied. Begins.”

At the same time was saying, she has closed the double pupil, the long eyelash builds on below eyelid. The whole person unexpectedly appears exceptionally tranquil.

Looks at such Ju Zi(orange), Huo Yuhao only thought own chest place as if stopped up anything to resemble. Stands up slowly, if he can under the killer to Ju Zi(orange), but can also wait till now?

Went out of the room, breathes outside undead Demi-plane somewhat cloudy and cold air, Huo Yuhao is heaving a deep sigh. He knows that he lost, although caught here Ju Zi(orange), eventually has actually lost to her!

Ju Zi(orange) Bi Mu long time, does not have the least bit sound, again when opening eyes pupil, in the room did not have Huo Yuhao.

She also stands up, on the face actually reveals the wicked look, “this does not have the conscience! Owes I to save him, does not hesitate to take risk to cope with Beast God. Snort, the man really does not have a good thing.”

Spoke these words, she also smiled. Does he have eventually to her gets rid?

Carries the teacup once more, Ju Zi(orange) has not exited, there silently is drinking the tea. A while, their one cup of tea have drunk up, she has attained in front of the Huo Yuhao teacup oneself, slowly is drinking, did not mind that he has drunk.

After tea, Huo Yuhao went back to the room, looks that Ju Zi(orange) carries own teacup to drink water, he has gawked, then sat returned to oneself formerly position.

“Ju Zi(orange), are actually you what kind of? Can you help Xu Tianran unify Continent really? You should know that the war will die many people. Your family member, initially died in the war. Not does unto other not to do to others, why do you want to continue this war?”

Ju Zi(orange) complexion one cold, “I continue this war. Huo Yuhao, you engage in introspection, if no me in this war, then, it can occur? Will lose the ambition of eastern expedition without my Sun-Moon Empire? Without me, Sun-Moon Empire Soul Guidance Device that you can resist? Right, the war wants the deceased person, but, I can pat the chest to say one, at least in the war that I lead, the casualty was historically the war is lowest.”

“The world situation, must be divided and be divided the long time about the long time to gather. Douluo Continent, needs a complete and unified strong country. Why belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries is not our Sun-Moon Empire match. Is because the disparity in science and technology. But a unification complete country, can actually use the science and technology on being beneficial to the nation and to the people. You have also seen, after Sky Soul Empire we seize, belongs to Sun-Moon Empire Soul Guidance Technology to enter in Sky Soul Empire. At the beginning, these Sky Soul Empire people also very repelled, but with the lapse of time, haven't they gradually approved us now? This is the charm of science and technology. Technological progress, the life of people will be getting better and better. In the future can have more possibilities. Therefore, I think that a unified country is the need. Naturally, whose this unified national control in hand, was a different matter.”

Huo Yuhao silently looks at Ju Zi(orange), listens words that this is opening the mind, shaking the head of gently, “we have different insistences. I cannot look that my motherland was attacked by you. Therefore, that initially I most am not willing to face, must face eventually. We stood on opposite eventually, met in the battlefield. Your Sun-Moon Empire is very formidable, but, in the future, you also not necessarily certainly can unify entire Continent. Belongs to Douluo Continent three countries over ten thousand years of background, is not broken easily. Everybody has spelled really mutually wounded, suffers hardships truly, is the common people.”

-------------------------------------------------------

The peerless Tang Sect cartoon 128 th has sent, everybody in our prestige - platform transmits: Peerless Tang Sect 128, consult. Comes to see Wang Dong and Yuhao match play quickly, fine coloring book.

Joins our prestige - platform is very easy, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is our families.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-565-part-2





Volume 12

#565 - Kidnap! Next


Ju Zi(orange) said: “These major principles you were needless to say with me. In this regard, we do not have any common language. I am not big to the authority **, I initially chose to follow Xu Tianran, in fact to revenge. But for these years, in fact I to revenging looked pale. But, I have the son, I must lay the good groundwork for my son.”

“You also saw, Xu Tianran to my son is any manner. The previous time, Little Yunhan almost dies outside. If not you delivers him, I am unable to imagine him to be what kind. Therefore, I must become formidable, I must make my son turn into on this world the most formidable person. I fight for state power, not for Xu Tianran, but for my son. In the future, my son must become this world actual master. This point, no one could prevent me. Only if, you have killed me now. If you can set firm resolve to kill me, then, I can tell you actually a secret.”

Huo Yuhao has gawked, “exchanges the secret with the life? Is what?”

Ju Zi(orange) shows a faint smile, looks that the Huo Yuhao look becomes gentle, “you secret how, regardless of unable to guess correctly. However, wants to know, only if you set firm resolve to kill me. When your blade inserts my heart, I told you.”

The Huo Yuhao forced smile said: “You were too clear, you who I looked were because knows that I impossible under killer to you, so was calm. Yes, I could not kill you. Even now cannot continue to imprison you. However, you also saw my this space-independent. If I must deliberately destroy, will not be small to the attack of your Sun-Moon Empire.”

Ju Zi(orange) said indifferently: “That tries, look is I unifies the Continent speed to be quick, you destroy the Sun-Moon Empire speed to be quick.”

Huo Yuhao knits the brows: “Weren't you worried? Do not forget, Xu Tianran may once injure in my hands.”

Ju Zi(orange) sinking sound track: “Yuhao, if you can achieve a matter, perhaps, I can delay actually to the speed that Douluo Continent invades.”

“What?”Huo Yuhao visits her curiously.

Ju Zi(orange) earnest [say / way]: “Helped me kill Xu Tianran!”

“Ah?”Huo Yuhao has not thought that Ju Zi(orange) actually will say such words, “he is your husband! You and do you want to murder husband unexpectedly?”

Ju Zi(orange) smiles cold, said: “Husband? He is never my husband, I am not her wife. I am only his use tool. Or his all people are the tools that he uses, these also include my child. Originally, I to his many sentiment, without his training, did not have my today. When but, he decided to give up my child on that day, I do not owe him anything. In the near future, I must kill him. Only then he dies, my child can inherit the throne, all issues do not become the issues. Therefore, if your wish makes me delay to invade the Douluo Continent speed, then, must kill him. Has killed him, I have the reason to withdraw troops. Naturally, after he dies, I must cope with Holy Spirit Cult. Also for this reason, temporarily leaps does not get rid to unify Continent. What kind of? If you can achieve, then, I at least can guarantee that within ten years, no longer launch the war. You can also help Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire develop while these ten years time well, can look overtake our Sun-Moon Empire step. If you can achieve, on this day, is three points.”

Huo Yuhao seems first time knows Ju Zi(orange) to be ordinary, visits him who decides, long time could not speak.

Ju Zi(orange) makes him kill Xu Tianran unexpectedly, such Ju Zi(orange), is very in his eyes strange. Present Ju Zi(orange), as if when mentioned her son, had the sincerity!

“Ju Zi(orange), why I do not know, you will turn into this unexpectedly. How to say again that Xu Tianran is also your child's father! Although I also very much think him dead, is, you should not. I do not hope that you become a cold-blooded animal.”

Ju Zi(orange) has smiled, she smiles is very cold, “my child's father? If is really this, you think that I will begin to him? Although my Ju Zi(orange) is not good person, but, I am also vivid, is a genuine woman. But Xu Tianran, he actually radically is not a real man. He was plotted by his blood brother in the past, may, not only the both legs that loses, he makes the ability of man. My child, is only my, does not have with his relations. He in order to have the crown prince, was been stabler by own rule, even forces me to borrow to plant, do you know? You may know how many pain my these years did receive?”

The tears, in sneering flow. The whole body of Ju Zi(orange) is shivering.

Huo Yuhao has also tarried, he does not certainly know that Ju Zi(orange) actually withstood these many.

Xu Tianran and Ju Zi(orange), unexpectedly only then the name of husband and wife, does not have the reality of husband and wife, is makes Ju Zi(orange) borrow to plant, this matter, can be considered as absolutely on is Sun-Moon Empire biggest secret. If passes on, to Ju Zi(orange) and Xu Tianran, will have the huge attack.

But at this time, Huo Yuhao thinks is actually not these, he then understands why Ju Zi(orange) will hate Xu Tianran. A man, own husband, unexpectedly by own woman whereabouts other man taking advantage of planting. This is what kind cruel! Regarding a woman, especially so.

“Sorry, Ju Zi(orange), I do not know.”

Ju Zi(orange) goes forward several steps, arrives in front of him, looks up him, at this time among them distance, is less than one foot, Ju Zi(orange) delicate fragrance transmits quietly and beautifully.

“I did not need you to say sorry. Although I hate Xu Tianran, but I actually very much love my child. Therefore, Yuhao, if, helping me kill Xu Tianran. But actually do not injure Little Yunhan. You achieve these, other matters did not need you to manage. I will try to find the solution, lets Sun-Moon Empire in ten years, no longer starts the war. Ok?”

Huo Yuhao was really excited, if to Shrek City as well as Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire ten years, can handle a lot. Although on Soul Guidance Technology, Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries and Sun-Moon Empire also has the huge disparity, but ten years makes utmost efforts to develop, always has the opportunity of pursuing. Ten years later, oneself also become more formidable, to that time, perhaps, oneself has been able to lead the war completely.

However, this matter this matter of great substance, in the Huo Yuhao heart has hesitant. “I must consider.”

Ju Zi(orange) nodded, said: “I do not worry. However you could rest assured that whatever, I will not go to attack Shrek City truly, you have told me, there is your family|home. How will I destroy your homeland?”

Huo Yuhao said: “What is your this true goal? Besides compels from Sun-Moon Empire me, since you do not plan to attack Shrek, you also do plan to do? Is the goal Dou Ling or Star Luo?”

Ju Zi(orange) visits him, smiles not to speak.

Huo Yuhao also visits her, “replied that my issue, I deliver you to go back.”

Ju Zi(orange) sighed one lightly, said: “How did I reply you? Tells you me definitely not to attack Shrek Academy this matter like me, the Shrek Academy person, believe you? Even if they believe you, they do dare to use the safety risk of Academy?”

The Huo Yuhao brow wrinkles, “you already calculated!”

Ju Zi(orange) smiles, “! Am I very intelligent? But, I did not think actually one are very intelligent, if I really intelligent, initially should not let off you. Did not have that Wang Dong'er anything matter.”

Huo Yuhao should not be excessive, avoids her scalding hot vision, sighed a sound track lightly: “Walks, I deliver you to go back.”

Ju Zi(orange) said with a smile: “You fear anything, I will not eat you.”At the same time was saying, she goes forward one step, draws close to Huo Yuhao in front.

The Huo Yuhao subconscious backlash half step, the right hand lifts, according to her shoulder, making her and maintain an arm distance.

“She that?”Ju Zi(orange) looks at Huo Yuhao, light asking.

Huo Yuhao silently looks at Ju Zi(orange), has not spoken. Initially he when the Sun-Moon Royal Soul Engineering Academy study, has not known that Dong'er is a girl, now recalls, if knew at that time, perhaps in his heart did not have the means to accommodate other people again.

To Ju Zi(orange), the Huo Yuhao emotion is somewhat complex, truly, Ju Zi(orange) is first walks into the woman in his heart, is only, that feeling is somewhat ignorant, Huo Yuhao even had thought at that time in own heart also has the worry, was afterward clear, this worry because of Wang Dong'er.

Circumstances changes with the time, now Ju Zi(orange) asked that his such issue, his some do not know how really should reply is good, he is not willing to injure Ju Zi(orange), but cannot talk nonsense.

Ju Zi(orange) silently visits him, after long time, the tears have welled up, “Yuhao, I only hope you to remember, on this world, regardless of I have injured anyone, two people I will not injure, one is you, one is a son.”

Huo Yuhao has shaken shaking, takes his mind to cultivate, naturally can feel, in Ju Zi(orange) these words has been full of the sincere emotion, is not fakes definitely.

Nod of gently, in the Huo Yuhao eye reveals several points of disappointed color, “is not willing to meet in the battlefield with you. At least, we are the friends.”

Ju Zi(orange) said: “Can hug me one?”

Huo Yuhao hesitant, stretches out the arms eventually, has supported Ju Zi(orange) gently, actually not body and her fitting.

Ju Zi(orange) shoves open him, “you are really also perfunctory. However, I am very happy.”Spoke these words, she turns around to run suddenly, runs to outside.

Huo Yuhao hurries to follow, arrives at outside with her.

Stands in the camp, Ju Zi(orange) looks to the distant place that the distant place land is barren, many hills, cannot see the green as before, cannot see existence of any life aura.

“Really mysterious, does not know why you will have this kind of place. I know that you will not say, I will not ask anything. Delivers me to go back, after going back, I am War-God Empress. I before to words that you spoke, kept a promise.”

“Um.”Huo Yuhao sighed one lightly, did not recite the incantation, a leaf of jet black front door opened wide behind them. A Huo Yuhao hand holds the Ju Zi(orange) shoulder, the personal appearance dodges, submerges the front door to vanish does not see.

The quickest renewal, non- ball window reading invited.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-565-part-3





Volume 12

#566 - My Goal Is To Fight In The Spirit


The ray again changes, all as if returned to the stock rail. In the jet black front door, Huo Yuhao brings Ju Zi(orange) to march into to her big account.

Ju Zi(orange) has turned around, facing this mysterious one, in her heart shocks at this time as before, “since this is the deepest secret that you have hidden?”Ju Zi(orange) asked in a soft voice.

Huo Yuhao had not replied that visits her, his look is also very complex.

Ju Zi(orange) said: “You were the heart were too soft, you had the opportunity to kill me a moment ago, or imprisoned me. Actually, I do not have to speak the truth completely, if I am not, the army may really the attack your Shrek City. But by your Shrek strength, there is an opportunity top. So long as has gone against the first wave of offensive, perhaps you have the opportunity. But, you have let up such opportunity, returned to here, so long as I want, you again did not have any possibly to seize me.”

Huo Yuhao sighed, said: “I know.”

Some Ju Zi(orange) surprise visits him, said: “Do you also deliver me to come back?”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “I cannot decide, you said right, my heart was too soft. However, hopes that in the future do not challenge my bottom line, do not have the too strong confidence to oneself. If one day, I really want to kill you, where you could not hide.”

Ju Zi(orange) smiles, she as if did not worry that the threat of Huo Yuhao, “you must have this skill, kills that person first. Has killed him, ten years make me to observe.”

Huo Yuhao eyes narrows the eyes, kills Ju Zi(orange), he has the psychological burden, but, must say that kills that person, he is a burden does not have. Is that person so really good to kill? In Bright Capital City, there is an imperial Soul Engineer Corp protection, to strike to kill that person, then, must the imperial Soul Engineer Corp destruction.

“I walked.”Huo Yuhao beckoned with the hand to Ju Zi(orange), the personal appearance is hidden in the air quietly.

Some Ju Zi(orange) illness brought on by the obstruction of flow of vital energy. Suddenly said: “Who I told you my goal am.”

“Um?”Just prepared commander tent Huo Yuhao to stop, the personal appearance reappeared in commander tent, turned around surprisedly looks at Ju Zi(orange).

Ju Zi(orange) stands up, arrives in front of him slowly. “Yuhao, does not know you to believe that I stopped by calling out you suddenly, is willing to tell you this secret, because, I wanted to look at your one eyes.”

The Huo Yuhao heart slightly shakes, felt Ju Zi(orange) like the water gentleness, the mood somewhat is losing patience.

“My goal is Dou Ling Empire, you should be able to guess correctly that but cannot affirm.”Ju Zi(orange) chuckle. Said.

The Huo Yuhao look concentrates, nodded to her, the personal appearance twinkle, is hidden once more, disappearance of being quietly.

Ju Zi(orange) stands there. On the elegant face is having the light smile throughout, as if not know that he departed. Until after long time, her complexion gradually became gloomy, turned back own position, the mind barrier that will close before opened. On the elegant face is revealing the cloudy clear uncertain look, seems is pondering anything silently.

Left commander tent, Huo Yuhao has shot up to the sky. The fluctuations of all Surveying Soul Guidance Device fall on him, instantaneously by the Imitation Soul Ability analysis and concealment.

Has flown upwards to over five kilometers upper air, Huo Yuhao stopped.

Be continuous hundred li (0.5km) the Sun-Moon Empire army from the upper air bird's eye view ground, the Huo Yuhao mood is somewhat low. One do not have the means to set firm resolve to cope with Ju Zi(orange) eventually.

Although Ju Zi(orange) displays before him gentle like water, but Huo Yuhao actually deep feeling her fearfulness. From beginning to end, initiative have not grasped. Ju Zi(orange) has almost used he on each weakness ingeniously. Such woman. Really was too fearful, particularly commander of enemy.

War-God Empress, lives up to reputation!

Ju Zi(orange) each few words real, this is Huo Yuhao most thinks the frightened place. The open and aboveboard open intrigue and analysis, making him actually have to give up imprisoning her plan.

Facing the crazy Sun-Moon Empire army. Even is the Sun-Moon Empire army who Holy Spirit Cult leads, absolutely facing calm Ju Zi(orange) is more fearful. Now Shrek City most fears is such storm.

Moreover, Ju Zi(orange) also very good grasped him at heart, knows that his bottom line is anything. She tells him not to attack Shrek City, only this point, makes Huo Yuhao have to let off her. But also bewildered has believed her. Perhaps is because, she opened the mind barrier directly, to reason that oneself do not guard against. Huo Yuhao is really unable to start to such Ju Zi(orange).

The air in upper air is very neat, after Huo Yuhao slightly makes the stop, flies in the Shrek Academy direction.

Just like Old Xuan said that he does not have the means to convince Shrek Academy Ancient Elder, then, he can do now, is as far as possible prevents the motion of Ju Zi(orange).

Returns to Shrek City, Huo Yuhao to go to school ground directly, opens the King front door, has all put three Soul Engineer Corp. Let the camp that they return to train be stationed. Meanwhile, transports the massive commodities and grain.

These commodities arrange several Soul Guidance Array places in Shrek City sufficiently, adds on joining of three Soul Engineer Corp again, making the defense of Shrek City be able to promote the several fold surely, even if really facing the crazy offensive of Sun-Moon Empire army, can resist some time.

Completes these, weather already dawn. Huo Yuhao has not gone to Academy, but returned to Tang Sect directly. School ground here matter, he has made the Soul Engineer Corp assistant go to Academy to report.

Returns to Tang Sect, what making Huo Yuhao somewhat pleasantly surprised is, Beibei and Tang Wutong came back.

Cannot attend to disturbing them to rest, Huo Yuhao found Tang Wutong in own room first.

“What kind of? Wutong?”

Tang Wutong worthily is Titled Douluo, although at this time or daybreak, but was awakened after by Huo Yuhao, she actually fiercely throws, grasps him.

After coming back, she heard Huo Yuhao matter, perhaps others do not understand that what he has done, but won't Tang Wutong be able to guess correctly?

Moreover she is very clear, Huo Yuhao opens her, is in order to does not come under her influence, if there are her, she will not allow him to choose the method of Yin-Yang Supplement to practice second Soul Ring at this time.

“Bang”the strength of seal is absolutely fearful. In Tang Wutong closely hugs, Huo Yuhao does not escape by luck the possibility. Once again was shaken to fly.

Huo Yuhao presents the big font brand mark on wall, he very helpless discovery, oneself future father-in-law seal will be quite overbearing. Even will act according to his strength to adjust the seal attack might.

He had Dual Soul Nucleus, after may be exploded flies, is sorely and is very very sore. Huo Yuhao in this moment, in the heart even somewhat has doubts, actually oneself this future father-in-law's strength will be what kind of Ah? his seal, can actually formidable to so the degree. Must know, oneself facing Limit Douluo time, there are to escape possibly, is, facing his seal, means does not have. This thinks that this time can hugging well Wutong, now looks like, as if own strength also by far insufficient!

Tang Wutong snort|hum, “hugged you because of my very fear, was flushed by the seal, you got what one deserves. You dare while me not, when breaks through. Do you have to think my feeling? If the breakthrough were defeated, what to do?”At the same time was saying, her eye was a little red.

The Tang Wutong nose has pulled out pulling out, sudden arrow step rushes to front of Huo Yuhao, has entrained him, then heard on him heard.

Went bad! Huo Yuhao in great surprise. But on the face actually does not dare to express any mood to fluctuate.

“Said.”Tang Wutong sneers, both arms surround in the front, in big eyes of pink-blue color, clearly has dense murderous aura to glitter.

The heart of Huo Yuhao is twitching, “did we say the proper business first? That side Dou Ling Empire what kind of? Has the situation? Did they listen to your dissuading? Did you find Heavenly Sun Douluo?”

Tang Wutong curled the lip, said: “Heavenly Sun Douluo had found, the words I also brought. But they turn a deaf ear obviously. Dou Ling Empire elite came toward Shrek, many tomorrow. I arrive at Dou Ling Empire time, they already sent elite. Four Soul Master legion, add on 200,000 armies again.”

Huo Yuhao pats the forehead, “ended. The Ju Zi(orange) goal, is Dou Ling Empire.”

The Tang Wutong complexion sinks, “confesses your issue, body fragrance what's the matter?”

Huo Yuhao sighed, submissive before, wanted to abduct Ju Zi(orange), the matter is said by she convinced. Is working as Tang Wutong, he is a point conceals does not dare to have. Did not say that the white lie is not good, but the Tang Wutong this double big eye as if can see through him, do not have concealed good, otherwise she felt accidentally, that really will affect the feelings, let alone, Huo Yuhao does not think one made anything to be unfair to her matter!

Is listening to his explanation, the Tang Wutong complexion gradually became even more gloomy.

“Does she make you hug you to hug?”

“I gently have held her shoulder!”

“That is not good.”

“Woman is jealous is really an impervious matter!”

“Impervious impervious. Has the skill you to look for her. Perhaps, you by the body allow, she also repulsed the enemy, even revolts directly also perhaps. This is how the boundless beneficence matter!”Saying of Tang Wutong face ridicule.

Huo Yuhao sighed, “good, I made a mistake. I will look for her time next time again, certainly is leading you.”

“Made a mistake must be punished.”Tang Wutong coldly visits him.

“Also can punish? I admitted mistakes.”An innocent person of Huo Yuhao face.

Tang Wutong flies suddenly is also threw, a tone lives in his lip.

The Huo Yuhao pupil enlarges instantaneously, that fragrant and mild feeling spreads to the brain instantaneously, made his some blanks. At this time, even if Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus as if also some, no matter used.

Then, naturally printed on the wall......



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-566-part-1





Volume 12

#566 - My Goal Is To Fight In The Spirit


When Huo Yuhao pastes the wall to sliding, he suddenly has an inexplicable happiness. The watermark advertisement test watermark advertisement tests Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus is useful. Although is very as before sore, but as if restored to be quicker than before. If can such own, what be each time? The seal strength is strong, we did not fear. Currently has the Dragon Pill fusion in any case, Pi Caorou is thick.

Hey, father-in-law Sir, how long having a look at your seal to block my.

Shook the body, stands, Huo Yuhao harbors evil intentions looks at Tang Wutong.

“Do you do?”Tang Wutong inexplicable feeling somewhat dangerous.

Huo Yuhao smiles, said: “Doesn't do, but some people said that must punish me. That punished several times to be good.”

Has not waited for Tang Wutong to respond that Huo Yuhao on instantaneous throwing on. Tang Wutong wants to fend, but Huo Yuhao is relying on formidable Spiritual Detection, direction that the accurate judgment he must fend, direct above her way, one grasps Tang Wutong, the pain kisses her fragrant lip once more.

“......”Tang Wutong cannot be separated from the tiger claw, was kissed. However, next one flickers, the body of Huo Yuhao flew, formidable seal strength, once again “penalty”he.

This time, Huo Yuhao has not even waited for the body to fall from the wall, rebounds, throws once more toward Tang Wutong, “comes again, the penalty must thoroughly!”

“Does not want!”Tang Wutong this time study was intelligent, started Teleportation Soul Ability on oneself pin bone directly, the personal appearance dodged, suddenly vanished.

However, when she moves sideways to present the time, happen to sees a badly face with a smile.

Their Soul Ability are the same, there is Martial Soul Fusion, after Huo Yuhao broke through second Soul Nucleus, to the control of Space Power does not know that was more formidable than many before, is relying on Spiritual Detection as well as to the Space Power sensation, he accurately judges the position that Tang Wutong presented.

In Tang Wutong is thinking one must by the wolf kiss. Huo Yuhao was actually the body stops, both hands held her shoulder, said: “Wutong, punished this to finish. I truly obtained the positive news from Ju Zi(orange) there. Dou Ling Empire that she must cope with. But at the present this time. We do not have the means to convince Academy Ancient Elder. Therefore, can only walk one. Did First Senior Brother come back?”

Tang Wutong said: “First Senior Brother also came back. I heart that. Star Lou Empire that side situation is better, has left behind some elite. But sent some people to come eventually.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Now could not attend to this many. That side First Senior Brother, I pass to greet, then we walk immediately. We go to Dou Ling Empire. Can look prevent Sun-Moon Empire to their attacks. Ju Zi(orange) to maintain the battle efficiency of frontal battlefield, as well as confuses us. Is impossible to reassign too many manpower, most likely, is dispatches Soul Engineer Corp to go to sneak attack, attacks the Dou Ling Empire weak place.”

Tang Wutong said: “Good, you look for First Senior Brother, I tidy up slightly. We walk.”

“Um.”Huo Yuhao complies with one, turns around to walk. But the footsteps actually stopped, turns head to look to Tang Wutong, the gentle voice asks: “Is tired?”

Tang Wutong shaking the head of gently. “It is not tired, so long as with you in same place, even if more tired nothing. Later while me not, when take risked. Do you know? I am really good to fear that leaves your days in me, after coming back, again could not find you. I heard that this time came including Beast God Di Tian, for must aim at you.”

The Huo Yuhao her pink-blue color long hair, “do not fear silently that I will not take risk easily, this time also some assurances such do. Di Tian there, cannot take care of oneself temporarily, does not look for me. However, told you a good news, the Di Tian type has taken down while this breakthrough in my Reverse Scale. I walked first, you tidy up.”

“Um.”Tang Wutong complies with one, Huo Yuhao is moves sideways, left the room, directly soared that side Beibei.

He looks for Beibei, not only for the Star Lou Empire matter, but also for Tang Ya. The Tang Ya evil toxin thorough was good, own Blue Silver Grass Martial Soul was awakened. However, she and Blue Silver Emperor have not completed the fusion, because cultivating of Tang Ya not to be able to achieve the bottleneck at present, wants she 90 levels of times, fused Blue Silver Emperor to take own spirit again. Huo Yuhao must go to inspect for her, having a look at her present condition to be what kind. After all, he has taken Sword of Life.

“First Senior Brother.”Huo Yuhao has not searched to observe in the room with own Spiritual Detection the situation. This related to others ** the matter he will not do. The sound is not strong, but has the penetrating power very much passed on.

“Um? Little Junior Brother.”Hears the Huo Yuhao sound, in the room transmits the rustling sound to put on the sound of clothes. Tender snort|hum resounds, this tender snort|hum the air/Qi is full, but has several points to be discontented obviously.

The time is not long, Beibei walked from room, evidently, wearily does not have, instead some mind glow.

Huo Yuhao somewhat awkward [say / way]: “First Senior Brother, is the Little Ya Teacher situation what kind of?”

“Good, um, she is very good.”Beibei somewhat awkward saying.

Which Huo Yuhao could not have looked, in the heart darkly rises gang of sad intent, when can so be also good with Wutong one well! Great father-in-law Sir, actually do you when come?

“The Star Lou Empire that side I had greeted, Duke White Tiger listened to your judgment, thinks that has the possibility very much. But Shrek, he also thinks very importantly. Therefore, dispatched part of elite to come. But that side the defense line is also takes strict precautions against to cling to tenaciously. On the other hand, the Star Lou Empire overall strength is very strong. If the Sun-Moon Empire aspect is not attack whole-heartedly, is not necessarily able to flatter. He also makes me bring well to you. I told him us in the destruction that Sun-Moon Empire was. Duke White Tiger said that he also thinks, looked the having something pointed attack can do. Cannot so be passive.”

“Um. First Senior Brother, basic is now clear. The target in Sun-Moon Empire aspect is Dou Ling Empire, therefore I planned that goes to that side Dou Ling Empire to walk with Wutong. If can bump into Dou Ling Empire that side Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp, gives them to deal a head-on blow. Three Soul Engineer Corp I have made them return to Shrek City, tomorrow will start to deploy troops for defense, here gave you.”

Beibei looks at Huo Yuhao saying: “Little Junior Brother, heard that you did break through? Titled Douluo?”

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “Completes by luck, First Senior Brother felt relieved that has Wutong and I in the same place, even if the matter may not be, our whole bodies return do not have any issue.”

Beibei nodded, said: “Does not have anything not to feel relieved that to your me, Academy gives us. However, are you extremely weak, making Sanshi they go with you together?”

Huo Yuhao thinks that said: “Academy should be safe, good, I called Third Senior Brother their several people to walk together.”

Beibei said: “now wants?”

Huo Yuhao nodded, “time did not wait for the person, that side Sun-Moon Empire certainly already to start, we more early, might prevent them on exceed.”

He too understood Ju Zi(orange), although Ju Zi(orange) told him the goal, but, the plan of Ju Zi(orange) already had launched without a doubt, perhaps shortly after the Dou Ling Empire that side elite proleg just walked, attack of Sun-Moon Empire from another direction. Border line that before Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire bordered on was so long, the Sun-Moon Empire aspect, can launch the offensive from any direction to Dou Ling Empire, was not good to resist.

Beibei said: “You planned that whom leads to walk?”

Huo Yuhao [say / way] without hesitation: “Third Senior Brother and Fourth Senior Sister, in addition Ji brother, Ye Guyi and Nan Qiuqiu. The people are too many are not good. Several of us should be OK. Second Senior Brother remains to assist Teacher Xuan to manufacture Soul Guidance Device, he does not go, Fifth Senior Sister also stays behind, avoid they each other are very anxious.”

“Good, such has decided that we called the person together.”

Soul Master is in meditate luckily in the evening most of the time, therefore, does not exist to harass person of clear dream matter. After the quarter, the people who Huo Yuhao formerly said were said.

Huo Yuhao called to prepare ready Tang Wutong again, has not led the people to fly to depart directly together, but opened Gate of the Dead, has delivered to them undead Demi-plane, making them continue to practice in the undead Demi-plane camp. He flies, having an everybody getting-off speed is being much quicker, moreover like this rests in undead Demi-plane, everybody can also guarantee the optimum condition as far as possible.

Huo Yuhao said goodbye to Beibei, has not actually reported to Academy the trip of situations, soars once more, directly soars the Dou Ling Empire direction to fly.

Flies into the upper air, Huo Yuhao closes double pupil, Spiritual Power is assigned away from the capital, adopts the Spiritual Detection sensation completely all of outside. The flight for him, could not constitute now any consumes. Even he can also rest and realize from experience in entire flight.

From the sky flew, making his feeling to the space more profound. The flying speed increases unceasingly at the same time, he also unceasing was trying to find out in the entire flight the change as well as the space to the transformation of that body induces.

Actually was Dou Ling Empire where attacked? As outstanding individual who Ultimate Soldier Plan trains only, Dou Ling Empire main cities position as well as approximate map all in the Huo Yuhao mind.

Approaches Shrek Academy definitely is not the suitable breach, may encounter here anytime to Dou Ling Empire elite. The analysis here from the rationality, should be is away from the farther the better. Dou Ling Empire is bounteous, did this look for from where by oneself? Should better or wants some accurate news be good.

-----------------------------------------------------

Over the two days was repaired by the therapist, when the therapist I massaged the stiff back and neck, always said that was enduring, will be very pain, I helped you download!

I listen quite panic-stricken......, Unloads and downloads......, I am also living fortunately, I suppressed to support.

Now the cervical vertebra and back, did not carry on the physical therapy unable to sit still. But I will shoulder! Certain! I gather the strength, next month, will be our peerless Tang Sect last moon/month, I as far as possible will be many select, put together a monthly ticket! Everybody also gathers strength with me!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-566-part-2





Volume 12

#566 - My Goal Is To Fight Under The Spirit


Huo Yuhao now Spiritual Power, although can cover very wide scope, but this covering eventually is limited, impossible to complete the reconnaissance to a border of country in a short time.

Flies in airborne, he also looked out a Star Dou Forest direction. In the heart mused how did not know Beast God Di Tian and these Evil Soul Master battles. Looking from the heart of hearts, he hopes actually Beast God Di Tian wins.

Although Di Tian must cope with him, but Di Tian starting point for the Star Dou Forest destiny and his oneself, but these Evil Soul Master wanted hateful many. If Evil Soul Master dies in his hands, oneself were actually convenient.

This time rescues Dou Ling Empire first, if rescues successfully, comes back also really to consider the suggestion of Ju Zi(orange), if strikes to kill Xu Tianran to trade ten years of peace, was one is greatly meddlesome. Now the Sun-Moon Empire army, truly is not any country can block. The Ju Zi(orange) choice is stationed outside Shrek City, a goal is for the recuperation. She must attack, any place will lose seriously. Perhaps what she said is real, in war, she also at avoid as much as possible casualties.

Thinks of Ju Zi(orange), some Huo Yuhao big, Ju Zi(orange) became more and more fearful, now completely is sly commander. But was not initial that Senior Sister.

Shrek Academy situated in original Sky Soul, Dou Ling and places of Star Luo three countries connection, therefore quick Huo Yuhao entered in Dou Ling Empire. Flew shortly, he had discovered these Dou Ling Empire come the Shrek City reenforcement elite as well as the army. Takes a broad view to look, does not have the edge boundlessly!

He could not prevent these armies to enter Shrek City, can only extend their reversed direction flight, following the Dou Ling Empire border line, continuously to north. This direction, is easiest to discover the enemy.

Sun-Moon Empire big camp.

Orders issue from commander tent unceasingly, outermost Sun-Moon Empire army two wing two Soul Guidance Array moved taking advantage of the dim light of night quietly. After they leave the camp, prompts forward ten li (0.5km) slowly, is then stationed, assembles.

After two Soul Guidance Array complete the assembly. Also is two.

When dawn. Outside Sun-Moon Empire army camp. 12 Soul Guidance Array assemblies have been completed. The Sun-Moon Empire army sets out once more, moves ahead ten li (0.5km).

From Shrek Academy. Only remains 90 li (0.5km) to be away from.

Without any warning, does not have any attack. But such moves ahead ten li (0.5km) motion, lets entire Shrek City unconscious is anxious.

In the Shrek City top, the Shrek City defense force has prepared for momentarily greeted attack. Three Soul Engineer Corp that Huo Yuhao leaves behind. As well as they the Soul Guidance Array equipment that has from Sun-Moon Empire, rapid in the Shrek City north city jamb to starting arrangement. Various types of commodities fast are also shipping.

Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire first batch of reenforcement arrived, after listening, the Shrek Academy aspect dispatches. At this time, two Great Emperor national capitals have chosen to the Shrek Academy absolute trust, reenforcement elite that will send, all gives the Academy control.

In history, more than 4000 years ago. Finally when facing the Sun-Moon Continent decisive battle is so, overcomes the enemy, made Sun-Moon Continent turn into Douluo Continent part thoroughly.

After 4000 today, this as if must repeat. Dou Ling or Star Luo. Two Great Emperor national capitals hope that Shrek Academy can reappear the initial magnificence. Hits this biggest enemy thoroughly remnantly. Naturally, Sky Soul Empire final remnants of defeated troops. They have also been ready. Can recover the homeland, as if in this at one fell swoop.

However, the attack of Sun-Moon Empire has not actually arrived, after moving ahead ten li (0.5km), they maintain the original lineup are being stationed there, the military discipline is prosperous, but actually does not attack, even links an exploratory attack not to have. But, after that several hundred thousand army distances pull closer ten li (0.5km), the oppression strength that brings is different from before.

Some specially formidable installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, if launches from this distance, might cover the Shrek City range. Regarding this, how can Shrek not guard?

Old Xuan as well as Sea God Pavilion Ancient Elder, are the next day high noon knows news that Huo Yuhao vanishes. However, this Huo Yuhao has at least left behind three Soul Engineer Corp.

Old Xuan has to take the rap for him, said to Ancient Elder that was he dispatches Huo Yuhao to complete the secret task.

Old Xuan is also willing to believe that analysis of Huo Yuhao to the Sun-Moon Empire army is correct. But, is related to the Shrek City safety, who dares to bet? At least at present could not have seen that Sun-Moon Empire has the sign that any must withdraw.

From ten days of deadline that initially Ju Zi(orange) said that also had final three days to the present. The atmosphere in Shrek City, is beyond example anxious.

Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire, more and more elite gather in Shrek City, gets ready for action. Everybody was waiting. Numerous Soul Guidance Device of Tang Sect production were also pushed up the top.

When Dou Ling and Star Luo both countries see Shrek Academy three Soul Engineer Corp, the confidence was also fuller several points. They as if saw that the outside Sun-Moon Empire army was hit the remnant appearance.

Ju Zi(orange) sits well in own commander tent, is eating the birdsnest gruel, a leisurely appearance. Regarding last night kidnapping, she as if already had forgotten, does not have any caring.

She does not certainly believe how she told the Huo Yuhao truth to be able. When she just led the army moves to here, that two Soul Engineer Corp already. Now moves has launched inevitably. Yuhao wants to prevent, how possibly with enough time. The key is, oneself moves ahead ten li (0.5km) motion, can make his any explanation the futile effort.

Three days later, Shrek Academy estimated that impossible to hand over Huo Yuhao. Then, again stretched the rules their several day to be good. Waits for Dou Ling Empire elite to obtain domestic news the time, again deceptive attack.

Yuhao Yuhao, in the face of absolute strength, your strength, how can also achieve the degree? However, you also really worthily are the man who I like. At twenty -year-old age, had the present strength, in the future is limitless. If, the future is you and I am ruling Sun-Moon Empire together, this good.

Drinks up the birdsnest gruel, Ju Zi(orange) returns to the big account that oneself rest, sits cross-legged to sit down, starts to practice. But her facial expression also finally becomes gentle.

Yunhan, you fortunately? You may know that mother quite thinks you.

Half evening's time, Huo Yuhao almost flew in the Dou Ling Empire northern border, is relying on the supersonic flying speed. These cruises makes him not have to attain. Had not found any fight the trace.

The defense of Dou Ling Empire in border is quite strict, the entire border, at least stored up over 300,000 armies, moreover now also starts to have various Surveying Soul Guidance Device to appear, although also has no way to compare with Sun-Moon Empire, but generally speaking, several years ago compared has also striven to excel.

Dou Ling Empire had Sky Soul Empire as the natural blockade after all, although on the other hand the national strength is small and weak, but for these years, has not looked like Sky Soul Empire and Star Lou Empire has defended is attacked by Sun-Moon Empire, oneself also very diligently is developing, at least judging from the present situation, is quite good.

Huo Yuhao has flown is away from the Dou Ling Empire northern border not far place, to continue to fly to north again, that may be the Extreme North Tundra category.

Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp is confident, possibly does not launch from that position the attack to Dou Ling Empire is right!

But, this all the way looks like, absolutely does not have any trace of Sun-Moon Empire army to appear. Is this possible? Does Ju Zi(orange) deceive my?

Thinks that this possibility, Huo Yuhao sinks on the heart, if Ju Zi(orange) is deceives own, that will have the big problem. One are impossible the manpower that found her to send out. At this time, what to do did she start to Shrek Academy attacks?

Thinks of here, Huo Yuhao first thinks that immediately returns to Shrek, but, he calms down quickly.

Recalled Ju Zi(orange) to tell itself at that time the expressions of these matter times, as well as then mind fluctuation. Regardless of how Huo Yuhao does not believe that at that time Ju Zi(orange) was deceiving him. All sorts of signs showed that then Ju Zi(orange), said should be the truth. May such being the case, why unable to find Emperor Sun-Moon who Ju Zi(orange) sends out ** team? Did these armies, actually arrive where?

Has not continued to fly again, Huo Yuhao thought one must be calm first. He from the airborne landing, falls in the ground, sits cross-legged to sit down, in the eye is revealing the color of thinking.

He in view of Ju Zi(orange), if one, will be what kind of?

The armies suppress, making Dou Ling and Star Luo both countries have to rescue Shrek Academy, in this case, is what kind of attack, regarding Star Lou Empire or Dou Ling Empire is most fatal?

In order to guarantee the front military strength is powerful, Ju Zi(orange) is impossible to send out too many armies, but in fact, the news that must come looking from the Sky Soul Empire remnants of defeated troops, the strength that currently in the Ju Zi(orange) hand grasps, as if has not reduced. In other words, the ordinary army had almost not been sent out.

As the matter stands, own guess should be completely correct, Ju Zi(orange) sends, has Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp. Each Soul Engineer Corp is several hundred people, in several hundred thousand people of armies certainly common. Moreover they walked, does not affect the arrangement of Soul Guidance Array place.

If Soul Engineer Corp, the strength somewhat is possibly insufficient, therefore, two to three Soul Engineer Corp, is most possible. But, why these haven't Soul Engineer Corp attacked the border? The Dou Ling Empire border defense line is very complete, without any attacked sign. What they dispatch the Shrek Academy aspect is elite, but good of border defense also guarantee. Best situation that this has been able to achieve. Even if Huo Yuhao this looks that thought one are somewhat has groundless fears.

----------------------------------------------

Needs everybody to select the recommendation ticket to support! Was right, I had with everybody has said that did our peerless Tang Sect cartoon pamphlet fifth volume of nation go on the market? Hey. Has the thing to deliver, concrete is anything, oneself have a look.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-566-part-3





Volume 12

#567 - The Decapitation Strike Of Livelihood Empire


But, in his heart restless actually became more and more intense. His oneself has Power of Destiny that Three Eyed Golden Lion hands down from generation to generation, to the sensation of destiny is very keen, whenever he has now this feeling time, certainly will have the matter to occur.

Actually was?

Huo Yuhao has patted own forehead, if are Ju Zi(orange), to choose actually?

Two Soul Engineer Corp words, the breakthrough, breaks through the Dou Ling Empire border defense line forcefully, is that also useful? The following army support, has not seized the city unable to hold. After all, Soul Engineer Corp is strong, manpower is actually limited!

In situation that in this type can only destroy......

Wait / Etc.! Only can destroy.

Suddenly, the Huo Yuhao heart has contracted suddenly, he has thought suddenly a possibility, he in some time ago just had made the possibility.

Yes! Situation that Ju Zi(orange) faces now, before leads three Soul Engineer Corp to be how similar at the matter that in Sun-Moon Empire handles?

What is different is only Ju Zi(orange) here Soul Engineer Corp is impossible to have the ability of stealth, but must discuss the battle efficiency, what if she sends out is Soul Engineer Corp of Hand of the National Protector rank, perhaps must above oneself that three Soul Engineer Corp.

In border, defense of Dou Ling Empire, although is good, but meets that rank Soul Engineer Corp, must say that dodges their airborne Surveying Soul Guidance Device, is not impossible. If so......

Huo Yuhao understood suddenly, but while clear, the back instantaneously has also emitted the close cold sweat.

The matter that Ju Zi(orange) handles is actually very simple, she has duplicated herself at the matter that in Sun-Moon Empire handles. She will not make that two Soul Engineer Corp attack and destroy everywhere, creates scared to Dou Ling Empire. Because two Soul Engineer Corp islands of resistance are thorough, in not that undead Demi-plane and so on under the ability protection, will always be exterminated.

However, if does her goal have one? Or. Has a city? Also can be what kind of situation?

The Huo Yuhao back cold sweat remained. Right, certainly.

The Ju Zi(orange) goal, is the Dou Ling Empire capital city! Huo Yuhao soaring without hesitation, speed instantaneously suddenly to increase to the quickest speed that oneself can be. Directly soars the Dou Ling Empire capital direction to go.

Also has anything to be broken compared with the Dou Ling Empire capital. Dou Ling Empire was Imperial Family completely annihilated regarding Dou Ling Empire attacks a more terrorist matter?

One attempted such to do in Sun-Moon Empire, but were defeated. But. This time, Dou Ling Empire has dispatched Shrek City own elite, internal capital certainly will also be very void, the powerhouses left. Why do they resist the surprise attacks of two Soul Engineer Corp?

Ju Zi(orange) Ju Zi(orange), you were really too fearful!

In the Huo Yuhao heart, had the intense murderous intention to Ju Zi(orange) once again. The Ju Zi(orange) strategy, seems is very each time direct, but actually that fatal.

Acceleration that Huo Yuhao goes all out, his personal appearance in airborne simply looks like together the flowing light. Occasionally will penetrate in the space, never the distant place drills again. The rapidness of speed. Resounds sonic bangs from the sky unceasingly.

Huo Yuhao understands that own opportunity were actually not many. If Ju Zi(orange) before this time goes to Shrek City already layout. Soul Engineer Corp that then, she sends out regardless of quantity many, after submerging Dou Ling Empire. Has enough time to go to the Dou Ling Empire capital.

They cannot certainly have that rapid speed like themselves in Sun-Moon Empire within the boundaries. But, is that also what kind of? Regarding them, now such speed was enough. They only need disguise in the ground to change costume, through some quite secret way, goes to Dou Ling Empire capital Spirit Dou City.

Dou Ling Empire aspect, although developed the Soul Guidance Device speed to be quick in these years, but the upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device science and technology they must fall behind are too many, was impossible to achieve Sun-Moon Empire such completely to arrange on massive upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device the capital around.

Can aim at the tactic of Dou Ling Empire capital is too many, are too really many. Huo Yuhao self-examines, if in the hand present two Soul Engineer Corp, can find out several means to aim at the Dou Ling Empire capital to launch the attack, moreover absolutely is ruinous.

Carries out this task, Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp must carry nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely. But Dou Ling Empire capital, why also to resist such attack?

Huo Yuhao is flying rapidly, while has closed the double pupil. Since one continuously, in tactic, but also loses to Ju Zi(orange)!

If can early think of these, this good?

Dou Ling Empire so, that side Star Lou Empire? We hope that Ju Zi(orange) has not deceived me, has not aimed at Star Lou Empire to take such action similarly.

However, that side Star Lou Empire, at least also has oneself that father. Even if Imperial Family except for the issue, so long as there is a Duke White Tiger in this armed forces the pillar, temporarily will not be chaotic. Therefore, the choice of Ju Zi(orange) yes right, sends out fatally in view of Dou Ling Empire strikes, can let the Dou Ling Empire interior confusion absolutely. At that time. Her goal can be......

Thinks through an issue, then a series of issues also understood.

The Ju Zi(orange) true target, is Star Lou Empire! Dou Ling Empire civil strife, Dou Ling Empire army naturally must return to the interior, anything compared with stabilizing an internal more important matter.

But in this case, Star Lou Empire put the surface to be short of the natural ally, but Ju Zi(orange) can also attack Star Lou Empire whole-heartedly.

So long as hits Star Lou Empire, what Dou Ling Empire is? Casual what kind, can make them submit.

Star Lou Empire itself borders on with Sun-Moon Empire! Huo Yuhao even thinks that at some critical moments, Sun-Moon Empire most formidable Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp appears that side Bright Struggle Mountain Range, the both sides converging attack, how should Star Lou Empire resist?

He does not have the answer, because this radically is a dead end. The Ju Zi(orange) overall strategy, the clear appearance in the Huo Yuhao brain, has been possible at this moment, he actually unable to find out the law of dealing completely . Moreover, he thought that he was slow, knows was also too late.

Now in any event, must go to Spirit Dou City, if also with enough time, even if rescues some Heaven Dou Empire Imperial Family to be also good.

The Huo Yuhao speed was too fast, his daybreak still in the Dou Ling Empire border, may work as Sun to rise truly from the distant place. He penetrated Dou Ling Empire, was away from Spirit Dou City to be getting more and more near.

But also at this time, Huo Yuhao felt the fierce Soul Power fluctuation that the distant place has transmitted unceasingly.

Really, really I guessed right.

Huo Yuhao acceleration once more without hesitation. By far. Spirit Dou City was already in sight, but. When Huo Yuhao looks out into the distance, sees Spirit Dou City time, in his heart actually cannot help but raises a despair.

The Spirit Dou City direction, he sees clearly. Is the thick smoke of shooting up to the sky, that thick smoke is not 12 flames can produce definitely, seems, is entire Spirit Dou City is burning unexpectedly likely, this was really too fearful.

The fierce Soul Power fluctuation is transmitting from that direction as before unceasingly, the distance is nearer, Huo Yuhao even heard the intermittent bellow.

Huo Yuhao also knows the Spirit Dou City exact location. But where actually does not know the Spirit Dou City imperial palace. But judging from the present situation, entire Spirit Dou City as if burns, does that imperial palace have the possibility of escaping by luck?

Answer without doubt negative, Huo Yuhao pain has closed eyes. One late come one eventually!

But also flickers below, when his again opening eyes pupil, in the double pupil, sends out the intense murderous intention.

Personal appearance suddenly to dodge, the body of Huo Yuhao cuts the expansive sky, falls in the Spirit Dou City direction., He noticed from afar the massive forms glitter in the thick smoke. He saw familiar blue form, one type form that is glittering dark yellow.

Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp. Good Ju Zi(orange), she to send out, is really Sun-Moon Empire Hand of the National Protector. Another Soul Engineer Corp should. Dark yellow Soul Guidance Device equipment, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp? Emperor Dragon of head of four big Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp?

Huo Yuhao clenches the teeth, in the double pupil full is the cold severe color. Spiritual Detection launches fully, has covered toward entire Spirit Dou City.

Since was unable to prevent, takes revenge for the ghosts that Spirit Dou City died!

In Spiritual Detection under covers covers, Huo Yuhao discovered quickly that in being away from Spirit Dou City approximately inside and outside 30, in common woods, the scale quite not small Soul Guidance Array arrangement is completed.

The scale of this Soul Guidance Array place, at least is three times of ordinary Sun-Moon Empire Soul Guidance Array place, he can look through Spiritual Detection, here Soul Guidance Device, is Sun-Moon Empire is absolutely most advanced.

The Soul Guidance Array arrangement here, without a doubt, this should be they launches the place that the attack most starts, in the meantime, when then they retreat best barrier.

Completes to the attack of Spirit Dou City, what even if were loses such Soul Guidance Array and were considered as?

First is cut off their rear guards.

Through Spiritual Detection, the Huo Yuhao accurate feeling, in this Soul Guidance Array, 50 Soul Engineer stations. Moreover is ajar the linkage defense guard shield. Once the front war is disadvantageous, them can also play the defense role.

Worthily is Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, fight experience truly is rich, gave back to itself to leave behind the full retreating resources.

However, since they run into me, then,......

Huo Yuhao floating falls, in distance that Soul Guidance Array not far away, opened own Gate of the Dead quietly, has released several companions.

Confesses anything to them without enough time, under their gazes, Huo Yuhao flushed.

Extreme Ice Battle God Armor takes possession instantaneously, dark blue ray integrates Huo Yuhao within the body just like the flowing light generally.

A personal appearance show, he arrived at that Soul Guidance Array neighbor, through Imitation Soul Ability protection these Soul Guidance Array in Soul Engineer cannot discover his form through Surveying Soul Guidance Device.

The quiet blue ray flashes through together quietly, the ray is not strong, even is it can be said that slender. But also flickers below, Huo Yuhao had wormed one's way into from Soul Guidance Protective Cover quietly.

The grating alarm sound in resounds in Soul Guidance Array, but, are all these also useful?

Entered the linkage defense guard shield, let alone is 50 Soul Engineer, even if again elite Soul Engineer, facing angry Eye of Asura, can only resist blindly.

Linkage defense guard shield that cuts the half-open position, Huo Yuhao uses is not Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife, but is Demonic Engraving God Knife.

Demonic Engraving God Knife has the formidable destructive effect regarding any energy body and object, this point, even must surpass Sword of Life.

Relies on the portray of Demonic Engraving God Knife, Huo Yuhao is breaking in outrageously, his Spiritual Detection already grasped the position that inside all Soul Master were.

The personal appearance dodges, he toward a direction flushed.

In the alarm sound, inside 50 Soul Engineer all responded that various Soul Guidance Device ray twinkles, Surveying Soul Guidance Device, seeks for the direction that the warning is transmitting particularly comprehensively.

Was Soul Guidance Protective Cover broken? This makes all guarding Soul Engineer have a bewildered feeling. In their opinion, even if Transcendent Douluo is impossible to break ajar Soul Guidance Protective Cover! Moreover, their Surveying Soul Guidance Device did not have any induction before, was this possible?

Then they saw the Huo Yuhao form, Huo Yuhao appeared outrageously, has not hidden own whereabouts through Imitation Soul Ability again, because has not needed.

The Soul Guidance Array interior also similarly has the Soul Guidance Device protection, feared that was penetrated.

Huo Yuhao appears the personal appearance, immediately ten several Soul Guidance Ray shoot to him. These Soul Guidance Ray are very sinister and ruthless, has the ordinary hard radiation and scalding hot beam, but also hides together is seeming common, actually destructive power greatly strengthened decomposition beam.

However, regarding these attacks, Huo Yuhao is actually evades does not evade, whatever they fall on themselves.

In front of Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, these Soul Guidance Ray link ripples unable to arouse. The Huo Yuhao right hand from the sky makes the movement that empty presses, in the eye golden light dodges.

A series of “Bang and Bang”sound gets up, from Huo Yuhao recent seven and eight Soul Engineer explode the head instantaneously. Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power sufficiently compares favorably with any Limit Douluo now, although these Soul Engineer are the Hand of the National Protector members, but also is cultivating of four, five rings is, in front of his Soul Burst, simply looks like general that the paper sticks.

Is centered on the Huo Yuhao body, a Absolute intense chill in the air spreads toward the surroundings, has almost covered in a flash the entire camp.

In the camps, these are trying to launch the attack to him Soul Engineer, side that in this presents suddenly cold front, has to stimulate to movement Soul Power, whole-heartedly resists the tremendous blow that this chill in the air brings.

Repair to lowly, is only during several breath, turned into the ice sculpture, cultivates to be high, extremely cold under was limited the motion in this.

--------------------------------------------------

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket! 4000 character big chapters. Right, yesterday I in our prestige - in platform sent us to dazzle the drawing of world Tang Sect Corporation, everybody was interested to have a look. We dazzle world Tang Sect, is our Tang Sect entity shop. Later mainly makes the electricity business, sells our Tang Sect books, peripheral product. The peripheral product will develop one after another.

Everybody interested words, can pay attention to our washing now first, treasure, shop, in shop there search: Dazzles world Tang Sect, can find. The shop is manufacturing tight, it is expected that at the end of the month, can meet with everybody officially.

Purchases our legal copy books, we have the present to bestow, moreover we ensure in the future will be the entire net first quick. The guarantee enables everybody to buy our books and cartoons from our bookstores first.

Joins our prestige - platform examines the corporate site, everybody transmits: Dazzles world Tang Sect Corporation, then.

Joins the platform to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is our families!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-567





Volume 12

#568 - Surprise Attack In Cloud Of Smoke Float Over


Huo Yuhao has not initiated Ice Explosion Technique, because now and often initiates the Ice Explosion Technique good time, this Soul Guidance Array Soul Guidance Device is very advanced, destroys one, is not the small losses. How the watermark advertisement test watermark advertisement tests that side the Dou Ling Empire imperial palace not to know the situation, can reduce some losses, is.

One step steps forward, Huo Yuhao personal appearance strange disappearance when Soul Guidance Array, appears again, already 200 meters away, by Soul Guidance Array in giant Soul Guidance Device.

The form also happen to flushed together from that giant Soul Guidance Device at this time. Sees Huo Yuhao, he stares first, lifts the hand is together Soul Guidance Ray releases toward Huo Yuhao.

This person is at present Soul Guidance Array most powerhouse, is a strength achieves eight levels of Soul Engineer powerhouses.

Huo Yuhao coldly snorted, basic, no matter that [say / way] eight levels of Soul Guidance Ray, on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, are only flood dark blue halos, the Soul Guidance Ray destructive power completely was melted. But the right hand of Huo Yuhao has laid out. The dark golden light blade edge delimits the startled day rainbow, has covered the body of that eight levels of Soul Engineer instantaneously.

golden light shines, Paragon Protecting Cover. Eight levels of Soul Engineer maintaining life methods already quite rich, this is no exception.

Who although he cannot see Huo Yuhao is, but by him the status in Sun-Moon Empire, Humanoid Soul Guidance Device has seen, Xuan imposing manner that at present this person sends out, is not he can contend. After Paragon Protecting Cover opening, front Soul Guidance Thruster also opens, personal appearance flying upside down, wants to run.

What a pity, next one flickers, his always proud seven levels of Paragon Protecting Cover actually directly crash in the ground.

The defense of Paragon Protecting Cover truly is good, but, tremendous strength his pounding maliciously in ground. Moreover the Paragon Protecting Cover surface, presented five astonishing fissures unexpectedly, may want to shatter unexpectedly anytime.

Five cold currents also to rush forth from the fissure enter along with it. This eight levels of Soul Engineer hurry to release their Soul Guidance Protective Cover. What a pity, Huo Yuhao will not have given him again any opportunity.

Tip of the toe in ground. Huo Yuhao arrived in front of his Paragon Protecting Cover, left hand very simple presses on Paragon Protecting Cover, then Huo Yuhao turns around to walk.

Golden Paragon Protecting Cover turned into ice blue color, that in Paragon Protecting Cover. The whole body is completely stiff. Also changed into an ice sculpture.

Emperor's Palm, Great Coldness Snow!

Even if Paragon Protecting Cover. It is not able to prevent the Great Coldness Snow Absolute chill in the air. After having second Soul Nucleus, Huo Yuhao Absolute Ice finally accomplishment. When this Emperor's Palm, had Snow Emperor in the past the heyday elegant demeanor.

Spiritual Detection covers the entire Soul Guidance Array place, has not discovered any living witness again. Huo Yuhao arrives in the key station rapidly. Simultaneously takes back own Absolute Ice chill in the air, opened Soul Guidance Protective Cover, puts outside partners.

“Third Senior Brother, you remain behind this Soul Guidance Array place. Turns on here linkage defense guard shield, when I come back. Wutong, you follow me, we arrive in front Spirit Dou City to have a look. Sun-Moon Empire dispatched two Soul Engineer Corp to sneak attack Spirit Dou City. Now fears the situation not to be good.”

Spoke these words fast, Huo Yuhao holds up the hand of Tang Wutong, jumps rapidly, goes in the Spirit Dou City direction.

They hand in hand. First felt that incorrect is Tang Wutong. The Tang Wutong surprised discovery, own Soul Power actually did not have the means with Soul Power of Huo Yuhao to fuse like before mutually, converges Hao Dong Power.

Huo Yuhao Soul Power as if turned into solid, keeping her Soul Power from permeating.

Huo Yuhao controls the personal appearance to fly to Spirit Dou City, while explained at present own Soul Power condition to her.

Tang Wutong knits the brows: “That said that later I must have the Yin-Yang to balance second Soul Nucleus, can use Hao Dong Power with you once more?”

Huo Yuhao shakes the head saying: “I do not know. After all, I am human first have the Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus person. Also how can with my once more Martial Soul Fusion that you adjust, later we attempt slowly. Our Martial Soul Fusion techniques should be able to use.”

“Um.”At this time obviously did not discuss this issue, the free time of speech, they arrived at sky over Spirit Dou City.

In Spirit Dou City, many are on fire, particularly approaches that side the central area, the flame soars to the heavens, that side anything that the rich smog covers up cannot see.

The heart of Huo Yuhao, sank to valley, although could not see, but his Spiritual Detection can actually feel clearly! In that side, over 300 meters in diameter giant gulf has extended about 50 meters to the ground. In gulf range, regardless of there is anything to construct, already changed into the powder powder. But from that gulf surrounding construction, that place, is the Spirit Dou City imperial palace is likely at!

Good ruthless Sun-Moon Empire, good ruthless Evil Tyrant and Emperor Dragon two big Soul Engineer Corp. You such being the case are vicious, that do not blame me not being impolite.

Spiritual Power erupts suddenly, he before broke through that side Soul Guidance Array place, Spiritual Detection has been covering here, all Emperor Dragon and Evil Tyrant two Soul Engineer Corp members all in his searching observed in the range.

These Soul Engineer have not known that their rear position was broken through. At this time is wreaking havoc in Spirit Dou City crazily.

The effective strength in Spirit Dou City aspect as if already by their to get rid of was similar, before shelled imperial palace that was nine levels installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to achieve inevitably surely. Now these two Soul Engineer Corp Soul Master, unscrupulous wantonly attacks in the city. Especially seeks for Soul Master and Soul Engineer to start.

However, they although now is rampant, but is not negligent. Is every ten Soul Engineer gathers, acts in unison, runs into the match who dares to revolt against, all launches the attack immediately fully, kills it. Meanwhile in the city in some big projects launches the offensive, its destruction, manufacture confusion.

In city, Spirit Dou City city defense force, although the population are many, but the genuine powerhouse are not many. Dou Ling Empire elite Soul Master, all arrived at that side Shrek City. Remains in the Spirit Dou City powerhouse, majority in imperial palace. The imperial palace was exploded. The loss is serious. This little while where can gather resists two Soul Engineer Corp strengths!

Then, the time that Emperor Dragon and Evil Tyrant two Soul Engineer Corp bear patiently is quite not short. They seek for the Dou Ling Empire reconnaissance the scotoma, sneaks quietly its within the boundaries. Does not dare after the big city, to look for the wilderness open country to march forward, by its own Surveying Soul Guidance Device little explorer. Arrives around Spirit Dou City with great difficulty. Happen to starts today.

If Huo Yuhao late comes a double-hour again, perhaps they must retire after meritorious service.

The Huo Yuhao mind big net opens, is drawing Tang Wutong, is hidden in the smog quietly. Is relying on Imitation Soul Ability, they did not fear that was discovered.

One team of Soul Engineer rapid before their bodies not far away passed over gently and swiftly. The Huo Yuhao thought moves, they followed with Tang Wutong.

This Soul Engineer belongs to Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp, in four Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, the Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp speed is quickest. Huo Yuhao also most hates them. Initially besieged him and Wang Qiu'er, isn't this Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp? If not for they, Wang Qiu'er also not necessarily must offer sacrifices.

The personal enemy meets particularly is jealous, Huo Yuhao simply does not have any stay, the right hand to wield, hundred meters huge Dark Gold Terror Claw across the sky passed over gently and swiftly in the smog together.

These Soul Engineer basic responses do not have, was patted by Dark Gold Terror Claw. Although they have the four rings above strength. The body is carrying triggering Defensive Soul Guidance Device. But, cultivates for is really bad was too far. Does not have in the linkage Soul Guidance Device situation, these four rings and five rings Soul Master, possibly in front of Titled Douluo rampant?

The smog became Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong best concealing. Strikes successfully, ten Soul Engineer die. Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong once more seek for peripheral zone next group of Soul Engineer.

These two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer are very strong, if makes them gather, displays the linkage defense and linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device, even if Huo Yuhao present cultivating to also can only flee to the wilderness.

What a pity, they were too arrogant. They break through Spirit Dou City already sometime, before collaborated, to get rid of in Spirit Dou City almost all top powerhouses. Seven Titled Douluo rank powerhouses died under their linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device. Later they disperse, battlefield cleanup.

Don't forget, these Soul Engineer have Storage Soul Guidance Device, but here is the Dou Ling Empire palace wall capital, does not grab turns, how they can repress.

Greedy is the pardoned crime. Because is greedy, they do not know one became the killed object.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection in the role that this time can play is really too big. He does not bump these strengths to surpass seven rings above Soul Engineer, looks for the surrounding to cultivate for low Soul Engineer specially starts.

What pursue is strikes to kill. Does not give the match to hit back and inform the opportunity of one's own side.

It is not Dark Gold Terror Claw is Soul Shaking Burst. From beginning to end, Tang Wutong has not even gotten rid.

The free time of a while, Huo Yuhao successively has cut to kill more than 200 two big Soul Engineer Corp members.

Must know that Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp chooses Soul Engineer is extremely severe, not only wants the strength to be enough, but also is young and has the potential, in addition assiduously trains, is selective later can be selected.

Each Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp normal official fight Soul Engineer, has 300 people. Huo Yuhao on such a while, on to get rid of most Soul Engineer Corp, in addition, in the Soul Guidance Array that side 50 people.

Emperor Dragon and Evil Tyrant two Soul Engineer Corp already buckle about half.

But also at this time, two Soul Engineer Corp leaders finally discovered that is not right. Because many subordinates cannot relate.

---------------------------------------------------

The peerless Tang Sect cartoon 129 issues, everybody transmits: Peerless Tang Sect 129, in our prestige - platform consults. Looked that Huo Yuhao first time fights with Wang Dong!

Joins the platform to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is our families.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-568-part-1





Volume 12

#568 - In Surprise Attack In Cloud Of Smoke Float Over


Before they also in stimulated of grabbing, but Soul Engineer Corp was not big, population also these. But here is the domain of enemy. Therefore they are quite careful, after a period of time, will relate team leader of each squad, thus confirmed everybody's position.

However, when they start to relate once more, the surprised discovery, many squads have not actually replied, lost trace unexpectedly likely.

Two Soul Engineer Corp heads these may fear, immediately issues the order, in upper air set. Inventory population.

In Spirit Dou City, at this time is one piece in confusion, the city defense force is resisting the attack of Soul Engineer blindly, in the city everywhere is the crying bugle call and confusion. Each family close the door. But no one knows when will have a Soul Guidance Cannon ball to fall in own family|home. The wall, cannot take to them any security sense.

In this time, the attack was stopping suddenly, forms, fly in the upper air direction. Obviously must gather.

“They discovered probably.”Tang Wutong said in the Huo Yuhao ear in a low voice.

Huo Yuhao smiles cold, said: “Soul Engineer Corp gathers, is extremely formidable existence, once disperses, then, is their ends. These Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer has achieved too many success, so will be arrogant. But is arrogant, is loses their life the important reason. We walk. Let us completely finish them, takes revenge to the people who Dou Ling Empire died.”

At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao holds the hand of Tang Wutong to skyrocket, the personal appearance toward airborne flies like lightning.

Under the cover of Imitation Soul Ability, he and Tang Wutong change into the air completely, arrives in the assembly place that they have ordered compared with these Soul Engineer quickly.

Huo Yuhao sees, float six Soul Engineer in midair.

According to the establishment of Sun-Moon Empire Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, each Soul Engineer Corp has three expert regiment chief, two.

At present these should and that's the end. Two expert regiment chief, are nine levels of Soul Engineer cultivates is, another four assistant regimental commanders, is eight levels of Soul Engineer. Before Huo Yuhao in Soul Guidance Array that side to get rid of eight levels of Soul Engineer, this motion, these two Soul Engineer Corp absolutely had still been have said is elite performs.

Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, is waiting for silently.

At this time, had many Soul Engineer from below to fly, toward here gathers, but.

Huo Yuhao has not moved, as before and Tang Wutong on silently in that several Soul Engineer Corp expert regiment chief nearby not far away.

That six vice- are the complexion of regimental commanders is becoming more and more ugly, does not have no way ugly, flew the population that to be really short from below were too many. Moreover is few of an entire squad and entire squad.

These squads, even links a sound not to send out.

Evil Tyrant Commander Soul Engineer Corp named Xia Xuanchen, he replaced initial Mad Bull Douluo Wang Yiheng. After Wang Yiheng the Tang Sect people collaborate to get rid of, he by assistant regimental commander originally rose. The strength compares in the Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp regimental commander wants inferior many.

“Old Xu, the situation is not a little right! Perhaps we bump into the hard stubble. How has the person been short of these many?”

Was called Old Xu by him, is Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp Xu Tianyuan, this person is Imperial Family. Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp is in itself controls by numerous Imperial Family members, but actually completely does not obey emperor's order, is a strongest strength that the Imperial Family ancestor and relative controls.

Xu Tianyuan is also Imperial Family, from rank, he is Emperor Sun-Moon Empire the Xu Tianran clansman. May in fact, the age be much bigger than Xu Tianran. In the entire Sun-Moon Empire Imperial Family ancestor and relative status very high one. Otherwise his impossible control Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp.

The Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp strength is next to Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, absence of one word, but actually subordinates in the different influences.

Imperial Family ancestor and relative when some specific, the strength specially will be formidable, when for example numerous imperial princes compete for the throne.

However, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp is quite always neutral, never favors any imperial prince, the status of this neutrality, made them exist. They only serve the emperor's clan benefit.

“It is not right. How to have been short of that many people? Can be has forgotten the discipline that these young bastards grab?”After he said this possibility, did not believe including oneself some.

The Xia Xuanchen forced smile said: “Is unlikely. Even if they have grabbed, will unable to contact the communication. team leader of various squads, but also is insufficient so to be shortsighted.”

Xu Tianyuan nodded, sinking sound track: “If nobody gathers again, we turn on the linkage defense guard shield to retreat. This our goal was also in any case completed.”

Xia Xuanchen has hesitated, said: “But, has been short of that many brothers.”

Xu Tianyuan clenches teeth, said: “Enemy, if there is powerhouse to hide in the city, what we can also make? Here is the Dou Ling Empire capital is at surely, believes the matter that the capital is attacked spread. Will have soon the master of Emperor Qin to arrive. Since the goal has been completed, other could not attend, first removed to say again. Safety first.”

“Good.”Although they are Beast King Level Commander Soul Engineer Corp, but in this motion, is actually primarily Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp Xu Tianyuan. Although Xia Xuanchen loves dearly oneself these subordinates, but at this time, only then took the bull by the horns.

Soul Engineer in many of more and more around them gathering.

In this time, some Xu Tianyuan strange feelings, his Xia Xuanchen also similarly is feeling suddenly.

They are nine levels of Soul Engineer, moreover can become Beast King Level Commander Soul Engineer Corp, their respective strengths, even if in nine levels of Soul Engineer is also the outstanding person.

“Be careful.”Xia Xuanchen drinks one lowly, right hand wields, a handle Can's silver war hammer suddenly appears during he grasps, then rumbled toward void.

“Well.”Light well transmits from the air. Bursts out from the nihility to the pale golden little hammer innumerably suddenly, toward expands in all directions.

Under Xia Xuanchen that hammer played the enormous role, the silver light jumps shoots, before these golden light erupt instant, has had certain filtration. However, even if so, he and Xu Tianyuan are simultaneously are also stuffy snort|hum one. Personal appearance flying upside down. All is mouth and nose hemorrhage.

At this time, the strengths of two Beast King Level Commander Soul Engineer Corp appeared, the flash in golden light bang by that inexplicably being presented that Xia Xuanchen and Xu Tianyuan were almost simultaneously the respective racket a oneself chest palm.

A formidable strength bursts out from their Humanoid Soul Guidance Device suddenly. The huge thrust force assumes ring-like promotes outward.

Flying upside down that not only each other promotes them, is similar to arrow Yaichi. Also side several assistant regimental commanders, two Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer that as well as just gathered suddenly promotes, all diverges toward the surrounding. Suddenly, is similar to Heavenly Woman Scattering Flower is unexpectedly ordinary.

Mantra Amidst the Void, Spiritual Tempest!

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong personal appearance appears in air. That struck a moment ago, is their formidable Spiritual Tempest Martial Soul Fusion technique.

However, even if Huo Yuhao cannot think that these Sun-Moon Empire powerhouses' responses so are unexpectedly quick, and has chosen the most correct resistance Spiritual Tempest method.

Formidable repelling force that bursts out from two Commander Soul Engineer Corp, even links him and Tang Wutong certainly is affected. But that more than 300 Soul Engineer are also instantaneous dispersing. Most people have avoided coverage of Spiritual Tempest.

But overwhelming majorities eventually are not complete, in airborne accordingly explodes the head from Core Area territory recent more than 30 Soul Engineer. The bunch blood light erupts from the top of the head, the corpse crashes to go toward below directly.

During four two Soul Engineer Corp assistant regimental commanders, all under that formidable mind impact, fall into to be dizzy. But Xu Tianyuan and Xia Xuanchen do not have. Their Humanoid Soul Guidance Device are nine levels of Soul Guidance Device, has strong defense capability . Moreover, to their this levels, the body is the inevitable equipment resists the mind attack Soul Guidance Device.

Therefore although they bear the brunt, similarly brain dizziness, but finally after sacrificing two precious mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device, has withstood Huo Yuhao and attack of Tang Wutong Spiritual Tempest stiffly.

The Huo Yuhao vision fell on the body of that Xia Xuanchen directly, particularly in his hand above that handle silver hammer.

That silver hammer is not Soul Guidance Device, but is typical Martial Soul. Nine levels of Soul Engineer, unexpectedly when was most essential has used own Martial Soul, this means that not only he Soul Engineer, was Titled Douluo in the true sense.

Sun-Moon Empire, is really the latent talent!

However, Huo Yuhao has not actually stopped, facing several hundred Soul Engineer, stops means that was collaborated to attack by the opposite party. While two Soul Engineer Corp chaotic opportunities. He moved sideways with Tang Wutong instantaneously, first plunged Xia Xuanchen.

Is the formidable enemy, must eliminate on exceed first. Moreover, these two Soul Engineer Corp regimental commanders, can play the enormous amplification role regarding entire Soul Engineer Corp director. Only then strikes to kill them first, can about one step ruin these two Soul Engineer Corp.

When Xia Xuanchen sees the Huo Yuhao look, had guessed correctly oneself is his goal. The body shines intense silver light suddenly, nine levels of Soul Guidance Protective Cover.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong move sideways instantaneously, but, the Tang Wutong body resounds the resonant dragon roar sound, a fist on the bang toward Xia Xuanchen Soul Guidance Protective Cover goes. Huo Yuhao lays out is own left hand.

Their attacks seem that unadorned, but in an instant, the Xia Xuanchen sensation has saved him once more. He feels obviously that in this fist palm is containing extremely terrifying prestige energy. It seems like simple, but made in his heart have the life threatened feeling.

I looked that daily some book friends asked that when the Magic Chef of Ice and Fire apple version can on, I ask game side, at present looks, is about three weeks, the escape version on, the legal copy might be many first time, the apple official verification is quite slow.

The book friends present of Android system can play, was good in our prestige platform that side direct downloading, below has the special button. Brother has practiced our server first, hey! The anticipation flight mount promotes. It is said also has the system of soul chains, soon promoted.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-568-part-2





Volume 12

#568 - Under Surprise Attack In Cloud Of Smoke Float Over


, His whole body ray flamings without hesitation greatly, in both hands, left a crystal stone suddenly. The watermark advertisement test watermark advertisement tests this crystal stone to present is the ellipse, has the baby head size fully. On the crystal stone, has the close trace portray. A appearance, first sends out the extremely powerful dignified aura.

The fist palm of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong almost simultaneously pats above his Soul Guidance Protective Cover. Terrifying Spiritual Power and Soul Power fusion, nine levels of Soul Guidance Protective Cover send out the grating resounding. The crystal stone presented the crack trace. But yellow Golden Dragon overbearing aura that the terrifying Absolute chill in the air as well as in Tang Wutong Radiant Dragon Goddess Butterfly lends, then enters following these cracks crazily.

At this moment, above the crystal stone of that ellipse, bursts out radiant golden light. Strength of the formidable resistance, stiffly flying upside down that backward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong promote. Moreover, gave back to the body of Xia Xuanchen to cover one has been similar to the egg shell general golden color ray.

Sees in the Xia Xuanchen hand the crystal stone, in the Xu Tianyuan eye pupil of distant place revealed the greedy color. He recognizes certainly that is any thing, regarding Soul Engineer, even if nine levels of Soul Engineer, is the absolute most precious objects!

What thing is that?

In the Huo Yuhao heart is surprised immediately, his Absolute Ice has the penetrating power, after the Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus practice is completed, ordinary Soul Guidance Protective Cover could not have blocked this Great Coldness Snow.

However, in a moment ago that flickered, the defensive power that the Xia Xuanchen body bursts out, can actually isolate the Absolute Ice prestige completely outside. Also has had that strong propelling force. This is not general Soul Guidance Device can achieve. Actually is the gadget in his hand what?

“Ring-like linkage, locking!”The Xia Xuanchen rave makes noise.

It seems he resists Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong that strikes very with ease, may in fact the matter, are clearest. If not in the hand this strange egg shell, perhaps in that flickered a moment ago, he had been frozen by Huo Yuhao Absolute Ice. Although was insufficient dead, but the attack of match was impossible such one. When follows to attack the arrival. He is inevitably impossible to escape by luck.

Although takes over the Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp time not to calculate is too long, but prestige of Xia Xuanchen in Soul Engineer Corp is quite high. While his bellowing, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp surplus Soul Engineer opened their linkage Soul Guidance Device rapidly.

This ring-like linkage, specially to cope was broken through by the enemy to the situation of intimate place. Huo Yuhao also has to acknowledge. In the training and direction of Soul Engineer Corp. Sun-Moon Empire leads as before.

The bunch blue color ray shines. Connects a ring rapidly, the intense Soul Power fluctuation also appears.

“Circulant linkage. Defends the guard shield.”Xu Tianyuan that side reaction rate is not slow, similarly has issued the instruction immediately.

The Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp quality in four Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp is highest one, the speed that they start similarly is also quick. The Xu Tianyuan goal is very simple, for must encircles Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong in inside. The linkage defense adds the linkage attack. Even if the match strength is strong, collaborates by their more than 300 Soul Engineer. Hasn't been able to strike to kill these two?

Huo Yuhao sighed one darkly, Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, was not really good to cope! Now looks like, if did not take advantage to strike to kill part of Soul Engineer a moment ago randomly, but also is not really good to start.

The situation in Dou Ling Empire imperial palace was unable to recall now, but in any event. If one also want the means to be separated from the situation of large unit while these two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, annihilates them. But now is not obviously good, two complete the linkage Soul Engineer Corp, even if Limit Douluo. Also can only evade sharply its.

The jet black front door opens quietly, no longer needs the incantation, independent leaf of Gate of the Dead, Huo Yuhao almost can achieve instantaneous.

The hand of Tang Wutong, personal appearance is dodging, they submerge in the front door to disappear do not see.

If runs away, perhaps may also be pursued by the linkage attack, escapes from the linkage defense not necessarily is completely safe. If the linkage attack carries on the range to cover, any invisible Soul Ability will lose the function.

But like Huo Yuhao, escapes into to go to another plane directly, let alone that is at present these two Soul Engineer Corp, even if Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp here, does not have the means with them.

Side flying Xu Tianyuan that Xia Xuanchen has a lingering fear, has wiped the cold sweat on forehead.

“Narrow squeak, that two person strengths strive to excel, what is more fearful, they also meet the stealth ability.”Xia Xuanchen said to Xu Tianyuan.

Xu Tianyuan looked in his hand the elliptic crystal stone, knits the brows: “What I am worried was they just displayed the ability of the fleeing. A aura completely vanished, is Space Power? But, wants to grasp Space Power, should be the Limit Douluo level is good. Did Dou Ling Empire, when have this level powerhouse?”

The Xia Xuanchen forced smile said: “We quickly remove. No matter these two powerhouses come from where, it seems like, we were the brothers who contacted with are do not have. Quickly returns to that side the position, tidies up to walk. Let everybody throughout maintain the linkage defense stance. Avoids being sneak attacked by that two people. We must leave as soon as possible are good.”

“Um.”Nod of Xu Tianyuan deep to be so.

They are the island of resistance are thorough. If in frontal battlefield, even if the enemy is more formidable, is relying on the Soul Engineer Corp strength, they did not fear absolutely. But now in this case, two powerhouses hide in the side, looks like feels uneasy general. May face the sneak attack of opposite party conveniently. First returns to Sun-Moon Empire is the best means. Although in any case their this times the loss is not small, but the goal achieved, is great merit one.

Two nine levels of Soul Engineer after discussion, lead their Soul Engineer Corp to fly immediately in the direction of Soul Guidance Array place. Although they have prepared for from the beginning lost this Soul Guidance Array place, but judging from the present situation, the Dou Ling Empire resistivity imagines them must be smaller. Nine levels of top installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball almost to solve the entire imperial palace surely. If were not afterward these two powerhouses appears, they even could be said as the victory.

Two Soul Engineer Corp transform the lineup once more, this time, they as before have not maintained crowded. This is because before, Huo Yuhao that Spiritual Tempest, making two regimental commanders see fully he attacked the fearfulness in ability in the group. Therefore, as before is maintaining ring-like, stated differently, ring-like in a big way turned into one to be small.

Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp outside, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp. Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp outside is releasing the linkage defense. But Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer rest. In this case, they can defend alternately, once encounters the situation, the Soul Engineer Corp defense is enough, another already can strengthen the defense, can transform the defense is the attack.

If did not have the enemy to appear, under the defense, they also sufficiently maintained certain speed lead the way alternately. As for running into Emperor Dou Ling ** the team, they naturally did not fear. Only if Dou Ling Empire is gathers all Soul Master to besiege them, otherwise also really not any opportunity. In elite all went to under the Shrek City premise, the strength that these two Soul Engineer Corp join up is almost invincible existence.

In the direction of Soul Engineer Corp, two Soul Engineer Corp long do not have the slight defect, if by any chance they arrive at the Soul Guidance Array that side time, complexion actually ugly fearfulness.

The defense guard shield of Soul Guidance Array place is starting, but inside person actually completely could not relate. Then they noticed that the Soul Guidance Array place linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device starts the sufficient energy. The goal, is they.

What to do can also? The matches have controlled their Soul Guidance Array place unexpectedly first, this already complete surprise, after thorough enemy, the time that their successive ponders radically does not have, to turn around runs, toward Sun-Moon Empire direction full speed flight.

What a pity, what they do not know, in fact in Soul Guidance Array, but few several people. Linkage defense and linkage attack that they stimulate, relies on is Soul Guidance Array in own Soul Power reserve, came from the strength of milk bottle. Cannot insist too for a long time.

If these two Soul Engineer Corp maintain certain distance launches the sustained attack, may have certain loss, but recaptures Soul Guidance Array is actually the obvious matter.

But when looks like Huo Yuhao facing Ju Zi(orange), clear(ly) knew her goal not in Shrek City, but the Shrek City aspect does not dare to relax is vigilantly same. This time is also so, even if these two Soul Engineer Corp clearly know that Soul Guidance Array inside Soul Engineer is not strong, they impossible to choose to stay at this time. Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong beforehand surprise attack, has cast the deep shadow to them.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong almost shortly after two Soul Engineer Corp just ran, quietly arrived at Soul Guidance Array outside.

After the partners converge, Huo Yuhao immediately found Xu Sanshi.

“Third Senior Brother, Spirit Dou City that side situation is not wonderful. Spirit Dou City encountered very strong attack, the imperial palace damaged completely. Does not know that Imperial Family also does have the living witness to stay behind. Thus, your several remain, goes to Spirit Dou City, revealed that our Shrek Academy status, then helps them improve the order, seeks person who Imperial Family may survive. I and Wutong chase down that two Soul Engineer Corp, I do not believe that they can fly back to Sun-Moon Empire to go, so long as the midway they have the time of rest, is our opportunities. Completes the order form while them, strives forever to keep Dou Ling Empire these two Soul Engineer Corp. To the Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family revenge.”

Xu Sanshi nodded, said: “Good, you and Wutong go. Spirit Dou City gives us. You is really right, what a pity......”

Xu Sanshi sighed one darkly, now said anything late. Sun-Moon Empire was too sly, not only set the goal in Dou Ling Empire, but also aimed at the Dou Ling Empire imperial palace to start the Decapitation Strike directly. Formidable Soul Engineer Corp displayed their terrifying striking power in such campaign completely. Similar situation, if Star Lou Empire meets, perhaps is also not necessarily able to resist Dou Ling Empire is better. In the final analysis, in fact lost in the reconnaissance.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-568-part-3





Volume 12

#569 - In The Life Experiences Of Xu Three Stones


Has traded Sun-Moon Empire, only if like Huo Yuhao, had almost the support of community stealth and space ability, otherwise, in that type almost does not have under the detection that the slit covers to sneak attack is impossible to succeed. Watermark advertisement test watermark advertisement test

Here Soul Guidance Array has not needed to leave behind the manpower, when the Dou Ling Empire that side capital stabilizes, sends for receiving again is.

Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, they jump once more, pursues the direction that two Soul Engineer Corp are leaving to fly.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection cannot search to observe the entire country, but pursues two Soul Engineer Corp is also not being anything.

Spirit Dou City.

Cloud of smoke float over, the entire imperial palace under the attack of terror, starts from the center, damage most. Only the city wall in surrounding, but also broken existence.

In the city is weeps and wails and pitiful yell sound everywhere. Confusion.

The city defense force quantity in city are many, but also can only be the vacant maintenance order now. The imperial palace was destroyed, has almost also ruined the pillar of Dou Ling Empire person.

Xu Sanshi is bringing Jiang Nannan, Ye Guyi, Nan Qiuqiu and Ji Juechen, five people arrive under the Spirit Dou City city wall together. Looks at the gunsmoke in city, his complexion also became even more ugly.

On Xu Sanshi, not only actually has the Sky Soul Empire blood relationship, 50% came from Dou Ling Empire. His mother, in fact was Dou Ling Empire previous dynasty princess, was on a king youngest younger sister, is now the biological paternal aunt of Emperor Dou Ling Empire. Naturally, the premise is, if Emperor Dou Ling Empire is also living now.

Xu Sanshi in childhood, once followed mother to come Dou Ling Empire, has seen one side the male cousin emperor of this peer. Afterward again did not have what relation.

Initially, his mother must marry the father time, has encountered the vigorous opposition of Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family. At that time, his mother most received the daughter who previous dynasty emperor loved. But the proud princess has finally chosen her put on airs, was being brought running away by the Xu Sanshi father. Comes back again. Was bringing Xu Sanshi.

Therefore, regarding Xu Sanshi one, Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family repelled. But this matter, is in the Xu Sanshi heart secret. Even if Jiang Nannan does not know.

At this time. Saw gunsmoke that in Spirit Dou City raises, in Xu Sanshi heart. All sorts of feelings. How regardless to say that here is mother's maternal home! But on him, flows part to be the bloodlines of Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family eventually.

“Kaesong gate.”Xu Sanshi looks out the top, at this time. City gate already confinement, in top, sword and spear sword halberd, a density.

“What person?”The bow and arrow and Soul Guidance Device on instantaneous downward aiming top. At this time, when the city is flustered, the nerves of almost all people are tying tight. In this case, any suspicious people who may present may by the attack.

“We come from Shrek Academy. Reenforces specially.”The Xu Sanshi sinking sound said.

“Shrek Academy? How did you show?”The military officer on top can also reluctantly maintain calm at this time.

Xu Sanshi lifts the hand, revealed one in the status token of Shrek Academy Inner Court disciple.

Looks at far Soul Guidance Device is various countries will definitely provide, quick, the people in city saw clearly his token situation. Then makes him throw the token to the top.

Although Xu Sanshi in the heart anxious, does not bear. But did not have any means at this time, must make an effort to throw, threw to fly the token.

The token to the top, underwent the confirmation quickly, after confirming without doubt, the city gate opened finally.

An about 30-year-old defense general welcomed, although Xu Sanshi five people of seem is not old, but he actually does not dare to neglect. The person who Shrek Academy comes out, the strength always does not look at the age. The 20-year-old Inner Court disciple, the strength was quite astonishing.

“In city situation how?”Xu Sanshi asked to the military officer.

“End not completely will be clear. The attack of enemy does not have omen, suddenly appearance, direct attack imperial palace. Then attacks our each critical positions. Loses seriously! Imperial palace that side......”

Here, on this military officer face is piece of sad intent, although he did not know that side the imperial palace specific information, but looked into the distance in the imperial palace direction from the top, can see that side the imperial palace frigid situation. Meanwhile, when the imperial palace suffers nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball bombardment surely, he in the top the value is defending, at that time, his feeling looked like the world end approached generally. The entire imperial palace, turned into huge red-orange bright sphere, then, the terrifying attack arrived.

Soul Engineer that in the city revolts against, were almost strangled to death by these fearful enemies, then they start to kill the city defense force. Although city defense force quantity are many, but without the organization and counterforce capacity, the casualty is serious. Some big constructions, were wrecked by the enemy completely.

The Xu Sanshi complexion is very ugly, but at this time, he actually as before can maintain calm.

“Since now is unable to confirm that side Imperial Family also whether some people survive, now, I hope that you can coordinate me, first maintains in Spirit Dou City the order to be important. The enemies had been repelled by our companions, two Soul Engineer Corp evacuate, temporarily will not have the enemy to attack again. Therefore, the city gate did not need to defend, you were leading the person, entered a city with me, immediately keeps the order.”

“Ah? this is not good.”The military officers have rejected immediately, in the meantime, looks that Xu Sanshi vision were also many color of several points of doubt. Let him give up the city gate defense, this?

Xu Sanshi had not explained that but has taken off a necklace from the neck.

The necklace is in itself the silver, is very thin, but following hanging falls is very unusual, that is a pale golden small sign, above is mounting six gems. The color of each gem is different from the shape, but actually pieced together the Dou Ling two characters finally, above also has the gentle Soul Power fluctuation to send out outward.

Saw that this hangs to fall, military officer is surprised, has a look at Xu Sanshi again, on one knee knees down suddenly.

“End will pay a visit the prince.”

Prince? Hears this name, Jiang Nannan, Nan Qiuqiu, Ye Guyi and Ji Juechen was also startled. When has Xu Sanshi become the Dou Ling Empire prince?

They do not certainly know, that Xu Sanshi takes out hangs to fall, was initially her mother, when most is in good graces, was granted by previous dynasty emperor.

This necklace is the symbol of Imperial Family, is the symbol of Imperial Family status. Only the crown prince can obtain in conferring rank and title. Entire Dou Ling Empire also few.

Initially, Xu Sanshi mother, because was favored, obtained such granting, its significance was. The Xu Sanshi grandfather gave her mother not to be inferior in the status and status of any crown prince.

Afterward the Xu Sanshi mother after his father eloped, this hangs to fall became the souvenir. Violent anger senior emperor even must take back it. Her mother actually hangs to fall to hide very well this, said that anything is not willing to hand over. Said that must keep commemorating. Afterward. This hangs to fall after the Xu Sanshi adult ritual, has become his thing.

Has not thought including Xu Sanshi. One one day can actually use this to hang to fall, he does not hope arrival of this day! But, now at this time, his body. Is flowing the bloodlines of Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family, he is duty-bound!

Xu Sanshi brings back the necklace, wears on own neck. Sinking sound track: “Gets up. Acting according to the special circumstances. Immediately enters the city along with me, draws in the city defense force, maintains in the city the order. Whatever, in Spirit Dou City cannot be chaotic, cannot the deceased person.”

“Yes.”The general sets out rapidly. In vacant sorrowful look were many several points of confidence, although he does not know that who this prince is, even has never seen. But since Dou Ling Empire also has the Imperial Family bloodlines to exist, that also means hopefully! So long as Spirit Dou City not chaos. Then, all have the leeway of recalling.

This general issues the order immediately, is responsible for guarding 2000 officers who to remove 1500 people the city wall, by him personally is led, to follow the Xu Sanshi five people together, directly soars in the city to go. Now, Spirit Dou City too needs to stabilize.

Xu Sanshi opened own status, enters in Spirit Dou City to put down a rebellion.

Another side, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong also overtook that two Soul Engineer Corp.

, Sees that two Soul Engineer Corp orderly lineups from afar, Huo Yuhao also darkly sighs one, said to Tang Wutong: “Sun-Moon Empire in training and use of Soul Engineer, has truly gone far beyond us. You look at their lineups, their linkage Soul Guidance Device, is more advanced than us. Worthily is Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp.”

Tang Wutong said: “We now what to do? Perhaps by their present conditions, wants to leave behind them is unlikely. Linkage Soul Guidance Device was really too repugnant.”

If no linkage Soul Guidance Device, relies on Imitation Soul Ability and Spiritual Disturbance that domain Huo Yuhao is mysteriously appearing and disappearing, they completely have the ability and other methods to kill these Soul Engineer through the sneak attack completely.

However, the linkage defends existence of guard shield, makes this possibility approach in zero infinitely. So long as has been maintaining linkage defense guard shield, Sun-Moon Empire these two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp do not fear any sneak attack. But by their equipment of strength and this sneak attack, this is not a too difficult matter. So long as maintained the defense is being OK in certain extent.

Huo Yuhao slightly makes the thinking, eyes narrows the eyes, sinking sound track: “They think that this can escape us to chase down? I must have a look but actually, is the time that they can defend continually is long, ruthless that we chase down.”

At the same time was saying, on Huo Yuhao Chu Wuhun leads the ring ray to dodge, Soul Guidance Cannon appears in his hands.

This Soul Guidance Cannon is not quite big, the caliber be only about 30 millimeters, are all over the body swarthy, sends out gentle Soul Power to fluctuate.

Huo Yuhao Soul Power pours into, on this Soul Guidance Cannon sends out immediately slightly buzz the whining noise, lifts up on the shoulder, does not need to aim, Huo Yuhao took away the firing button.

---------------------------------------------

The leisure time has been playing our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire tour, I become our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire game, as soon as I get online, everybody biggest pleasure is to gather round chops me......, But also some people shouted loudly, fought three to be short of me honorably......, Can should not be so flagitious. The real men cannot support the person to be many! Having tears streaming down the face.

The book friends of Android system cell phone, quickly come to play together, in our prestige - platform can download directly. The book friends of apple system also please patiently wait, that side the gizmondo will develop as soon as possible.

Joins our prestige - platform is very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication is our families.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-569-part-1





Volume 12

#569 - In The Life Experiences Of Xu Three Stones


One group of dazzling red light erupt instantaneously, has launched the past in the distant place two Soul Engineer Corp directions.

This is most common Bursting Cannon, the effect is also very simple, has the intense explosive force and high fever, thus has the destructive effect.

Huo Yuhao this Bursting Cannon is he does personally, is in itself seven levels of Soul Guidance Device, but the striking power has about five levels of Soul Guidance Device prestige energies.

Seven levels and five levels, differ appropriate very big. Since the might has five levels, why Soul Guidance Device itself is actually seven levels? The reason is very simple, Huo Yuhao pursued Absolute in the fields, this aspect, is the firing distance.

The Bursting Cannon striking distance that Huo Yuhao manufactures can be the astonishing ten kilometers, is 10,000 meters. This has been able to compare favorably with part to install Soul Guidance Cannon to shoot surely. When Huo Yuhao makes this seven levels of Soul Guidance Cannon, but also obtained the praise of Xuan Ziwen Teacher.

Must know that Xuan Ziwen is very harsh, in the ordinary circumstances will not praise own disciple, only if had the special achievement. Huo Yuhao is obtains him to praise most people without doubt, but the total degree as before is also limited.

Soul Guidance Cannon, is not in the Stationary Soul Guidance Device situation, can actually be so far the launch on attack, this in Soul Engineer historical, is very rare. Even if Xuan Ziwen does, is not necessarily able to do well compared with Huo Yuhao.

This Soul Guidance Cannon Huo Yuhao manufactures naturally to have the goal, the goal is very simple, is when necessary carries on to tempt the enemy to use.

Decided to install the value of Soul Guidance Cannon ball to be too soaring, was the consumables. But when this Soul Guidance Cannon manufacture also used were more massive much the rare metal, moreover was very rare and precious that type, but can actually the reusable!

At this time, an artillery sends out, shell in airborne accelerates suddenly, itself presents for the streamline, looks like date stone, directly soars the Sun-Moon Empire two Soul Engineer Corp direction lasings of distant place to go.

This shell chest cavity speed is not too fast, but fearful on fearful in its late acceleration, after departing hundred meters, it instantaneously accelerates, the main body has had unexpectedly also a separation, shell's part became the booster strength. Let the other half shell go by more astonishing speed lasing.

Must know that this may complete in the energy state! Can want to see, this has the how abnormal situation.

“Bang!”Thunders with one group of red-orange sparks erupts on the Soul Engineer Corp linkage defense guard shield of distant place.

Before two Soul Engineer Corp, receives the attack of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, just started, these Soul Engineer that lives have not known that what happened. Afterward Huo Yuhao stuck out suddenly the attack, nearly struck to kill Xia Xuanchen, in addition their own population sharp declines, in this case, they must not know that had anything, that was also too slow.

Therefore, while maintaining linkage defense attitude flight, in fact these Soul Engineer also became the frightened people.

A Soul Guidance Cannon ball explodes on Soul Guidance Protective Cover, the first responses of almost all Soul Engineer, increase to the strongest condition the linkage defense.

Not only Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp so, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp is also so. Two Soul Engineer Corp, two linkage defense guard shields take shape instantaneously, simultaneously linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device also starts the sufficient energy, prepares momentarily attack. The rapidness of response, making one praise to the heavens, moreover all responses that made, was most correct.

Is expert regiment chief Xu Tianyuan and Xia Xuanchen cannot pick up any slight defect in the response of Soul Engineer Corp absolutely.

But, the issue emerged. This issue is simpler and direct, that is, enemy, where?

A Soul Guidance Cannon ball launches, they actually cannot discover the trail of enemy. But attack, is such wishy-washy Soul Guidance Cannon ball attack.

Bursting Cannon, this gadget Sun-Moon Empire is about to have eliminated, because did not have the characteristics, only then Defensive Soul Guidance Device of some ordinary cities will use. Generally speaking, their this Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, have little used Bursting Cannon this type of weapon. More will use destructive power to be stronger, particularly aims at the soul to lead defense guard shield destructive power strong Puncture Cannon and breaking cannon and so on.

From the sky stagnated for nearly five minutes, linkage Defensive Soul Guidance Device throughout maintains in the maximum intensity condition, but, the enemy has not appeared always.

Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, another hand takes Bursting Cannon, on the face is revealing one to sneer. Tang Wutong doubts visits him, said: “Are you are doing?”

Huo Yuhao said: “Brother told them, we came. Let their careful point, vigilant.”

Tang Wutong is intelligent. Slightly makes the thinking, immediately understood the meaning of Huo Yuhao. “You want them momentarily to maintain in the condition of being frightened by the slightest sound! You were really too bad.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Am I bad? They are not good generations. Yeah, how has not known that side Spirit Dou City. We hope that Third Senior Brother they can help Spirit Dou City stay in a brothel overnight the surface stably. At least the interior first should not be randomly good.”

Tang Wutong heavyhearted [say / way]: “This time strategy was really too sinister. If the front Dou Ling Empire elite army knows the situation of rear imperial palace perhaps, will unable to bear clash to look for the Sun-Moon Empire decisive battle from Shrek City. If is really such, they counting of Ju Zi(orange). Ju Zi(orange) really quite fierce.”

The issue that Huo Yuhao nod of silently, Tang Wutong is worried about is he most is also worried. The Ju Zi(orange) strategy, such keeps you from resisting.

“Whatever, we annihilated these two Soul Engineer Corp to say first again. To cope with Sun-Moon Empire, contends directly was impossible. We can do, unceasingly weakens their strengths. They can manufacture massive Soul Guidance Device, but, trains outstanding Soul Engineer truly to require the time. So long as we can weaken their Soul Engineer strength unceasingly, one day, Sun-Moon Empire no longer so will be formidable.”

Free time who they spoke, another side two Soul Engineer Corp also realized to be swindled, started off. They are not do not want to search for Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong trail, is, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong strength is too strong, they do not dare to disperse! Only then maintains the linkage defense guard shield is the safest condition. But, this actually needs to consume their Soul Power continually.

Before, they have fought in Spirit Dou City. Regardless of Dou Ling Empire took away many elite to walk, Spirit Dou City also after all was the Dou Ling Empire palace wall, there is a considerable degree to guard the strength. Routs these guards, regarding two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, the consumption was not small.

Later, they face the attack of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, immediately evacuates. From beginning to end cannot obtain the effective rest. At least must maintain from the sky flies.

Soul Engineer Soul Power is limited, even if in Soul Master, few can like Huo Yuhao unceasing restores Soul Power in the fight, the flight at all does not become the burden.

Even if Titled Douluo, when maintains the high-speed flight, the consumption has certainly. Let alone two Soul Engineer Corp most Soul Engineer both were about the four rings strength.

They and other series of equipment truly can long time fly by Flight Soul Guidance Device, Sealed Milk Bottle. But this long time, to be how limited. Let alone they must maintain linkage defend.

Therefore, after two Soul Engineer Corp regimental commanders discovered the enemy has not appeared, the complexion got dark immediately, they understand that the enemy must do.

This in the battlefield is one type very simple, but actually absolutely the effective tactic, that is: Harassment.

Through the harassment, making you not have means to accelerate to leave fully, in the meantime, through the harassment, enables the condition that you maintain are frightened by the slightest sound to rest throughout.

Several top Soul Engineer not anything, but their subordinates are not good. The time grew, their Soul Power will consume completely. Once they are unable to maintain the linkage defends formation the time, then, their ends probably must arrive.

“Xia brother, are we what to do good?”Xu Tianyuan asked to Xia Xuanchen in a low voice. He was unable to make the subordinates hear, after is not all people can realize predicament that at this time they face.

The Xia Xuanchen complexion is also very ugly, “perhaps Xu brother, this time we have ** was tired. Comes the person is not only powerful, but also the thoughts are meticulous, since he chose has harassed like this, definitely will continue. We can do now, can only save Soul Power as far as possible, as far as possible first is far away from Spirit Dou City. Then must look for the place recuperation.”

Xu Tianyuan said: “Your meaning is, finds a quite far away place, Soul Engineer Corp protects, does a Soul Engineer Corp recuperation, make the brothers restore Soul Power through this method?”

Xia Xuanchen nodded, said: “Only can so. That two person strengths are very strong, escapes into the space strength. Even if we sets up the trap, is not necessarily able to retain them, will lose seriously. Now we can only keep, as far as possible consumes with them. So long as we can unceasing through restoring to make the brothers have the persistent combat capability. The time grew, believes that they also retreated.”

A Xu Tianyuan fist thump strikes on own palm, complexion pale [say / way]: “Really was too aggrieved. If makes me catch that two fellows, must tear to shreds them.”

Xia Xuanchen smiles bitterly, said: “Xu brother, is patient, brothers look. Now we also can only be so. At least that two people have not dared the storm we. Who lets our is near Spirit Dou City?”

“This. Let everybody accelerate first, we are far away from here some, descends the recuperation.”Xu Tianyuan is also generation courageously, after they set the strategy, immediately makes Soul Engineer accelerate again, flies toward the distant place.

---

The new week, three deliver, requesting earnestly everybody to recommend the vote support! Let us rush to the list!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-569-part-2





Volume 12

#569 - Under The Life Experiences Of Xu Three Stones


In this time, is a Bursting Cannon shell flies to shoot to come, hits above Soul Guidance Protective Cover.

The condition of frightened person is not a short time can relieve, two Soul Engineer Corp that just accelerated were the subconscious release their linkage defense, increased the power. Moreover moved has also stopped.

“In that side, the shell flies from that side. How doesn't the regimental commander make us attack?”Although cannot see Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong form, direction Soul Engineer that but the shell flies can see!

Is the Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp member, they usually are also very proud, was provoked successively twice, these Soul Engineer somewhat were also angry.

“All people maintain calm, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp can not use the linkage defense guard shield, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp maintains a guard shield. Do not pay attention to any attack, to continue to fly.”

Xia Xuanchen has issued the order calmly, he is very clear, now that hides is sees them who the enemy in hidden place most hopes to be chaotic, sees them to attack.

Once launches the linkage attack, fierce that then, Soul Engineer Soul Power can consume, but in this case, the goal of that person was achieved. But their attacks are impossible to have the effect. Had collided with the two, Xia Xuanchen was very clear that two people the strength strongly. At least is above Transcendent Douluo cultivates is, moreover is not ordinary Transcendent Douluo. If he does not have that mysterious crystal stone, before did not die must delaminate the skin! Let alone, these two people have the strange stealth ability and Space Power control, this makes him have to proceed with caution. If in the two has one person is Limit Douluo, that troublesome was big, once the opposite party erupts, very much has the possibility to wipe out them!

Therefore, maintains the defense is necessary, avoids consuming similarly is also necessary. Since the matches do not dare the storm, that means that their strengths do not have the storm assurance. Now everybody competes, is the patience.

Yes, what compared with is patience. Huo Yuhao also very much has the patience similarly. He initially when carried on the Ultimate Soldier Plan training, including was very important, was the patient competion.

But now, he is also comparing the patience. The patient this gadget, his some are.

Mass-criticizes, changes an angle, comes one round again.

Ten kilometers distance, absolute safety. The enemy target is so big, but enemy is actually not able to lock them. This is the best target. To hit they, the distance is an issue. Does not need to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, is not possible. But decides to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball when launching, the path is so obvious. Even if nine levels installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong have enough time to fend. Therefore, their securities do not have any issue. In this case, Huo Yuhao must do, continually harasses, making that two Soul Engineer Corp burdensome.

He fully was implementing his mentality, the average 1-2 minutes on a launch shell in the past.

At the beginning, two Soul Engineer Corp have not adapted very much, under attack of continuing, some people increased the power of linkage defense unceasingly, the story that but the wolf came everyone knows. The time grew, these Soul Engineer also adapted. That is just ordinary Bursting Cannon. Their these Soul Engineer any person Soul Guidance Device striking power of be stronger than that Bursting Cannon.

It is not harasses, does not pay attention to you and that's the end. So long as flies again a distance, can rest.

After half double-hour, the harassment of Huo Yuhao is still continuing, but, will not have Emperor Dragon and Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer will strengthen the power of linkage defense rashly. Especially Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer, will not release the linkage defense guard shield again. Both sides are maintaining a deadlock condition, but the harassment of Huo Yuhao, as if also lost the effect.

After Huo Yuhao has launched Bursting Cannon, the silver light dodges, in the hand Bursting Cannon takes back quietly, another brand-new Soul Guidance Cannon quietly appeared on his shoulder. This Soul Guidance Cannon with beforehand is different. First is the length.

This Soul Guidance Cannon length has exceeded three meters unexpectedly, even if carries it at Huo Yuhao this slim figure, appears some are uncoordinated. Then is the style, this Soul Guidance Cannon seems some looks like handle lances, front is the lance front, behind also has the umbrella shape, is similar to the lance point is ordinary, again behind, is the long pole, only then Huo Yuhao shoulders that part on shoulder to be slightly thick.

When Huo Yuhao Soul Power pours into, Soul Guidance Cannon itself sent out the strange luster immediately. dark green!

dark green halos have extended from the end forward, the ray condenses finally in the acme. That green ray green profoundness, if carefully looked that will discover, inch allow Chu beyond this Soul Guidance Device acme, in the air presented small black hole unexpectedly.

This is not that can swallow all black holes, but is the air to shatter trace.

Generally speaking, when the striking power and speed are the certain extent, may the tearing air, has this condition. The space that but at that time, broke will close quickly. But the space that at present this breaks is actually continues maintains, condition that do not close.

Tang Wutong is pure Soul Master, she did not understand the Soul Engineer ability, but this, she can also feel the fearfulness of this Soul Guidance Device.

Huo Yuhao this not optional launch, but shoulders it on the shoulder, Spiritual Detection releases, aiming.

Tang Wutong has his Spiritual Sharing, naturally can feel the object who he aims. In that two Soul Engineer Corp, a Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp member who is at internal rest condition.

“”In grating fulmination sound, the dark green beam electricity shoots together, the flash before launch, Huo Yuhao loosens the hand of Tang Wutong, before personal appearance like lightning, clashes. At his present speed, fully under the sprint, is only several seconds, stretched across several kilometers, approached the soul of enemy to lead to defend the guard shield.

The dark green beam projects, he arrived has been away from Soul Guidance Protective Cover less than three kilometers position. All undergoes the Spiritual Detection precision calculation.

The dark green ray dodges to pass, just like together slender arrow arrow, accurate hit on linkage defense guard shield.

That linkage defense guard shield shakes gently, the guard shield surface, braves a azure smoke suddenly. Overall speaking, the guard shield does not have what change, but, in that guard shield hit position, presented an eyelet.

Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp and Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer saw extremely terrifying one. This, even if they will go on living in the future, will never forget.

Together dark green beam, accurate incomparable falling in a Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp Soul Master body.

This Soul Engineer triggering Soul Guidance Protective Cover first opens, but also disappears in the next flash, body that he disappears.

After that dark green beam hits, the body of this Soul Engineer is only slight trembled, even links a pitiful yell unable to send out, the whole body changes into the innumerable green luminous spots, vanished in the air.

These green luminous spots flutter, seems containing the strange strength, because outside has Soul Guidance Protective Cover, these luminous spots do not have the means to fly.

The screams resound suddenly, almost all Soul Engineer as if by prior agreement opened their Soul Guidance Protective Cover.

That green ray was really too fearful, although they were Soul Engineer, but has not actually seen so strange one, who can know, that green ray to them also harmful?

Huo Yuhao strikes to go well, turns around to walk. Escapes.

Xia Xuanchen and Xu Tianyuan dumbfounded looks at this, their heart is Ba Liang, Ba Liang. Ordinary Soul Engineer did not know that what thing that is, can they not know?

That can pass through the linkage defense guard shield, disappears an internal Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp member instantaneously, is not just formidable nine levels of single body Assault Soul Guidance Device, super breaking cannon?

Initially, Huo Yuhao once convinced Xuan Ziwen with eight levels of breaking cannon. But the breaking cannon that he currently uses is not eight levels, but is nine levels.

breaking cannon any rank, is extremely terrifying existence, once were hit, the possibility of almost not having lived.

The breaking cannon itself biggest special characteristics, can decompose all energies. Any safety mask before it, likely is common that the paper sticks. To prevent the attack of breaking cannon, then, defensive power if certainly over three times of breaking cannon itself striking power are good.

But nine levels of breaking cannon striking power, even if the safety mask that nine levels of Soul Engineer display fully, does not have the means to prevent. The linkage defense guard shield also needs the extremely high intensity, has the resistance to be possible.

If two Soul Engineer Corp both are the most flourishing condition, has the possibility of resistance actually. But present they, are away from the most flourishing condition actually to differ was really too many.

After having been short of more than 200 people, moreover is only 50% people displays the soul to lead to defend the guard shield, they absolutely do not have the opportunity of any preventing!

A human life, such did not have. But this is also not most fearful. What is most fearful is two Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer in the heart has the intense fear that at this time.

“Everybody don't be upset, to continue maintains the linkage defense guard shield. A moment ago that was nine levels of breaking cannon. Is impossible the sustained attack. Even if nine levels of Soul Engineer, a day also can only start one time.”Xia Xuanchen is almost shouting to clear the way without hesitation.

Although breaking cannon cannot the long-term usage, but must say that a day can only launch one time, that also talked nonsensically and irresponsibly. But at this time he actually has saying that otherwise, the morale of troops is immediately chaotic.

Xu Tianyuan looked at Xia Xuanchen one, has not prevented him, but the complexion became uglier.

Not only the enemies Transcendent Douluo, is nine levels of Soul Engineer, this is they have not thought.

Before that distant transmission Bursting Cannon, but could also be said as ordinary Soul Guidance Device, any Soul Master can use. But, these nine levels of breaking cannon, have besides Sun-Moon Empire, they had not heard belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries also has Soul Guidance Device of this rank!

Three, asked the recommendation ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-569-part-3





Volume 12

#570 - The Plan Changes


Nine levels of breaking cannon soaring of value, even if on them not such equipment.

Moreover, what this enemy is more fearful, their bodies are carrying various Surveying Soul Guidance Device are completely invalid to him.

When nine levels of breaking cannon launch, two nine levels of Soul Engineer immediately opened on them the strongest detectability. Nine levels of breaking cannon can only in three kilometers range effective. But, they actually as before cannot find the exact location of that person. As the matter stands, they can only come under attack passively. Won't the heart have the shadow?

Xu Tianyuan somewhat flustered finally. Returns to Sun-Moon Empire from here, is in original Sky Soul Empire, at the entire Soul Engineer Corp speed, at least needs to fly about four double-hour, but must avoid impediment that Dou Ling Empire may present as far as possible.

In four double-hour, this inexplicable match, if has been pursuing them, that will bring the how huge damage? Moreover, to two Soul Engineer Corp conditions, unable to insist at present four double-hour were so long. Then must getting down recuperation.

To be what to do good?

Xu Tianyuan clenches teeth, passes on the tone channel to Xia Xuanchen: “Must make everybody rest, now morale of troops chaos, if comes time breaking cannon again, and person who has killed successfully our, troubled.”

Xia Xuanchen looks to him, said: “Xu brother, we what to do?”

Xu Tianyuan said: “This gets down, is replaced you to be responsible for defending by my Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp, makes nearer, next to recuperation that everybody gathers. As the matter stands, the linkage defends the density of guard shield to increase. breaking cannon wanted to break through is not easy. In airborne does not have the means distance to be so near, fears the collision. But in ground actually. First made everybody restore the energy to say again. We also try to find the solution.”

“Only can so.”Xia Xuanchen cannot find out better means.

They issue the order immediately, Evil Tyrant and Emperor Dragon two big Soul Engineer Corp surplus members, fell toward the ground.

They have chosen in woods the recuperation. Swept piece of trees by Soul Guidance Device, remained to vacate. Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp outside, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp. Has exchanged the defense.

Meanwhile, is relying on the quite crowded lineup, defended the intensity of guard shield also to promote the linkage.

Xia Xuanchen, Xu Tianyuan as well as several assistant regimental commanders gather, each other looks at each other in blank diamay, complexion ugly must die.

They may be the Hand of the National Protector members, even if in Sun-Moon Empire, that is also the status is quite lofty. Even if Xu Tianran sees them, is polite. Especially Xu Tianyuan, itself also has the title of crown prince.

However, this time they have actually met ** bothersome. This hid the enemy in hidden place is really too hard to deal with. Could not find the match, is most troublesome. Where does not know the enemy, are their battle efficiencies strong and useful? Only can be comes under attack passively.

“Cannot continue such to get down, this, we will be nibbled by him again sooner or later gradually cleanly. Once our people die are too many, has the possibility of mutiny.”Xia Xuanchen thump maliciously has struck the ground, splashes dust.

Xu Tianyuan nod of silently, “must think the means to direct these two people, then to get rid of they. We go back also to have long distance, moreover, even if enters in original Sky Soul Empire, must be able to converge with the army to the Shrek City that side flight. The time was too long. This way, perhaps few individuals can live going back.”

Several assistant regimental commanders nodded, appearance that only follows the lead.

“Xia brother, your brain is easy-to-use, you try to find a solution. Even if took a danger unable to attend.”The Xu Tianyuan sinking sound said.

Xia Xuanchen nodded, said: “Has a plan for the present, we only then think means to tempt them, then whole-heartedly launches the attack. I look at this. The strengths of these two people are very strong, they at least are Transcendent Douluo cultivate are, a possibility is nine levels of Soul Engineer, or has nine levels of Soul Engineer manufactures breaking cannon. To discover them, must break their stealths first.”

“Before we have attempted, fluctuation Surveying Soul Guidance Device and heat energy Surveying Soul Guidance Device are invalid to them. The mind Surveying Soul Guidance Device range is too small, does not have the means to search to observe. That can only use stupid means. We first tempt them to attack, then uses the way of rug attack, discovers their exact locations. They want to escape into the space, by at first that observation, requires the time. So long as we are ready, concentrates several people of strengths to start strikes fully, when the time comes, they do not die must receive heavy wound. So long as heavy wound they, making them not dare to pursue, our goals were also achieved.”

Xu Tianyuan eye one bright, nodded, said: “Good, does. Let everybody restore first. Later this, making the brothers to cover the attack, I lead four assistant regimental commanders to compose a small linkage attack, by our five people with joint forces, the striking power enough, has aimed at the two one of them. Xia the brother, you direct brothers. Including my Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp, gives you to direct temporarily. So long as they dare to approach, I do not believe them also to be able the whole body to draw back.”

Looks on the Xu Tianran face ferocious look, Xia Xuanchen serious nod, said: “Since Xu brother felt relieved, that by me. We work as one to get rid of this trusted friend big trouble. Also good to go back to report on accomplishments earlier. Spirit Dou City was broken, Dou Ling Empire internal inevitable chaos. That side the front, according to the plan of marshal, will possibly have the change, needs our strengths.”

“Um.”On the Xu Tianyuan mouth complies with one, but the eyeground is actually revealing the look of showing neither approval nor disapproval. Regarding Ju Zi(orange), he looks like to Xu Tianran is the same, does not have any favorable impression. But he also has to acknowledge that this War-God Empress ability was really too strong. Their these merits are expensive as well as the big shots of military have to obey her order, even cannot discover to oppose that she works as the reason of marshal. Now, empire praise in people's to this War-God Empress arrived at Absolute. In certain aspects, the Ju Zi(orange) prestige also has even surpassed Xu Tianran. Especially after Sky Soul Empire throughout was broken through, is so.

Xia Xuanchen has arranged, Xu Tianyuan leads other four assistant regimental commanders is also being sits cross-legged to sit, starts to rest. Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer do not dare to neglect, total involvement is displaying the linkage defense guard shield, is protecting all people.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong in not far away upper air, all of bird's eye view tread.

“Your that struck should frightens them, you looked that they can only fall in the ground now. Maintains the close lineup, will make the linkage defense guard shield more tenacious?”Tang Wutong spoke to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “Meeting. To their lineups, breaking cannon should be able to break through at present, but after the breakthrough, was very difficult sufficiently the striking power of murder. These two Soul Engineer Corp compared with hard to deal with that I imagine. However, I can guess correctly that they then must do.”

“?”Ju Zi(orange) curious looks at Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao said: “breaking cannon although now cannot cope with them, so long as they started not to have the means. Flies in the sky, Flight Soul Guidance Device wants ** Soul Power, this makes among Soul Engineer probably maintain certain distance. Distances between 12 individuals are not anything, but their several hundred people, must open the linkage defense guard shield. At that time, they could not block my breaking cannon to attack. Once death person were many, may present the civil strife. Because no one knows the goal of my next attack is anything. Therefore, if I am their commander, wants to bring own subordinate whole body to draw back, but was not defeated by me one by one. Then, then they must do, tempts to attack us, then thinks means to get rid of we.”

Tang Wutong said with a smile: “That was simple. How whatever they tempt, we do not exit and that's the end. I do not believe that they can also we be what kind. So long as after we they start again begins, they are powerful have not located to cause.”

Huo Yuhao actually shook the head, in eye cold light twinkle, “they, since wants the feint to give me, why we don't want? Not only wants, but, this time I must make them thoroughly desperate. Walks, we arrange.”

At the same time was saying, he holds the hand of Tang Wutong to turn around to walk, flies toward the distant place.

Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp is protecting, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp Soul Master through the meditate rest. Here had certain distance from Spirit Dou City that side, moreover that side Spirit Dou City is very chaotic, is at least impossible to have the pursuing troops to come in a short time.

Quick, a double-hour passed by, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer basically restored Soul Power. As for the milk bottle, that without enough time supplemented.

Changes players, changes into the Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp rest, the Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp foreign defense.

The Xia Xuanchen unification directs two Soul Engineer Corp, methodical that all carry on, but Xu Tianyuan leads four assistant regimental commanders to sit there meditate, was concerned with regarding all of outside.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong already returned airborne, looks at the following situation, he also frowned. The enemies compared with hard to deal with that he imagines, only this calm, was very surprising.

“Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer Soul Power basically restored, trades the Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp restoration. Regardless of then must lure us to attack or continue to depart, they must restore to the optimum condition first. This is must compare patience with us!”Huo Yuhao said to Tang Wutong.

Tang Wutong pulls his arm, said with a smile indifferently: “They are not anxious, our anxious anything, waits and that's the end.”

In the Huo Yuhao heart moves suddenly, “Wutong, since they have given our enough time, I suddenly have another idea. Wipes out these two Soul Engineer Corp, perhaps is not the most ideal effect.”

“Um?”Tang Wutong surprised looks to him.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-570-part-1





Volume 12

#570 - The Plan Changes


Huo Yuhao said near her ear in a low voice several anything, on the Tang Wutong face the look gradually becomes strange, “you were too bad! Snort, you dare to say do this, do not help Ju Zi(orange)?”

Huo Yuhao hurried to cry out has hit day Qu, “naturally not. If the watermark advertisement test watermark advertisement test I have not remembered incorrectly, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp grasps the strongest strength in Sun-Moon Empire Imperial Family ancestor and relative hand. To this Soul Engineer Corp, the Imperial Family ancestor and relative looks is very certainly heavy. Ju Zi(orange) will use the open intrigue, can't I? This war, won regarding us directly already not possibly. The Spirit Dou City imperial palace receives heavy wound, has not known whether has Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family to survive. Then, we can only every little bit moves back to the inferiority. Drew back 10,000 steps saying that if Sun-Moon Empire will unify Continent in the future, even if fell in Ju Zi(orange), the absolute ratio fell on Xu Tianran or is in Holy Spirit Cult is much better.”

Tang Wutong “pū”smiles, said: “Looks at your tense appearance, I just am test you one. Won't I have believed you really?”

Huo Yuhao has also smiled, “I know certainly that your meeting believes me, but must explain that this is to your respect. Walks, we get down.”

Saying, Huo Yuhao was holding the hand of Tang Wutong, was hidden in the wooded mountain quietly vanishes does not see. Naturally, place distance that two Soul Engineer Corp that they drop are very far.

Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp Soul Master are restoring patiently, the attack had has not appeared for a long time. Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer that although is responsible for defending will therefore not be lax, but in the heart relaxed finally.

Before Xu Tianyuan has said that the enemy had strength of the striking, now as if has proven this point.

Xia Xuanchen has been observing outside sound, he does not even dare to sit the practice, then, he must do arranges the trap. This trap arranges must make the opposite party think that has an opportunity.

He and Soul Engineer of subordinate felt that may be different. The feeling of that feeling uneasy has not vanished throughout. He also deeply believed that since that two powerhouses pursued here, then, certainly easily will not give up. The powerful person also certainly is very patiently good. Cannot endure lonely. Becoming the powerhouse?

The time passed is not short, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp after a while can also restore again. Then, is completes the trap the time. At that time was also most dangerous, could not say that can only sacrifice few people. Otherwise, that two people will not be swindled. Does not know that they come from where, the powerhouse of this rank, but also has nine levels of Soul Guidance Device breaking cannon, always makes Xia Xuanchen feel that is somewhat mystical and terrifying.

“Report, Surveying Soul Guidance Device showed that some people came toward us.”Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp Soul Master reports suddenly. Let Xia Xuanchen awaken from the ponder.

“Did some people come? Several?”Xia Xuanchen faints from fear immediately, rapid inquiry said. Couldn't that two people repress to appear?

“Population are many, arrives from the ground, moreover is encircling toward us.”Soul Engineer of that report also somewhat is obviously anxious. The enemy quantity of because encircling is extremely numerous, yes, the enemy, in this Dou Ling Empire, they may meet, can only be the enemy. Moreover these enemies as if already understood clearly their positions, surrounds completely.

The Xia Xuanchen complexion concentrates, did the reinforcements of that two person come? If so, the matter becomes more troublesome. However, he to has not feared regarding the reinforcements. Original complete four countries of Dou Ling Empire on Douluo Continent, the strength is smallest and weakest one, even does not have one to become Soul Engineer Corp of organization system. The person who encircles are many, even if Soul Master he did not fear. Here may have two Hand of the National Protector Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp. Although has been short of over one-third population, but main force also, their these powerhouses also.

“Awakens except for all people of five positive and negative regimental commanders, standing by.”The Xia Xuanchen sinking sound said.

Now he could not attend to establishing the trap, at least temporarily must first repel the invading enemy thoroughly said again. But the attack of enemy, in fact also pretends carelessness, reveals the good opportunity of trap.

At the same time issued the order, Xia Xuanchen arrived at that side Reconnaissance Soul Guidance Device rapidly. Upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device will not be good in enemy use obvious effect, therefore they carry is ground Surveying Soul Guidance Device, although the searching range wants to be smaller, but the accurate degree actually fully realized that is higher.

On the Surveying Soul Guidance Device screen, Xia Xuanchen saw densely and numerously red, each red point represents words of enemy, looks, his unexpectedly innumerable enemy quantity has many.

These enemies appear very calm, the speed of approaching is not fast, but has actually completed the encirclement, at very steady speed toward them.

Because here is woods, has big tree to prevent, concrete appearance that they suddenly could not have seen clearly these enemies. However, this was enough.

All Soul Engineer have completed the combat readiness, including has not restored fully, but also restored the most Soul Power Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp members.

After Xia Xuanchen slightly makes the thinking, sinking sound track: “Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp, the Soul Guidance Ray attack, ruins the surrounding trees, the clear wall is firm.”

Fights in the forest, to Soul Engineer is quite disadvantageous, what because Soul Engineer most excels is the long-distance attack, but under impediment of trees, wants to take is more difficult.

Listened to the order of Xia Xuanchen, blue beams start to strafe toward the surrounding, is only the free time of a while, in diameter one kilometer range, all trees had been swept clear. This gave around two Soul Engineer Corp linkage defense guard shields to clean up a big stretch of open area. After the enemies appear, will not have the dead angle facing two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp strong firepowers.

Under the intense waiting, the forms of enemies appeared in the line of sight of Soul Engineer finally.

However, when they see these enemies, all Soul Engineer complexions actually cannot help but all change.

Even if the enemy is formidable, being insufficient makes two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp members not start to have the fear in the fight. May these enemies, achieve at present. Because, they radically are not the person.

What thing is that?

The giant skeleton skeletons, in some hands are raising the anomalous bone blade, some are even carrying a bone.

One jumps jumping forward running, the whole body iron green corpse. Some corpses even support one to be pregnant. The body is also dropping ill-smelling liquid.

And what is more, in these enemies, but also presented some strange fellows, the headless knight and personal appearance are huge, just like the terror that the innumerable corpses piece together become exist. Some they hear something never heard of before the terrifying biology and seeing what one never saw before. Without any exception, on these living thing, has all filled with the death aura.

So rich and intense death aura, so long as were the normal person looked, the feeling will not be certainly good.

Soul Engineer are so, Xia Xuanchen is also so, he has not thought that before these, calm enemy in own heart, unexpectedly is a undead army.

All these were really too unexpected, he is unable to imagine, oneself must face, unexpectedly was a gang of such enemy.

Almost is without hesitation, Xia Xuanchen arrives in front of Xu Tianyuan rapidly, awakens this Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp crown prince regimental commander.

After other Xu Tianyuan and four assistant regimental commanders finished meditate sets out to see these Undead Creature, the feeling and Xia Xuanchen are exactly the same.

The Xu Tianyuan complexion one sank, the fist grips closely, “bastard! I said how this enemy will have nine levels of breaking cannon. Nine levels of breaking cannon in our home are the secret weapon, how the enemy will have. Now the answer came out. Your majesty initially was determined with that Holy Spirit Cult to form an alliance, but also enables its to become we protects the country Saint to teach. At that time I strongly had opposed. These are Evil Soul Master, possibly with its how a companion? Then I understood, these Evil Soul Master are knows obviously our motions, cope with us specially, must eliminate in Dou Ling Empire us. Good opportunity that they choose!”

Not only Xu Tianyuan thinks, even if ideas in the other Xia Xuanchen and several assistant regimental commander hearts does not have anything to distinguish.

A Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp assistant regimental commander said very much very much: “Dou Ling Empire where has to threaten our powerhouses, if any, they already should send in the frontal battlefield. This meeting stealth, grasped the Space Power powerhouse to be formidable probably, if there are him, was responsible for investigating in the frontal battlefield, we did not have that easy destruction Sky Soul Empire. Now all have revealed the truth, hateful Evil Soul Master, hateful Holy Spirit Cult. Our military always disagrees with them, their this must seize the chance to weaken the military strength, weakens the War-God Empress strength. As the matter stands, they can prevail. We die outside, who knows? These many Undead Creature, Evil Soul Master came perhaps also to continue that two people.”

Listened to the words of this assistant regimental commander, the Xia Xuanchen complexion also ugly as if must drop the water leakage. Since Evil Soul Master already visualization, means that these Evil Soul Master have definitely grasps stays here them, moreover does not keep a living witness. In this case, they must first face, is the test of life and death crisis.

Xu Tianyuan coldly [say / way]: “To kill us, does not have is so easy. Xia the brother, to this time, we only had wrestles at risk of life. These Evil Soul Master powerhouses hide certainly in hidden place. trump card in our hand, take. These Evil Soul Master think really that our Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp so is good to cope?”

Xia Xuanchen nodded, said: “Xu brother felt relieved, this critical moment, our Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp cannot a poor thing but mine own. Certainly whole-heartedly. Today I with Xu brother together, leading the brothers to have a bloody road. Goes back to ask these Holy Spirit Cult bastards to do accounts.”

-----------------------------------------------------

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. Loves you.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-570-part-2





Volume 12

#570 - Under Plan Change


“Right, goes back to ask them to do accounts.”Several assistant regimental commanders are almost being filled with righteous indignation anger with one voice exclaim.

Each article ice-cold Soul Guidance Device starts the foreign aiming, in this time, is not knowing where from has transmitted an order, outside these Undead Creature swayingly erupted suddenly, is ordinary just like the tide, flushed toward the linkage defensive position.

Soul Guidance Ray, the bunch of Soul Guidance Cannon balls, launch under the orders of several formidable Soul Engineer unceasingly, suddenly, Undead Creature body exploded irrelevant to shatter. In the ground, everywhere is skeleton and internal organs, some at sixes and sevens things.

Huo Yuhao is drawing Tang Wutong, already arrived at the distant place airborne to look.

Shortly two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp firepower full appearances, they are some discolorations.

Although they already have very high judgment to these two Soul Engineer Corp, but saw truly their strength fully erupts, is surprised.

Without a doubt, these Undead Creature come from Huo Yuhao undead Demi-plane. In undead Demi-plane, Undead Creature is almost inexhaustible. Their origins, are not clear Huo Yuhao, Huo Yuhao knows that the Undead Creature total quantity in undead Demi-plane has a limit, after this limit, the Undead Creature total will again not continue to increase. However, once Undead Creature has consumed, in undead Demi-plane will continue to produce new Undead Creature.

Now, the Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White) main body, corpse Ice Bear King Second White, truly became the King in undead Demi-plane, the rein massive Undead Creature. In undead Demi-plane, besides minority Undead Creature of Bone Dragon this level, most Undead Creature listens to him to urge. As the matter stands, when Huo Yuhao opens Slumbering Calamity, driven by Second White, before be more violent.

However, the Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp destructive power was too formidable. Detests this Undead Creature, in undead Demi-plane is also one of the Pyramid top existences, in ground nearly invincible existence. Their body is huge, the defensive power is extremely astonishing. Erupts, the speed is also quick.

But, in front of Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, their proud huge statures under the heavy artillery bombardment, actually can only be irrelevant to shatter. It is not able to rush to the near. Moreover, because also the personal appearance is huge, they especially were also looked after by the firepower. In fierce thundering, has to detest to drop down unceasingly.

The soul leads outside the defensive position, the Undead Creature of big piece and big piece changes into the corpse unceasingly, but always has emergying Undead Creature to continue in the Soul Guidance Protective Cover direction to throw.

Although the Huo Yuhao goal does not kill these Soul Engineer, but cannot make them go through a strategic pass absolutely with ease, goes through a strategic pass is too relaxed, his goal could not be achieved.

Xu Tianyuan and Xia Xuanchen do not know, at this time, in the upper air, Huo Yuhao just for them simply was similar to one death mark general Soul Guidance Device received, from Starry Sky Douluo Ye Yulin, Sun-Moon Divine Needle!

Takes Huo Yuhao present cultivating as, can definitely be able to display the Sun-Moon Divine Needle prestige. He planned that while the opposite party pretends carelessness to him the time, wants to lure the enemy in deep, comes the broken bureau with Sun-Moon Divine Needle, then and Tang Wutong thwarts, strikes to kill these Soul Master. Their Martial Soul Fusion techniques, not only but Spiritual Tempest! But at that time, the Spiritual Tempest might cannot arrive completely on the enemy.

Afterward he changed the mind, this Sun-Moon Divine Needle was not suitable to use. Although this gadget the might is huge, but the characteristics are extremely also obvious, once uses, will be recognized very much easily, to the plan of Huo Yuhao disadvantageous. Therefore, he chose gave up using Sun-Moon Divine Needle. After all, this gadget besides Ye Yulin, known has, only then he.

In Soul Guidance Protective Cover, all Soul Engineer all entered the stimulated condition, is launching Soul Guidance Device in hand crazily. Looks that these Undead Creature just like shears the wheat general to drop down, similarly also has the carefree feeling!

Xu Tianyuan and Xia Xuanchen also gradually relaxed, although these Undead Creature seem threatening, in the feeling the strength is not weak. But their Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp the firepower to, actually some insufficiently looked.

Such being the case, they have nothing to worry that regardless of that Evil Soul Master strength strong, summoned these many Undead Creature continually, always had the weary time. To that time, perhaps is the good opportunity that they instead kill.

Each Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp has own background, is expert regiment chief, the best thing is bringing on them. For example, nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, the high-energy compression milk bottle wait / etc..

The high-energy compression milk bottle is the Sun-Moon Empire most newly developed new technology, each value is equal to eight levels of Soul Guidance Device, can store up to be equal to seven levels of Soul Engineer Soul Power.

Fiercely looks like, as if the performance-to-price ratio is not high. However, must know, but seven levels of Soul Engineer the Soul Saint rank, with the Soul Emperor level is not a level, storage Soul Power, naturally is also extremely considerable.

Simply speaking, in five levels of Soul Engineer hands, if such milk bottles, then, they can use their five levels of Soul Guidance Device to fight continually several double-hour, does not need to consider the issue of Soul Power consumption.

Installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball as for nine levels surely the might, that say nothing.

The reserve of Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp, is mainly primarily the high energy to compress Sealed Milk Bottle, but Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp, is actually in all Hand of the National Protector Soul Engineer Corp, has nine levels to install Soul Guidance Cannon ball most one surely. This point, now Emperor Sun-Moon Empire Xu Tianran does not know.

Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp is long-standing, each generation of commander are the Imperial Family ancestors and relatives. These Imperial Family ancestors and relatives are loyal to Imperial Family, but did not express that they certainly were loyal to then emperor. Therefore, once they nine levels have Soul Guidance Cannon ball type of thing surely, secret hideaway.

In all nine levels of Soul Engineer, only then few people will manufacture nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely. But in Imperial Family ancestor and relative hand grasps, not only wealth, various rare metals! Therefore, under various benefit exchanges, the unceasing reserve, making the strength that in the Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp hand controlled more and more formidable.

Only then all previous Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp regimental commander knows, if Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp carries on the fight not at any cost, even if Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, not necessarily is their matches. That is spends money completely the motion of being battered to death opposite party!

Also because of this, status of Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp in Imperial Family ancestor and relative mind is extremely high, they even believe that so long as is controlling Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp, to a certain extent, they have the decision entire Sun-Moon Empire future destiny ability.

Xu Tianyuan is this generation of Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp hierarch, he is the authority ** extremely intense person, these can change the empire destiny the treasure, although all will not bring on the body, but is also bringing the larger part.

Before shelled Spirit Dou City nine levels that used installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely are the army unify to transfer. It is not his. But now, he has been ready, used in oneself hand these cards in a hand.

Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer loses, although makes him very grieved, so long as in the hand also holds these cards in a hand, the Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp true strength will not be weakened.

“Bang, bang, bang and bang......”cloud of smoke float over, in the fierce bellow, Undead Creature of big piece just likes shears the wheat to drop down generally.

Also the moment, world as if has become peaceful. Emperor Dragon and in the Evil Tyrant two Soul Engineer Corp field of vision scopes, all Undead Creature had been ripped the fragment completely.

Finished?

Some Soul Engineer respites, after intense stimulated, somewhat exhaustedly raids slightly.

Xia Xuanchen looked at a Surveying Soul Guidance Device screen, shouted to clear the way loud: “Do not relax vigilantly, had not finished, enemy. They as if are building up.”

Yes, on the Surveying Soul Guidance Device screen, although the short distance did not have Undead Creature, but in the distant place forest, has massive Undead Creature to surround here as before. Has to launch the attack anytime possibility.

A stop, makes two Soul Engineer Corp mind tighten the degree slightly to do to relax. The change of this rhythm is very easy fatiguesome.

Really has Evil Soul Master to direct in the back, they stop, should, not only for rhythm control, but somewhat feared.

It is said that these Evil Soul Master want to train their Wraith Soul or is Undead Creature, must spend very big price. Dies, is weakens to one point of their strength. Snort, but actually must have a look, how long your Evil Soul Master can continue to attack. Compared with the positive storm, when has Soul Engineer Corp feared the match?

Xia Xuanchen and in the Xu Tianyuan heart is the similar years. What a pity, what they do not know, is controlling of this undead army, does not care about these Undead Creature casualties.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power compared before, there is a qualitative leap. Before the Undead Creature death, he observed some details.

After each Undead Creature died, their bodies will brave a vague fluctuation of energy, flies back to the King front door, returns to undead Demi-plane.

At the beginning, he also thinks that is own misconception, but afterward he discovered that is not the misconception. Under the careful identification, recognizes that Undead Creature Fire of Soul.

In other words, Undead Creature death, only then they check the body of Fire of Soul, but their Fire of Soul as before will actually return to undead Demi-plane.

Must know that in undead Demi-plane these Undead Creature Fire of Soul were initially Holy Necromancer and Slumbering Calamity Elux personally established. In their souls even also has the strength of Light, Angel Martial Soul owner Ye Guyi that even if most is good at purifying, does not have the means to purify their soul.

The quickest renewal, non- ball window reading invited.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-570-part-3





Volume 12

#571 - In The Fear Of King Of Beasts Soul Teacher Group


So long as Fire of Soul were not destroyed thoroughly, these Undead Creature really did not die, they can definitely strengthen the strength from undead Demi-plane, condenses the body.

However, the death and through the flexible fire reorganization, must consume the massive energies, but the origins of these energies, are undead Demi-plane.

After these years the understanding to undead Demi-plane, Huo Yuhao understands gradually that undead Demi-plane should be Elux Teacher alone opening space plane. Itself, Lord plane like Douluo Continent is unstable, a simpler point, undead Demi-plane is more like plane that is formed by the pure energy body, internal all comprised of the energy.

When creates it, Elux should use not the well-known method, has injected an extremely stable energy to it, this stable energy guarantees its self-sufficiency sufficiently. When inside Undead Creature was released, after carrying on the fight and consumption. This stable energy will also consume.

Naturally, speed of this consumption is very slow.

However, if consumes continually, does not supplement, the undead Demi-plane energy will consume sooner or later completely, to that time, entire Demi-plane will collapse.

Naturally, this situation is almost is not in reality possible.

More is understands to Undead Magic deeply, Teacher that Huo Yuhao to oneself that elapsed, Holy Necromancer and Slumbering Calamity Elux is the admiration.

Elux when manufactures undead Demi-plane, not only has given its stable energy, constructed a marvelous circulation it.

The function of this circulation, after looking like the plant absorption moisture content, is the same after the photosynthesis that the sunlight illumination has.

If undead in undead Demi-plane died in the outside, truly will drain part of energies, actual few of but draining. Then, how the energy in undead Demi-plane supplements? The way of supplement specially is actually simple. That is, through is not in undead Demi-plane the turnover of biology, supplemented.

Simply speaking, Huo Yuhao opens undead Demi-plane. One walk. Then. On him all energies, in undead Demi-plane. Will obtain an ingenious guidance and change, part of aura will make in undead Demi-plane have the chemical reaction, thus promotes the energy in undead Demi-plane, is at the saturated condition after the undead Demi-plane internal energy. No longer presented this type to respond.

But is the aura that Huo Yuhao has what? That is, Light!

Is the Light aura of outside. The sunlight shines the Light aura that brings, Light of innermost feelings, is the origin of this energy.

Therefore, so long as undead Demi-plane inheritance is innermost feelings Light, the itself ability is also not dark humanity or is any living thing, that. undead Demi-plane does not need to be worried about own energy consumption completely.

Before the Huo Yuhao belt went in three Soul Engineer Corp! How many Light strengths more than 3000 people can have? Therefore, since these days, the energy in undead Demi-plane has been at the saturated condition.

But so, Huo Yuhao fully will not consume the strength in undead Demi-plane. After all, these Undead Creature are the foundation in undead Demi-plane is, consumption too big words, will have the issue. Let alone, they exist, quite in a Huo Yuhao own direct subordinate army, although does not facilitate the use in the normal battlefield, but in some peculiar circumstances, for example at present, ten analysis and synthesis use.

An army, what most needs is what? Besides own strength, most important is actually, commander!

This is also Huo Yuhao lets the reason that the undead army stops temporarily.

Although the goal of undead army must consume these two Soul Engineer Corp, but does not rout them. But the consumption also has tasteful, own payout naturally the fewer the better.

Low and deep recitation sound, starts from resound in all directions, Lich, stiff body in the Undead Creature group, raises hand high the bone stick. But exactly the same that the incantation sound that in their mouth makes, just and Huo Yuhao recited at this time.

The terrifying undead aura ascends slowly, the light grey colored mist, fills the air in the trim forest. All living thing in forest, at the maximum speed are running away toward the distant place, does not dare to have the slight contact.

The terrifying strength is spreading, invisible pressure, has been oppressing Emperor Dragon and Evil Tyrant two Soul Engineer Corp. They are almost unconscious can promote the Soul Guidance Protective Cover prestige to the strongest condition, because they do not know that the following supplies to any degree, do not know when formidable will arrive.

Consumption, not only on the body, is on mind.

The Undead Creature most major characteristics are ugly and fierce, any normal humanity when facing Wang Lingsheng, the first response is frightened and intense. In this case, their mind consumptions compared with normal fight in fierce many, but this also similarly is Huo Yuhao the purpose that wants to serve.

The present situation is so, Huo Yuhao has not thought that the Undead Creature deterrent force can also have the mass consumptions to two Soul Engineer Corp.

mind exhausted restoration, even be more exhausted than Soul Power is much slower.

Two Soul Engineer Corp successively attack by Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong repeatedly, perished that many people, already was the frightened person, at this time faced Undead Creature, they frightened?

Xia Xuanchen and mentality in Xu Tianyuan heart is very clear, they understand actually that reason that hides in enemy in secret attacks with these Undead Creature, had not counted on that these Undead Creature can rout two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp. The real motive should to force them to fly into airborne.

Since has such goal, they in airborne certainly have arranged. If Evil Soul Master, these evil fellows were very possible to come not only two.

Therefore, two Commander Soul Engineer Corp is very calm, they can only wait for that waited for the enemy appears on own initiative. Regarding these Undead Creature, they have not looked actually in the eye. However, they somewhat have neglected obviously, under ordinary Soul Engineer this time psychology changes.

The long incantation, has continued one minute, the massive grey colored air currents from go toward linkage defense guard shield direction to rush forth that two Soul Engineer Corp form in all directions.

Does not need to order, various Soul Guidance Device attacks almost erupted immediately, tries to scatter these grey colored air currents.

However, what making two Soul Engineer Corp Soul Master be surprised, their all attacks, have not had any function to that grey colored air current unexpectedly.

Yes, without any function, a wee bit does not have.

Is this possible? In each individual heart almost simultaneously had this thought.

Then they discovered that these grey colored air currents in spread a distance after their directions, stopped unexpectedly, then falling slowly in the ground, has not attacked their defensive positions.

Soul Engineer just relaxed, their eyes stared in a big way.

In the sound of rustling sound, in ground, these became the corpse of bone and hashed meat, under moistening of that grey colored air current, congeals unexpectedly slowly, takes shape. Changes into skeletons and corpses, crawled from the ground.

Must know that before died in battlefield, dies Undead Creature under Soul Guidance Device thousands. At this time, when these Undead Creature start ressurection, in the empty field of vision, is almost in a flash by Undead Creature is filled.

What is more fearful, in each Soul Engineer heart, has the feeling that Undead Creature did not die, this is the most fearful place.

Undead Creature does not die, has certain limit, but, Soul Engineer do not know! They have not noted, before actually in these ressurection Undead Creature, does not have, these most formidable detesting and frightened knight and so on formidable Undead Creature, only then skeleton and corpse these quite preliminary Undead Creature.

The people under the fear, will erupt the formidable strength, this point is without a doubt.

Therefore, next one flickers, two Soul Engineer Corp battle efficiencies comprehensively burst out.

Enchanting rays, bring to dazzle the color eye-catching tail flame unceasing bombardment in Undead Creature, rips the fragment the big Undead Creature of piece and big piece.

These skeleton soldiers and corpses, often take several steps, has unravelled in the ray.

Innumerable Soul Engineer are roaring and is roaring, in the wildest way erupts strongest Soul Guidance Device that they can display, crazy attack and wreaking havoc.

The line of sight can in the range, has started fierce energy storm, terrifying Soul Guidance Ray and Soul Guidance Cannon ball, turned into the death area this region completely.

No longer has the corpse, after almost all Undead Creature drop down once more, the body directly changed into the flying ash to annihilate. The earth slowly undercuts under this terrifying attack.

If the bird's eye view from the sky, can see, is huge bright sphere. Other, anything could not see.

At the beginning, Xu Tianyuan and Xia Xuanchen to the striking power that two Soul Engineer Corp erupted are very gratified. But quick, they felt that some are not right. This striking power was also too fierce, moreover morale some are not as if right, not only surges upward, is also mixing with other things.

Frightened? Xia Xuanchen discovered quickly that oneself Soul Engineer, in some people eyes suddenly are revealing the frightened and crazy look.

He awakened finally, what a pity, his awakening, eventually some late.

----------------------------------------------

Sends the peerless Tang Sect cartoon newly in our prestige - platform, has joined the book friend in platform to examine directly, the book friend who has not joined, after joining, transmits: Peerless Tang Sect 130, can examine.

Joins the platform method to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication is our families.

Also, asked the recommendation ticket, everybody and I went against the recommendation list our Tang Sect together! Refuels together! Next month is our peerless Tang Sect last moon/month, I will try hard to erupt, put together the monthly ticket, asks everybody Duoduo to save the strength, fights bravely with the third child!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-571-part-1





Volume 12

#571 - In The Fear Of King Of Beasts Soul Teacher Group


Xia Xuanchen is almost call without hesitation makes noise, making everybody stop attacking. But, at this moment, when several hundred Soul Engineer use is erupting their striking power fully, each Assault Soul Guidance Device had been displayed Absolute by them, erupts is thundering fiercely, can his sound spread far? Nobody can hear radically, everyone in slaughtering in crazy and fear. Has a thought in their mind, that must destroy present all Undead Creature.

The aspect, somewhat lost control.

Xia Xuanchen has taken down successively several Soul Engineer, but these Soul Engineer after dropping down, immediately jump unexpectedly, to continue to attack. Only if were knocked down by him, otherwise nobody stops unexpectedly.

This crazy attack condition, in the field of vision does not have Undead Creature, has continued five minutes, gradually stands still.

Xia Xuanchen and Xu Tianyuan complexion becomes very ugly.

Soul Engineer the status in the army is no doubt lofty, but in the final analysis, they also eventually are the servicemen. The servicemen take the command prompt as the inherent responsibilities. Once the serviceman no longer command prompt, that also means that the out-of-control of entire army. This is most fearful.

Soul Engineer that stops, while stimulated, in the eye frightened vanished gradually. Undead Creature was swept clear by them thoroughly cleanly, the ground undercuts several rice, could not see again any stump residual limb breaks the arm.

But, after the fear, in everyone body first gushes out, is weary. The intense exhausted feeling, making many people sit on the ground, big mouth and big mouth was panting for breath. Exhausted of stimulated and body of mind, after this is erupts the repercussions.

But at this time, perhaps their bodies was also not weakest, but mind certainly was!

Xia Xuanchen has suddenly resounded anything, the personal appearance dodges, is responsible for investigating several Soul Engineer that to overrun toward Soul Engineer Corp.

What a pity. His motion eventually was late one step. Soul Engineer that is responsible for investigating almost subconscious calls out in alarm makes noise, “why and why the surrounding also has, that many Undead Creature?”

His sound, cuts off finally in the hand of Xia Xuanchen. However. When Xia Xuanchen covers his mouth, should not say. He all said.

During is in stimulated and exhausted Soul Engineer, each person first response, is almost the delay.

Also? Many? Before them, effort that makes?

In intense weariness, compared with formerly a more intense fear. Almost sweeps across immediately on.

Several cultivate to be weak, before consumed very big Soul Engineer, mind almost collapses in the flash. They fire into outside Soul Guidance Protective Cover in the crazy call, wants to run away. On each face, has the look change of distortion.

“Bang, Bang, Bang and Bang......”

Soul Guidance Ray project, the accurate hit, explodes the head!

Six Soul Engineer that clashes first, will shortly pour in the pool of blood.

All Soul Engineer vision subconscious looks in the direction of Soul Guidance Ray launch. Sees. Is stern-faced Xu Tianyuan.

“Maintains calm to me! Who dares to mutiny, kills without amnesty.”The Xu Tianran cold and gloomy sound spreads over in each Soul Engineer ear, has awakened them the fear to the discipline.

The Xu Tianyuan right hand lifts, blue Soul Guidance Cannon ball appeared in his hand an all over the body. “What flusters? Your these waste. Have you forgotten your status? Who are we? We are Sun-Moon Empire Hand of the National Protector, we are Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp. Now one of the world most formidable strengths. Any enemy, before us, the possibility of only then submitting. What do you fluster? Saw? Those who see in my hand was what? Nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely.”

“A moment ago this degree of attack, how even if comes ten times and hundred times again? We same can destroy them easily. Because the enemy uglily, is Undead Creature, did you fear?”

“Observation, favored, how many Undead Creature this time can also have to live?”At the same time was saying, on Xu Tianyuan the ray dodges again, a great artillery appears in his shoulder. Assistant regimental commander, has loaded that blue shell for him personally.

Xu Tianyuan does not even have aiming desirably, the deep blue colored light glow dodges, that installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to launch surely.

In the distant place woods, next one flickers, the terrifying deep blue colored light glow entire sky glow, huge energy tide crazy to rush forth, as if entire world in this flickered turned into the blue color.

On Surveying Soul Guidance Device of observation, at least over one-third red points vanished. Has not left any trace.

This is the top Soul Guidance Cannon ball prestige energy!

Originally low morale, frightened mood, under this deep blue colored light glow shines, returned to normal gradually. Soul Engineer, lower the head, stands up, was confessing for the behavior.

Xia Xuanchen relaxed secretly, compared the thumb to Xu Tianyuan quietly.

But Xu Tianyuan has knows painstakingly. A moment ago this situation, was actually how regardless of should not use nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely. These Undead Creature are just Evil Soul Master summoned, they had not found the Evil Soul Master trail. But nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to let the enemy caution and care surely very much obviously, is nastier.

But, doesn't he have the means? The morale of troops confusion, will soon mutiny, besides, in a short time, him could not find out other to deal like this.

What he does not know, Huo Yuhao this time expression also somewhat twitches. He has not thought that opposite party unexpectedly so easily releases one nine levels to install Soul Guidance Cannon to shoot surely, for stable morale of troops.

Luckily, his Spiritual Detection has covered the audience, saw Xu Tianyuan puts out that nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely the time felt that was not right. Immediately makes under this shell path strength strongest Undead Creature go all out toward the both sides to separate.

Even if, his undead army is also the loss is so serious. Naturally, he and Tang Wutong hides by far.

This round confrontation, Huo Yuhao, although got the winning side, but after the opposite party released nine levels surely installed Soul Guidance Cannon ball type to kill greatly, the disparity pulled closer.

On Huo Yuhao also nine levels surely install certainly the Soul Guidance Cannon ball, but he does not hate to use! This gadget, is not time as a last resort, he will not use. The value was too soaring.

The big writing skill, nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely. After the short startled anger, Huo Yuhao calms down rapidly.

In should not use in surely the situation that nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball obviously. The opposite party has actually chosen the use, what does this mean? Means that the opposite party somewhat lost control under own oppression.

Before flushed that six Soul Engineer is the best proof. Such being the case, that again gives you oppression strength. Moreover, changes a way.

Under the order of Huo Yuhao. The undead army is similar to tidal removes. Nine levels installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball the destructive power to be too fearful surely. In the face of this formidable striking power, any living thing. Must vanishes in puff of smoke. Even if Limit Douluo, does not dare the frontage to shoulder one nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball hardly surely the prestige energy.

In order to avoid a bigger loss, Huo Yuhao planned the thought that controls Undead Creature to continue to attack changed. His subsequent party, is not only this?

Don't forget. Not only he formidable Titled Douluo, simultaneously is nine levels of Soul Engineer. Is Soul Engineer, he regarding the Soul Engineer ability, familiar. For example, although the linkage defense guard shield can isolate all energy attacks and mind attacks, but, it does not have the means isolation temperature.

Although the temperature is also the one manifestation of energy. But stated differently, its dissemination, not only through air, moreover can pass most objects. To isolate the temperature completely, that is almost impossible. At least is modern Soul Guidance Device did not have the matter that means achieve.

“Retreated. These Undead Creature vanished.”

In Soul Guidance Protective Cover. The cheers erupt after several minutes.

Xu Tianyuan this talent relaxed, simultaneously in the heart also surges the proud feeling. In the nine levels install under the deterrent of Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, the match retreated finally. This means that their attacks also do stop? Yes! Some how many people can, in nine levels do install in front of the Soul Guidance Cannon ball also to maintain calm surely? If that nine levels installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball happen to kill part in enemy a moment ago surely, that was more perfect.

The expression on Xia Xuanchen face also relaxed, arrives at side Xu Tianyuan, said in a low voice: “Xu brother, we let everybody again rest a while. Now this condition, cannot get away.”

“Um.”Xu Tianyuan nodded, the beforehand full eruption, let just restore Soul Power Soul Master, on mind on Soul Power, received the consumption of considerable degree, non- recuperation, did not have the means to leave. Meanwhile, they must continue to observe, whether the enemy retreated.

“Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp is responsible for maintaining the linkage defense guard shield, the Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp member, grasps the rest.”Xu Tianyuan has issued the order immediately.

“Xia brother, can our beforehand plans also implement?”Xu Tianyuan asked to Xia Xuanchen in a low voice.

Xia Xuanchen said: “Must execute, must wait to say again. First makes everybody restore.”

“This Dou Ling Empire ghost weather, did the day is cloudy, well, snow?”Xu Tianyuan somewhat surprised saying.

In the season, this little while is late autumn, Dou Ling Empire in Continent north, capital Spirit Dou City also in national territory by the north. Therefore, the temperature to other countries, wants to be lower.

In the sky, the sparse snowflake drops from the clouds, fluttering falls toward the ground. The free time of a while, in the ground turned into piece of light Bai Se (White Color).

The general low temperature, regarding these Soul Master, naturally is not anything. Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer that is responsible for defending also with a laugh look that on Soul Guidance Protective Cover fell snowflake.

-------------------------------------------------

Requested earnestly everybody to recommend the vote support, this month did not ask the monthly ticket, but we whether to go forward in the recommendation list several steps! Recently our Tang Sect will have a series of big movements.

Next month, I will try hard to erupt to put together the monthly ticket.

Meanwhile, next month, our Tang Sect online bookstore must open. Later everybody does not need to worry that did not have the place to buy the signature book, I can each month as far as possible many bamboo slips give everybody.

Our micro stations also estimated that promotes the end of this month or the beginning of next month, meets the issue of system our cartoon, some I usually write, exclusive small short article. For example beyond Douluo Continent, for example I will also find the time to write 200,000 character about Douluo Continent God Realm fables next year specially. Comes to be plentiful we Douluo world. Therefore, everybody and I together diligently. First pushes up recommendation list our Tang Sect. After our Tang Sect bookstores open, will also unveil the peripheral product one after another. And the part will bestow to directly buying the book friends of book.

Makes these, not to make money, I do not need any profit, I only hope our Tang Sect book friends can better integration Tang Sect, better experiences our Tang Sect world through the different quarters! Loves you, thank you. You make me have today, in the future, I only hope that well repayment you, I will recuperate the good body as far as possible, wrote for everybody for several years. Later I will also try hard, strives for perfection in the quality creates. I must make everybody take am Tang Sect for the honor!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-571-part-2





Volume 12

#571 - Under The Fear Of King Of Beasts Soul Teacher Group


Soul Guidance Protective Cover itself does not have what temperature, because of internal massive eruption Soul Guidance Ray and shell attack, to exterior launched from the interior a moment ago, lets outside Soul Guidance Protective Cover and guard shield, the temperature slightly has the difference.

Therefore the snowflake falls on the guard shield, quick dissolved. However, as the snowflake gradually increases, guard shield surface were also gradually many Bai Se (White Color). Looking from the distant place, looks like a huge Bai Se (White Color) semicircle spheroid, is very interesting.

“Dou Ling Empire this ghost weather, but also was really a little cold.”Soul Engineer said in a low voice. Simultaneously has drawn own clothes.

That eruption, many Soul Engineer had perspired a moment ago, this snowed, quick of temperature as if drop. Many people start to spill their clothes, what is better is own heat preservation.

Snow gradually below was bigger. The guard shield surface, the snow also started to thicken gradually. The temperature again has not actually dropped are too many, but internal Soul Engineer think as before somewhat coldly.

Xu Tianyuan ordered, making few people light a fire. Warms up to everybody. Also exchanges is eating a thing.

The quick, steaming hot soup has delivered to him and Xia Xuanchen, their present Soul Power are very full, does not need meditate. After having eaten several hot soup, the body is warm immediately, is relaxes finally.

“Xia brother! Has not thought really that our time comes to carry out the task, front all so are smooth, to behind, had instead had problems.”

In the Xia Xuanchen eye the cold brightness twinkle, eats up bowl inside hot soup, the sinking sound track: “This going back, decides does not give up with that Holy Spirit Cult. They dare to begin to us unexpectedly. I thought that this crowd of souls led are exactly chatty.”

Xu Tianyuan eyes narrows the eyes, in the look murderous aura fills the air, “Holy Spirit Cult, good Holy Spirit Cult. Does not know that these fellows walked. I actually a little do not hope now they left. What a pity, Surveying Soul Guidance Device searches not to observe their exact location, otherwise. Gives them one nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, even if not die, must make them delaminate the skin. When do we become so passive?”

Xia Xuanchen said: “Most repugnant is that meeting stealth fellow. Holy Spirit Cult hideaway deep of, our Chapter 1349 lineup. The preparation leaves.”

Finally must walk, audiences Soul Engineer are one is also eager to try. They have treated a lot of time here, after fight. Now wants to go back earlier, good true steadfast rest.

Soul Guidance Protective Cover form in the interior. Protects large-scale Soul Guidance Protective Cover of some residence people to start to weaken slowly.

But they discovered with amazement, although their Soul Guidance Protective Cover weakened, but the outside actually as before is maintaining the guard shield of semicircle, snow and ice guard shield!

“Well, these snows iced up!”Internal biggest Soul Guidance Protective Cover takes back completely, small Soul Guidance Protective Cover complete. Outside snow has not fallen, looks like a giant ice room, is quite unusual.

“Tries with Soul Guidance Ray.”Xia Xuanchen said.

Immediately has Soul Engineer to release together Soul Guidance Ray. Immediately, a hole appeared, has revealed outside skylight. Meanwhile, a chill in the air also heads from this pinhole.

“Ha Ha, this also is really interesting. Has not thought that our Soul Guidance Protective Cover can also build the house.”

Xu Tianyuan and Xia Xuanchen somewhat are also surprised, this situation, they also similarly are Chapter 1349 volume radiations!

A series of “puff”in sound, the positive ice layer was routed instantaneously. Has revealed outside big piece space.

Woods cold air/Qi beyond description instantaneously is also heading on. This woods cold aerodynamic impact on each Soul Engineer linkage defense guard shield, the air current had been blocked by the guard shield, but that actually was also occupied by all people in the instantaneous gable extremely coldly, because there is existence of Soul Guidance Protective Cover, the feeling of Soul Engineer wants on slow some, but they see outside world time, stared in a big way the eye.

Outside, completely is one snow and ice world, takes a broad view to look, can only see Bai Se (White Color) unexpectedly, the innumerable snows in big flakes in the strong winds howl to fly. Because before, has the impediment of ice layer, they do not know that outside world turned into this appearance.

Also while shocking in sees all at present, they also impressively felt that chill in the air to raid.

The temperature almost dropped 50 degrees below zero instantaneously, moreover in the situation of Soul Guidance Protective Cover defense, has isolated part of chill in the air.

Each Soul Engineer likely was the whole body instantaneously is sprinkled trough ice water, the whole body blood as if must congeal. That fierce impact, making them hit to tremble smartly spirit. Everyone subconscious body trembles, the motion became somewhat stiff.

However, they after all are also Soul Master, within the body Soul Power circulation, outside subconscious resistance severe coldness. But, this severely cold actually as if seizes every opportunity general.

“It is not good.”If at this time Xu Tianyuan and Xia Xuanchen could not have seen the issue, they did not match as these two Soul Engineer Corp regimental commanders.

So severely cold, has far exceeded the normal category. The cold air of this terror still in rapid suddenly to increase, particularly outside cold current injects, that snowflake impact on the linkage defense guard shield, resounded piece by piece unexpectedly has been similar to the metal friction common sound.

“To! Lift-off.”Xia Xuanchen is almost without hesitation drinks to make noise greatly.

Came in only to say again. Obviously, they the trap of enemy, could not attend to pondering how now the enemy achieves. But regardless of this Soul Ability is how formidable, impossible to cover entire world, so long as clashes, flies into the upper air, naturally will be separated from coverage of this extremely cold air current.

The response of Xia Xuanchen is quick, moreover he is first runs out outward.

However, at this time, formerly also made them feel that the surprised snow room, did not have the explosion of omen!

“Bang rumble!”

In the fierce bellow, innumerable Absolute Ice explode, the terrifying explosive force, will shortly change into the most intense air current, sweeps across Soul Guidance Protective Cover that all Soul Engineer have formed.

Formerly for must exit, the linkage defense guard shield turned into every ten person one groups, no longer overall. Therefore, now quite therefore dozens Soul Guidance Protective Cover respectively are withstanding this terror explosive force.

Ten four rings to five rings cultivates for Soul Engineer, the strength puts together is very strong. However, what if they face is the powerhouse of Titled Douluo rank, they will not have any opportunity without a doubt. This is the disparity of absolute strength.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-571-part-3





Volume 12

#572 - At Perfect Surprise Attack


The start of this large explosion, is everyone has not expected, because before, had not discovered that outside has any Soul Power fluctuation to appear, in this case, without any preparation, everyone comes under the extremely cold influence, own Soul Power cannot display the most high level.

When this large explosion approaches, most approaches the ice layer, the strength is also the weakest four Soul Engineer squads, changed into the fragment in cold the extremely explosion instantaneously, the ice same water piece!

That is 40 Soul Engineer! Such was killed unexpectedly. But Xia Xuanchen that just about to clashes, forcibly was promoted similarly also by that terrifying explosive force.

Suddenly, the entire scene became a confusion.

Defense, fully defense!

Dazzling golden light bursts out suddenly, Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp the Xu Tianyuan chest place projects golden light, golden light changed into piece of light barrier to leave to the exterior crest, has withstood the big piece snow white ice flower. He rushes to side Xia Xuanchen rapidly, their joint effort, haunches Soul Guidance Protective Cover, to forefront.

Rapidness that the large explosion comes, might terror, but vanishes also quick.

After the explosive force vanishes, in complete thirty Soul Engineer squads, besides first four squads by scrap beside, three squads, because the strength is bad, own linkage defense guard shield to shatter, they, although had not been killed directly, but was also frozen ice sculptures by outside ultra-low temperature.

What is more terrifying, they just changed into the ice sculpture, the body once more blast out. Changes into a place fragment, where is unable to distinguish to be humanity.

70 Soul Engineer, vanishes in puff of smoke during this surprise attack. Soul Guidance Protective Cover of several squads also blasted out the flash, but they diligently stimulates to movement Soul Power fully, sealed up Soul Guidance Protective Cover in the confusion. Then can escape death by a hair's breadth.

Runs out of the snow and ice, two big nine levels of Soul Engineer simultaneously release the strongest attack, to strafes in all directions. Soul Guidance Ray and Soul Guidance Cannon, blast out in not far away unceasingly.

At this time, although loses seriously, but two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp demonstrated they extremely high quality, each squad immediately chose to lift off, toward airborne flew. Moreover the distance is very near.

Xu Tianyuan, Xia Xuanchen and that four vice- team leader fly finally, they fully showed are the commander qualities, brought up the rear for the allied force.

Such that just like Xia Xuanchen sentences in advance, after Soul Engineer Corp increases to 500 meters highly, the extremely cold air current vanished gradually, all returned to normal.

However, the most Soul Engineer complexion was also frozen azure Bai Se (White Color).

More than 300 Soul Engineer, have been short of 70 people. Establishments of two Soul Engineer Corp, to the present, only remaining Soul Engineer Corp.

The Xia Xuanchen complexion is very ugly, completely is the iron green, the reason is very simple, in seven squads that died a moment ago, six are his Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp.

What Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp most excels is speed, but in absolute strength, has a disparity with Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp. Therefore, in the overall strength, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp completely showed at this time came out their superiority. The damage wants small many.

Xu Tianyuan took a fast look around one probably, saw the issue was, has patted the shoulder of Xia Xuanchen, “Old Xia, no rush. Waits, gives you also to supplement a manpower from the reserve team of our that side. Small, the linkage defends formation, supports to me, cannot give the enemy again the opportunity.”

This large explosion a moment ago came was really too towering, making them be caught off guard completely. Xia Xuanchen and Xu Tianyuan think that has been careful. But who knows that was the [say / way]. They until now cannot find out, actually that compared favorably with eight levels to install the explosion of Soul Guidance Cannon ball to come a moment ago sufficiently surely from where, why these ice will be detonated.

The linkage defense guard shield opens, this time, for security, is together displays by two Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer, the Soul Guidance Protective Cover ray also becomes very pure.

“Walks, we flew Duan Julizai to say to distant place first. Wants under the manufacture that situation, it is estimated that should be the domain class ability. The consumption of this ability is also huge, although could not find these bastards, but believes that they want to pursue us not to be easy again. First is far away from here.”

Soul Engineer Corp starts to accelerate to fly toward the West, two Soul Engineer Corp simultaneously open to defend the guard shield to consume very in a big way, moreover cannot continue to fly for a long time, but could not attend to this situation at present, first is far away from this dangerous region is most important.

The Xu Tianyuan look is better, at least his here loss Xia Xuanchen is not too big. Xia Xuanchen obtains the comfort of Xu Tianran, although complexion slightly attractive a point, but the aura is as before cloudy. The disparity of reserve forces and voting for member is very big. To train a qualified Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp member, requires a lot of time. This time, is vitality damages severely really! The Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp almost two-thirds manpower did not have.

“Regimental commander. This brothers are not probably good.”In this time, an anxious sound is resounding.

Xu Tianyuan turns head to look that sees only itself behind not far away, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer is holding another person. By he is holding Soul Engineer face whiten, has been cut off a arm and a leg, the whole body because of the excessive loss of blood, appeared extremely terrifying dark green Bai Se (White Color), eyes, is gloomily does not have up.

The corners of the mouth of Xu Tianyuan twitched, the mood also becomes dreary, the floating body arrives at side this Soul Engineer, sighed, “brothers, walked. When we go back, certainly finds way to revenge for you.”

At the same time was saying, he lifts hand, experiences personally on the severely wounded Soul Engineer forehead to press toward that.

This is the custom in armed forces, is seriously injured, if treats and cures without enough time, then, was let its dying by commander in chief getting rid, quite in being buried in the battlefield hero, after going back, not only wants the elaborate funeral, but also in the family|home will also obtain extremely rich pension, even commander must go to offer condolences personally.

On that Soul Engineer face revealed the gratified color, has closed eyes, prepared to accept oncoming of death.

Xu Tianyuan this palm pats does not calculate makes an effort, he is planned after the palm contacts this Soul Engineer forehead, Soul Power outside spits again, otherwise makes an effort oversized, will ruin his corpse. Is fellow soldier, his also not being able to get down hand.

Xia Xuanchen has turned head, this scene, anyone, is not willing to see. Other Soul Engineer also low-spirited lowering the head.

In this time, suddenly, the body of Xu Tianyuan has been shaking shaking. A hand that stretcher patient only saves suddenly, is quietly according to his chest place.

Xu Tianyuan thinks he is subconscious, but, flickers below, a crisis beyond description raises in his moral nature instantaneously.

Does not need him to make anything to respond that triggering Soul Guidance Protective Cover and Paragon Protecting Cover, almost immediately were inspired.

The dazzling ray and intense Soul Power fluctuation have also alarmed all people.

What a pity, their responses already late.

A dark blue whirlpool, appearance of being quietly in Xu Tianyuan chest place. Takes cultivating of his nine levels of Soul Engineer as, then powerful Soul Guidance Protective Cover and Paragon Protecting Cover. In front of this dark blue whirlpool, unexpectedly ripped smashing. That is only pale such as the hand of snow, at this time, light according to the chest of Xu Tianyuan.

The terrifying mind engine'knock', is centered on the body of that wounded person, bursts out instantaneously outward.

Surroundings nearest dozens Soul Engineer, almost will explode shortly the head. Several assistant regimental commanders, by the Spiritual Power impact of that terror flew.

Xia Xuanchen is also one staggers. Flies upside down ten several rice.

Body of Xu Tianyuan stiff in midair, his back Flight Soul Guidance Device almost extinguishes instantaneously.

That wounded person, that Soul Engineer of beforehand report, the personal appearance actually quietly desalinated.

The linkage defense guard shield slight distortion, that two forms also thorough disappeared.

Linkage defense guard shield that is displayed by Soul Engineer only foreign, but not internal. In other words, inside person can exit, but outside person cannot come.

Only then linkage Defensive Soul Guidance Device of Soul Guidance Array place can control, internally or externally can isolate or not isolate.

Until the form of that two person disappears, the body of Xu Tianyuan along with the flights of other Soul Engineer, hits toward Soul Guidance Protective Cover on.

Xia Xuanchen was almost for a while the gate pulse in the past, wanted to hold on him.

However, late!

“Bang!”The body of Xu Tianyuan blasts out instantaneously, changes into the innumerable fragments, scatters in all directions to flutter about.

Xia Xuanchen Soul Guidance Protective Cover one was stimulated, this has not been injured, but periphery several Soul Engineer were killed and wounded. That two people, actually disappeared from the scene, disappearing of disappearance.

“Bastard! Bastards”Xia Xuanchen angry was roaring, all Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer, cannot help but sadly exhaled the sound.

Xu Tianyuan directed this Soul Engineer Corp to have for a long time, at this time died, regarding the attack of entire Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp, was unequalled.

Who can want to obtain, one generation of Soul Engineer powerhouses, nine levels of Soul Engineer, the empire crown prince, such died unexpectedly. Even cannot fight to contend with the match directly.

Painful sad Hu, sends out in each Soul Engineer mouth, but they are basic including the personal enemy are everyone have not seen clearly. They do not even know how that two enemies mix.

Beyond several kilometers, in the midair, Huo Yuhao holds the hand of Tang Wutong to appear slowly, naturally, only then they can see each other, these Sun-Moon Empire powerhouses cannot see absolutely their.

Without a doubt, that two had sneak attacked the Xu Tianyuan person a moment ago, is Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, more exact, this is a perfect surprise attack, perfect Decapitation Strike.

This is my first time uploads the novel in our Tang Sect office. Message by commemorating. I will send picture everybody in our work room to be interested in going to in the prestigious platform the platform to look.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-572-part-1





Volume 12

#572 - In Perfect Surprise Attack


Even, at that time was in the soul to lead to defend them in guard shield, if attacks whole-heartedly, that inside Soul Engineer, can live, perhaps little little, even might be annihilated.

However, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong have not done, they have a longer-term plan, but this plan, regarding the destruction entire Sun-Moon Empire army, will be more meaningful.

The snow is in the Huo Yuhao control, Ice Explosion Technique, is the Absolute Ice strong capability that he most excels. But that forces audiences Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer to lift off, in fact is only Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain part of strengths.

If Huo Yuhao really by destruction these artificial goals, when they start to lift off, Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain will release the strongest condition, but that time Soul Engineer Corp, took every ten people as a squad, can resist that degree attack truly, can only say that was few.

But Huo Yuhao has not done, he has destroyed several squads through Ice Explosion Technique. Meanwhile, while flaw that the linkage defenses of several squads show, sneaks rapidly, strikes to kill the two quietly, with the aid of Imitation Soul Ability and function of Spiritual Disturbance domain, mixes in smoothly.

When linkage defense guard shield turns completely, his goal has been achieved actually.

If Huo Yuhao is only ordinary Transcendent Douluo, then, wants through stealing the attack kills nine levels of Soul Engineer is not that easy matter, but, ten million do not forget that he had second Soul Nucleus, Absolute Ice second Soul Nucleus. This means that he can use the second Soul Nucleus strength directly, that dark blue whirlpool is this category.

Absolute Ice second Soul Nucleus, in addition, Emperor's Palm, Great Coldness Snow!

A palm congealing heart.

Xu Tianyuan in that flickered has died a violent death. Huo Yuhao brings Tang Wutong to escape calmly. Fled the scene quietly. But the mind engine knock is not Spiritual Tempest, this is he shows mercy. Because he must leave behind many strengths to make them go back, becomes the unstabilizing factor in Sun-Moon Empire army.

Naturally. Before leaving, him also has left behind some special things. Makes a more profound impression to these Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer.

In Soul Guidance Protective Cover. The flight stopped, exited in the beforehand surprise attack dead Soul Engineer that now two Soul Engineer Corp surplus Soul Engineer add, the total quantity did not arrive at original half.

The Xia Xuanchen complexion was unable to describe with the ugliness, his look even some delay, regarding the Xu Tianyuan ability, he very much understand. Is nine levels of Soul Engineer, Xu Tianran, although is not most formidable these in this ranks. But his Soul Guidance Device equipment, actually absolutely is most top.

Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp property that Humanoid Soul Guidance Device various triggering defenses, on him carry, wait / etc., Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp property?

Xia Xuanchen had realized suddenly an important issue, eye one bright, hurries to seek in Soul Guidance Protective Cover.

Has the linkage to defend the guard shield, even if the body of Xu Tianyuan explodes, his thing should also still exist.

However, when Xia Xuanchen sought for the long time not to have any harvest painstakingly. His complexion changed even more ugly.

Didn't have? The Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp wealth did not have. This means that was taken away by the enemy. In other words, these people sneak attack them. The most important reason, must take away the Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp property, but doesn't massacre them completely?

Yes! Then serves the Evil Soul Master benefit!

In this time, suddenly, the loud breathing was awakening Xia Xuanchen, his subconscious looks to the surroundings. Immediately the surprised discovery, in Soul Engineer, several people of complexion changed a paleness, eyes actually turned into the blood red. Aura extremely loud.

“It is not good, is the Evil Soul Master ability. They had been controlled. Has killed them.”Xia Xuanchen drinks in the sound severely, oneself began.

After several breaths. The Xia Xuanchen angry roaring sound reverberates in Soul Guidance Protective Cover, “bastard, Holy Spirit Cult, I and you are unable to co-exist!”

The distant place, Tang Wutong sighed spookily, “Yuhao. I a little am uncomfortable.”

Huo Yuhao is hugging her slender waist, “I know. However, this is the war, war wants the deceased person. Actually, these people, although was attempted to pervert by me, but they can restore after a period of time. I also can only achieve do not need the ability of Undead Magic master to kill people as far as possible. You thought that I now did become more and more cruel?”

Tang Wutong shaking the head of gently, said: “No, you said right, the war is brutal, is not the enemy dies, was we died. Kills opposite party Soul Engineer, they can little kill some of our people.”

Huo Yuhao sighed, on the face revealed a light halo, cold sound track: “Ju Zi(orange) said right, past I, was the heart was too soft, this was the war, wanted to control it and change it, must change these problems. But you could rest assured that I will certainly strictly adhere to the conscience.”

“Moreover, in the past I have also walked in the erroneous zone, Wutong, in the frontal battlefield, in fact loses to Ju Zi(orange) is very normal. Because, our overall strengths and Sun-Moon Empire have the disparity. Therefore under the Ju Zi(orange) open intrigue, has led by the nose by her. However, this actually does not mean that we do not have the opportunity. The open intrigue is not good, that can only use the plot. Open and aboveboard is unable to defeat them, that can only use the surprise-attack forces. This is also I am Ultimate Soldier can achieve. Walks, we should go back, how has a look at the Spirit Dou City that side situation, hopes that can help them stabilize as far as possible lives. Is insufficient the chaos.”

“Um.”Tang Wutong nodded, they turn around to go, directly soar the Spirit Dou City direction to fly.

They retreated, but surplus Emperor Dragon and Evil Tyrant two Soul Engineer Corp remnant armed forces are actually gingerly slow departures. In that depressing atmosphere, in each Soul Engineer innermost feelings, has been full of the terror anger. Each of them looks like installs Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, may blast out anytime!

Spirit Dou City.

When Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong return this Dou Ling Empire palace wall, the surprised discovery, in the city no longer had the thick smoke to emit . Moreover, the overall atmosphere as if is also relatively stable.

At this time weather already basically dark, on the street does not have what pedestrian, has the massive servicemen to go on patrol unceasingly, obviously, this city already curfew.

Sees this, Huo Yuhao also secretly relaxed. Brings Tang Wutong to enter a city quietly, simultaneously opened own Spiritual Detection, is searching the trail of partners.

His Spiritual Detection under the stimulation of movement of Dual Soul Nucleus, the range that can cover was too big, although is not enough to cover the entire city, but at their flying speeds, quick had found the Xu Sanshi five people of trails.

Found them is very easy, because, Xu Sanshi five people, in the ruins place of imperial palace.

Since they arrive, returns to Huo Yuhao at this moment, passed the free time of five double-hour.

Huo Yuhao through the Spiritual Detection direct link in Xu Sanshi, simultaneously brought Tang Wutong to fall in their directions.

The ray twinkle, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong quietly appear side Xu Sanshi, Jiang Nannan, Ye Guyi, Nan Qiuqiu and Ji Juechen.

At this time here may, not only their five people, on the ruins of entire imperial palace, have almost stood the person, moreover many people wear the armor attire of military officer.

Suddenly presents two people, the Spirit Dou City high-ranking military officers who was frightened by the slightest sound have made the intense response immediately, suddenly, the Soul Power fluctuation surge, many people released their Martial Soul.

Xu Sanshi lifts the hand, said: “Person on one's own side, is my Junior Brother and Junior Sister.”

The Huo Yuhao surprised discovery, the Xu Sanshi words really very much have the deterrent force here, listened to his such saying, the military officers and Soul Master were then peaceful, but looks that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong vision somewhat was surprised.

Yes! How these two people come, their nobody is clear. Is this what kind strength?

Huo Yuhao dispatches an inquiry to Xu Sanshi the look, Xu Sanshi is also turning head to look to him. Sees the eye of Xu Sanshi, the Huo Yuhao heart sinks. The eye pupil of Xu Sanshi turned into the red unexpectedly most probably, on the white of the eye has covered entirely the blood thread.

Xu Sanshi Huo Yuhao of this condition first time sees, usually, Xu Sanshi is always laughing, in Shrek Seven Devils, absolutely is the pistachio nut common character. His strength is very strong, but actually and who relates is very good. Especially in front of Jiang Nannan, is an appearance of scapegoat.

May at this moment, on Xu Sanshi actually release swift and fierce killing intent, the makings of whole person become are different.

“Little Junior Brother, these Soul Engineer how?”The Xu Sanshi sinking sound asked that his voice also already somewhat hoarse.

Huo Yuhao said: “Two Soul Engineer Corp, separately are Sun-Moon Empire Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp and Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp. Under me and Wutong chasing down, by our to get rid of half. Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp was killed by me. Other people ran away. However, they do not know that is hand that we leave, under my concealing, they should think that is Evil Soul Master begins.”

“Um, thank you Yuhao.”Xu Sanshi nodded to him, has turned the head, murderous aura in eye pupil not only has not weakened, instead has the trend of rise.

Huo Yuhao hurries to shift several steps, arrives at side Jiang Nannan, asked in a low voice: “Fourth Senior Sister, was Third Senior Brother this? What situation are here these military officers? Now in Spirit Dou City how? Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family whether......”

Jiang Nannan has broken his question with the look, then passes message said: “Situation is not very good. The sneak attack opportunity of Sun-Moon Empire choice was good. Happen to is the Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family meeting time. Therefore, Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family is almost annihilated, all was killed. In Spirit Dou City the chaos, we catch up luckily promptly. Before me, does not know, on Sanshi really has the emperor's clan bloodlines of Dou Ling Empire, he has used a status faith token, after entering city gate starts, gradually draws in the army, keeps the order, this forced to suppress the Spirit Dou City confusion. Now everybody gathers here, one is you came back, another, must discuss the countermeasure.”( to be continued )



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-572-part-2





Volume 12

#572 - Under Perfect Surprise Attack


Dou Ling Empire is Imperial Family annihilated? Was extinguished completely kills?

Although already guessed correctly that may be this result, when Huo Yuhao hears this result truly, the complexion cannot help but becomes ugly. Sun-Moon Empire, was really too ruthless. Ju Zi(orange), was too ruthless!

Before he now already some regrets, has not struck to kill the complete two Soul Engineer Corp member, is the Dou Ling Empire revenge.

However, Xu Sanshi unexpectedly is the Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family bloodlines, this also makes Huo Yuhao be startled, but they before no one knew! This time bumps into.

The function of Imperial Family bloodlines absolutely the effect of Shrek Academy student good were too more. No wonder Third Senior Brother they can in such a short time keep the order in Spirit Dou City.

However, this obviously also insufficient! Dou Ling Empire, what now most needs is the pillar.

“Crown prince, now Imperial Family is on the wane, we need your leadership.”A near 60-year-old veteran goes forward several steps, on one knee knees down, said to the Xu Sanshi sinking sound.

Visits him, complexion cloudy clear uncertain change of Xu Sanshi.

Not far away, another age is similar, wears the old man actually sinking sound track of minister clothing: “It is not good. This status still waits for considering. How can be so rash?”

The veteran gets angry: “Puts your fart, I endured you to be very long, you rubbed chirp, we already organized to chase down these bastards. You dare farting again, the father immediately to get rid of you.”

“Commander Li, now is not the impulsive time. The position of Imperial Family, is important!”The old man is also a forced smile of face.

Is called the Commander Li veteran sinking sound track: “After crown prince came, he was any us to look in the eye. If not he controls in the city promptly the order, perhaps entire Spirit Dou City was chaotic, could not insist that we dare to come. Now empire elite goes to that side Shrek Academy to rush to rescue, if Spirit Dou City the civil strife, definitely will give the Sun-Moon Empire opportunity. The crown prince has proven his status with his motion to us. Now crown prince likely was the survivor who Imperial Family was a rear survival, did not support him, whom but also supported?”

That wears the old man of official's costume, is the Dou Ling Empire hundred officer's heads, current dynasty prime minister, his complexion is very ugly, very hesitates. If empire a group of people without a leader, truly is the major problem, at this time, once had this problem, Dou Ling Empire has the possibility that the fission, disintegrates instantaneously.

But, a country the main inheritance can it be that so is also simple, if at present this person, what to do radically is the spy who Sun-Moon Empire sends? Although on him has the faith token, but if Sun-Moon Empire seeks it deliberately, not necessarily can't attain this faith token?

Therefore, in this prime minister big person heart very hesitates, does not dare to accept directly.

In this time, Xu Sanshi has been opening the mouth, became with his the somewhat hoarse sound said: “Regarding the empire throne, my not any thought of coveting. However, now Dou Ling Empire suffers the so serious attack, even if searches other Imperial Family, requires the time. Therefore, I must manage this position temporarily. Prime minister Sir, your worry I understood very much, then, please listen to me to narrate, my origin.”

Listened to his such saying, presented the vision of all official military commanders to be attracted the past by him immediately.

The real men, have so-called being able to refrain from doing things, at present this time, Xu Sanshi bravely steps forward, for is not this authority, but will be the Dou Ling Empire future.

“my name is Xu, call Xu Sanshi. Said honestly, I am from the heart is not willing to acknowledge, oneself is Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family. Because, initially my parents' marriage had not obtained the blessing of empire Imperial Family, causing them to elope.”

Such remarks, some old old ministers, on the face revealed look looking pensive, this story, somewhat seemed to be familiar.

Xu Sanshi continues saying: “Yes, my mother named Xue Ying. Emperor Dou Ling Empire, is my biological uncle. My father, is the head of household of Mystic Deep Family present age. I think that perhaps in this regard, everybody will have a memory. My previous time comes Dou Ling Empire time, is a child.”

On the senior prime minister face reveals color suddenly, “original, you unexpectedly are Princess Xue Ying son, your faith token, is the princess?”

Xu Sanshi nod of silently.

The senior prime minister said: “If so, then, your status we can approve. Inherited princess's faith token, means that you at least can be the empire county king. But now, in Imperial Family you are the person of being a rear survival, status at least one crown prince, we can acknowledge. However, you need the certificate, you are Princess Xue Ying son are good.”

Xu Sanshi light [say / way]: Martial Soul that “I inherit is father, is not Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family Martial Soul. However, I believe that our Mystic Deep Family Martial Soul also calculates some fame on Continent. Then, asking everybody to favor.”

At the same time was saying, Xu Sanshi lifts the hand, at the same time jet black such as shield of black ink on appearance of being quietly before all people.

Outward diffusion of light golden halo along with it from this shield, quick, the shield surface turned into the golden color. On the golden shield of carapace shape, a small snake slowly is creeping along.

Black Tortoise Shield!

Yes, Xu Sanshi Mystic Deep Turtle Armor Shield, had already evolved into Black Tortoise Shield!

“Um? Isn't your this Mystic Deep Turtle Armor Shield? Mystic Deep Turtle Armor Shield clearly is the black.”Saying of Commander Li doubts.

Xu Sanshi nodded, said: “Yes, my this is not pure Mystic Deep Turtle Armor Shield. Our Mystic Deep Family Martial Soul, has certain Black Tortoise bloodlines inheritance, but I am very lucky, in the unceasing practice, stimulated to be that some bloodlines of Black Tortoise, Mystic Deep Turtle Armor Shield, evolved into Black Tortoise Shield.”

At the same time was saying, Soul Ring raise from his along with it slowly.

When all civil and military ministers on the scene saw on Xu Sanshi lives the splendor bright eight Soul Ring, suddenly dumbfounded, during the audience also fell into one piece to be silent.

Knows that some ministers who Princess Xue Ying can calculate to obtain at present this are how old, is only twenty years old! Is less than absolutely 30 years old. At such age, actually had eight Soul Ring? What does this mean? Means the peerless talent!

Mystic Deep Turtle Armor Shield, is in itself in defense class Martial Soul extremely formidable existence. But Black Tortoise Shield? That is the thing that in the legend has.

Who can think that on Xu Sanshi, presented Black Tortoise Shield this legend Martial Soul unexpectedly, moreover attached eight Soul Ring. This simply was too incredible.

A senior prime minister finally mentality stablest person, his subconscious asking: “Crown prince, how your this is Martial Soul the variation? As far as I know, even if the contemporary Mystic Deep Family head of household, Martial Soul does not have the variation to be successful. Even I have not heard, whose Martial Soul in the Mystic Deep Family recent several generations can the variation become Black Tortoise Shield.”

Although he was asking the question, but, from this crown prince's name, in fact somewhat has approved the Xu Sanshi status.

Xu Sanshi nod of silently, regarding this point question, he naturally thought.

“Everybody, I have another status, I come from, Shrek Academy!”At the same time was saying, he took out the badge of oneself Shrek Academy Inner Court disciple, brings in the front.

“Regarding this point, everybody can send for Shrek Academy verifying greatly. Because of initially me and my partners, once won on the previous Great Continental Soul Master Academy Fighting Spirit Competition championship on behalf of Shrek Academy, has guarded the Shrek Academy glory. Therefore, we had also been awarded lifelong the Shrek Seven Devils title by Academy.”

“However everybody should know that in our Academy, a talent, this talent is also one of our Shrek Seven Devils, he studied a special formidable ability, named spirit. By the spirit, can make our Soul Master not need to hunt and kill Soul Beast also to have to be similar to the Soul Ring ability, even is more formidable than Soul Ring. But I, is beneficiary. So far, I have a spirit. One 100,000 years, Golden Hawksbill Turtle.”

Yes, 100,000 years! In fact, all people saw his eighth Soul Ring are the blood reds, therefore their shock are that intense.

However, after the Golden Hawksbill Turtle spirit also Xu Sanshi releases, all people cause a stir.

The spirit, this matter Dou Ling Empire high levels know certainly. But person who can obtain the spirit truly, after all few in Soul Master. Moreover also few people can obtain formidable spirit.

The great unrest that but the spirit starts in Soul Master is actually many people knows that Dou Ling Empire, has established Spirit Transferring Pagoda, starts to explore the mystery in spirit aspect.

But spirit that at this time, Xu Sanshi releases, without doubt is extremely formidable, can not make the people on the scene change countenance?

However, made also in behind that they shocked.

“Before, our Shrek Academy received the Sun-Moon Empire army to oppress, this looked like Dou Ling and Star Luo both countries requests reinforcements. However, soon, Academy discovered faintly that this very possible is a plot. Sun-Moon Empire will begin to our Dou Ling Empire here. Therefore, sent us. Although our coming, only then seven people, but, if we early arrive, believes that the tragedy will not happen. Because, this time comes along with me together, is our Shrek Academy at present is next to Limit Douluo and Sea God Pavilion Master Old Xuan second powerhouse, next Sea God Pavilion Pavilion Master inevitably inheritance, creator of Spirit Transferring Pagoda organization, Huo Yuhao.”

The quickest renewal, non- ball window reading invited.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-572-part-3





Volume 12

#573 - On Crown Prince Xu Sanshi


The Shrek Academy second powerhouse! Although is second, but actually similarly shocks!

Is Shrek Academy that what kind of existence? Even if Sun-Moon Empire must acknowledge that Shrek Academy is having the Soul Master most formidable strength. Not one.

Holy Spirit Cult accumulates for several thousand years, has at present these Evil Soul Master, but they do not dare to rely on the strength of clan/sect, provokes to Shrek Academy. Even if there are two Limit Douluo, does not dare. Because of what? Because of Shrek ten thousand years of background.

In Star Dou Forest, Ten Great Ferocious Beasts has five, when they start beast tide attacks Shrek City, as before by Shrek City is actually blocked. Is this what kind strength?

Is such Academy, the powerhouse who is listed second, that meeting how formidable Ah? let alone, in this person or the legend organized the person of Spirit Transferring Pagoda organization. Is makes the Dou Ling Empire people on the scene be surprised.

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth twitched, but, at this time, he cannot certainly undermine to Third Senior Brother. Must go forward one step, arrives at side Xu Sanshi, nods to the people.

When the Dou Ling Empire high levels saw when the Huo Yuhao age even Xu Sanshi is smaller, suddenly, on the face the look also becomes incomparably splendid.

Xu Sanshi sinking sound track: “Everybody do not look at Yuhao to be young. In fact, he is the great ability that in our Academy the millennium non- worlds leave. Currently had the Transcendent Douluo strength, is Twin Martial Souls. In a moment ago, him personally chased down Sun-Moon Empire to attack our two Soul Engineer Corp, and has established their status. Sun-Moon Empire two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, Emperor Dragon and Evil Tyrant. Yuhao and his lover, by the strength of two person, go to chase down that two Soul Engineer Corp personally, finally annihilates to surpass half it, and struck to kill Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp, if were not worried that Spirit Dou City here situation, they might even wipe out the enemy of Sun-Moon Empire this attack.”

Xu Sanshi this saying said is actually a little exaggerating. At least compares with the situation that he finds out is so. However, he actually does not know, oneself said unexpectedly is the truth, the guess incomparable accurate.

Senior prime minister surprised looks at Huo Yuhao, “are you really reputation Pagoda Master of that Spirit Transferring Pagoda organization?”

Huo Yuhao nod of silently, “I am. I know that everybody because of the age, is very difficult to believe. Then, uses the fact to prove.”

At the same time was saying. Huo Yuhao goes forward one step, on his whole person, erupts the unequalled terrifying imposing manner instantaneously. Soul Ring, raises from the body slowly.

The person saw when first Soul Ring that on the presence of everyone him raises is Bai Se (White Color), frowned. Isn't Bai Se (White Color), ten years of Soul Ring?

However, they see quickly, in this Bai Se (White Color) Soul Ring, sent out the magnificent golden brilliance unexpectedly. Then is the black, black, black and black, when Soul Ring to sixth, turned into golden-rose color unexpectedly. Then is, red, red and red.

In other words. Huo Yuhao nine Soul Ring, yes, [gold/metal], black, black, black and black, rose [gold/metal] and red, red and red.

What Soul Ring allocated proportion Ah? this and this are

Still lets in behind that they shock, Huo Yuhao eyes narrow the eyes. From him, unequalled huge Spiritual Power spreads instantaneously, has covered the entire imperial palace ruins.

Everyone felt that gentle Spiritual Power emerges to own spiritual sea. Then, they saw most Spirit Dou City.

Sees, not only outline, is the entire detail.

Must know that civil official military commander on the scene adds, fully about thousand people! Everyone can feel, can this how formidable Spiritual Power be able to achieve?

Huo Yuhao Spirit Eyes, in fact Soul Ring, only then eight, those who truly have nine rings is his Absolute Ice Martial Soul is right.

Just, to shock, Huo Yuhao slightly makes the adjustment through Imitation Soul Ability to own ability. His mind ability, in fact has been Limit Douluo that level in any case. What lacks Soul Ability is?

Huo Yuhao was very clear at this time he should make anything, he must help Third Senior Brother the present aspect stabilize completely, even was makes Third Senior Brother inherit the throne.

Dou Ling Empire too needs to stabilize, at least at present is so. At the present this time, only then the formidable strength, can deter the audience. Thus makes them acknowledge the Third Senior Brother status.

Spiritual Detection and Sharing, simultaneously gives several thousand people. Huo Yuhao this is also first time such does. When this is not he directs Soul Engineer Corp so is simple, directs Soul Engineer Corp, does not need such wide scope each detail of sharing almost most city!

Two big Soul Nucleus of Huo Yuhao within the body are revolving crazily, on the side of his Spiritual Power is consuming rapidly, another side rapidly is restoring. Although consumes is much bigger, but by his current situation, actually as before can insist long time.

Enough after several minutes, Spiritual Detection and Sharing takes back. Huo Yuhao standing silently side Xu Sanshi, sinking sound track: “Everybody should feel. This is the present Spirit Dou City situation. Said honestly that this time matter is very regrettable. In fact, we arrived at Dou Ling Empire in former some time. Because we received the accurate news, Sun-Moon Empire will certainly attack Dou Ling. Where at that time we did not know the enemy, will attack in what way. Therefore, our attention all that side the border, lost the too much time in the border.”

“But who knows that Sun-Moon Empire has chosen sneaking unexpectedly. Of without by anybody being discovered arrived at Spirit Dou City. When we discover, eventually some late. Cannot stop the occurrence of tragedy. Third Senior Brother, is our Shrek Academy these people, our goals have one, that helps Dou Ling. Our not prolonging contact authority, but please believe our good intentions.”

Emperor Dou Ling who Huo Yuhao these words, said ** on Fang Zhongjiang face burning, what is Sun-Moon Empire chooses to submerge unexpectedly? What does this mean? Means that side border defense, even/including others two Soul Engineer Corp sneak the home quietly, has approached the capital, does not know. Must decide on the nature of the guilt, at present these military officers, all this place die.

The audience entered peaceful condition, the strength that Huo Yuhao showed that understood his great strength to all personal testimonies. Can by strength of the, cover the entirety of close Spirit Dou City this giant city Spiritual Detection, this is hears something never heard of before simply!

The Xu Sanshi status was without a doubt, most again sends for going to that side Shrek Academy to check and that's the end.

Then, then?

The prime minister walked, has arrived in front of Xu Sanshi. on one knee knees down moment that “crown prince Sir, Dou Ling Empire is in the life and death. Since had proven the status of crown prince Sir, then, asking crown prince Sir to lead us, reconstruction imperial palace. Also invited crown prince Sir, temporarily substituting for throne. By stable popular sentiment.”

Xu Sanshi nod of silently, at this time, he any had not worried, normally. He is how regardless of not to stay here to be any crown prince even is the prince regent, but, Dou Ling Empire so, the country will perish now, how regardless to say that his mother are the princess in this country, in this case, he does not have other choice, he cannot see that Dou Ling Empire disintegrates.

Once Imperial Family any descendant has not existed. Then, Dou Ling Empire will give rise to the huge problem. Very possible is each region does things their own way, to that time, collapsed of itself simply. But lost Dou Ling Empire support Star Lou Empire. Why can also resist Sun-Moon Empire?

Has saying that Sun-Moon Empire this Decapitation Strike is extremely successful. If no variable that Xu Sanshi this cannot anticipate, even if that two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp are annihilated, they absolutely are also worth.

In the Huo Yuhao heart sighed one darkly. At this time, he can only support Xu Sanshi.

The surrounding rulers and ministers under the prime minister and Commander Li leadership, to Xu Sanshi knee down slowly. The big ritual pays respect.

At least currently speaking. Xu Sanshi as the Imperial Family successor, is most appropriate, the stable morale of troops is most important.

Xu Sanshi invited the prime minister and Commander Li stays behind, after three people of emergency discussions, made three decisions. The first decision is, immediately blocks off the flow of news, presses the first Spirit Dou City palace wall attacked matter.

The second decision, by Xu Sanshi as prince regent, is conducted as the Imperial Family sole heir toward the meeting temporarily.

The third matter, stable popular sentiment, in the people to Spirit Dou City announced that the imperial palace loses not in a big way, Imperial Family wounded are many, the dead are few. At present because your majesty is injured, temporarily appoints the prince regent to manage the country.

As for Shrek City that side Dou Ling Empire elite, conceals the news to them similarly temporarily, at this time, Dou Ling Empire most feared is a character, chaotic! That side army was chaotic, was the country was chaotic, was the serious important matters.

Moreover, now temporarily also suits transfers that side elite army to come back. Must stabilize first lives in the capital condition, then said other.

Without doubt, Xu Sanshi must keep Spirit Dou City temporarily.

After Huo Yuhao and Xu Sanshi discussed that decided that let Jiang Nannan, Ji Juechen, Ye Guyi and Nan Qiuqiu stays behind assists Xu Sanshi. After all, he is extremely weak. But Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong as soon as possible return to Shrek, reports to the Academy aspect here situation. In order to change the beforehand strategy. Meanwhile, waits for an opportunity to move.

Huo Yuhao to Emperor Dragon and plans of Evil Tyrant two Soul Engineer Corp, had not finished. But all need he to go back to control, only then he understands these two Soul Engineer Corp present conditions.

----------------------------------------------

Our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire renewed the thing. Everybody experiences quickly. The newly-opened server early morning, just planned the book friends who blue starts to play come quickly. In our prestige - platform downloads directly, increases the attribute, enhances the effect \;, The different elements and equipment parts can through attaching the demon activate the corresponding attribute, the equipment slit the law is not only only the promotion and has gone up steps, can have slighting the law of personalization \;, Moreover ensure cannot owe, later will also launch gift certificate exchange, can according to the recharging quota exchange good reward \;, Vip can buy the good stage prop with the quite preferential price, 60-80 levels of duties, monsters and map also increased.

Joins our prestigious platforms, clicks on Magic Chef of Ice and Fire and hand tour downloading to download directly. Joins the platform to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - searches Tang three few, has v authentication, is our families.( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-573-part-1





Volume 12

#573 - Crown Prince Xu Three Stones


“Third Senior Brother, here all asked.”Huo Yuhao hugged Xu Sanshi, has patted his back.

Xu Sanshi sighed, “has not thought really will really have such one day, I will write a letter immediately, let the person and mother of family come. We hope that mother because of this attack, but......”

Here, his expression also low-spirited. How regardless to say that Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family is his members of the same family! Now exterminates the clan directly, his mood how.

“Yuhao, here gives me. Although I have not experienced in government country anything, but actually as far as possible maintains here condition stability. That side Academy, the Dou Ling Empire army, troubles your many looks. Dou Ling Empire could not stand up to attacks again.”

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “Third Senior Brother, you stabilize as soon as possible here, reconstruction imperial palace. That side army I when later some make them return. This war just started, in the future how, I will unable to reach an agreement. However, in any event, we will spell to try to resist Sun-Moon Empire, defends our homelands.”

Said goodbye to Xu Sanshi as well as the Dou Ling Empire people, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong takes off at the same night, directly soars the Shrek City direction to go.

The fact has proven, the judgment fault of Huo Yuhao absolutely correct, naturally, he in fact not completely is his judgment, but is Ju Zi(orange) tells him personally. Ju Zi(orange) has not deceived him, time that but, the Ju Zi(orange) scheme, Huo Yuhao guesses late.

The flight in the nighttime sky, a complexion solemnness of Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong is also the delicate eyebrows micro wrinkle.

Yes, this war truly starts. Sun-Moon Empire army, but also that side Shrek City. Now, the Continent aspect was somewhat chaotic, how but regardless of saying that Sun-Moon Empire got the absolute winning side. This way, no one knows when the Sun-Moon Empire offensive fully will erupt.

This time, they, although quite therefore made Sun-Moon Empire lose a Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp military strength, but Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family was all extinguished, what does this mean? Means that Dou Ling Empire definitely will have some problems. But existence of this issue, means that the Dou Ling Empire overall battle efficiency definitely will slide.

The Sun-Moon Empire following principal objective is not Dou Ling Empire, but certainly is Star Lou Empire. So long as extinguished Star Lou Empire, Dou Ling Empire creates disaster radically insufficient. Perhaps, oneself must fight side-by-side with him.

Thinks of here, the Huo Yuhao expression became somewhat strange.

After these many matters, hatred in his innermost feelings has compared does not know that in the past desalinated many. Especially saw after the matter that on Ju Zi(orange) has, is so. Ju Zi(orange) is because hates, gave up many things, she now is War-God Empress, is, she is unhappy!

Perhaps, oneself and between him matter, in some specific times, should be the solution time.

Thinks of here, why Huo Yuhao does not know, has the near nostalgia timid feeling unexpectedly. His some are not willing to go facing that person. That once incomparably hated in his heart, but now in innermost feelings many some men of respect.

When Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong return to Shrek City, is daybreak. A Shrek City silence, but is indistinct, actually as before can feel the air/Qi of strong withering.

Reconstructs later Shrek City, beforehand was bigger, the total area approached Bright Capital City. But at this time, in Shrek City, is actually stationed in hundreds of thousands of armies, came from Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire elite, in the city, makes one momentarily to with the appearance that the Sun-Moon Empire army determines the final outcome. Naturally, Sky Soul Empire remnants of defeated troops.

The Sky Soul Empire present army adds also 70,000 people, although elite loses is very big, but can live, is the powerhouses in Sky Soul Empire. Some Innate Body Sect people.

Just, Sky Soul Empire or Innate Body Sect, had been hit remnantly. Compared with the past years, the disparity cannot the truth computation. Whenever in the Huo Yuhao mind recalled when Princess Wei Na that pale complexion and atheistic double pupil, in the heart has been full of the sigh. The war, was really too brutal.

Directly enters Academy, has flown Sea God Lake, falls on Sea God Island . Does not have the time to rest, perhaps in the war, each latest information, may outcome of decision normal campaign.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, although was the Titled Douluo rank powerhouses, but they similarly will also feel weary, what a pity, did not melt their weary good opportunities at the present this time.

They arrive at Sea God Pavilion fast routinely, Huo Yuhao after Golden Tree bows politely, immediately enters in Sea God Pavilion.

They have not concealed their aura, two people's arrivals, made Sea God Pavilion big shots all be awakened from meditate.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong stand in hall are waiting for silently.

Tang Wutong grips the hand of Huo Yuhao on own initiative, said in a soft voice: “Yuhao, later well said that wants steadily.”

Huo Yuhao understands that she is any meaning, nod of silently.

The time is not long, Sea God Pavilion Ancient Elder from the building, saw travel-worn two successively, on most Ancient Elder faces reveals the surprised color. Because in their impressions, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong should in Tang Sect be. Moreover the recent several days Sea God Pavilion conference they have not appeared. Old Xuan said that because Huo Yuhao breaks through, cultivates not to be unstable, keeps in Tang Sect to practice.

When Old Xuan sees the Huo Yuhao gloomy complexion, in the heart somewhat understands immediately had anything, in the heart sighed one darkly, gradually arrived on the seat of honor to sit, beckoned to Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, said: “Yuhao, Wutong, you also sit.”

Huo Yuhao actually shaking the head of silently, “sorry, Old Xuan. I somewhat cannot sit still, is standing.”

Old Xuan takes a deep breath, in the eye the none remaining dodges, looks at Huo Yuhao. Sees, is the Huo Yuhao stubborn look.

Old Xuan nods the head said: “Good. Late at night arrives, but also awakens us with the mind aura. What happened?”

Huo Yuhao nodded to Old Xuan, then and Tang Wutong bows after Ancient Elder again together salutes, he walks tall, the sinking sound track: “I and Wutong, just came back from Dou Ling Empire.”

“Dou Ling Empire?”Listened to his such saying, presented on Ancient Elder face to reveal the surprised color.

Old Song cannot bear ask: “Do you go to Dou Ling Empire to do?”

Huo Yuhao closes eyes, on the face full is the color of pain, “I go to Dou Ling Empire, has witnessed a destruction of national Imperial Family.”

“What?”Such remarks, the audience is all startled. Old Xuan somewhat could not sit still, fierce standing up, vision stubbornly is looking steadily at Huo Yuhao, “Yuhao, you must be responsible for your words!”

Huo Yuhao pain [say / way]: “Responsible? Responsible, all my can be responsible. Even but if, I am responsible for again, can save national Imperial Family high and low several thousand lives? Less than one day ago, Dou Ling Empire capital Spirit Dou City, suffered the surprise attacks of Sun-Moon Empire two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to shell the Dou Ling Empire capital by nine levels surely. The Dou Ling Empire imperial palace was razed, all Imperial Family, are annihilated. But at that time, Dou Ling Empire was holding a meeting of time Imperial Family member, almost all Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family members, all participated. But I arrive at time, sees, is the gunsmoke of Mancheng.”

At that moment, how he leads the Tang Sect people to go to Dou Ling Empire, afterward guessed correctly that Sun-Moon Empire will carry on the Decapitation Strike, goes to the Dou Ling Empire imperial palace, as well as afterward bitter experience said in detail.

The Huo Yuhao sound is somewhat low and deep, in tonality filled was painful and helpless.

“I can strike Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer that kills to be many, is unable to recall the destruction of Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family. That is Imperial Family of country! The Sun-Moon Empire method is extremely ruthless spicily, they have calculated, as the empire, will lose Imperial Family, Dou Ling Empire will have faced what kind of aspect. But Dou Ling Empire elite, all in our Shrek City, was actually waiting for war that one will not have.”

In entire Sea God Pavilion, solemnly silent, the breath of numerous position Ancient Elder starts becomes is somewhat rapid.

The Dou Ling Empire imperial palace was attacked, this in their opinion, is completely inconceivable.

Old Zhuang cannot bear get angry: “Why does the Dou Ling Empire army eat? Two Soul Engineer Corp sneak, don't they actually completely know?”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “Not only Dou Ling Empire, even if changes into Star Lou Empire, situation also not good many. Superiority of Sun-Moon Empire in Soul Guidance Device aspect, makes several hundred people of Soul Engineer Corp sneak a country sufficiently, but was not discovered. After all, the border of any country so is long. The key question is, Dou Ling Empire genuine powerhouse and elite not internally, capital most void time, otherwise, will they so be easy to go well?”

A Ancient Elder cold sound track: “That said that you were blaming us? Blames us not to listen to your suggestion? We give up the defense of Shrek City, asking them do not come on the line? Even if we do not let Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire person come, they don't come?”

Huo Yuhao was silent, he knows certainly that this cannot blame Ancient Elder completely . Moreover, all people for the Shrek Academy consideration.

His shaking the head of silently, “was sorry, Ancient Elder, my mood some out-of-control. When I saw Spirit Dou City changes into stretch of ruins, I can never forget that picture. Sorry, I thought that I have no longer suited the duty that is the Sea God Pavilion member. I resign from the Sea God Pavilion appointment to Ancient Elder.”

At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao draws Tang Wutong to retrocede several steps, then respectful bows with hands clasped to Ancient Elder, is drawing Tang Wutong, turns around to walk.

“Halts!”Old Song shouted angrily, stopped by calling out Huo Yuhao.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-573-part-2





Volume 12

#573 - Crown Prince Xu Three Stones


At this time, Sea God Pavilion Ancient Elder actually population not entire, Yan Shaozhe, Cai Mei'er, Xian Lin'er, Qian Duoduo and Zhang Lexuan not. As the Sea God Pavilion member in “young guard”they in one. Prepares to greet from the war that Sun-Moon Empire starts at any time.

Therefore the Ancient Elder age on the scene is big.

Huo Yuhao stops the footsteps, actually lowers the head.

Old Song gets angry: “Here is Sea God Pavilion, is not your Tang Sect. You want to come to come, wants to walk walks, said why doesn't do not?”

Huo Yuhao lowers the head not to speak.

Old Song coldly visits him, “I know that you are thinking anything, you are thinking that our decision-makings are wrong, because of our requesting reinforcements, causing Dou Ling Empire to be sneak attacked, Imperial Family was extinguished! Is right?”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “Old Song, I do not have to think. I thought that the responsibility that on the Academy shoulder carries was too heavy. Ten thousand years inherit, are the accumulations of Academy, are Academy background, but also similarly is a serious burden. This burden, letting us sane ponders, judges. Even is conservative. I do not have the meaning of strange Academy, I am only the mood am somewhat depressing. But this war had not ended, then, I must continue to go to the battlefield, to continue to fight!”

“Frontage fight, we face Sun-Moon Empire, simply does not have any opportunity. Therefore, I can only use strange. Said straightforwardly, is the schemes and tricks. Only then so, may weaken the match unceasingly, found an opportunity. I cannot make Academy be shamed because of me. Therefore......”

“Um?”Listened to his such saying, the numerous position Ancient Elder somewhat gloomy expression had gawked staring.

They think Huo Yuhao to play temperament, this must resign from the status of Sea God Pavilion member. Has not thought that he really also has such idea.

Old Xuan sinking sound track: “Yuhao, you believe that our schemes and tricks couldn't accommodate? The Academy reputation is no doubt important, but, the reputation actually cannot be the burdens. You said right, the Academy ten thousand years accumulate, to us, is a serious responsibility. But this responsibility, we must shoulder. If Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family were extinguished, has our certain responsibility, I acknowledged. However, Shrek, makes no mistake certainly, this point, will not change how.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Sorry, Old Xuan. In order to resist Sun-Moon Empire, under certain circumstances, I even must use to be similar to the Evil Soul Master ability. This is Academy is impossible to allow to exist. I cannot make Academy carry on the back this reputation. Can want to see, in the near future, Sun-Moon Empire will certainly attack Academy with this reason, only then leaves, can not make Academy be shamed.”

Old Xuan said indifferently: “Dumb kid, you thought many. What was this considered as?”

“Ah?”Huo Yuhao surprised looks to Old Xuan. Shrek Academy had Evil Soul Master this matter, what also isn't?

“Evil Soul Master, no doubt is our enemies. But on this world, does not have the true evil ability, only then evil person. The formidable strength, uses at war, slaughters. But uses in other places? Perhaps, he plays is the good function. The Evil Soul Master ability is also same. You think that we do not know, initially Star Dou Forest beast tide time, did you use that strength to help Academy break through? However, who can once accuse you?”

“The Academy ten thousand years accumulate, were make us bear the huge responsibility. But similarly, do the Academy ten thousand years accumulate, take to our reputation can it be that Sun-Moon Empire manufacture rumor to vacillate? You know why the Sun-Moon Empire army doesn't dare to move us easily? Besides your reason, because they dreaded, once moved us, oneself morale of troops is not steady.”

“Our Shrek Academy, now first under heaven Academy, is the temples in all Soul Master dreams. Does not have Soul Master to suffice high level easily we, even if Sun-Moon Empire Soul Master is also same.”

“As for the Dou Ling Empire matter, we rushes is very regrettable, but the matter occurred, we can do, is help Dou Ling Empire as far as possible stabilizes the home, in the meantime, resists the Sun-Moon Empire army. Yuhao, you want to make anything, does. Our these old fogies can do now, in this Shrek City, as far as possible diverts this Sun-Moon Empire army for you.”

Old Song arrives in front of Huo Yuhao gradually, her figure be shorter than Huo Yuhao, can only look up his face.

“Child, sometimes, something, trade an idea, no reason why not. If, Star Luo and Dou Ling were extinguished. Their elites also in Shrek City. What does that mean? Means, hope.”

“Now Academy to Sky Soul, Star Luo and Dou Ling elite Soul Master of three countries coming, completely opened us the research in Soul Guidance Device aspect, as well as Martial Soul Faculty library all materials. We are not the country, do not excel at the war. But our abilities are, inheritance!”

Listened to Old Song these words, Huo Yuhao to be shocked! He has not thought that Academy resists the Sun-Moon Empire open intrigue with this way unexpectedly.

Sky Soul, Dou Ling and Star Luo, the three countries elite in Shrek City, majority are Soul Master compose at present! Soul Master are it can be said that thousands, total quantity over ten thousand. Such many Soul Master, is almost equal to now the Continent about one-third quantities. Was equal to belonging to the Douluo Continent three countries 50% quantities.

Shrek Academy, the choice the Soul Guidance Device research results, ten thousand years of background Soul Master practice method, all opens wide to these Soul Master unexpectedly, what means? Means that these Soul Master can obtain the directions of some Shrek Academy! Even if in the future war really disadvantageous, had the inheritance of Shrek Academy, these Soul Master at least are also belongs to the hopes of Douluo Continent.

The Academy back takes responsibility at the same time, with being its way, affects, even said that is the protection belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries. This selfless mind made Huo Yuhao formerly the question in innermost feelings completely turn guilty.

The Old Song look became temperate, has patted the shoulder of Huo Yuhao gently, “young people, good and brave hearts, was right. However, you must remember, no matter, Academy does not become your burdens, will not exert the most serious responsibility on you, our these old fogies have not died. Waits one day, after all our soul turns over to Western Paradise, these responsibility will press your this generation of shoulders. Before that Academy can only be your backing. When you became the Sea God Pavilion member on that day, we chose trusted you unconditionally. Therefore, wants to make anything, does.”

“Old Song......”the Huo Yuhao sound somewhat shivers, somewhat sobbed. Tang Wutong is already getting angry circle.

Old Xuan stands up similarly, arrives at side Old Song, on the face reveals a disappointed color, right that “Old Song said that our these old fogies are also living, this responsibility, we will support. But you have not spoken incorrectly, we maintain the accomplishments of one's ancestors, deficient, is your such spirit. You have grown up, had enough has protected own ability, went, I believe that you can certainly turn around the situation. But before that so long as we are also living, Shrek cannot the reducing rival.”

Huo Yuhao retrocedes suddenly several steps, “pū passes”one, knees down, has done obeisance to numerous position Ancient Elder. After three do obeisance, he stands up, holds the hand of Tang Wutong to turn around to go.

Gazes after the back that he is departing, in the Old Xuan eye reveals a gratified color, “this child, grew up. Really envies Old Mu, can have such a good disciple. Has him, the Shrek fire seed, never will extinguish. Does not know that future he, which step can arrive.”

Old Song moved [say / way]: “Actually this child said is very right, the responsibility that since, our bodies have tied up were too many. We hope that this Continent can go through the difficulty.”

Old Xuan said: “You said that what this boy next step will make?”

Old Zhuang stands up, said: “He must be any me unable to guess correctly, but looks at his such, can perhaps be the earth-shaking action. Otherwise, by the disposition of this boy, how regardless of not to choose at this time turns in resignation to Sea God Pavilion.”

In the Old Xuan heart moves, brow wrinkles slightly.

Left Sea God Pavilion, Huo Yuhao has held the hand of Tang Wutong to leave Shrek Academy directly, returned to Tang Sect.

Beibei has not rested, or entire Tang Sect has not rested.

Since the Sun-Moon Empire army has threatened the border, entire Tang Sect looks like the robot same is revolving. Because only then Tang Sect Soul Guidance Hall can manufacture enough formidable Soul Guidance Device, making the Shrek Academy survivability stronger.

Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire this time come, not only two countries elite Soul Master and army, in the meantime, has brought various massive rare metals.

Shrek Academy has exposed own research completely to the public, demise of Sky Soul Empire made their like grieve for like, at this time, no one could give a thought to the personal interest, can preserve own country is most important. Share a common hatred!

Had these sufficient materials, all Soul Engineer in Shrek Academy all opened the working pattern, everyone had two relaxation times of double-hour on average every day, surplus, all was working.

Although Beibei will not manufacture Soul Guidance Device, but he is Tang Sect leader First Senior Brother, with the Tang Ya same place, is responsible for the traffic control. Even came from Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire to have Soul Master of Soul Engineer talent continually, helps under their directors.

Issue that not only this learning process, can alleviate Tang Sect short-handed enormously.

In this case, Tang Sect has been during the high load revolution.

“Little Junior Brother.”When face weary Beibei sees the face darken Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, the heart also cannot help but sinks.

His first response has had an accident, “Sanshi they? They are not......”Beibei will lose the sound track.

----

The peerless Tang Sect cartoon sends newly in the platform! Everybody transmits, peerless Tang Sect 131, consult! Comes to see the charming decisive battle of Yuhao and Wang Dong quickly.

Joins our prestigious platforms to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches for Tang three few, has the authentication, is our families.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-573-part-3





Volume 12

#574 - I Came!


Tang Ya in not far away, hears his sound, hurries to run over. Although Tang Ya also not with the Blue Silver Emperor fusion, but own Martial Soul restores, after these days, she also restored cultivating of oneself eight rings Soul Master is.

Initially Evil Soul Master no doubt had caused the huge damage to her, but similarly, these promotion actually also retained. Martial Soul restores, the Tang Ya strength is to also soar. In Tang Sect also absolutely was master.

Huo Yuhao hurries saying: “They are all right, First Senior Brother should not be worried. However, Dou Ling Empire had an accident.”

The surrounding many people and many voices, four people arrive in quiet room, Huo Yuhao also narrated this line of processes.

Listened to his words, the Beibei complexion also becomes ugly, an imperial palace in country such was razed! If not because Xu Sanshi happen to have the Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family bloodlines, this time issue was bigger, Dou Ling Empire will possibly disintegrate.

Beibei sighed, said: “The Continent aspect, is not we can control, we can do now, only then completely the human affairs, listened to the destiny. Little Junior Brother, what do you have to suggest?”

Huo Yuhao sinking sound track: “Because must protect Academy, Academy has borne the too big responsibility. Even if clearly knows that the enemy will not come to attack, is impossible to give up to the defense of Shrek City. Dou Ling and Star Luo two countries elite also in Shrek City. This way, Sun-Moon Empire army, once launches the general attack, which country regardless in view, is not they can resist. Academy no doubt retained two big empire elite, but, we cannot make Sun-Moon Empire such destroy Dou Ling and Star Luo. Therefore, now the urgent matter, is makes the Sun-Moon Empire army retreat from Shrek City. At least, after they retreat, goal will become explicit many. To that time, the diversion fights, at least we can also relatively with ease. Is insufficient to lead by the nose by them again.”

“Present Emperor Sun-Moon ** team, looks like the thorn of card on our throats, Shrek City this position, diversion Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries are very in fact uncomfortable.”

Beibei said: “But, what means we have, can make Sun-Moon Empire withdraw troops? This radically is impossible matter. This time has ruined the Dou Ling Empire imperial palace, they took advantage. Such way, has the possibility of duplication.”

“I have the means.”Huo Yuhao said suddenly.

“Ah?”such remarks, let alone Beibei and Tang Ya, Tang Wutong has been surprised.

“Do you have the means? What means do you have?”Beibei surprised asking.

Huo Yuhao subconscious grips tight double fist, “wants to cope with the Sun-Moon Empire open intrigue, only then surprise-attack forces! But I, am the surprise-attack forces. First Senior Brother and Little Ya Teacher, I rest first.”

Then, he turns around to walk, has not talked clearly the matter.

Beibei brow tight wrinkle, but he has not actually closely examined, whatever Huo Yuhao left. Tang Wutong hurried to follow.

Tang Ya has bumped Beibei, “you do not ask that what Yuhao can make?”

Beibei shaking the head of silently, said: “I believe him, therefore I did not ask. In recent years, Yuhao grows has gone far beyond us, but his temper is also more and more calm. This time matter, if changes a person to experience, perhaps somewhat was already flurried, does not know that should not know what to do. But he does not have, hadn't you noted a moment ago? His look is very firm, obviously early has to decide the idea. Such being the case, did I also why ask? Completes our matters and that's the end. Once the Sun-Moon Empire army retreats, then, then, our motions must continue to launch.”

Tang Ya nodded, said: “Good, we also go busily.”

Huo Yuhao returned to the room, Tang Wutong also to follow.

“What means do you have?”Beibei did not ask that did not ask on behalf of Tang Wutong. She also believes Huo Yuhao, but, in her heart also has many worries!

Huo Yuhao to Beibei had not said that he a moment ago at the matter that Sea God Pavilion turned in resignation, although has not succeeded, but from his motion, Tang Wutong could see that he must make anything.

Huo Yuhao grows the tone, slightly after silent moment, has drawn Tang Wutong, said several anything in her ear.

“What? You actually want......, But, will they agree?”

Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, said: “I will make them agree. This plan, the goal is not only one.”

Tang Wutong heavyhearted [say / way]: “But, you......”

Huo Yuhao said with a smile: “What's wrong? Don't you believe my strength?”

Tang Wutong said: “I and you together!”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “No, in that case, my plan did not have the means to be completed completely. Moreover, we cannot now Martial Soul Fusion, but displays the Martial Soul Fusion technique consumption to be too big, is not suitable protracted battle. Relax, you observed the enemy for me, and saw your husband I, killed the four directions greatly!”

“Others have not married you!”Tang Wutong ill-humored saying.

Huo Yuhao said: “Was right, dear, when our father came Ah? my this to be possible quick. Come, kisses one. My present Pi Caorou is in any case thick.”

“......”

The sunlight shines the earth, the late in the morning!

New day started. But Sun-Moon Empire army to the Shrek City deadline, arrived finally.

But what sounds queer, the Sun-Moon Empire aspect, actually does not have any sound, even does not have to suppress again forward. Maintains is being away from a Shrek City 90 kilometers distance as before.

This distance is not near, but absolutely is not also far. Especially regarding Soul Engineer. So long as the full flight of quarter, they can open up an offensive to Shrek City.

Shrek City, for these days was also very discrete, to time. Who knows that Sun-Moon Empire can take an action. In the city, all Soul Engineer and Soul Guidance Device are the conditions of being ready in full battle array. Outside the city has many Soul Master powerhouses to go on patrol.

In the Surveying Soul Guidance Device aspect, Shrek City is inferior to the Sun-Moon Empire army, but must say the Soul Master quantity, the disparity of both sides is huge.

Receives simply, if not Sun-Moon Empire has formidable Soul Guidance Array and linkage Soul Guidance Device, the frontage spells hardly, who will be the winner also cannot know!

The atmosphere of both sides maintains somewhat anxious. The war is ready to be set off.

That side Sun-Moon Empire is tranquil, the pressure before storm gather to person.

At this moment, appearance that a person is quietly above the Shrek City top. No, is not a person, after he appears, he behind walks a person, the pink-blue color big wave long hair hangs loose after behind, standing silently side him.

Huo Yuhao looks out into the distance, although is separated by 90 kilometers, but in the clear weather situation, by his vision, can see the distant place general situation.

Sun-Moon Empire army, in that side.

Tang Wutong standing silently side him, oneself have drawn the back long hair, starts to comb the hair.

Rushes to the Shrek City top to comb the hair, this matter is not the average person competent.

But a team leader actually face respectful standing not far away that at this time, on Shrek City, is responsible for going on patrol silently looks.

The Huo Yuhao look, already struck root in the hearts of the people. Since that day, he dared after Beast God Di Tian challenged, from Shrek City Soul Master, these came from Star Luo and Soul Master of Dou Ling two countries knew him.

On that day, Huo Yuhao no doubt lost, but, can during Beast God struck to live fully, he has proven the formidable strength. Beast God Di Tian, that surmounts Continent's Number One Expert that Limit Douluo had!

Therefore, Huo Yuhao mounts the top not to consume the half minute argument, let alone, at this time in the top, the true defense main force, heavy artillery Soul Engineer Corp, is Huo Yuhao commander.

Huo Yuhao stands there looks silently, the moment time, Tang Wutong has composed own long hair. The braid has hung to outstanding buttocks place. Above has actually extended to the position of close top of the head, the scorpion pigtail.

“You stay here.”Huo Yuhao somewhat helpless looks at beautiful woman.

Tang Wutong shook the head, “I do not participate, but I must follow side you.”

Touches her head, gathers by her cheek, kissing gently, “quite fragrant.”

Tang Wutong said bashfully: “Many people look.”

“Look, what my own is my wife. The time early, we did not walk.”At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, they jump under glare of the public eye, does not see them to use Flight Soul Guidance Device, goes toward the direction soaring of distant place Sun-Moon Empire army unexpectedly.

“Flew and fly away?”The dumbfoundedness that the Shrek City defense force will guide, this what situation, these two said that flew away? They and they flew to the Sun-Moon Empire army direction, was this must do?

“The quick and quick whereabouts Academy aspect reported that said that Huo Yuhao commanded with Miss Tang Wutong goes to the Sun-Moon Empire army direction.”Associated to the former Sun-Moon Empire aspect proposed that must hand over the Huo Yuhao condition, the perspiration on this city defense force military officer forehead got down. Who knows that these two must go to do! Walks into a trap?

Light ray twinkle, on the Huo Yuhao face reveals a ice-cold god light, flies in the midair, his own Spiritual Power has been similar to tidal turbulently, not in Sun-Moon Empire big camp direction, but toward airborne.

Terrifying Spiritual Detection has covered the Boundless area, in the sky, upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device appears in the Huo Yuhao perception area one after another.

Because Shrek Academy the powerhouse is numerous, the Sun-Moon Empire aspect, does not dare distance Shrek City that flies upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device to be too near, to avoid losing. But, in front of Huo Yuhao formidable Spiritual Power, these upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device does not have to hide.

However, at this time they had discovered Huo Yuhao existed, is similar to tidal retreats in the Sun-Moon Empire big camp direction immediately.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong have not hidden own personal appearance, Sun-Moon Empire, Huo Yuhao has “extremely good”the reputation. Besides own strength, Sun-Moon Empire upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device that he destroys absolutely is largest. Therefore, controls upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device Soul Engineer to discover him, immediately reports at the same time, rapid returns to remove these Surveying Soul Guidance Device.

The mind thought of Huo Yuhao puts receives, he wants is this effect. Since has been the Sun-Moon Empire army has taken to them the pressure, but this time, he must give some Sun-Moon Empire aspect pressures in turn, this can make its plan continue to execute.

90 kilometers distance pulls closer quickly, the free time of a while, Sun-Moon Empire big camp already clear presents in Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong line of sight range.

Huo Yuhao eyes narrows the eyes, on the face the look is as before solemn, in this case, he must be calmer than at any time.

The Sun-Moon Empire aspect, rich fluctuation of energy started to appear, even if in airborne, can feel in the ground the huge energy that clearly started to condense. Soul Guidance Array start to revolve, locking the strength of survey wraps toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong on.

A person is strong, is useless facing these Soul Guidance Array, the Sun-Moon Empire aspect has even proven this point on Beast God Di Tian. Although Di Tian has also ruined Soul Guidance Array place, but also has to retreat under their forcing, even was still injured while the chaotic sneak attack under Evil Soul Master.

Although Huo Yuhao is strong, but he is also only individual strength.

However, is responsible for locking Huo Yuhao Soul Engineer, the thought in mind has not continued too often the time, had the change.

Because, Huo Yuhao, vanished.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong almost simultaneously vanish in the midair. Has not left behind a trace and aura, all formerly fell on their locking, lost the function instantaneously.

Initially, even if cultivated before has not broken through, Huo Yuhao own strength sufficiently hides oneself, let alone now. Asked these Surveying Soul Guidance Device, was really too easy. What he and Di Tian are different, what Di Tian grasps is Space Power, but he actually achieves by own Martial Soul strength with the ability of environment assimilation. Moreover, under own formidable mind sensation, any fluctuation of energy can by his Imitation, be wanted in this case to look him, even if several Limit Douluo, not necessarily has the absolute assurance, let alone was following these Surveying Soul Guidance Device. By the current Soul Guidance Technology standard, could not at least have achieved.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong vanished, but in the Sun-Moon Empire camp may not have therefore to relax. Soul Engineer of any rank is very clear, entered Soul Guidance Array by a super powerhouse, or approaches, what fate will have.

Huo Yuhao initially drew support from collision with Di Tian, has left behind the profound lesson to them. In that side ground, remained to the present has been filling the darkness and ice the strength of fusion terror. Evidently, cannot melt in a short time.

A sigh from the sky resounds, the Huo Yuhao sound by far passed on.

“Don't you make Shrek City hand over me? Now I came. Who receives me?”

This chapter of 4000 characters, thank everybody's support.

Was quite happy over the two days, in I swam in the ice stoker reverse finally. Before is always ganged up on every noon collection. Brother steels oneself for revenge, daily collects in mysterious store and sports arena honor store, finally makes me collect a formidable magician partner: Dark night. The dark night is the single body attack big fireball, that called a ferocity. Brother did not fear that now was ganged up on.

Iced the fire to increase many things, the interested book friends played together! Can download from our prestige platform directly, following cell phone downloading on line. Quick plays together.

Um, is most important, tomorrow's three, then, in November our final entire months, eruption!!!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-574





Volume 12

#575 - I Came!


“Don't you make Shrek City hand over me? Now I came. Who receives me?”

The Huo Yuhao sound is very light, but actually by far passes on, the sound passes on hundred li (0.5km), has covered the Sun-Moon Empire entire big camp, but does not have any Surveying Soul Guidance Device to analyze his exact location. This, tight atmosphere immediately became more intense.

Ju Zi(orange) in commander tent, naturally heard the Huo Yuhao sound . Moreover, before her, several messengers has reported the situation of just outside having to her.

The Ju Zi(orange) present mood somewhat is also despondent, the reason does not have him, soon before, he just received has come from Evil Tyrant Commander Soul Engineer Corp Xia Xuanchen through subpoenaing the Soul Guidance Device round the news.

Evil Tyrant and Emperor Dragon two Soul Engineer Corp sneak attacked Dou Ling Empire capital Spirit Dou City to succeed, has ruined the Spirit Dou City imperial palace. But when they prepare to retreat, presented many Evil Soul Master, sneak attacks them. Causes two Soul Engineer Corp to lose seriously. Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp Xu Tianyuan died.

This news comes, the first response of Ju Zi(orange) blocks off the flow of news, at least they come back beforehand blocking the passage of information in Xia Xuanchen.

Evil Soul Master sneak attacks two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, this matter was really too big, even if were not enough to suppress by his War-God Empress prestige.

What Beast King Level is Soul Engineer Corp representing? On behalf of the military. Let alone also had Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp. Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp representative is the Imperial Family ancestor and relative.

The military adds the Imperial Family ancestor and relative, even if Xu Tianran personally here, must very careful dealing. Let alone is she?

But Evil Soul Master? What that represents has two Limit Douluo Holy Spirit Cult! Moreover, Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master Zongli Wu also makes Army Supervisor in the big camp.

Ju Zi(orange) does not understand why Holy Spirit Cult will attack two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp. However, she actually believes Xia Xuanchen.

In her heart, in four big Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp expert regiment chief, Xia Xuanchen is strength weakest one, but actually absolutely is brains most sober one, this entrusted with an important task by her.

Xia Xuanchen carefully has also analyzed Holy Spirit Cult this time goal in the pass on message, attacks the military, attacks their Soul Engineer Corp strength, in the meantime, Xu Tianyuan starts in view of Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp. Storage Soul Guidance Device that on Xu Tianyuan carries vanished in their sneak attacks. But in that likely stores up to have several nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely. The concrete quantity is unclear.

Is this reason enough? Regarding the normal person, does not suffice. After all, attacks two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, absolutely is the important matter! But regarding always selfish, for one's own selfish interests, even does not hesitate loss of life Holy Spirit Cult, actually at normal matter.

Ju Zi(orange) is very clear, Holy Spirit Cult that genuine hierarch, remote antiquity Ye Xishui, Grim Reaper Soul Guidance Device with any east Xichong energy.

But soon before, Holy Spirit Cult was the soul that the use several thousand sergeants of having no scruples died has sneak attacked Beast God Di Tian. And is led by Zongli Wu personally, chases down Di Tian.

Zongli Wu they came back, goes to time, is several Evil Soul Master, comes back, the population has actually been short of one-third, the Zongli Wu complexion is pale, obviously, their plans have not succeeded. Beast God Di Tian is not good to kill, this also serves the Ju Zi(orange) benefit, is she most wants to see.

But, previous Zongli Wu they have used several thousand officers dying soul matters, has started the great unrest the military.

The Holy Spirit Cult powerhouses walk away, Ju Zi(orange) actually bore the huge pressure.

The anger of military has reason very much, the officers give life for one's country, is the hero. But after dying, links soul also to unexpectedly by the Evil Soul Master uses of these Holy Spirit Cult, even changes into Wraith Soul, this is they matter how, regardless of unable to endure. The contradiction between military and Holy Spirit Cult, is intensifying unceasingly. In this case, once Xia Xuanchen has such news again, finally can be imagined, this incessantly is the issue of blasting fuse. Will very likely cause the war between military and Holy Spirit Cult.

The army, Ju Zi(orange) has not feared Holy Spirit Cult, his military powerhouse is numerous, nine levels of Soul Engineer quantities may be many, support of several Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp.

But, that side Sun-Moon Empire capital? But that side existences of two Evil Soul Master, have existence of Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui particularly. Holy Spirit Cult foundation also that side Bright Capital City. Once here accident, Holy Spirit Cult will take an action in the capital.

She does not care regarding the Xu Tianran life and death, but she cares about oneself son! Moreover, Sun-Moon Empire is under an excellent situation now, cannot be chaotic.

In this case, in the Ju Zi(orange) heart is more puzzled, by her intelligence and ability, somewhat is hard to choose now. Only can suppress the military anger temporarily first, at least before she arranges, cannot let the conflict between military and Holy Spirit Cult erupts, that does not serve her benefit.

Moreover, Ju Zi(orange) is from the heart is also very strange. Two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp that actually Holy Spirit Cult is sends out what kind of strength that attacks?

Holy Spirit Cult has many Evil Soul Master, in her heart is have several probably, in this regard, the Sun-Moon Empire aspect has done the close investigation.

Two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp strength Ju Zi(orange) is clear. Even if after attacking Spirit Dou City succeeds has relaxed, wants to sneak attack them, the absolute demand very formidable strength can achieve.

Undead Creature? Massive Undead Creature. This looks like the Holy Spirit Cult method actually. But in the report of Xia Xuanchen, several questionable points have brought to her attention.

The enemies can the stealth. Only this point, makes the heart of Ju Zi(orange) leak jumps a racket.

Can stealth Soul Master have, writes in Soul Master not to have. But excels at the stealth specially, the individual battles, she may know one! Let alone, Xia Xuanchen also told him, these sneak attacked in their Evil Soul Master, had the strength of specially formidable snow and ice. By the domain ability in snow and ice, made has killed the bureau, making them fall into the hopeless situation.

Snow and ice ability? Stealth ability?

In situation that these two abilities simultaneously have, if Ju Zi(orange) must not suspect that his body, she did not match to take War-God Empress.

When Ju Zi(orange) thinks on that person, expression that on her face can reveal, only then smiled bitterly.

She had realized finally, clear(ly) knows the opposite party is making anything not to have the means to prevent, even cannot expose the opposite party status the awkwardness.

Yeah? She guessed correctly obviously sneak attacks two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp people is very possible is Huo Yuhao, even also has Tang Sect other people, but she actually cannot say. Why? Because Holy Spirit Cult is also the match who she must cope with! Huo Yuhao through routing Sun-Moon Empire two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, frames by planting stolen goods on to shift blame to Holy Spirit Cult. In some sense, even can be is helping her.

But, this busy gang, aren't some times? Let alone, Huo Yuhao also to get rid of Xu Tianyuan. Xu Tianyuan most has the crown prince of power and influence! He dies, the Imperial Family ancestor and relative that side strength of must reshuffle. But Xu Tianyuan originally with her relations.

Is equal to getting rid of this Huo Yuhao, the entire matter made that one group of chaotic, but she cannot expose the Huo Yuhao status.

Otherwise, didn't all waste all previous efforts? If the military and Holy Spirit Cult relations relax, showing no external differences must aim at Shrek City, that did not serve her benefit.

After she has used repeatedly Shrek Academy responsibility, Huo Yuhao in turn has also used her one time. Ju Zi(orange) has to acknowledge that he initially should not tell Huo Yuhao own goal is Dou Ling Empire. This fellow was really too intelligent.

However, Ju Zi(orange) did not think one lost. The Spirit Dou City imperial palace was broken, even if two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp perishes completely, she as before is a side of achievement. Facts showed that what Huo Yuhao they go was late.

The chaos of aspect, makes Ju Zi(orange) have to branch out the massive energy to solve various matters. When she is exceptionally busy, outside has actually broadcast the Huo Yuhao sound.

When Ju Zi(orange) hears the Huo Yuhao sound, her first response is, that sneak attacks two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp people, isn't Huo Yuhao?

Yes! If he, why he such quickly came. Also, is this must do? He believes that I do want to catch really him? Said that he does plan to use among us the relations to press me? No, this is not his working style.

Suddenly, Ju Zi(orange) unexpectedly is some delay, even is somewhat vacant. Such that just like Huo Yuhao said that wants to cope with Ju Zi(orange), he must use the surprise-attack forces, at least in the present, he succeeded.

Must know, news that Xia Xuanchen spreads showed that at least must to tonight, two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp remnants be able to return to the army.

One is the distance is far, another, after Huo Yuhao they attack unceasingly, two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp completely became the frightened people, has to be careful! Moreover, beforehand unceasing eruption, made them be utterly exhausted. Can come back tonight, this makes the best use of the time.

Therefore, Ju Zi(orange) after short absent-minded, realized immediately, perhaps, this similarly was also used by Huo Yuhao.

The smart people and smart people contend, if wants is more complete. Is the time that if these two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp come back by Huo Yuhao, then, actually he required to do?

“Passes on me to order, Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp sends out, to escort me to have a look personally, this fellow must do. All Soul Guidance Array complete linkage defensive preparation, do not launch the attack easily. Informs all over eight levels Soul Engineer, lifts off collectively. Gets ready for action.”

After Ju Zi(orange) a series of issuances of order, she also walks toward commander tent.

Three start, was right, told everybody a good news, finally our first batch of peripheral product Tang Sect card signs did was similar. Our shops will soon open, the interested book friend is washing, treasure directly, shop there search: Dazzles world Tang Sect, first collects our shops. This Wednesday, official business! When the time comes will have the massive signature books to appear, meets everybody's needs. Which has specifically, on Wednesday informs everybody. Loves you!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-575-part-1





Volume 12

#575 - I Came!


Regarding her security, in fact she was not worried, the person who outside provokes is Huo Yuhao! How regardless to resist, she does not believe killer of Huo Yuhao to personally under to her. Otherwise, soon before, in that mysterious Demi-plane, she will not be living.

The light ray glitters in the air, all person Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer complexions are very ugly. They are unable to lock the match unexpectedly, what situation is this? This means that fellow may enter in their big camps anytime!

“Marshal, careful is on. Where that person does not know.”Ju Zi(orange) commander tent, had been sphered by extremely nine levels of Soul Engineer, moreover they released the linkage defense guard shield subconsciously, covered Ju Zi(orange).

Ju Zi(orange) gives a calm smile, beckoned with the hand, said: “All right, he has not dared to penetrate us. If he comes, again could not exit. First has a look at him to do.”

Her saying, said certainly that listens to the surrounding these people, after knowing Huo Yuhao has Demi-plane, her very clear Huo Yuhao survival capability had multi-.

“Reported the marshal, Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp builds up.”

Ju Zi(orange) nodded, “Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp lifts off along with me, the linkage defense guard shield opens.”

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong naturally also in airborne, just under concealing of Imitation Soul Ability, cannot see the form that they have.

The ray twinkle, the halo from the sky blooms together, one group of flame bright sphere slowly raise from the Sun-Moon Empire big camp direction.

bright sphere presents for the translucent shape, the internal situation is partly visible. Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer all are lust red Soul Guidance Device, is particularly striking.

Status of Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp in four big Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp is next to Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp. Since Ju Zi(orange) takes over, had the great support of Xu Tianran, in addition the War-God Empress prestige date was abundant, currently more and more had to surpass the Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp trend.

In the sky, rays glitter, air obviously in some linkage defense guard shield surrounding distortions of Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp. That is the change of high temperature. Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp all Soul Guidance Device are primarily the fire.

Ju Zi(orange) on float, her body puts on magnificent golden red Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, protects perfectly the body. On this Humanoid Soul Guidance Device shining, Sun-Moon Empire Humanoid Soul Guidance Device is all different from Huo Yuhao had seen. Although is only the remote viewer, but Huo Yuhao faintly can feel that this Humanoid Soul Guidance Device prestige energy, does not resemble unexpectedly under own Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, even also surmounts in the fields. For example, takes cultivating of Ju Zi(orange) as, can actually use this obviously is nine levels of crests Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, this Humanoid Soul Guidance Device naturally has to reduce the ability of operation requirements. This is Extreme Ice Battle God Armor does not have.

Naturally, such Humanoid Soul Guidance Device must see through on whom, by the Ju Zi(orange) strength, puts on this Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, more reasons to protect oneself.

A Huo Yuhao face solemn reappears in the midair, along with his visualization, below also has massive Soul Guidance Device to lock him immediately.

However, Soul Engineer that is responsible for locking quickly on surprised discovery, they lock seems a nihility, cannot feel existence of life body.

The fight experience of Huo Yuhao is rich, naturally will not place oneself the strategic place by oneself, he does is actually very simple, through the Spiritual Disturbance domain, forms phantom beyond own first hundred meters and that's the end. Casual you lock, how you lock, could not find the Huo Yuhao exact location. Let alone, has Spiritual Detection to cover the audience, in does not care about in the situation of touching the opposite party mind guard shield, before any Soul Guidance Device launches, will touch Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection, dodges naturally not to be a problem.

“Are you Sun-Moon Empire War-God Empress?”The Huo Yuhao ice-cold sound passes on by far. However, when he spoke of the last character, some intonation slightly changes.

Has no way not to change, on his waist, a small hand is pinching his muscle to revolve 180 degrees.

The attire, making you install! Tang Wutong thought bitterly.

Ju Zi(orange) coldly looks at Huo Yuhao, the sinking sound track: “Good, I am Sun-Moon Empire empress. Also is commander of this army. Has not thought that you dare. Since came, is without a fight. It seems like that Shrek City cannot protect you!”

Their vision very ice-cold, is all away from is so far, Soul Guidance Protective Cover exists, cannot see clearly the opposite party look. But at this moment, feelings in their heart actually somewhat strange.

Although they were not first time have bumped into the battlefield, but this actually absolutely was first time under being a focus of public attention, faced by the original status. Faces as enemy.

Ju Zi(orange) not, because the match is Huo Yuhao, but general idea, polarity, because just opposite airborne float is Huo Yuhao, in her heart vigilantly increases.

Do not look that beforehand several times she had the superiority, because of her the understanding Huo Yuhao, she is clearer, if this fellow erupts his own talent, how fearful match will be. The fact is also so, he takes to the loss of Sun-Moon Empire, even already and entire Sky Soul Empire was initially similar. Only Surveying Soul Guidance Device, many destroys in his hands Ah? let alone Soul Engineer and Soul Guidance Array place and so on.

Looks at Huo Yuhao of distant place very affirmative, Ju Zi(orange) already matter explicit brand mark that two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp attacked on Huo Yuhao. Definitely is he right!

Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “A person works a person to work as. You want me, then, I came. Meanwhile, I also left Shrek City. Now, I am I. Has the skill, you catch me to pass. Who refuses to accept, can graze a horse greatly.”

Ju Zi(orange) coldly snorted, “you actually self-confident. You believe that by the strength of your oneself, can resist my hundreds of thousands of armies? You now only then two choices, submitted to or are the deaths!”

Huo Yuhao laughs, “wants to make me submit to? Dream of a fool. What qualifications do you have to make me submit to? Depending on following these Soul Guidance Device? If you have understood me, should know that by my ability, below these Soul Guidance Device simply does not have any function for me. My this time, must inform you, starting today, I was your this army the maggot of tarsal bone. I continuously with you. Perhaps, wants to kill you not to be easy, but if kills your person, I very much have confidence. Your linkage defense guard shield is impossible to start, is impossible to cover your entire army?”

The Huo Yuhao sound spreads through Spiritual Power by far, such remarks, in the entire Sun-Moon Empire army, the military officer first-level character of is the complexion big change.

The Huo Yuhao strength they have seen, although does not know that concrete is any level, but can resist Beast God Di Tian to strike not dead, at least is also the Titled Douluo standard.

If ordinary Titled Douluo naturally is not anything, does not have to hide in front of various Sun-Moon Empire Surveying Soul Guidance Device, did not have close army, was rumbled to kill the dregs.

But, this fellow is different! Although does not know what he uses is any method, but he can actually conceal all Surveying Soul Guidance Device by his ability. But the powerhouse of this level insists on not giving a thought to the assassination of status in the situation of not having the means detecting, then, can only be the everybody feels insecure result.

He will certainly not aim at these ordinary soldiers, but their these military officers, Soul Engineer, without doubt were his goal.

A day two days, perhaps fortunately, but, did the time grow? After the time grew, how many people can he kill? This no one can reach an agreement.

Naturally, has way of coping, but, wants to cope with such one, is really not an easy matter!

Suddenly, the atmosphere of entire Sun-Moon Empire army becomes some are not good.

The Ju Zi(orange) complexion also becomes a paleness, the coldly [say / way]: “Person who Shrek Academy comes out, when became so shameless.”

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, said: “This is the battlefield, only then outcome, won't the winner nobilities defeated thief, this point empress you know? Right, in the frontal battlefield, we are not your matches. I was even dismissed by Shrek Academy because of you. Now I am alone in the world, barefoot did not fear that puts on shoes. The place that I continually eat meal now did not have. Hasn't been able to make me vent? Object who this vented, naturally was your has robbed the fellow of my rice bowl.”

Ju Zi(orange) almost shows the whites of the eyes, when he became such shameless!

“I can the food eat to you. So long as you join Sun-Moon Empire, all that before you made, I can take responsibility, do not go into one's past. Moreover, status that but can also Imperial Family consecrate to you. So long as you need, we first supply.”

Huo Yuhao laughs, laughter incomparable rampancy, “real? If in this case, is not cannot consider! My request is not high, I heard that your this War-God Empress is much longer, I had the wife, marries you to be the wife is not good, but becomes a concubine to be able. You is a concubine to me.”

“You......”on the Ju Zi(orange) face an appearance of violent anger, below entire Sun-Moon Empire army is also the instantaneous disturbance. What is this? The insult of scarlet fruits!

Ju Zi(orange) in the Sun-Moon Empire army, status Xuan, is honored as one generation of war-gods, military rare talent who millenniums. At this time actually above both armies battlefield, so was insulted by the opposite party. Let alone, Ju Zi(orange), but Sun-Moon Empire empress, Xu Tianran only then such an empress. Even even/including imperial concubine imperial concubines do not have. Huo Yuhao this saying, quite therefore insulted entire Sun-Moon Empire.

Appearance that all Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer, all are being filled with righteous indignation, if not awed by the Ju Zi(orange) dignity, they already lashed out.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-575-part-2





Volume 12

#575 - I Came!


But regardless of, the military officers of Sun-Moon Empire army and Soul Engineer are how angry, they cannot think absolutely, at this time their War-God Empress, in heart supple intestines hundred knots.

Bastards! This bastard, works as all people to say this words unexpectedly. This words, you, if told me in secret, perhaps, I didn't agree? You may know that at midnight the dream returns, I rather am the concubine to you, is not willing to be this empress!

Heart of Ju Zi(orange) in slight is shivering, the aura is not very uniform. In her Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp powerhouses think that she is in the extreme anger, no one dares to speak, was waiting for that she issues the order.

“Huo Yuhao, you! Look! Death!”The Ju Zi(orange) sound, almost drills from the gap between teeth.

Actually, she does not know, Huo Yuhao in stealth, does not feel better at this time. Tang Wutong is punishing him wickedly.

Huo Yuhao explained to her through the mind connection unceasingly that this is to enrage the Sun-Moon Empire powerhouse, is good to implement the next plan. What what a pity is, present Tang Wutong is actually only a been jealous woman.

“What's wrong? Doesn't empress agree? That added that what I want what to give what, isn't this idle talk spoken lines words? In this case, I will also say.”Huo Yuhao rampant as before.

Ju Zi(orange) cold sound track: “You think really we couldn't cope with you? Huo Yuhao, do you believe that I immediately order now, attacks Shrek City, massacres city thoroughly. Let your ten thousand years of accumulation Academy, the thorough destruction, forever cancels from Continent.”

Huo Yuhao coldly [say / way]: “If you dare such to do, I am poor the life energy, must your Sun-Moon Empire all people, utterly destroy. Including general publics. Does not remain. By this world, does not have the Sun-Moon Empire bloodlines.”

“What?”Huo Yuhao such remarks, not only Sun-Moon Empire here all people are surprised. Even if the distant place, has flown into the airborne Shrek Academy high levels similarly to be also surprised.

They understand finally, why Huo Yuhao yesterday evening somewhat impulsive must resign from the status of Sea God Pavilion member. He at that time perhaps radically was not impulsive, but already had the plan.

What this said is what words? Is Titled Douluo, remote starts to general publics. Even if Sun-Moon Empire that faces, what this does mean? Means that he becomes a deicide, becomes the entire Continent enemy, becomes an executioner.

Even if Evil Soul Master, does not dare to say this, as the matter stands, he will become the entire Continent Soul Master enemy, everybody must execute it. Even if Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire person will not be protecting him. Because, this is the taboo, absolute taboo! The taboo of Soul Master, similarly is also the Soul Engineer taboo.

The powerhouses do not get rid to the average person, this is the unspoken rule, particularly the unspoken rule of Titled Douluo level.

Titled Douluo destructive power what kind terror, if Titled Douluo gets rid to the average person, in day of time, cuts to kill ten thousand people are far from a difficult matter. That definitely meets loss of life!

Therefore, Huo Yuhao these words said that not only will have placed the Sun-Moon Empire opposite, has placed the entire Continent opposite. This wants counter- humanity!

Float in airborne Old Xuan, the face muscle twitched obviously.

Old Song is a face shocking looks to him, said: “Won't this boy, do really?”

The Old Xuan forced smile said: “Now is not the issue that he can do, but was he said this words, completely has thrown own reputation. Does not know that actually he must do, no wonder he must resign from us all! This child, but also is the surprise-attack forces is really prominent.”

“I am proud!”Nearby Qian Duoduo mumbled one suddenly.

Xian Lin'er has given him ill-humoredly the bald palm of the hand, “what are you proud?”

Qian Duoduo smiles, said: “Present Yuhao, you did not think, really a little Ultimate Soldier flavor? Anything is Ultimate Soldier, even if faces mighty force, can rely on the strength of oneself oneself to turn around the situation. Now, he as if had this trend. Not necessarily is the misdemeanor. As for words that he spoke a moment ago, Ancient Elder, did you hear?”

Old Zhuang first shaking the head, “my anything has not heard. From was too far.”

Yan Shaozhe sighed, said: “Yes! How my recent ear did not know, was not a little easy-to-use. Went back to pull out the earwax. Yuhao sound, does not pass on toward us, that side Shrek City, should also nobody be able to hear in any case. This boy, the speech is fuzzy, who knows that what he was saying?”

The Old Xuan corners of the mouth twitched, similarly is also sighs one, “for a long time has not drunk, yesterday made Yuhao this boy be mad me to drink several cups, finally today also a little dizzy, was not good, I flew motionless, I must return to the city the head later. The boy will not suffer a loss in any case, do we also here do? Walked, goes back.”

What Old Song twitches is the heart, Nyima, your Limit Douluo, said one flew motionless, who believed! Do you believe?

Old Xuan deep looked at Old Song, “something, so long as unceasing told itself, the time grew, oneself believed.”

The distant place, Sun-Moon Empire, several hundred thousand armies, at this time are actually a silence.

Formerly also thinks that is the deity fights to have nothing to do own ordinary soldiers, stared in a big way the eye.

Various Surveying Soul Guidance Device immediately have also discovered that side Shrek City, Soul Master that flies went back. What does this mean? At least in their eyes looks like, this means that Shrek City these people, gave up Huo Yuhao. Present Huo Yuhao, really became a loner.

Ju Zi(orange) looks at Huo Yuhao, in the look is gloomily difficult to be bright, this time mood is incomparably complex. She cannot think absolutely that innermost feelings good Huo Yuhao, actually said such to turn the words. She does not certainly believe that Huo Yuhao will start to the average person. But, he said these words, has braved the great misdeed!

This was forced by me? Is because that side Spirit Dou City, Dou Ling Empire was Imperial Family extinguished the reason that kills completely? Had he been compelled this by me unexpectedly? Yuhao! This flickers, the heart of Ju Zi(orange), was somewhat soft, to the vigilance of Huo Yuhao, because this had some changes tenderheartedly.

“Are you what kind of?”Ju Zi(orange) sound as before ice-cold, but with formerly compared with, had lacked a powerful.

Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “Does not want to be what kind. I am also in any case alone in the world, dies to knock with you.”

“You dare!”Ju Zi(orange) roars.

Huo Yuhao said with a smile: “You can try, do I dare. Does not try with my life in any case. Here many people.”

The body of Ju Zi(orange) trembles, “your Titled Douluo, dares to aim at the average person unexpectedly. Don't you fear by the scourge?”

Huo Yuhao said: “By scourge also homeland destroyed good. I suffer the scourge, can save the life of person are many I to protect, what the scourge was considered as?”

Ju Zi(orange) as if somewhat breathless [say / way]: “Actually are you what kind of?”

Huo Yuhao takes a deep breath, raises head to look at the day, said: “I do not know that your this times, making Academy hand over me is the original intention. But since you proposed, I also came. However, wants to catch me, is not easy. Was inferior that we before this both armies, bet, how?”

“Gambling?”This character, making Ju Zi(orange) just relax for several points vigilant was pulled back immediately.

Gambling? What does he want to bet? Ju Zi(orange) doubts looks at Huo Yuhao.

“How do you want to bet?”The Ju Zi(orange) sinking sound asked.

Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “You most dreaded that nothing but is my stealth ability. But I, does not hope that you ruin my homeland. Although I and Shrek City have not related, but, I must protect it as before. We by ten decide outcome. I, your ten people, come in turn. One-to-one, dies to knock. Death that continuation that wins, loses! If you have killed me in ten, all finished. If in ten, I have all won. Then, you withdraw troops. And within three years, can not resort to arms to my Shrek Academy again. If you agreed that this gambling approximately starts. The words that does not agree with, you prepare to fill in the human life.”

Ju Zi(orange) is suddenly enlighted at this time, the Huo Yuhao upholstery was so long, threatens so the pressure, the ultimate goal, unexpectedly is so.

Good intelligent Huo Yuhao! His uses oneself individual threat strength, has kidnapped the entire Sun-Moon Empire army. This is must force itself, must complete this gambling with him.

In situation that in several hundred thousand armies look, if Sun-Moon Empire is not willing to bet, that also means that ignores to the safety of ordinary soldier. Morale of troops inevitable chaos. So long as Huo Yuhao makes killing of several small scale, likely will create the situation that the army most fears, the mutiny!

But this is the situation that Ju Zi(orange) cannot see absolutely, is all military officers cannot see.

Therefore, Huo Yuhao is uses own reputation to be the price, has kidnapped the entire Sun-Moon Empire army.

Moreover, his age such young, is not Limit Douluo. Even is not Transcendent Douluo. In this case, he proposed that selects ten, lets reason that one's own side simply has not rejected.

This fellow!

Once repulses the enemy from Shrek, did not have to the Shrek pressure. Then, the army in view of the planning for action of Star Lou Empire, likely must have the change. Yuhao Yuhao, you were really give me to have a difficult problem.

In a short time, Ju Zi(orange) intention phonograph.

In this time, suddenly, in her mind was presenting a sound, this sound is very light, but exceptionally is clear.

“Evil Soul Master, our common enemies.”

“Um?”In Ju Zi(orange) heart one startled, she has not thought that has so formidable linkage defense guard shield protection, Huo Yuhao can also spread to her heart the thought unexpectedly. Meanwhile, she also immediately understood the outcome that Huo Yuhao must make is any matter.

--

Three finished, seeks the recommendation vote support!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-575-part-3





Volume 12

#576 - To Select Ten!


Let the army repulse the enemy, unexpectedly is only one of his goals, but another goal, aims at Holy Spirit Cult.

Yes! Holy Spirit Cult, is the common enemy, but, aimed at Holy Spirit Cult at this time, has the conflict with Ju Zi(orange) plan. But, Huo Yuhao may, no matter these, are working as these many people now, only had so.

“Huo Yuhao, challenges our ten people by the strength of your oneself, simply is dream of a fool. This gambling makes, we naturally without question. However, we lost, must pay the price that the army retreats. But you lost, is actually only a human life, you looked at yourself heavily. You did not have that qualifications.”In the Ju Zi(orange) sound has filled disdaining.

Huo Yuhao wants to extend a thumb to Ju Zi(orange), acts in harmony! This is the god same teammate.

Both sides in the so hostile situation, she had realized from their words immediately they need anything, simply was too strong.

Selects ten, Huo Yuhao must aim, main naturally is Evil Soul Master, Holy Spirit Cult Evil Soul Master. Then, wish makes Evil Soul Master begin, merely is the Sun-Moon Empire army safety, that is insufficient. These Evil Soul Master look forward to the multi- blind spot person, has more souls to assist them to practice. Therefore, must be able to attract their things to be good. But these things, naturally want Huo Yuhao to take.

Huo Yuhao nodded to Ju Zi(orange), said: “Am I unqualified? Was individual is certainly insufficient. However, I can put out several types of things, as gambling stake.”

At the same time was saying, side airborne Huo Yuhao light shadow, a leaf of jet black front door opens quietly, a colossus drilled from that front door.

This colossus, made the following countless people hold breath immediately cold air.

What is that? One over 50 meters in height, the body is lending the incomparably terrifying aura, great bear! Why its hair is grey colored, the eye is actually the blood red, but also is beating the flame likely.

Huo Yuhao also puts out a handle blade from the hand, a handle is glittering all over the body the ice blue short blade edge.

The short blade edge across the sky flies, immediately, in the sky, thermal shock, the distant place Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp linkage defense guard shield had the ray gloomy situation unexpectedly. In sky, starts to have snowflake piece by piece to fall gently.

If Xia Xuanchen here, sees that leaf of jet black front door, with Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife that Huo Yuhao releases, perhaps then, he can associate to some situations.

What a pity, he has not come back now. All these, during the computation of Huo Yuhao.

Corpse Ice Bear King Second White, Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife.

“These two, are on me the most precious thing. This handle blade, is Divine Tool, true Divine Tool. Initially if by it, I could not block Beast God Di Tian struck. Let you have a look, its might.”

At the same time was saying, Ice and Snow Goddess Breath from the sky raises up suddenly, blue blade glow has cut in the Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp linkage defense guard shield direction.

Does not need Ju Zi(orange) to order, Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp Soul Master promoted immediately the Soul Guidance Protective Cover intensity high.

However, when that blade glow falls on the guard shield together, the entire linkage defense guard shield getting angry red ray completely was unexpectedly gloomy, instead turned into the dark blue. A series of explosive sounds burst out on the guard shield.

Frontage, together deep slash, suddenly brand mark above that linkage defense guard shield. Only poor, the guard shield was cut.

This is the linkage defense guard shield that Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp displays whole-heartedly! Even if Limit Douluo, possibly does not have to rout it.

Morning Dew Knife, strikes gently, creates so the effect unexpectedly. Most fearful, is the attribute repels one another. The side of that terror is cold, even in Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer including guard shield felt, the flame color that themselves sent out was gloomier. Prestige of the blade, actually goes so far as in this way.

Morning Dew Knife takes back, Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “As for my this pet, I were not many says. The discerning people naturally can see. Is! Cult Master Zongli. I know that you are looking, hasn't come out?”

The purple black ray lifts off together suddenly, Holy Spirit Cult Lord Zongli Wu, from the sky appears own personal appearance.

His vision has filled greedily, has not gone to look at Huo Yuhao, but completely was centralized on Ice Bear King Second White.

Even if is Evil Soul Master clan/sect Cult Master, how he cannot see Huo Yuhao is a formidable Soul Beast transformation is Undead Creature. But he actually can definitely affirm that this is Undead Creature, even very possible be more formidable than it before death.

Can release this type of aura, before death at least is also Ferocious Beasts. Manufactures the undead puppet Ferocious Beasts, this is the Zongli Wu goal.

Before he chased down Beast God Di Tian, the hope made the puppet with Di Tian. If he has succeeded, he believes that he is the unmatched in the world.

What a pity, the Beast God strength far exceeded him to sentence in advance. This line, making Holy Spirit Cult lose is not small. He was injured, comes back a recuperation talent to restore reluctantly. This is because before Di Tian was injured, morning that they faint from fear, otherwise, they likely by that Continent's Number One Expert forever keeps in Star Dou Forest.

The Star Dou Forest strength, imagines compared with them must more terrorist many.

“Army Supervisor.”The Ju Zi(orange) vision looks to Zongli Wu, in eye reveals the color of inquiry.

Is Army Supervisor, Zongli Wu also has very high authority in the armed forces, he is not responsible for others, specially supervises Ju Zi(orange). If some important decisions, Ju Zi(orange) must undergo his agreement to be good. Like the withdrawal of troops, is the important matter.

Reclamation vision that Zongli Wu does not abandon, nodded to Ju Zi(orange), said: “Gambling stake is precious enough.”Spoke these words, he looked that does not look at Huo Yuhao one, turned around to fly in the Sun-Moon Empire big camp direction.

Has not stated clearly, but without a doubt, Zongli Wu has indicated own opinion.

In Ju Zi(orange) must to Huo Yuhao say anything time, suddenly, the purple black ray dodges, Zongli Wu came back.

His vision somewhat strange looks at Huo Yuhao, said: “Boy, if you lost, we do not kill you. I want you to join my Holy Spirit Cult. I keep your life.”

Regarding others, Huo Yuhao said that words to brave public opinion a moment ago, but regarding Holy Spirit Cult main him, is actually not anything. Moreover, Huo Yuhao can put out corpse Ice Bear King, in addition, he had heard some related Huo Yuhao matters, he had recognized that on Huo Yuhao, has certainly to be the Evil Soul Master secret. But these, he not only wants to know, but, once can train one in Holy Spirit Cult Huo Yuhao this talent, then, he likely becomes Holy Spirit Cult Saint Child!

The Dragon God Douluo Mu En disciple, joins Holy Spirit Cult, will this be to the Shrek Academy huge attack?

As for is the sincerity joins, Zongli Wu was not worried, regardless of any person, falls in his hands, he has the confidence to make it turn into Evil Soul Master thoroughly.

Huo Yuhao smiles looks at Zongli Wu, said: “Good! So long as you had the skill to win me, joined your also no reason why not, in any case I am also the homeless person.”

Zongli Wu has also smiled, smiles is very happy, “said it and meant it.”

Ju Zi(orange) in side looks that these two old foxes add the small fox, in the heart somewhat twitch, is actually who to plan who? Cult Master Zongli, could I ahead of time pay silent tribute for you?

Zongli Wu does not certainly know that Ju Zi(orange) is thinking anything, turned around to fly to the camp direction.

Ju Zi(orange) sinking sound track: “Good, since Sir Army Supervisor complied, this Commander promises you. After a double-hour, in our big open area between camp and Shrek City, ten determines the final outcome!”

Huo Yuhao smiles certainly, no longer said anything, but looked at Ju Zi(orange) one silently, is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, turns around to fly in the rear plain direction, phantom that airborne he transforms also vanishes does not see. Corpse Ice Bear King Second White, as well as Huo Yuhao that Ice and Snow Goddess Breath and Morning Dew Knife, changes into light shadow to vanish quietly does not see.

The Sun-Moon Empire army and Shrek City poly 90 kilometers, the intermediate point was about 45 kilometers, this without doubt was the safest distance, was fair.

Huo Yuhao descends to the ground, sits cross-legged to sit down, starts meditate. Tang Wutong standing silently behind him. For his protector.

Sun-Moon Empire, Ju Zi(orange) is also leading her Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp members rapidly falls toward the big camp.

Quick, commander tent discussing official business.

All that airborne had a moment ago, all Sun-Moon Empire military officers saw, had no need for Ju Zi(orange) making the introduction. After all people arrive in full, she directly asked two questions.

“Huo Yuhao presented challenge to our armies, after the confirmation of Army Supervisor, we decided to accept his challenge, is placed in front of us now, ten people who two issues, first, we sent out who were. Second, after we win, two gambling stakes that Huo Yuhao puts out, whom turning over to possess.”

Zongli Wu sits side Ju Zi(orange), when Ju Zi(orange) proposed these two issues, he looked at Ju Zi(orange) one subconsciously, the brow micro wrinkle, does not know that is thinking anything.

In big account, it may be said that powerhouse like clouds, Sun-Moon Empire elite in this army, not only there is a Evil Soul Master powerhouse, nine levels of Soul Engineer are the quantity is also numerous. And includes that several Sun-Moon Empire Imperial Family Consecrate Hall powerhouse.

Nine levels of Soul Engineer stand, said: “That gambling stake naturally should be belongs to the empire. I am willing to go to battle for the empire, to get rid of that rampant boy.”

Another nine levels of Soul Engineer also nodded.

These nine levels of Soul Engineer are also the worldly people, when Zongli Wu flies into airborne, they could see that Zongli Wu had a liking for that corpse Ice Bear King. They are not certainly willing to make Zongli Wu go well, therefore, immediately proposed the opposing opinion. Meanwhile, these nine levels of Soul Engineer, indicated that is willing to strive for the country, decisive battle Huo Yuhao.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-576-part-1





Volume 12

#576 - To Select Ten!


Ju Zi(orange) then changes Zongli Wu the vision, “does Sir Army Supervisor, you look?”

Zongli Wu light [say / way]: “From the truth, said that is correct. The spoils of war that obtains should certainly belong to country.”

Here, his cloudy and cold vision has swept from audiences nine levels of Soul Engineer, by nine levels of Soul Engineer that he saw, the complexion changed, although they were powerful, but faced this Evil Soul Master clan/sect sect master, in the heart many somewhat feared and disturbed.

“But!”Really, Zongli Wu also has something to be talked about later, “this Huo Yuhao, since dares to challenge us, he certainly some relies on, he excels at going into hiding oneself, the actual combat capability is also very strong. Quite is not weak regarding the Soul Guidance Device dodging ability. As the matter stands, in fact resists his words, the Soul Master effect will be better than Soul Engineer. From his Soul Power fluctuation, he should not arrive at the Transcendent Douluo level. After all, he is 20-year- old age. But two gambling stakes that he puts out, that handle short sword is Ice Attribute, was called Divine Tool by him, and is not overrated, might everybody saw, naturally should belong to the country. As for another, that is Undead Creature, I can affirm. It does not have any function regarding the country, only then our Holy Spirit Cult, can control it, and makes it change into to the national useful strength.”

Once was called Old Su nine levels of Soul Engineer to stand by Ju Zi(orange), coldly [say / way]: “That said that Sir Army Supervisor wants splendidly took back in that spoils of war the pouch?”

Zongli Wu stands up, the big personal appearance makes his own imposing manner more powerful several points, “I white will certainly not take this thing. This resistance, wrestles by the life and death. Believes that very much treasures to own life. Such being the case, this resistance, is taken the main action strength by my Holy Spirit Cult. We defeat him, takes away one not to have the spoils of war of direct role to the country, should be also OK. Marshal, did you say?”

He looked that does not look at nine levels of Soul Engineer one, but changed Ju Zi(orange) the vision.

Ju Zi(orange) looks at Zongli Wu, in the heart sighs one darkly, Yuhao Yuhao! You may be good to plan really! All during your computation, perhaps at present all, you was also calculates, otherwise, you will not put out that the thing that Zongli Wu must move. Since this, I also do hold true by do not help you, copes our together enemy? Do you have confidence to defeat them really?

Ju Zi(orange) is thinking at the same time, tranquil nod, said: “Good, since Army Supervisor is willing to lead this responsibility, this war, gave Army Supervisor. However, this war, is related to the army glory, in the meantime, relates to our strategic plan, allow Sheng cannot defeat. Can Army Supervisor, be willing to issue the written pledge to fulfill a military order?”

“Um?”The Zongli Wu look concentrates, written pledge to fulfill a military order? What is the written pledge to fulfill a military order? Once issues the written pledge to fulfill a military order, but cannot complete the task the words, must be handled by the military law. This in the army, when some extremely vital task execution, the method that can carry on. Has not thought that Ju Zi(orange) even proposed wants him to issue the written pledge to fulfill a military order. This is forcing him without doubt, clearly, this woman does not want to be obtained that formidable Undead Creature by oneself.

But, written pledge to fulfill a military order how? Also was considered as anything, that Huo Yuhao, how old, by strength of the, must greet the market fight in which several persons take turns fighting one person so as to wear the opponent out, this simply is laughable. What even if he has to rely on, by my Holy Spirit Cult strength, hasn't been able to strike to kill him? If so, what my this does Cult Master also make?

Under gaze that in audiences nine levels of Soul Engineer eye covetously, Zongli Wu nodded slowly, said: “Good, this Army Supervisor issues the written pledge to fulfill a military order, if I cannot lead my Holy Spirit Cult people to defeat Huo Yuhao, wish to be handled by the military law!”

Quick, under the gaze and supervision of people, Zongli Wu issues the written pledge to fulfill a military order personally. Even if his State Master and Army Supervisor status, once this written pledge to fulfill a military order establishes, cannot change. This point, is the same to anyone.

Ju Zi(orange) nodded, said: “Good, such being the case, wishing Army Supervisor to triumphal return to turn over.”

“Snort!”The Zongli Wu anger snort|hum, wields the robe sleeve, the stride directly soars outside commander tent to go, several Evil Soul Master also follow him to leave together.

Gazes after the back that he is departing, Old Su as well as nine levels of Soul Engineer surround to Ju Zi(orange) side rapidly.

[Say / Way] that Old Su somewhat worries about: “Marshal, makes these Evil Soul Master cope with that Huo Yuhao really? The aura that on that Undead Creature releases is quite formidable, although we do not know that it came from where, but if falls in the Zongli Wu hand, to Holy Spirit Cult absolutely is even more powerful!”

Other nine levels of Soul Engineer also revealed the anxious look.

Ju Zi(orange) beckoned with the hand, light [say / way]: “Huo Yuhao is a smart person, he is the Dragon God Douluo Mu En disciple, the Shrek Academy Sea God Pavilion youngest member, is the Sea God Pavilion skip-generation successor. You believe that such a smart person, easily setting in deathtrap? Even if between he and Shrek Academy presented the contradiction, cannot so. Moreover, is talking the mood of time to see with me from him today that he is very calm, and has confidence very much. Such being the case, he certainly has relied on. Since Army Supervisor is willing to embrace this matter, that made him try. The battle has ten, that side Army Supervisor, can take the powerhouse who gets rid, should the insufficient ten people. If he is not good, we try to find the solution again. If Army Supervisor has won, we again try to find other solutions.”

Listened to a sentence such saying, these Soul Engineer powerhouses also silent. Ju Zi(orange) this is the manner of watching changes quietly, is somewhat conservative, but on the other hand, under at present this aspect, as if is also a good choice.

Huo Yuhao sitting silently on the broad plain, the surroundings takes a broad view to look, a smoothness. Soul Power in within the body, to continue and is fluctuating stably. However, even if stands side him, Tang Wutong is unable to feel the least bit Soul Power fluctuation from him the aura.

This is the Dual Soul Nucleus fearful place, by own formidable strength, two Soul Nucleus all compressed all Soul Power in whirlpools, perfect integration of Spiritual Power and Soul Power. Only meets the heaven and earth elemental energy inspiration within the body of outside, but absolutely easily will not actually be assigned away from the capital. Therefore. Even if the powerhouse of Zongli Wu that rank, cannot see Huo Yuhao now true cultivating for is many, can only judge through his aura, his level has not achieved the Transcendent Douluo level.

Yes, Huo Yuhao has not achieved the Transcendent Douluo level, but, he is Twin Martial Souls, and there is the second mix. His has achieved 93 Soul Power extremely, may by far not be general 93 can compare favorably extremely!

Extreme Ice Battle God Armor was already well on Huo Yuhao, this Humanoid Soul Guidance Device is the essence is similarly reserved, has not released the least bit Absolute Ice aura outward, all as if become very peaceful, peaceful somewhat fearful.

To select ten, such fight is almost unique in Soul Master. Huo Yuhao seems like compelled into the hopeless situation the impulsive young people, can finish itself in this most brutal way?

Shrek City, in top.

Shrek Academy Sea God Pavilion Ancient Elder came, Tang Sect numerous high levels also similarly.

Beibei, in beforehand the soldier does not know that Huo Yuhao must make anything, but now, nobody can prevent Huo Yuhao from continuing this matter.

Tang Ya tight is shaking the hand of Beibei, asked in a low voice: “Beibei, Yuhao he, he really?”

Nod of Beibei makes an effort, “he certainly. Since he has such done, certainly. We must believe him. Yuhao has such strength. He such does, the goal only then one, that is compels to draw back the Sun-Moon Empire army, if has not grasped, then, he exits not to have any significance. Meanwhile, he should also to use this fight, weakens the Sun-Moon Empire high-end strength, kills one is.”

Worry in Tang Ya eye because of the Beibei words has not actually weakened, “but, how I thought that the Yuhao absolute assurance, he such has not done, to will set at the deathtrap likely!”

Old Xuan in their not far away, hears the Tang Ya words, Old Xuan turns the head, nodded, said: “Good, he must set at the deathtrap himself. Sets at the deathtrap then to live. He has his plan, other I do not know. But cultivates from oneself, I can actually guess correctly one of his goals.”

“Among the life and death has the big fear. Yuhao must draw support, is tempering between this life and death, lets itself in the face of the huge pressure, rapid breakthrough. He cultivates Titled Douluo that becomes not to be different from us normally, he had second Soul Nucleus, has the potential that can promote rapidly. He too longed for regarding the strength. He is the hope can rely on his strength to turn around the current situation.”

“Therefore, he will make such choice, he must in this intense exciting way, come to set at the deathtrap then by himself to live, thus more intense stimulation own potential, was accelerated to promote by oneself, soon becomes the powerhouse of Transcendent Douluo level. Can succeed as for him, he has not considered. Moreover, I believe that his goal absolutely continues this, he definitely already had the arrangement. If this time, selects ten him to be completed, I believe that his cultivating to also inevitably can go a step further, to promote to a brand-new level. Even, even if attacks Transcendent Douluo also to have directly possibly.”

Yes, only then Old Xuan most has to appraise the Huo Yuhao authority, because he is the same with Huo Yuhao, has the second Soul Nucleus person, stated differently, Huo Yuhao is Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus, but Old Xuan is Equal Resonance second Soul Nucleus.

---

The Magic Chef of Ice and Fire tour shows splendidly, comes to play with us quickly together, then, we will also draw, other signature books as well as splendid presents.

The hand tour downloads in our prestige - platform, everybody joined the platform to be able. It is expected that in the first half of next month, the apple will escape from prison will get online, the second half month, the legal copy apple will also get online.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-576-part-2





Volume 12

#576 - To Select Ten!


After having second Soul Nucleus, Old Xuan is own strength increases incessantly, made him see clearly the second Soul Nucleus true formidable function. That promotion, not only absolutely compresses Soul Power to be so simple. Promotes a higher degree the potential directly.

In the Old Xuan heart mused, if one day, Huo Yuhao really can after second Soul Nucleus promotes to Absolute, when breaks through Limit Douluo to condense third Soul Nucleus to be successful, then, he will become one generation of Grandmaster who will inherit. Meanwhile, he also inevitably can break through this world limit. Even if no inheritance of any Gods, when he has third Soul Nucleus, can make 99 levels of limits vanish on him thoroughly.

This is the Old Xuan guess, but also is he expects. Naturally, he is also very clear, second Soul Nucleus regarding Soul Master is that difficult, third Soul Nucleus naturally is more difficult.

Yuhao Yuhao, do you want to compel into the hopeless situation to break through yourself really?

Really is this? No, is incomplete.

Just like such of Old Xuan guess, Huo Yuhao already had the complete plan, but during this complete plan, oneself cultivates for the promotion truly is important one ring, but, he is not compels into the hopeless situation to break through, but must be comprehended in this life and death resistance by oneself, ability that comprehends itself have.

The Yin-Yang balanced the second Soul Nucleus breakthrough to have several days, may in fact, Huo Yuhao unable to comprehend this second Soul Nucleus complete prestige energy completely.

Only then through among fight with powerhouses, he can quicker comprehension second Soul Nucleus mystery.

Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus, he is present age second, first is Beast God Di Tian.

Although Di Tian can change humanity, but his Soul Beast, Huo Yuhao is in itself first has this second Soul Nucleus humanity eventually, therefore, nobody can teach how his second Soul Nucleus should use, might actually strong. This all wants him to inquire about.

If there is an enough time, Huo Yuhao can certainly try to find out slowly, stable searches to observe. Gradually found oneself that broad road. But, does he currently have enough time?

Therefore, he must use this strong exciting method, inspires the potential that oneself second Soul Nucleus brings, has a look at itself, in process that in resists with the powerhouse, can actually achieve what kind of strength. More faced with the hopeless situation, can stimulate own potential on exceed. This when Huo Yuhao first time participates in Great Continental Soul Master Academy Fighting Spirit Competition, has discovered.

Compared with the past years, he does not know that wanted formidable many times, but he believes that reached the same goal or conclusion from different approaches, to any level, the formidable pressure, is promotes oneself to comprehend the best way.

A double-hour, quick on past.

The Sun-Moon Empire aspect, neat square formations leave ranks from the Sun-Moon Empire army military compound slowly.

From military compound the population are not many, altogether adds about 1000 people, but actually is fully-armed Soul Engineer. They are turning on the linkage defense guard shield, in big strides 45 kms away comes toward Huo Yuhao. And, is crowding around a Sun-Moon Empire powerhouse.

Shrek City, is the city gate opens greatly, although the beforehand Huo Yuhao words have blocked own escape route, but Old Xuan has the reason of Old Xuan, Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp threatens the border, Shrek Academy doesn't have the sound?

Shrek, lift-off, but is Soul Master, water Soul Saint rank Soul Master. in addition, the quantity has achieved unexpectedly also the astonishing over a thousand people.

The flight in the forefront, is Shrek Academy audiences Sea God Pavilion Ancient Elder, as well as came from elite of three big empires.

In their hearts, nobody blamed certainly before Huo Yuhao, to words that the Sun-Moon Empire army spoke, because they have not heard! Old Xuan told them, Huo Yuhao must with select ten ways, solves the Sun-Moon Empire army attacking army has reached the city crisis.

This is a hero! In all person eyes is so.

Both sides look like had already reached an agreement, the respective more than thousand people, approach toward the middle place slowly.

If in the one-to-one situation, Sun-Moon Empire again doubles the population, was impossible to win Shrek Academy. But, this is the war. The Soul Engineer war, never has the one-to-one such concept.

Old Xuan leads the Shrek Academy people to arrive from a Huo Yuhao 500 meters place to stop. Has not approached, Old Xuan has not made anybody pass and Huo Yuhao exchange, is only the aligning lineup, silently observed the enemy for him.

At this time, Old Xuan does not hope that has anybody to disturb Huo Yuhao.

Sun-Moon Empire, in stopped from Huo Yuhao 500 meters away similarly, is away from Old Xuan as well as the Shrek Academy powerhouses, fully had one kilometer being away from.

Both sides are widely separated by the kilometer to confront. But the range within kilometer, is then this Soul Master historically will certainly leave behind a battlefield of dark ink serious wound shocking war.

A Ju Zi(orange) military garb, is as before valiant. A big chair was moved by the subordinate, she sits above the chair. Is three services commander, here, only then she has the qualifications of sitting down, even if is Army Supervisor Zongli Wu is not good.

Zongli Wu coldly looks at Huo Yuhao of distant place, in the eye the ray twinkle, does not know that is calculating anything, but his aura, was actually becomes even more formidable.

Huo Yuhao is feeling the change of outside silently, the whole person is in meditate as before, was concerned with all of outside.

“Huo Yuhao, ten wars, start.”The Zongli Wu low and deep sound is common just like the billowing stuffy thunder, passed on the Huo Yuhao direction.

Huo Yuhao then slowly opens the double pupil.

When that flash of his opening eyes pupil, the Zongli Wu fierce feeling own heartbeat sped up instantaneously. He sees, is a pair of incomparably strange eye pupil.

This eyes pupil, unexpectedly is the different colors, is glittering clear golden light, the ray is not strong, but actually embodiment just like the endless profound solar deep place, but in his another eye pupil, twinkle is the sky-blue ray, just likes the sea, endless vast.

Two eye different color rays have continued the flash, respectively returned to normal, changes the normal eye pupil color. Even has not revealed the least bit imposing manner from Huo Yuhao. But is his such person, makes the complexions of Sun-Moon Empire here all powerhouses dignified.

Such that just like Ju Zi(orange) said that a person, dares to propose that selects ten, this does not have the matter that the courage can achieve. Must know that this is not Great Continental Soul Master Academy Fighting Spirit Competition, great competition has the age limit, the age limited has cultivated is. But in this battlefield, is the war of life and death, both sides will stop at nothing, will send out the strongest personnel to enter the war. Huo Yuhao is going to face, is a national most top strength.

Although Grim Reaper Douluo is not, Dragon Emperor Douluo is not, Sun-Moon Empire most formidable Soul Engineer not. But, as before must be apprehensive here the top strength including Shrek Academy!

The floating body, Huo Yuhao nodded to behind Tang Wutong.

Tang Wutong deep looked at his one eyes, goes forward one step, has hugged him, said near his ear in a low voice sentence anything, then turns around their direction to walk toward Old Xuan, but does not have to fall back on side Old Xuan and the others, but was away from about 100 meters place to stop in Old Xuan and the others, looked to direction that Huo Yuhao is.

Huo Yuhao vision tranquil looks to Zongli Wu, looked to sit there Ju Zi(orange), light [say / way]: “That comes. First!”

When Huo Yuhao said the first these three characters, the Ju Zi(orange) mood suddenly became somewhat absent-minded. Such situation, she is not first time sees, initially, Huo Yuhao, when Sun-Moon Empire Sun-Moon Royal Soul Engineering Academy carries on the exchange study, had challenged the Sun-Moon Royal Soul Engineering Academy powerhouses there, at that time, he was also so, by strength of the, facing a Academy powerhouse, throughout has not actually flinched.

This is he, innermost feelings are soft, but has the heroic spirit powerhouse.

Several years passed by, he grew truly, for one on this world most powerhouses. If today, he can win this competion, then, without doubt he becomes in the future the Sun-Moon Empire trusted friend big trouble, belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries true hopes is.

This is doomed to be going to become a war that Huo Yuhao to become famous, even if were he died in battle finally, he was also belongs to the heroes in Douluo Continent three countries'.

In the Ju Zi(orange) heart five senses mixed Chen, her anything had not said that as if gave this fight really completely is Army Supervisor Zongli Wu.

Zongli Wu coldly snorted, waves, the side black form is the electricity shoots together, flies to shoot to go in the Huo Yuhao direction.

This is a whole body covers the Men in Black in cape, cannot see clearly his look, when he flies, looks like one group of black fog, in the rapid flight, the aura of whole person crazily is also strengthened, fills with the evil aura Power of Darkness, bursts out just like the blowout generally. In several hundred meters entire flight, above his top of the head, condensed big piece Wu Yun (black clouds), blocks the sky covers toward Huo Yuhao.

Yes, the name of this person is called Wu Yun (black clouds). One of Holy Spirit Cult Worship Hall powerhouses, is not the Holy Spirit Cult eight big elders.

His strength, is quite strong, in Holy Spirit Cult Worship Hall, can arrange on position.

He is not pure Evil Soul Master, because own Martial Soul is dark attribute, therefore has been misunderstood, even was regarded Evil Soul Master to chase down. In a rage, the homicide all has chased down own person, afterward went to Holy Spirit Cult. After these many years practice, he already with own behavior true became Evil Soul Master.

Does obeisance to seek the monthly ticket and recommendation vote support. Today is our Tang Sect auspicious day, we dazzle the world Tang Sect shop, official opening, everybody is washing, valuable shop there search: Dazzles world Tang Sect, can find. It is expected that this morning, all treasure on complete. Our Douluo Continent reprints hardbound commemorates the first volume, our entire net exclusive belt signature. The hard shell, surpasses the quality of to praise. Book friend of first 500 purchase, can obtain the signature version. We have the newest cartoon and novel . Moreover, gives everybody again a welfare, purchases whole set books from here and ensure gives everybody the first volume is the signature versions. That is, if everybody buys one set of six crazy god, the first volume can have my genuine signature. Ex analogia.

At present our complete set book belt signs includes: Crazy god and god seal throne, good god of death and Magic Chef of Ice and Fire. Moreover, we have the complimentary gift to bestow, every time buys two cartoon or a book, we send out value four Yuan Tang Sect card sign one. Card sign concrete craft and collection method, everybody dazzles on the world Tang Sect shop to consult in us, very interesting. We use imports card. Later I will also give everybody to introduce gradually. And also some can be the commemorative cards of limited edition. We hope that everybody likes.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-576-part-3





Volume 12

#577 - The First Battle, Extinguishes Kills!


On that day chased down Beast God Di Tian time, had his one. That time chases down, regarding the Holy Spirit Cult powerhouses, can be considered as on is weak and sickly, but only a person exception, that is he.

He is the same with Beast God Di Tian, is having dark attribute. In chasing down the Beast God process, he through feeling Beast God aura, as well as observes control of Beast God to Power of Darkness, had many comprehensions to the dark ability. After this time comes back, not only has not been injured, instead had some comprehensions, the Soul Power rank has also promoted first-level, has been the Transcendent Douluo level. Limited he many years of bottleneck to break through finally.

Therefore, in other words, Huo Yuhao in this first war, facing, is Evil Soul Master of Transcendent Douluo level, the ability, dark!

Sun-blocking black Wu Yun (black clouds), sweeps across, but, the Huo Yuhao personal appearance, was almost is submerged instantaneously.

To Titled Douluo this level, each other both sides have fought, is not the Soul Ability resistance so was simple, the imposing manner, Soul Ability, self-created Soul Ability and restraint, wait for the factor to play the important role.

Huo Yuhao stands there had not moved, the match takes to his tremendous pressure, he naturally can the clear feeling. He even also thinks somewhat kindly. Because previous time takes to him the tremendous pressure, made his potential eruption, was Beast God Di Tian!

This Evil Soul Master is also dark ability, but, Wu Yun (black clouds) takes to the Huo Yuhao oppression strength, compared with Di Tian, difference was actually too far.

Dark?

On the Huo Yuhao face reveals light sneering. Extreme Ice Battle God Armor surface armor falls slowly, his whole person complete coverage, dark blue halo, releases outward from Extreme Ice Battle God Armor along with it.

Extreme Ice Battle God Armor is not an armor, but is Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, controls its motion, is not the body of Huo Yuhao, but is his formidable incomparable Spiritual Power.

When manufactures Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, because considers Huo Yuhao oneself the strong capability in Spiritual Power aspect, therefore Xuan Ziwen has no scruples will promote the limit to the Spiritual Power demand. Average people, even if puts on this Extreme Ice Battle God Armor impossible stimulation, once stimulates, Spiritual Power instantaneously will also be found time.

Controls Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, adopts the thought completely. In in the darkness, Huo Yuhao was unable to regard the thing. Even if his Spiritual Detection, as if fell into the viscous mire. Invisible oppression strength, from all directions to rush forth, but.

But, is such strength, can limit is occupied by him?

“Spirit! Soul! Shake! Explodes!”Speak unhurriedly and clearly, four characters, put out from the Huo Yuhao mouth slowly, his voice is not loud, but the both sides more than 2000 powerhouse each people can actually clear hearing.

All people obviously felt that their Spiritual Power seemed touched, even if has covered Huo Yuhao Wu Yun (black clouds), along with it suddenly to rush forth.

Fierce trembling erupts in the dark attribute fog, is Wu Yun (black clouds) of instigator, only thought Soul Power that one output has as if met a very unusual strength. Soul Power had not been affected, but he controls Soul Power Spiritual Power, actually in the face of that strange strength, cuns (2.5cm) rupturing. But lost the fog instantaneously upward ascension of control, appeared unexpectedly has been similar to the mushroom cloud general strange picture.

But in this mushroom cloud, together the form instantaneously glitters, breaks in airborne. Dark blue halo twinkle, is, Huo Yuhao!

The body enters airborne, Huo Yuhao wears Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, arrives general just like Gods, his vision, has locked completely following hid Wu Yun (black clouds) in Wu Yun (black clouds).

The forehead place, the Extreme Ice Battle God Armor transparent crystal splits together quietly, the Purple gold color brilliance emits together instantaneously, strange appeared, when that ray just projected is the Purple gold color, but in airborne actually gradually fluctuates golden-rose color, when it injects in the thick fog, turned into the pure golden color strangely. A ray, unexpectedly in airborne successively three color deteriorations, is this what kind strange?

The stuffy pshaw along with it resounding, black Wu Yun (black clouds) shivers fiercely.

Together the dark blue ray has been similar to epoch-making general, cuts toward that black Wu Yun (black clouds).

The black Wu Yun (black clouds) bitter experience to that sword glow, was similar to the snow and ice melts unexpectedly vanished generally, changed into the innumerable black mist and dust, toward dispersed in all directions.

The Wu Yun (black clouds) form revealed that but present he, is actually retroceding. His personal appearance, somewhat was clearly scattered in disorder. Behind him, the jet black wings, that is not Flight Soul Guidance Device, but is his Martial Soul takes to his wing.

Darkness Raven, this is his Martial Soul. One type very rare, dark attribute formidable Martial Soul.

Back wing intelligential seems to be ordinary, feather projects black beams a piece by piece, interweaves a big net before his body, tries to resist that dark blue ray.

Emperor's Sword, Peerless Extreme Ice.

The dark blue ray flashes through, the net does not have to shatter, but, the black actually turned into the dark blue.

The dark blue sword glow end, the form quietly appears together.

Huo Yuhao in sky disappears, because of him as if already through that sword glow the bridge, arrived in front of Wu Yun (black clouds).

The Wu Yun (black clouds) personal appearance looks somewhat scattered in disorder, obviously comes under the influence that beforehand Huo Yuhao Eye of Destiny that strikes. But he also and has the strength to hit back.

Body two yellow, two purple, five black, nine best Soul Ring allocated proportions. Arranges increases at sixth black Soul Ring suddenly, his whole person also suddenly becomes the nihility gets up.

Sixth Soul Ability, obscuration.

The consciousness comes under the influence of Soul Assault to be somewhat fuzzy, but his instinct still, the obscuration, can let him weakens 70% all physical attacks and Soul Power attacks instantaneously, to continue for five seconds. But during this period, his oneself cannot attack.

What Wu Yun (black clouds) need is these five seconds of cushion time, had these five seconds, he believes before one can ask Huo Yuhao, influence of Soul Assault.

However, Huo Yuhao immediately has not actually attacked him, but is in the mouth puts out a character.

“Explodes!”

On the forehead, the Eye of Destiny ray dodges.

Sees only Wu Yun (black clouds) whole body big change, just entered the obscuration the body unexpectedly changes in the strange mind explosion normal, not only that from him, was exploded unexpectedly also together black light shadow.

This is......

Sees here, even if is Holy Spirit Cult main Zongli Wu, is surprised.

This is, soul exsomatize? When did Huo Yuhao use the spiritual attribute nature to attack Wu Yun (black clouds)?

The mind attack of Huo Yuhao naturally does not have the second time, is only first time Soul Assault.

Eye of Destiny and Soul Assault, can the prestige can it be that so be also simple? Has not detonated its prestige energy immediately completely, is feared that Wu Yun (black clouds) also has any specially formidable defense capability, when experiences personally heavy wound directly to be initiated.

But detonated at this time, without a doubt, was the best opportunity. Wu Yun (black clouds) is not Soul Engineer, his body does not have any to prevent the mind attack Defensive Soul Guidance Device. Even if his cultivating for entered the Transcendent Douluo level, but, he faces is actually Spiritual Power entered the Limit Douluo level Huo Yuhao!

Wu Yun (black clouds) whole person body out-of-control flying upside down of backward, in that flash, his Martial Soul characteristics is even vanishing. But was exploded black light shadow wish that fast flies to melt in the main body. But Huo Yuhao, will again give him the opportunity?

light shadow dodges, Huo Yuhao vanished baseless, when he flickers below appears again, body exactly between Wu Yun (black clouds) and his souls.

The left arm backhand lays out backward, the right hand is forward.

A strange whirlpool appears above the Wu Yun (black clouds) soul suddenly, that flew from the sky to stagnate to the soul of main body rapidly immediately.

“Pū!”A light sound, the body of Wu Yun (black clouds) is flying upside down.

Huo Yuhao this palm seems is not strong, Wu Yun (black clouds) is Transcendent Douluo, the body tenacious degree must surpass the ordinary rare metal after all.

His body was shaken departs beyond ten meters, although the soul was stripped temporarily from within the body, but his instinct still, one staggers, comes to a stop reluctantly.

Huo Yuhao looked that has not looked at his one eyes, faces his soul, in the eye pupil the ray is dodging, the golden-rose color halo runs out together suddenly.

Also is Soul Assault!

“Pū!”The soul is defeated and dispersed instantaneously, changes into the innumerable to shatter halos, wells up toward the Wu Yun (black clouds) main body.

This time, Huo Yuhao again has not actually prevented.

The Transcendent Douluo soul was quite stable, even if he uses Soul Assault to hit successively twice, cannot destroy this soul completely, but so, the Wu Yun (black clouds) soul received heavy wound.

The flash of soul return main body, the Wu Yun (black clouds) mouth and nose place is the blood crazily spurts.

His subconscious gaining ground, head cape fell backward, has revealed a handsome face, was somewhat pale besides the complexion, did not have what difference with the normal person.

this time he, actually lifts, is pointing at Huo Yuhao, wanted to say anything, but as if could also not say.

Behind Wu Yun (black clouds), a strange whirlpool appeared. This whirlpool is the blue color and golden color interweaves. The flash when that whirlpool presents, the body of Wu Yun (black clouds) turned into the homochromy.

“Bang”

The Wu Yun (black clouds) body scrap, changes into the powder powder suddenly instantaneously, his had been blown to pieces the soul before, in this time large explosion, is also instantaneously is disappeared, has not stayed behind including a trace.

Finished from commencing of action, the entire process in fact only continued to count breaths the time. On behalf of first Evil Soul Master that Sun-Moon Empire goes to battle with, Transcendent Douluo level, the Darkness Raven Martial Soul owner, Raven Douluo Wu Yun (black clouds) of title crow, perishes!

The audience are silent, Huo Yuhao static standing there, has turned around, facing the Sun-Moon Empire direction.

Today is we washes, valuable shop opens first day, is a little anxious, is a little excited. Because started doing business, the lots are incomplete, but also asked everybody to excuse me. Our cultural business certificate still in the office, without this credential can only according to the entire hedge-selling, only then the Douluo first first second edition can the single issue sell, for half a month about, we prove to manage to be able the single issue to sell. Everybody excuses me.

Today sells best is Douluo reprints the first book, hardbound very fine, and has the signature. Therefore everybody can buy.

Our complimentary gifts also arrived, the card sign, buys books or two cartoons every time both delivers one. Our card sign uses Swedish import paper, after numerous special manufacture techniques, the different star-level card sign, has the different crafts. The first batch of 80 types, the card sign of higher star class selects is more difficult. A lower star class is easier to select. We have the tenth anniversary limited edition card sign. The tenth anniversary limit can only leave this batch, altogether 10,000, increase price to carry on the numerical selection. Today first buys the book friend of our limited edition card sign, has chosen 00110, because 0110 are my birthday, on January 10. Extremely is honored, thanked you very much. Moreover is the female book friend. Each limit card alone numbers, the book friend who therefore wants the numerical selection must as soon as possible, each number is only, has not duplicated. Has the collection value. Later every day I will recommend our treasure to everybody.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-577-part-1





Volume 12

#577 - The First Battle, Extinguishes Kills!


All people were silent, confident Zongli Wu is also so.

In a beforehand double-hour, Zongli Wu has carried on a series of arrangement, Wu Yun (black clouds) is his first method.

Ju Zi(orange) can guess correctly that in fact Zongli Wu can also guess correctly. Since Huo Yuhao dares to stand saying that must select ten, he certainly has considerable background.

Moreover Zongli Wu also has certain finding to Huo Yuhao, knows that he is Limit Douluo. In this case, the plan of Zongli Wu is conducted very complete.

Wu Yun (black clouds) goes on stage, the goal has one, that consumes. Is relying on his dark ability formidable with coherency, consumes Huo Yuhao Soul Power as far as possible, creates the opportunity to the following person. Zongli Wu even allows Wu Yun (black clouds) to admit defeat when necessary.

After all, trains Evil Soul Master Titled Douluo is not that easy, but Wu Yun (black clouds) just broke through Transcendent Douluo, so long as cultivates to consolidate, in the future will be one big helps.

But the Transcendent Douluo survival capability many that Titled Douluo is stronger. Zongli Wu believes that this is a seesaw battle. Even if Huo Yuhao relies on Absolute Ice, can suppress Wu Yun (black clouds), wants to defeat Wu Yun (black clouds) also to consume certain method to be good.

But he has not actually thought that merely is under several collisions, Wu Yun (black clouds) perished in the Huo Yuhao hand, the soul was disappeared. Even cannot display including Martial Soul avatar. He in process of probe attack, actually had still been struck to kill by Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao, unexpectedly already formidable to so degree?

This thought that almost appears in both sides most powerhouse mind.

Recalled the number of times that the beforehand entire combat process, in fact, Huo Yuhao gets rid are not many, even could not see that on him releases Soul Ring. However, his formidable Soul Assault, actually gave all people to make the deep impression. Transcendent Douluo, under his Soul Assault, actually absolutely did not have the strength of resisting * to fall successively twice. This is the what kind strength!

But the discerning person will also note, that is finally the large explosion of Wu Yun (black clouds) main body. That obviously is an ability. By the body of Transcendent Douluo, stands there lets a eight rings Soul Douluo attack, 12 double-hour are not necessarily able to be killed. But before Huo Yuhao, seems has not used Soul Ability, but is a light palm, extinguished Wu Yun (black clouds) unexpectedly kills.

Even if Wu Yun (black clouds) did not have soul control body at that time, but the intensity of his body also, Soul Power also in! Actually this is what situation, the Huo Yuhao use, is actually what kind of ability?

Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus! This is the answer, answer that only then few people can guess correctly.

That palm strikes, on Wu Yun (black clouds), Huo Yuhao poured into Wu Yun (black clouds) within the body own Yin-Yang Supplement Soul Power, that was a unstable whirlpool. Simply speaking, looks like small Soul Nucleus, has drilled into Wu Yun (black clouds) within the body directly. But this Soul Nucleus domination belongs to Huo Yuhao.

A Soul Nucleus explosion prestige can appear in Wu Yun (black clouds) within the body, did not die blames. He does not have the soul to control his Soul Power to carry on the resistance uselessly, the body intensity again high. But in Huo Yuhao Soul Nucleus, not only there is a Absolute Ice prestige energy, Spiritual Power.

Therefore, to shatter Wu Yun (black clouds) soul, under facing the formidable Yin-Yang Supplement Soul Power explosion, this skeleton not saves, mind disappears!

Good strength!

The heart of Ju Zi(orange) somewhat shivers slightly.

No wonder, no wonder he can bring my two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp that Tang Wutong is chasing down to be common just like the stray cur.

Has his strength been such degree unexpectedly? Yuhao, you are really one generation of Soul Master talents! Worthily is Shrek Academy future inheritance.

The great strength of Huo Yuhao, making Ju Zi(orange) pleasantly surprised, makes her mood gloomy. Is formidable Huo Yuhao, may continue into her enemy on exceed.

These words that formerly Huo Yuhao from the sky spoke, Ju Zi(orange) also clear remembering. If he is determined to harass the Sun-Moon Empire army really continually, the Sun-Moon Empire only means that please leave Grim Reaper Douluo to cope with him, at that time, was the war of life and death.

“Second.”In everyone mood very complex when looks to stand in the location center just like war-god general Huo Yuhao. He opened the mouth.

Yes, first died, this is first, below, second! Selects ten, this just began.

Face darken of Zongli Wu as if must drop the water leakage to come. That was broke through Evil Soul Master of Transcendent Douluo level! How many years can train to achieve? In entire Holy Spirit Cult, can arrange to enter the first ten powerhouses. Such made Huo Yuhao kill easily.

Injustice that Wu Yun (black clouds) dies! He cannot display his strength, when he also wants to probe the opposite party, Huo Yuhao already under killer. This is to Huo Yuhao is not familiar, terror that in addition Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power erupts.

Zongli Wu changes sits Ju Zi(orange) on chair, said in a low voice: “Marshal, this Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power is strong. To cope with him, we must reply on the mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device strength. Asked nine levels of Soul Engineer to help.”

A Ju Zi(orange) brow wrinkle.

Zongli Wu worthily is the Holy Spirit Cult Lord, at this time, he can maintain calm as before, found the issue to be at!

Yes! Now is the Soul Guidance Device time, if no Soul Guidance Device, Huo Yuhao Soul Assault may be called divine skill, wants to defeat him, difficult. However, had mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device? At least under his several attacks, will not have any issue. But Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power is eventually limited, but he must face, is actually a pair of ten competion.

Worked as these many people, Holy Spirit Cult all powerhouses, Ju Zi(orange) cannot say that did not borrow.

She changes behind numerous position Soul Engineer, the sinking sound track: “Is which willing to loan mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device to give Army Supervisor?”

In Ju Zi(orange) behind, nine levels of Soul Engineer altogether 11, all are the Sun-Moon Empire top powerhouses. Entire Sun-Moon Empire surpassed 50% nine levels of Soul Engineer here. However, after listening to her words, nine levels of Soul Engineer have not spoken, all people remain silent.

Zongli Wu look one cold, at this time, nobody is willing to help him unexpectedly! In his heart can be imagined angrily.

Huo Yuhao obviously is not anxious, the time that his anxious anything, here loses are more much, he restores are more. This point he knows that Zongli Wu naturally also knows.

Zongli Wu clenches the teeth, sinking sound track: “I buy!”

Did not have the time to delay, for that corpse Ice Bear King, in addition the beforehand written pledge to fulfill a military order, he did not have the escape route. Only has to purchase mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device to be good.

Holy Spirit Cult has managed these many years, has may richly the wealth of enemy.

Numerous position Soul Engineer have moved finally somewhat, after the simple consultation, a price list presented in front of Zongli Wu.

11 nine levels of Soul Engineer, the brothers, the price list is also consistent.

mind defense class nine levels of Soul Guidance Device, the price naturally is not money can weigh. Regarding nine levels of Soul Engineer, is most general, is the rare metal.

Altogether ten rare metals, each type takes the ton as the unit. Receives in exchange for nine levels of mind defense class Soul Guidance Device.

The heart of Zongli Wu is twitching. Holy Spirit Cult is rich, but is rich, rare metal type of thing is also the strategic resources!

Initially, Huo Yuhao had joined Dusk Water Union, specially trades the rare metal, stockpiled Holy Spirit Cult to have, may at present this price, actually really be too astonishing.

But can he not agree? Compares the rare metal, the Evil Soul Master value of Titled Douluo rank is higher.

You are waiting! In the Zongli Wu heart has made the cloudy and cold sound, clenches the teeth, the request that complying with numerous position nine levels of Soul Engineer to take advantage.

He has purchased mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device first. Because he does not know that Huo Yuhao before oneself powerhouse, how long can insist.

Little buys one is, this lost, said next again.

In nine levels of Soul Engineer surfaces is very tranquil, may actually smile to blossom at heart. Looks at Evil Soul Master to admit defeat, they are always happy. Soul Engineer is also Soul Master, so long as is the normal person, will not have any good impression to Evil Soul Master, they naturally are no exception. Since let alone these years, contradiction between Holy Spirit Cult and their Soul Engineer has been becoming more and more intense.

Zongli Wu is good to hate, their Holy Spirit Cult also has Soul Engineer, but this time kept in Bright Capital City, has not come, otherwise he is also insufficient so to have too many problems to tackle.

The vision looks to own side, mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device that Zongli Wu will buy just has handed over, “small phoenix, all careful, gives priority to itself safely.”

“Um.”Stands side Zongli Wu, is his beloved woman, is Holy Spirit Cult vice- Cult Master, Feng Ling!

Second, Zongli Wu has sent out Feng Ling.

From the beginning, Zongli Wu has not thought must fire off ten with Huo Yuhao, in his opinion, Huo Yuhao has background, does not have that strength. Meanwhile, he must leave a way out to himself.

Holy Spirit Cult this time the powerhouse also several people that accompanies the army to go to battle with, without exception, is the powerhouse of Titled Douluo above rank. Almost was most strengths of Holy Spirit Cult besides two Limit Douluo.

However, at the beforehand war as well as in view of Beast God Di Tian that surprise attack during, actually already successively dying in battle many people. Especially to Di Tian that war, it can be said that the vitality damages severely, now considering everything, Evil Soul Master on only the remaining nine people. Moreover there are two injuries to be quite heavy.

Therefore, seven people that can get rid, but in seven people, can achieve Transcendent Douluo to cultivate is, is counted Zongli Wu also to have four people.

Evil Soul Master Transcendent Douluo, is can practice extremely difficultly, trains one how difficultly? Generally speaking, Evil Soul Master of same level rank facing ordinary Soul Master, has the enormous superiority, even can by one-to-many. But this superiority along with cultivating for the promotion, instead gradually will be weakened.

---

Yesterday forgot saying that our washing, valuable shop, everybody in shop there, search: Dazzles world Tang Sect, can find.

Today recommends our Douluo Continent first hardbound second edition to everybody grandly the first book, above has beyond our brand-new: Tang Sect and Tang San, have not printed in any other places. Moreover each has my signature, temporarily has signed 500 books. We hope that everybody likes.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-577-part-2





Volume 12

#577 - The First Battle, Extinguishes Kills!


For example, two rings Evil Soul Master even can extinguish by own evil Soul Ability kills big piece of ordinary two rings Soul Master. But if, to five rings, this disparity will reduce, to nine rings Titled Douluo above, Evil Soul Master superiority, although also, but was not that obvious.

Huo Yuhao dares to propose that selects ten, Zongli Wu has placed directly in the Transcendent Douluo level to his strength judgment. This boy again extremely arrogant, does not have the strength of Transcendent Douluo level, he does not dare to propose such rampant resistance way.

Therefore, Zongli Wu only planned that makes the Transcendent Douluo strength Evil Soul Master get rid. Does the Titled Douluo rank, bring death? That is not he must do. Evil Soul Master trains Titled Douluo to be how difficult! That is in the battlefield extremely terrifying slaughtering machine.

Therefore, second goes on stage, directly is Feng Ling.

Feng Ling in Evil Soul Master of this coming, cultivates to be next to Zongli Wu, makes her go on stage directly, was the Zongli Wu worry again has anything to lose.

The floating body arrives at beyond the Huo Yuhao body first hundred meters, Feng Ling falls in the ground.

She similarly is a black long gown, but has not actually blocked from the forehead with the cape.

Has saying that Feng Ling seems very beautiful, but is the middle-aged person appearance, the skin is fair, has one type charm that is full of the evil different flavor.

Huo Yuhao was not first time sees this Holy Spirit Cult vice- Cult Master, initially, his first time saw Feng Ling time, he also deep remembering, the formidable oppression strength that transmitted from this Holy Spirit Cult vice- Cult Master.

But at this time, meets again, she is actually his match.

Feng Ling has a pair of strange eye pupil, the eye is not big, but has the appearance very much, particularly the two sides corner of the eye places, have the dark red trace to extend to the temples position. Has increased several points of beautiful makings to her.

“Huo Yuhao.”Saying of Feng Ling coldly .

Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, “hello, vice- Cult Master, we met.”

Feng Ling cold [say / way]: “Initially, participated in Bright Capital City Soul Engineer elite great competition that Tang Wu, was you.”

Huo Yuhao said with a smile: “Yes! Vice- Cult Master good eye.”

“Is very good.”Feng Ling sound ice-cold, the body black long gown was calmer. Suddenly, a sharp phoenix cry sound erupts from her, Soul Ring also instantaneously raise.

Three purple, five black, one red!

Surmounted the formidable Soul Ring ray of best Soul Ring allocated proportion to sparkle completely instantaneously, does not have hundred years of Soul Ring, lowest was the millennium ranks.

When her these nine Soul Ring appear, the Huo Yuhao complexion slightly changes. The strive to excel big strength, worthily is Holy Spirit Cult vice- Cult Master.

Feng Ling cultivates to specifically have many levels, Huo Yuhao does not know. But from her aura, Huo Yuhao can judge faintly, at least is also about 96 levels levels. And Evil Soul Master. Even might reach 97 levels. This Holy Spirit Cult vice- Cult Master, was not good to cope like former that Wu Yun (black clouds). Moreover, don't forget, on Feng Ling is also bringing mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device. To Huo Yuhao various Spirit Eyes Soul Ability, has weakening and suppressed of function considerable degree.

On the Huo Yuhao face reveals a light god light, Extreme Ice Battle God Armor under his control, shines with the strange brilliance.

On Feng Ling placed the third purple Soul Ring ray puts suddenly greatly, instantaneous, a pair of dull purple wing stretches behind her.

The powerful imposing manner, instantaneously is also erupting. Just like blotting out the sky general, goes toward Huo Yuhao to rush forth.

Phoenix wings? What phoenix this is, why is wing the purple?

Huo Yuhao saw Feng Ling to get rid, but, that time Feng Ling not whole-heartedly, but at this time, this Holy Spirit Cult vice- Cult Master uses the true strength without a doubt.

Under strong oppression strength, fluctuates without any flame. That is......

Dark? Dark Phoenix?

No, is not right, is not Dark Phoenix. The Dark Phoenix aura should be pure, actually cannot so ice-cold.

This is, Evil Phoenix!

Yes, Feng Ling Martial Soul, is Evil Phoenix, her title: Evil Phoenix Douluo.

Evil Phoenix Douluo, Feng Ling!

On the huge Evil Phoenix wings, the strong Soul Power fluctuation outward diffusion, the surrounding ray starts becomes gloomy, as if turned into grey colored including the sky. Intense constriction, making Huo Yuhao be in Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, some breath impeded feelings.

This Feng Ling, strive to excel!

The distant place, Shrek Academy audiences observed enemy in a powerhouse, Yan Shaozhe slightly discoloration, “Evil Phoenix, Evil Phoenix Douluo Feng Ling. Unexpectedly is she. Originally she has also joined Holy Spirit Cult.”

Is listening to his muttering, side projects four bad vision immediately.

And two, naturally come from his wife, Martial Soul Faculty Vice Dean Cai Mei'er, but another two, then came from Martial God Douluo Xian Lin'er.

“!”Yan Shaozhe hurries to cough two, returned to normal.

Feng Ling he knew certainly that said accurately, this is also the bad karma of his young time.

Initially, just Yan Shaozhe of making a debut time, is Shrek Academy one generation of talents. Studies under Dragon God Douluo Mu En, the itself strength is also quite formidable, the look is handsome, Martial Soul Radiant Phoenix. These Halo, making him the God's favored ones.

But Yan Shaozhe at the matter of men and women, is really somewhat loose clean, will otherwise not make afterward and Martial God Douluo Xian Lin'er quarrel.

Story between he and Feng Ling, but must before Xian Lin'er. Initially, after he just made a debut, has bumped into Feng Ling.

They are phoenix Martial Soul, but at that time the Feng Ling strength was weak, evil attribute in own phoenix Martial Soul has not appeared completely. It seems like dark attribute Dark Phoenix.

Radiant Phoenix meets Dark Phoenix, Yan Shaozhe has not repelled her, because of own Teacher, Dragon God Douluo Mu En with Dragon Emperor Douluo Darkness Sacred Dragon Long Xiaoyao isn't the best friend? Light dark double Saint dragon, achievement one generation of myths.

Therefore, he after meeting Feng Ling, instead is interested greatly. Perhaps, oneself and this can Feng Ling also become the light dark double phoenix?

Yan Shaozhe is young, is powerful, loose clean, quick, Feng Ling walked with him in one. Among them, relates progressive quick.

However, does not last forever, they associated, only then after about three months, a day, on the Feng Ling evil aura regained consciousness suddenly. If not rapidness of Yan Shaozhe discovery, Feng Ling will directly even kill and swallow him.

This is one special induction of Evil Phoenix to Radiant Phoenix. Said accurately, if were not between Yan Shaozhe and Feng Ling had that relations, under his Radiant Phoenix aura stimulation, Feng Ling Evil Phoenix will not have awakened was so quick.

Thereupon, a war. Yan Shaozhe is relying on the formidable strength, suppressed Feng Ling. However, he was eventually tenderhearted. After all, a night of husband and wife hundred days graciousness, Feng Ling is also his first woman.

Tenderhearted, he has bled off Feng Ling, oneself also left. From then on, he again has not seen Feng Ling. Afterward heard to be related indistinctly she news, her also achievement Titled Douluo, but actually does not know the trace.

For this matter, Dragon God Douluo Mu En maliciously has also punished him. The Evil Phoenix talent is in Evil Soul Master one of the most top talents, bleeds off Feng Ling, means that has let go a big demon! In the future does not know that many people must meet with a disaster.

Mu En initially had made such mistake, naturally is not willing to look at the disciple is also so, he also feared that Yan Shaozhe like initial, falling deeply in love is individually uncorrectable.

Thereupon, Yan Shaozhe had been confined to barracks for three years, in the Shrek Academy self-torture, is that three years of closing up, established him afterward became the Martial Soul Faculty Dean strength.

Circumstances changes with the time, in the battlefield, Yan Shaozhe saw Feng Ling once again, this feeling, only then he is clear.

Feng Ling likely was completely has actually forgotten him, looked that has not had a liking for one to him, the vision condenses completely on Huo Yuhao, the powerful Evil Phoenix aura was similar to the blowout is erupting generally.

Huo Yuhao and Feng Ling each other confront, no one first has gotten rid. The Huo Yuhao imposing manner is reserved, the Feng Ling imposing manner is assigned away from the capital, in diameter one kilometer range, world discoloration. Powerhouses who distant place both sides observe, has to release respective Soul Power, defends oneself, in order to avoid being affected by their imposing manners.

“Suffers to death!”Feng Ling coldly snorted. The personal appearance lightning flash, back entrains one string of strange remnant shades, this remnant shade appearance, clearly is a purple phoenix.

The right hand of Feng Ling, in airborne increases instantaneously, changes into a huge purple bird claw appearance, directly soars the Huo Yuhao overhead to grasp.

The simple and direct attack, has not used own Martial Soul avatar similarly. The lesson that as if beforehand Wu Yun (black clouds) died in battle absolutely does not have what significance for her.

Huo Yuhao has not retroceded or fended, the tip of the toe in the ground, the whole person had Xuan imposing manner to move forward to meet somebody toward Feng Ling. Similarly is the right hand lifts, wields. Airborne, is hundred meters huge Dark Gold Terror Claw, shortly will have covered the body of Feng Ling.

Dark Gold Terror Claw!

Sees this to glitter the intense gloss, the sharp air/Qi as if must the terrifying sharp claws that all tear, Zongli Wu also slightly discoloration. This Huo Yuhao, the strength is unexpectedly powerful in this way. Dark Gold Terror Claw that he displays, can Dark Gold Terror Claws Bear compare favorably with 100,000 years cultivate.

Feng Ling coldly snorted, the back wings receives suddenly, right hand phoenix's claw reverse toward airborne grasps. To slightly wrestle in a big way! Welcomed to Dark Gold Terror Claw.

“Bites!”In the crisp whining noise, explosive Soul Power of a series of terror outward blooms by the center that they collide.

In the bellows of a series of terror, the innumerable sharp aura cut deep gullies the surrounding big piece region.

The both sides powerhouses have to release the strongest defensive power, resists this sharp complementary waves.

Huo Yuhao from the sky stagnates motionless, the Feng Ling personal appearance actually retroceded dozens meters. Black long gown had been torn into shreds by that sharp aura. Revealed inside one as if had become with the black scale manufacture in armor.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-577-part-3





Volume 12

#578 - World War Ii! Phoenix Water Chestnut


In armor covers the whole body, although Huo Yuhao does not know that Feng Ling this year how old, but also has to approve one darkly, good stature.

This first collision, was Huo Yuhao got the winning side without doubt, the Dark Gold Terror Claw strong prestige energy, suppressed Feng Ling phoenix's claw.

They look like have tacit understanding very much, almost simultaneously jumps toward the sky. Changes into two light shadow, breaks in a kilometer upper air instantaneously.

The sky, is powerhouse's stage to the war. Otherwise, all in ground are torn into shreds by the complementary waves that they collide.

They are separated by hundred meters, selects for promotion upwardly, in the Feng Ling look does not have any mood fluctuation to appear, that stubbornly is looking steadily at Huo Yuhao, she while body rise, own imposing manner rapidly is also promoting.

Huo Yuhao similarly is not inferior, around body, the dark blue light shadow twinkle, is the upper air, the air is colder, Ice Element are also more. Under the function of Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, these Ice Element fast were inhaled his within the body, transforms as his strength.

The terrifying Soul Power fluctuation pasts in the air, the both sides war, is ready to be set off.

“!”The sharp phoenix cry sound resounds once more, in the midair, Feng Ling Shu launches his wings once more, the back, the giant wing opens simultaneously, the sky turned into the purple black instantaneously, at the same time, a giant gloomy phoenix, appears in that purple black, partly visible.

Yan Shaozhe phoenix Martial Soul is nimble and resourceful, arrogant, holy. But this Feng Ling phoenix Martial Soul, actually gloomy, evil! As if must the entire sky squash.

“Bang!”Around the Feng Ling body suddenly resounds a strange airing, on her first Soul Ring also opens along with it exploding. Powerful very evil aura immediately had counted around her body by the eruption that counts.

“Her Soul Ability, is different from before.”Thinking aloud that Yan Shaozhe muttered.

He had a sentiment with Feng Ling, although that time Feng Ling did not have now to be so formidable, but also is the six rings above powerhouse, but Soul Ability that at that time Feng Ling showed that has not the small difference with present.

Old Xuan sinking sound track: “After should be Evil Phoenix awakens, variation that initiates. Martial Soul variation, Soul Ability also along with it variation.”

This situation had appeared on Xu Sanshi and Beibei. The Martial Soul variation, will generally speaking cause the Soul Ability variation.

Yan Shaozhe sinking sound track: “Perhaps Yuhao this time, underestimated the match. Feng Ling already so formidable, that Zongli Wu will be only stronger than her. Let alone, Yuhao must face, is a match!”

On the Old Xuan old face reveals a light smile suddenly, “Feng Ling is very strong, but, Yuhao was not initial Yuhao. Today, he will show to all people that he is the present age powerhouse. Shaozhe, by cultivating, the battle efficiency, in fact, he has exceeded you completely. Although this Feng Ling strength is good, but compared with you, disparity.”

Yan Shaozhe is surprised, he has not thought that appraisal of Old Xuan to Huo Yuhao, unexpectedly high to so degree. But also at this moment, Huo Yuhao in sky also had the change.

Is centered on the body of Huo Yuhao, airborne, shone one group of blue misty gloss, just started, was the dark blue, but along with extended outward, the color actually gradually changed pale, to hundred meters beyond, completely turned into Bai Se (White Color).

Purple black that Bai Se (White Color) and Feng Ling release, has formed the striking contrast. But that Bai Se (White Color), actually starts to drift about and disperse, changes into the innumerable snowflakes, from the sky rotates and surges.

The snowflake does not have the flaw pure white, having the holy aura in fluttering, when the Feng Ling evil aura blooms, to time that Huo Yuhao engages in factional strife, the snowflake surges, is actually easy dispels them. It is not able to approach the slightest.

At the beginning, clearly was Feng Ling gets the winning side, the evil aura has covered the most region, the position that even stood Huo Yuhao also covered.

But quick, this covered had the change, expansion that outward the Huo Yuhao body surrounding snowflake stability continued, how whatever Feng Ling stimulated to movement own evil aura, is unable to oppress the range half minute that snowflake surged, her strength also in that wind and snow unceasing was oppressed and retroceded.

She must affect Huo Yuhao with her evil aura, but at this moment, comes under the influence is actually she. Although she had not been covered by the Huo Yuhao domain, but the temperature in air, is dropping at the scary speed, takes cultivating of Feng Ling as, in the face of this ultra-low temperature, for it discoloration. The Soul Power operating speed in within the body, seemed affected.

Absolute Ice, unexpectedly intrepidly in this way?

Emperor's Cold Sky and Permafrost Domain!

Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain!

Huo Yuhao in hard helmet mask, has closed the double pupil at this time, snowflake that each piece from the sky flies to swing, likely is he thinks of the feeling part, unceasing is extending outward.

The evil aura that Feng Ling releases is very strong, is very pure. Normal, even if resists his Absolute Ice not to suffer a loss.

But, Huo Yuhao present Absolute Ice was not initially. After second Soul Nucleus completes, his Absolute Ice also finally accomplishment.

But the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus most intrepid characteristics are, in you have in me and me to have you.

Mixed Huo Yuhao Limit Douluo level Spiritual Power, in addition Absolute Ice extreme concentration ultra-low temperature, the Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain prestige can compare before, already was the promotion of geometrical multiple.

“Cannot in this way!”Feng Ling first has made the judgment. If makes the Huo Yuhao domain continue to her to suppress, the time is longer, she more will suffer a loss. In the attribute has not beaten, puts together the pure battle efficiency!

Jet black such as seventh Soul Ring of black ink glistens suddenly, the strong purple black ray embezzles Feng Ling instantaneously.

Next flickers, in the sky, purple black Wu Yun (black clouds) dispels, a huge purple black phoenix runs out suddenly, is bringing the enchanting purple black tail flame as well as the innumerable strange ripple, flushes away toward Huo Yuhao suddenly.

Under the oppression of Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain, Feng Ling used finally, Martial Soul avatar.

The purple phoenix, looking from the distant place, filled was noble and enchanting, but, this purple phoenix actually pair of blood red eye pupil, thoroughly destroyed that noble.

The purple phoenix place visited, the air is twisting fiercely, around the purple halo, as if some innumerable sad and shrill howls reverberate in the air. Indistinct can see fierce faces.

Evil Phoenix where is evil? That is, swallows! Evil Phoenix Martial Soul to swallow Soul Master Martial Soul to promote oneself.

On the other hand, murder of Feng Ling in all Evil Soul Master is also few, Martial Soul that because she must swallow, is her own Martial Soul is certainly close . Moreover the strength and she is similar has the effect.

Therefore she initially when Martial Soul just awakened, must swallow Yan Shaozhe Martial Soul.

But at this time, after her Martial Soul aura comprehensively launches, the characteristics of this swallowing also erupt, even if Huo Yuhao is Absolute Martial Soul, cannot help but came under some influences, one trembling from Martial Soul makes his heart live to drag.

Huo Yuhao float in own Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain, facing the impact of Feng Ling Martial Soul avatar, he has not released own Martial Soul avatar to resist immediately, but as before is maintaining the domain appearance.

Saw that Feng Ling must bang into Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain. Transcendent Douluo Martial Soul avatar is extremely fearful, particularly after swallowing the characteristics shows completely, Feng Ling has the absolute confidence to break the Huo Yuhao domain.

The Huo Yuhao complexion sinks to congeal, both hands make a movement of joint holding suddenly. Immediately, the snowflake of Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain dispersing is similar to all rivers run into sea is common, condenses to go in his body direction. Direct has strongly approached his both hands palm.

Feng Ling huge Evil Phoenix avatar has from the sky stopped, did he give up the domain? Also can display Martial Soul avatar to come with me to contend?

This is the first thought in the Feng Ling heart raising.

The Feng Ling personal appearance arrived in front of Huo Yuhao, the formidable evil strength heads on, crazy to rush forth to Huo Yuhao, Evil Phoenix avatar has opened mouth, must swallow his one.

Huo Yuhao has not displayed own Martial Soul avatar as before, float in midair, his whole person looks like a statue is common.

On Extreme Ice Battle God Armor is blooming the intense dark blue ray, the right hand of Huo Yuhao, laid out slowly forward, welcomes melted the big mouth that Evil Phoenix avatar of god opened to Feng Ling.

Huge and tiny, broad and meson. At this moment, seems, disparity between Huo Yuhao and Feng Ling is so huge.

Is he doing? Facing Martial Soul avatar that Transcendent Douluo displays, he does not dodge unexpectedly does not evade, does not display own Martial Soul avatar to contend, is he so confident?

In all person hearts doubtful. The body of Feng Ling from the sky anchored suddenly.

Big Martial Soul avatar, from the sky stops unexpectedly, can clear seeing, start from that Evil Phoenix avatar forehead position, wipes the ice blue color, at an exceptional pace spread the past toward the Evil Phoenix whole body.

This......

In a Zongli Wu eyes pupil, pupil contracts instantaneously.

He and did he freeze Martial Soul avatar of small phoenix unexpectedly? What strength is this? Even if Limit Douluo, is not necessarily able to be so formidable? Evil Phoenix Martial Soul of small phoenix, in Evil Soul Master, may also be existence of top!

Yes, Huo Yuhao only left a palm, Emperor's Palm, Great Coldness Snow!

The Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain strength, was mobilized by Soul Nucleus by him, reduces, condensation instantaneously, then through the Emperor's Palm Great Coldness Snow release.

The feeling of Feng Ling is most obvious, in her sensation, oneself faces, radically is not a palm, but is a giant snow and ice whirlpool. But this snow and ice whirlpool invisible. Her Martial Soul avatar huge Soul Power was frozen by this invisible Absolute Ice unexpectedly. Made her unable to move, can only feel that terrifying chill in the air to spread over the whole body.

---

Today recommends us to dazzle the world Tang Sect bookstore to everybody, the god prints the throne complete set nine volume, the first volume of belt signature. Because we have a permit not to manage completely, some books can only according to the entire hedge-selling, everybody be interested in collecting. Is washing, valuable search: Dazzled world Tang Sect to find our shops. Buys a book to deliver a Tang Sect card sign. Also delivers a propaganda playbill. In our shop also some good things, everybody quickly to buy.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-578-part-1





Volume 12

#578 - World War Ii! Phoenix Water Chestnut


Can the ice freeze Soul Power? Huo Yuhao has given her affirmative answer!

" ! " Severe howl resounds, huge Evil Phoenix avatar erupts incomparably intense purple brilliance suddenly, above its top of the head, a purple Sun rips open the fog suddenly, appears. After this round Ziyang appears, the Evil Phoenix avatar prestige can instantaneously suddenly to increase. In the body surface of freeze immediately presents the innumerable crack traces.

The diameter dozens meters huge purple light beam also suddenly to launch from airborne that Ziyang, directly soared the body of Huo Yuhao to cover together.

Good strength! This is the first feeling of Huo Yuhao. However, he did not have the half minute to withdraw at this time.

In the eye golden light puts greatly, the Huo Yuhao personal appearance suddenly became illusory, reached as high as ten meters huge vertical eye, appeared in the midair.

Martial Soul avatar, Eye of Asura!

Yes, Huo Yuhao released his Martial Soul avatar finally.

Flash when Eye of Asura presents, the sky or the ground, the time as if suddenly became slow, all was been as if slow, the purple light that in the sky dropped was no exception.

Does the time speed of flow change slow? This is Soul Ability, is......

Eye of Asura presents all over the body is the bright golden color, around the eye pupil, is close and enchanting golden-rose color sun mark, is blooming outward the strange halo.

After this is Huo Yuhao breaks through, first time displays own Martial Soul avatar.

Bright golden light flickers the electricity to shoot below, directly soars airborne that [say / way] purple photoemission to go.

golden light and purple light, from the sky collide, burst out the unequalled radiant brilliance, the innumerable rays scatter in all directions the splash. Can see, in the upper air, two halos almost by the parallel stance outward diffusion, the surrounding area in hundred li (0.5km), any place are clearly discernible.

Meet the tough head-on with toughness! This without doubt is collision, Huo Yuhao facing Feng Ling whole-heartedly struck, chooses has met hardly.

While two ray collisions. Behind Huo Yuhao that Eye of Asura, reappeared quietly phantom, that was golden phantom, huge. But is illusory.

Destiny Divine Beast, Emperor Auspicious Beast, Three Eyed Golden Lion!

Three Eyed Golden Lion emerges out of thin air, golden-rose color Halo also raises from Eye of Asura along with it. The Eye of Asura giant pupil color had the transformation suddenly, one black one white, two groups of rays blend in the same place, changed into the core of pupil.

These two rays are the electricity shoot, directly soared just to work loose Absolute Ice Feng Ling to shoot.

Although Feng Ling has worked loose from Absolute Ice, but the chill in the air of that terror as before is actually corroding her body and soul. Yes, her spiritual sea came under the influence of that Absolute Ice.

Feng Ling can definitely affirm. If were not broke through the Transcendent Douluo level, has inspired own Soul Nucleus strength immediately, perhaps entire Martial Soul avatar will be frozen, at that time wants to work loose again, is impossible.

Good fearful Absolute Ice. Can freeze Soul Power and Spiritual Power Absolute Ice!

May be this. The Feng Ling look cloudy vulture, in Evil Phoenix avatar that pair of scarlet eye pupil has not dreaded as before, has, is only stubborn!

The black and white bi-color ray is almost an instantaneous flash, but . The first response of Feng Ling fends, her huge Evil Phoenix avatar became empty melted suddenly, as if transparent general.

However, strange appeared. That is black and white, bi-color halo falls on her actually quietly spreads, on her in overlay these two halos, not, because her body loses the influence illusory.

Is this possible?

Feng Ling stayed, oneself this phoenix doppelganger ability, Soul Power attack or physical attack. Can melt easily. Does he achieve?

Is that the mind attack? But, Feng Ling has not actually felt any mind attack the prestige energy!

This outcome what's the matter? Feng Ling does not know. But in next quarter. On Eye of Asura, the ray bursts out once more. This time, bright golden light. Directly soars Feng Ling main body suddenly to launch, but.

Feng Ling coldly snorted! In the eye the vicious tendencies put greatly, float giant Ziyang above her top of the head has not released the attack to intercept this Soul Assault immediately, instead projects together the purple light, directly soars the Eye of Asura main body to fall.

Meaning that this clearly must perish together.

But in fact, the Feng Ling body is carrying nine levels of mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device, she has the confidence to withstand Huo Yuhao this Soul Assault. Her Evil Phoenix of that Ziyang launch bites the soul light, but is not easy to resist.

Nobody knows that the Evil Phoenix Martial Soul most terrorist place is, the strength of her in fact most source is the mind attack, swallows, is Spiritual Source in Martial Soul strengthens oneself.

The evil attribute, bites the soul attribute, condenses in together, lights by Spiritual Power again, is that the origin of Ziyang.

But this Ziyang, Feng Ling ninth Soul Ability, Sun of Evil Phoenix. Initially, she just became Titled Douluo time, even is unable to use this formidable 100,000 years of Soul Ability. Until after afterward became Transcendent Douluo, can use.

But also because just that only 100,000 years of Soul Beast takes to her formidable Soul Ability, she can break through the Transcendent Douluo level in the short dozens years. Had the Holy Spirit Cult vice- Cult Master status.

Evil Phoenix that Sun of Evil Phoenix erupts bites the light of soul early to fall on Eye of Asura. Immediately, that golden Eye of Asura was exaggerated the purple. Entire pupil surrounding sun mark also therefore rapid inward draws, as if by greatly injury.

But Feng Ling actually stared in a big way the double pupil in the flash. With is different, in her sensation that in all person visions sees, had not felt that Huo Yuhao was attacked by oneself. In other words, spatial.[!] All that presents, is the illusory images.

But also while she had this feeling, Soul Assault of Martial Soul avatar Eye of Asura version also fell on her.

Almost was the flash, Feng Ling Evil Phoenix avatar is destroyed by that tyrannical incomparable golden light. She who changes into the main body, whole body was also covered by that huge golden light.

A necklace bursts out the intense silver light, protects Feng Ling in 0.9 levels of mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device prestige can appear.

Feng Ling only thought that own heartbeat some acceleration, face Huo Yuhao Soul Assault truly, she understands why before, rapidness that Wu Yun (black clouds) can defeat, was too formidable, Spiritual Power of this fellow, was too formidable. When let her have to plant the feeling facing Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui.

Luckily, there are nine levels of mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device. Can block this to strike fully, the expenditure was worth.

Feng Ling stubbornly looks steadily is bitten Huo Yuhao that the light of soul shines by own Evil Phoenix, the issue that she faces now is. At by the Soul Assault condition, she does not have the means to search to observe the exact location that through her Spiritual Power Huo Yuhao is, as the matter stands, she does not have the means to confirm that actually Huo Yuhao is doing.

" Ka! " Somewhat frightened sound suddenly resounds.

When Feng Ling looks down. Surprised seeing, oneself front that nine levels of mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device necklaces have been unable to withstand the load, start to present the close fissure.

This......

This is nine levels of Soul Guidance Device! Under that fellow strikes, is unable unexpectedly the load bearing.

A fear of difficult word surges in her heart suddenly, in the mind, cannot help but remembered formerly appeared on oneself the black and white light.

At this moment, Huo Yuhao Eye of Asura, in Evil Phoenix bit in the light of soul to disappear, his Soul Assault also arrived at the last act.

" Bang! " Soul Guidance Device suddenly to shatter of Feng Ling chest place, but also eventually prevented complete Soul Assault.

However, the sense of fear has not actually reduced in the Feng Ling heart. She only thought one as if had been observed closely by any Ferocious Beasts. That feeling is extremely painful.

Subconscious, Feng Ling must release own Martial Soul avatar once more.

However, at this time, she heard rapid calling out in alarm.

This sound she was too familiar, isn't coming from Zongli Wu?

Huge vertical eye. The appearance of being quietly behind Feng Ling, Eye of Asura looked like bridged over entire space plane. As before is the dazzling golden color, as before is reaches as high as ten meters, as before is the sun mark ray sparkle of that golden-rose color.

Yes, Eye of Asura has not disappeared, it as before also in!

The golden light electricity shoots, compared with before. Seeming the prestige can want slightly, but instantaneously has actually been covering the body of Feng Ling.

Feng Ling whole body one stiff, Martial Soul avatar that just about to erupts changes into the innumerable purple mist and dust to scatter in all directions to flutter about immediately.

What is more terrifying, she discovered surprised that her spiritual sea actually does not have the sound, facing this degree of mind attack. Unexpectedly cannot prevent. Spiritual Power of that terror, breaks in her brain instantaneously.

Feng Ling stuffy snort|hum, body from the sky rocked, on faint in the past.

golden light restraining, a big hand seized her neck accurately.

Huo Yuhao has also relieved from Eye of Asura.

Audience 0.1 silence.

Second! This is second, is Transcendent Douluo, Evil Phoenix Douluo! Formidable incomparable Holy Spirit Cult vice- Cult Master, was defeating unexpectedly. If Huo Yuhao thinks that struck a moment ago, can definitely strike to kill her.

The matter that Huo Yuhao handles is actually not complex, but, only then he can complete.

Before sending out Soul Assault, falls on Feng Ling, is Three Eyed Golden Lion entrusts with Huo Yuhao divine skill without a doubt, Casualty of Destiny, Soul Expropiation. The physical defense, mind defends instantaneous seal.

Although nine levels of mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device are strong, but also can only defend Huo Yuhao whole-heartedly strikes.

While sending out that strikes, Huo Yuhao also synchronously displayed own Spiritual Disturbance domain.

The Spiritual Disturbance domain made locking and line of sight of Feng Ling presented the deviation. Therefore, when that said that Evil Phoenix bites the light of soul shines, in fact has not fallen on the Huo Yuhao main body, but is he through the illusory image that the Spiritual Disturbance domain and Imitation Soul Ability condenses.

---

In November, our months of eruption, did everybody's monthly ticket prepare? Should be gathers the potential the time. Tomorrow's on the 1st, our old rule, not places an upper limit on the eruption, guarantees a minimum two, every 500 tickets add two. The day after tomorrow starting from, consecutively for seven days, three, this first round eruption, has lasted until November 8 again every day! Tomorrow is first day, can come a grand opening? Let our monthly ticket prepare, to!

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-578-part-2





Volume 12

#578 - World War Ii! Phoenix Water Chestnut


Then was simple, Teleportation, true Eye of Asura will have delivered to behind Feng Ling. Then is second Soul Assault.

If Huo Yuhao thinks, with the aid of the Soul Expropiation beforehand prestige energy, his sufficiently heavy wound Feng Ling, even strikes to kill her directly.

However, he has not actually done, but has sealed up the Feng Ling sensation and spiritual sea, captures her in own hand.

Falls gently toward the ground in slowly, in the Huo Yuhao eye is glittering the strange brilliance, one after another two wars, seem, he wins is very relaxed. In fact only then he knows that these two fight passes through his brain to revolve high-speed, displays Absolute the strength, can under so neat winning fight.

From beginning to end, Huo Yuhao does not have the half minute to retain. Because he knows that more does not hate to display Soul Power, may the consumption is bigger. But he then also has many fights to carry on, the Dual Soul Nucleus reply speed as well as his own Soul Power congealing thick degree is the opposite party cannot imagine absolutely. But similarly is also not enough to help him support ten.

Therefore, he has not massacred Feng Ling, but holds her 0.1 is to give oneself brother's duplicate time, another......

The falling gently ground, Huo Yuhao lifts own surface armor, Feng Ling is grabbed by his hand, the meaning of not having relaxed.

Zongli Wu stands there has not moved, Feng Ling falls in the Huo Yuhao hand, even if this time is Limit Douluo again here, is impossible to save others from the Huo Yuhao hand directly. So long as Huo Yuhao releases his sharp Dark Gold Terror Claw, can twist instantaneously broken the neck of Feng Ling.

" Are you what kind of? " Asking of Zongli Wu coldly . Everybody is a smart person, he will not shout anything lets loose her and so on idle talk. Since Huo Yuhao does not have to strike to kill Feng Ling immediately, then, some discussed that he has certainly any goal. But regarding Zongli Wu, Feng Ling is very important, is not only his right-hand man, is his wife.

Evil Soul Master, and has the sentiment! Freely. Since Zongli Wu has controlled Feng Ling not with the sentiment!

" I want your another saintess to trade. The saintesses are important, is vice- Cult Master is important, you measure. " Huo Yuhao said own goal simply directly.

Yes. He and other this day was very long, the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters actually where, he really could not find. Therefore, where he cannot find Ma Xiaotao.

Soon before, they just aura Sun-Moon Empire capital Bright Capital City time, Huo Yuhao had searched for with Spiritual Detection, as before has not actually discovered any trail. Since could not find, that only then started from Holy Spirit Cult itself.

Hears the condition that Huo Yuhao put forward, the Zongli Wu look concentrates suddenly, " daydreamed. "

Two big saintesses who he initially caught. Is exciting in the Holy Spirit Cult special method, making them promote to cultivate rapidly is. Afterward Blue Silver Saintess Tang Ya they were rescued by Huo Yuhao, remaining Fire Phoenix saintess Ma Xiaotao. On Ma Xiaotao, he placed the great expectations. Relies on the stimulation of movement of instinct, cultivating of Ma Xiaotao for was approaching Transcendent Douluo. Moreover, is Absolute Martial Soul! The evil aura in her Absolute Martial Soul, under the special method stimulation of Holy Spirit Cult, became the Absolute Fire fuel, making the Ma Xiaotao strength continue suddenly to increase in these years. In the future inevitably is the Holy Spirit Cult mainstay.

In the plan of Zongli Wu, most ten years, Ma Xiaotao has to attack Limit Douluo possibility 0.1 indigo to strike again to complete, her state of mind also will thoroughly lose then, becomes a puppet of Limit Douluo rank.

At that time, even if was Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao not, Holy Spirit Cult was as before powerful.

Therefore. When Huo Yuhao proposed wants Ma Xiaotao, Zongli Wu was almost rejection without hesitation.

He has the sentiment to Feng Ling, but will compare the Holy Spirit Cult future, this sentiment was not anything. The benefit is supreme, is always the Holy Spirit Cult objective.

" Said. Didn't you want her life? " Huo Yuhao in Feng Ling the hand mentioned slowly.

" ", His index finger shoots suddenly, a handle dark golden color sharp knife blade also along with it popping, is on the ruler dark golden color sharp knife blade the ray twinkle, the sharp place, is away from the Feng Ling throat inch.

" Stop. " Zongli Wu shouted angrily.

In his heart intertwines! He did not hate Feng Ling dead. His first time somewhat regretted regarding this motion. If not request completes this fight on own initiative. Wu Yun (black clouds) will not die, Feng Ling will not fall in the Huo Yuhao hand.

Although that corpse Ice Bear King is precious, but compares in two Transcendent Douluo, has not the small disparity! Zongli Wu subconscious grips tight double fist.

Huo Yuhao light [say / way]: " Sir Cult Master completely can consider a while, I do not worry in any case, these ten fights in which several persons take turns fighting one person so as to wear the opponent out, I look forward to multi- rest a while. " He selected his weakness directly, moreover smiled looks at Zongli Wu, did not fear appearance that he did not obey.

The breath of Zongli Wu became somewhat loud, he was very clear, not far away, the military officers of Sun-Moon Empire army are looking at themselves.

He has issued the written pledge to fulfill a military order. If this time were defeated, even if were not handled by the military law, he prestige in armed forces also inevitably suffers a disastrous decline.

Now he is potential to become Qihu. What to do? Various thoughts glitter in the Zongli Wu mind unceasingly. He really some does not know now should be what to do good.

Feng Ling, he does not give up. But, the Fire Phoenix saintess, he does not give up!

takes a deep breath, the Zongli Wu look becomes gloomy, " the Fire Phoenix saintess, is impossible to give you. She is I teaches one of the mainstays, even if is Cult Master I, does not have the power to use her to receive in exchange for the small phoenix. If you want, I can let the match who she becomes under you fights. You abduct her by oneself strength, I am speechless. However, gives you not to be good directly. "

[!]

" Said it and meant it. " Huo Yuhao is almost saying without hesitation.

The Zongli Wu eyeground cold brightness dodges, to behind beckons.

A terrifying imposing manner bursts out immediately, the clear and melodious spirited phoenix cry sound along with it resounding, " raises "

Different with the Feng Ling phoenix cry sound, Feng Ling phoenix cry is quite incisive, but this phoenix cry, has actually filled in clear and melodious aggressively. Is competitive! Power and influence world.

Xuan imposing manner from the sky erupts, the blazing air current surges 0.1 people, slowly from the Sun-Moon Empire crowd.

Her speed is not fast, but every step steps forward, actually stays behind a flame footprint in the ground, the flame ray concentrates not to be loose.

She wears a red big cape, covers own forehead, but Xuan the blazing imposing manner, blooms from her.

The Huo Yuhao look stagnates, is gazing at her, is you? Elder sister.

That red cape does not know that is any material quality manufacture, under that scalding hot air current ignition, not any sign of breakage.

Zongli Wu actually turned around to move toward audiences Soul Engineer, clenched the teeth, bought nine levels of mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device to take carry back.

This time, is a bangle, he turns back to that scarlet person in front.

The scarlet person lifts the left hand, her palm is fair, but is actually sending out the light red air current, the strong Soul Power fluctuation, somewhat cannot constrain unexpectedly.

That blazing aura, as if momentarily is similar to the volcanic eruption generally will burst out.

Zongli Wu puts on to her the bangle, then changes Huo Yuhao, the sinking sound track: " She, you could put Feng Ling here. "

Huo Yuhao cold sound track: " How I know that she is, making her raise head cape, reveals the true self. "

Zongli Wu has selected, scarlet person has given a hand signal.

The scarlet person lifts the hand, has lifted oneself head cape. The flash when her face reveals, the Huo Yuhao pupil contracts suddenly.

These years, he in doing everything possible seeking Ma Xiaotao, finally had seen at this time that the heart actually sinks.

Ma Xiaotao or Ma Xiaotao, the look does not have half minute to change, the years have not left any trace on her beautiful face. However, her eyes eyeball actually changed.

Ma Xiaotao eyes, turned into the red completely, the supercilious look return is the black eyeball, even including the pupil, completely is the red. The profound red, as if anytime may the drop hemorrhage from that eyes pupil resemble.

When she gains ground, looks at to Huo Yuhao time, in eyes pupil, only then endless killing intent and terror evil aura.

Xiaotao elder sister! The heart of Huo Yuhao is shivering.

The Xiaotao elder sister, was I have harmed you! Initially met, for various reasons, I cannot take away you. Afterward by Holy Spirit Cult Third Elder, Fourth Elder was brought Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp to besiege. Causes Wang Qiu'er to offer sacrifices. After Qiu'er offers sacrifices, Shrek Academy encounters the beast tide crisis, Huo Yuhao has to the earliest possible time hurry back to Shrek. When he wants to look for Ma Xiaotao again time, did not have her trail again.

But several years later today, when he sees Ma Xiaotao once more, he can feel clearly that this time she, as if lost the soul to be common. Completely became the Holy Spirit Cult slaughtering machine.

The Huo Yuhao innermost feelings murderous intention generally was stimulated like the volcano of eruption instantaneously. Holy Spirit Cult, Holy Spirit Cult!

His look instantaneously becomes incomparable ice-cold, stares to Zongli Wu. Zongli Wu was only corners of the mouth place hangs one to sneer, turns head to say to Ma Xiaotao: " Has killed him. "

Is working as both sides these many people, the words that said have no alternative but to calculate. The Huo Yuhao right hand shakes, in the hand Feng Ling flew toward Zongli Wu. But almost simultaneously, Ma Xiaotao was also ordinary just like one group of Lie Yan, throws to him.

The air becomes because of blazing twists instantaneously, the Ma Xiaotao whole person looked like insane generally, the both arms opened, the dark red flame of phoenix shape directly soared Huo Yuhao Bian together, but.

The phoenix eating delicacies day strikes, comes up, is her adept fourth Soul Ability.

Before Ma Xiaotao phoenix flame and compares, was more formidable, blazing Absolute Fire also mixes is linking the terrifying energy that Huo Yuhao is unable to clearly recognize completely, crazy toward the Huo Yuhao impact, but. On Ma Xiaotao, ascends instantaneously nine Soul Ring.

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-578-part-3





Volume 12

#579 - Three Wars, Phoenix Saintess


Besides Huo Yuhao familiar these, on her, blood red ninth Soul Ring.

Non- advertisement ball window visits: Capacity for alcohol " // " = " _ " &amp\; \;

In order to train her, Holy Spirit Cult spares no effort, 100,000 years of Soul Ring has given her.

Huo Yuhao stretches out the arms similarly, together deep blue colored light glow instantaneously from his entire torso impact, Ice Emperor Fury.

Red and deep blue, two rays from the sky collide in together, that is mutual engaging in factional strife of Absolute Ice and Absolute Fire.

The grating sound seemed get lost oil to sprinkle above the snow and ice the common, massive mist ascended instantaneously.

Ma Xiaotao Fire Phoenix almost will vanish shortly does not see, surplus Ice Emperor Fury complementary waves also fell on her, making her body tremble slightly.

In cultivating for on, she has been inferior to Huo Yuhao now. Was inferior to that initially nearly in going crazy by her in the Shrek Academy Sea God Lake bank to get rid of the kid.

Whole body one cold, Ma Xiaotao slightly one dull, but, the Absolute Ice aura had been repelled by her within the body powerful phoenix flame.

Absolute Ice and Absolute Fire, are the most violent two energies. Since has been mutually restrictive. Looked that whose cultivating to be stronger.

Giant phoenix wings launches behind her, third Soul Ability, Phoenix Ascension. Relies on Phoenix Ascension amplification, the Ma Xiaotao imposing manner is rising suddenly. Phoenix flame of blotting out the sky covers toward Huo Yuhao comprehensively.

Cannot fight with her in the ground.

A Huo Yuhao tip of the toe place, like must fire into the sky. But Ma Xiaotao has at this time, is only in the fight instinct and mind the endless slaughtering aura, which tube this is where?

Beforehand Feng Ling, on mind some were not quite normal, but compares in Ma Xiaotao, she must be much better. Ma Xiaotao simply looks like slaughters the machine to be ordinary now.

Opens mouth, dark red is similar to the ruby entity general firing line directly soars Huo Yuhao to emit to go together. First Soul Ability under Phoenix Ascension amplification, Phoenix Fire Wire.

Moreover, the Ma Xiaotao whole body also braved the blazing flame, on the whole person to burst out strong aura beyond description. Second Soul Ability, Bathing Fire Phoenix.

Huo Yuhao has defeated two Evil Soul Master, cultivates from Soul Power, Feng Ling is early Wu Yun (black clouds). In fact must above Ma Xiaotao. May facing Ma Xiaotao, Huo Yuhao actually probably feel many strenuously.

The reason is very simple, Ma Xiaotao is crazy . Moreover, her Absolute Fire does not fear Huo Yuhao Absolute Ice. Moreover, under facing her, Huo Yuhao does not dare the heavy hand!

Under this all sorts of restrictions, Huo Yuhao is unable to display completely own strength, naturally must receive the considerable degree the pressure.

Huo Yuhao takes a deep breath, the right hand lifts. Grasps void to Phoenix Fire Wire.

On Extreme Ice Battle God Armor appears Diamond Ice Crystal.

Absolute Ice and Extreme Ice Battle God Armor material quality Extreme Ice Divine Crystal complements one another absolutely. In cultivating for on, relies on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor amplification, Huo Yuhao has been striving to excel Ma Xiaotao many.

Ice Emperor's Pincer!

Phoenix Fire Wire was blocked, Diamond Ice Crystal that but the Huo Yuhao also shocking discovery, own Ice Emperor's Pincer condenses really has the trend that must melt under the Phoenix Fire Wire attack of Ma Xiaotao. This is simply inconceivable. Both sides cultivate to have many disparities, is her phoenix flame unexpectedly so why strong?

Ma Xiaotao when Huo Yuhao is startled, changed into Fire Phoenix to fly once more to him.

Is the phoenix eating delicacies day strikes as before, stated differently, this time she has second Soul Ability Bathing Fire Phoenix, third Soul Ability Phoenix Ascension amplification. Imposing manner compared with it a moment ago even better.

Huo Yuhao eyes narrows the eyes, an ice blue halo bursts out from him suddenly outward.

Octagonal Ice Source Concentration! Comes from Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass Soul Ability.

In fact, present Huo Yuhao is not his optimum condition. Because his six big spirit is in the deep sleep condition completely. Without the assistance of spirit, to some of some of his many influences, he can only be uses these to be the ability of spirits, but some special capabilities he also has more than enough.

For example Ice and Snow Two Emperor's Pride, in the situations of snow and ice two emperor deep sleep, he cannot use the full page. Meanwhile. His Absolute Ice Martial Soul avatar, cannot use. The Ice Emperor deep sleep, he again used Ice Emperor avatar, basic on the display the god marrow of Martial Soul avatar. Let alone his Absolute Ice Martial Soul avatar can also reply on the Snow Emperor strength actually.

But so, attainments of Huo Yuhao in Absolute Martial Soul aspect. Because there is second Soul Ring, absolutely could be said as now Soul Master most powerhouse.

Under the function of Octagonal Ice Source Concentration, his Extreme Ice Battle God Armor bursts out the magnificent brilliance 0.1 fists to rumble void.

This is the pure fist, attaches without any Soul Ability above the fist. But in this flickers, the Huo Yuhao whole person actually likely is melted for the world in general, but with Ma Xiaotao that he opposes, seems like repelled by the world.

" Bang " the Ma Xiaotao phoenix flame stiffly was been broken by bang, she is also flying upside down. The whole body has even covered Diamond Ice Crystal. In her wrist|skill on that nine levels of mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device is also ray greatly Sheng, obviously is playing own role, is resisting Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power for her.

Zongli Wu just melted Absolute Ice Soul Power of Feng Ling within the body at this time, happen to sees this, sees here, his complexion finally somewhat changed.

The strength of that fist, implication, is the world highest good! This feeling, he has felt on mother, but is not intense. Has felt on Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao, is more powerful than mother. But once to the person who he left behind the most profound this feeling, without a doubt, positive.[!] Is Beast God Di Tian. Beast God itself, because is Soul Beast, as if cannot completely and world merges into one organic whole. But, Huo Yuhao that fist wielded a moment ago, as if looks like the world source wields general! Soul Power of distinct use is not specially many, but, Ma Xiaotao actually suffered a loss.

Huo Yuhao has not tried to awaken Ma Xiaotao at this time, was deep because of he very clear present Ma Xiaotao within the body evil toxin, is not that easily can awaken successfully. He must save first her, then has to awaken her possibility.

To rescue Ma Xiaotao under so crazy condition, he must first do, is, defeats her!

Light ray twinkle, on the Huo Yuhao face is revealing the god of stagnation light, a fist bang draws back Ma Xiaotao, he only thought that the fluctuations in within the body two Soul Nucleus obviously became fierce several points, each other collision after-birth gave birth to the whirlpool Soul Power chain link, because as if also a moment ago this fist became sturdy several points.

The day is positive, is cloudy, world highest good, Yin-Yang Supplement.

Yes, that fist, from this came a moment ago, is he own Spiritual Power and Absolute Ice Soul Power perfect union. If were short, then, difference only then, mood!

Yes, mood!

If before meeting God of Emotion Rong Nianbing, Huo Yuhao was not perhaps clear initially own Hao-Dong Three Absolutes so to be why formidable. Afterward he understood, because of integration of mood, did not have mood Soul Ability, looked like does not have the soul. But soul formidable or not, has decided the Soul Ability potential and eruption.

Hao-Dong Three Absolutes, was initially was perfect to erupt his mood, that formidable, can jump the ranks to rout the match to him formidable.

But present he, even if has not integrated the mood in this self-created Soul Ability, initially formidable are too more, are too many. This fist rumbles, in his mind regarding the comprehension of Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, deepened a point immediately.

" Raises! " The resonant phoenix cry sound gets up, huge Fire Phoenix along with it appearance, phoenix avatar!

Ma Xiaotao under crazy condition does not know that anything is called the fear, in her heart of hearts, only then a thing, that is, slaughters.

Phoenix avatar shows, changes into Fire Phoenix Ma Xiaotao to directly soar Huo Yuhao to fly to shoot. The sky twisted, as if many waves in upper air. The earth twisted, terrifying high temperature, even made the entire battlefield in the ebullition.

Innumerable flame meteors from the sky condense the forming, crazy goes toward the Huo Yuhao concentrated fire, sixth Soul Ability, Phoenix Meteor Shower!

Facing this Soul Ability, in the Huo Yuhao innermost feelings has actually filled move, not long, Ma Xiaotao relies on Phoenix Meteor Shower to lead them to participate in that to strike Great Continental Soul Master Academy Fighting Spirit Competition, and won the final championship!

He still clearly remembers now that time Ma Xiaotao was the what kind great strength, what kind high-spiritedness. But many years later today, he saw this Soul Ability, even if this meteor shower to him. In his heart also is moved.

The hole, drifts about once again, solid ice change into punctures suddenly, in airborne blooms just like the ice flower of being in full bloom generally.

Octagonal Ten Thousands Directional Thorns!

Each ice thorn, an accurate hit meteor, the ice and fire collide mutually, the ice melts, the fire is gloomy. The magnificent brilliance, has from the sky formed the incomparably enchanting smoke and fire.

This war, compared with the first two wars, perhaps is not most bad risk, but actually absolutely is most magnificent.

Octagonal Ten Thousands Directional Thorns to Phoenix Meteor Shower, resisted. But that phoenix avatar is also having the potential of fifth Soul Ability Phoenix Piercing Clouds Attack, has fired into the Huo Yuhao main body.

Huo Yuhao in this time most correct way was to use own Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion avatar without doubt, even if did not have Ice Emperor to assist, by Absolute Ice Martial Soul avatar, he also had the absolute assurance to suppress Ma Xiaotao.

But, he does not have to do, the reason is very simple, ices the fire two, is two extremes, Absolute Ice and Absolute Fire is so. He was worried that under this violent collision, injures Ma Xiaotao. That is he will harbor regret lifelong.

After Huo Yuhao since mother died, in heart did not have the family member. To Shrek Academy, as if had the family|home, but Ma Xiaotao, looks like his biological elder sister is ordinary. Although they do not calculate in the together time are too long, but in the Huo Yuhao heart, this elder sister's status is very important

The capacity for alcohol renewed recently: " ////_ " = " _ " &amp\; \; //_

Guarantees a minimum to deliver, not places an upper limit on the eruption to start!

:

Two guarantee a minimum to deliver, not places an upper limit on the eruption to start, every 500 monthly tickets add two, sets no ceiling limit. Tomorrow starting from, every day three consecutively for seven days. To November 8!

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-579-part-1





Volume 12

#579 - Three Wars, Phoenix Saintess


Let alone, Ma Xiaotao will fall to so the paddies, Huo Yuhao falls a large part of responsibility on oneself, thinks that was because initially cannot take away her immediately, causes. Therefore he must not hesitate any price must retrieve Ma Xiaotao.

An ice crystal reappeared in the Extreme Ice Battle God Armor surface, Ice Empress Armor.

Meanwhile, Huo Yuhao both hands make a movement of joint holding to the front. Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain eruption.

The eighth Soul Ring sparkle!

Ice Bear Dispution Snow, eruption!

Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain adds the Ice Bear Dispution Snow 0.2 big strong skills, is centered on Huo Yuhao instantaneously blooms outward.

This time he, looks like debates the eye of snow, just like the tornado common snow and ice whirlpool, directly soars Ma Xiaotao to take away as many things as possible.

By doing so, even display Martial Soul avatar to be stronger than him directly, but is also better to control, one will not collide to end the fight, but is the dull knife shears the meat. Only has so, he can control his attack prestige energy according to the Soul Power change of Ma Xiaotao.

But by doing so, the only flaw is, his Soul Power consumption using Martial Soul avatar will be bigger.

General Soul Master, after using Martial Soul avatar, will fall into weakly, but the powerhouse of Huo Yuhao this Titled Douluo level does not have this aspect to be worried, but the domain class ability, is actually regardless of any level cultivates for the powerhouses must consume huge Soul Power to maintain.

After Ma Xiaotao phoenix avatar breaks in Ice Bear Dispution Snow, looked like ties up the chains to be ordinary, terrifying Bian Xue was relying on the ultra-low temperature crazily in engaged in factional strife with her Absolute Fire mutually. The massive mist from the sky ascend, letting the person is unable to see situation.

Zongli Wu face darken looks out airborne, the eyeground deep place, actually revealed smug look.

What Huo Yuhao does not know, although Zongli Wu does not have the plan and he carries on the complete unit ten competions, but five prepare or has, but in these five, is Ma Xiaotao of phoenix saintess, itself.

Is useful Absolute Fire to resist Absolute Ice to consume in a big way? Just. According to Zongli Wu plan originally, Ma Xiaotao should enter the stage in fourth. Now has been ahead of time, but plans not the too tremendous influence regarding Zongli Wu completely.

Zongli Wu knows certainly the Ma Xiaotao origin. Ma Xiaotao, that is the Shrek Academy outstanding student. Radiant Phoenix Yan Shaozhe direct disciple. Huo Yuhao also came from Shrek Academy. They related naturally are closely normal.

Therefore, Ma Xiaotao enters the stage, he does not need to be worried about the safety of this phoenix saintess, once Ma Xiaotao consumes the certain extent Huo Yuhao, then, is the time that he gives the final word.

In the Zongli Wu moral nature deep place, is actually not corpse Ice Bear King Second White that most regards as important, but is Huo Yuhao I am right.

Absolute Ice Martial Soul! Has been short of Blue Silver Saintess, if trades Absolute Ice, moreover has been the Titled Douluo level Absolute Ice Saint Child. The Holy Spirit Cult strength will definitely increase. In the future, will very probably have two Limit Douluo people ready dead in his side . Moreover, but also is existences of Absolute Martial Soul level. To that time, on this world. Also who can contend with him? Even if that breathes out Soul Engineer not to be good.

Absolute Ice adds Absolute Fire, Limit Douluo, that is formidable existence!

In order to obtains this Saint Child, even if was the sacrifice were many a point to be also worth. Because, his arrival, will make the Holy Spirit Cult future have the infinite possibility.

The aspiration of Zongli Wu, does not become State Master of country. His ideal, is the future ruler. Entire Continent ruler. Douluo Continent is also good, Sun-Moon Continent. Is his goal.

In sky, Fire Phoenix in struggling of going all out, but, Ice Bear Dispution Snow and Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain continually are actually strengthening.

Scalding hot in air vanished. What replaces it is chilly. The temperature from high to low, big of change, making one praise to the heavens.

The phoenix flame blooms unceasingly outward, but, each piece of hole falls on the phoenix flame. Will carry off its massive temperature.

Suddenly, Fire Phoenix from the sky stopped, the wings has opened the maximum degree, the entire body from the sky circled 0.1 circle enchanting halos to be brought by her wings. Resonant phoenix cry continues to resound through the sky 0.1 circle powerful dark red bands of light to expand outward, the place visited, is cut off Bian Xue unexpectedly outside.

That Fire Phoenix also instantaneously accelerates, almost instant, arrived in front of Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao does with enough time, only then lifts the hand, lifts own right hand, tries to block that huge Fire Phoenix.

Eighth Soul Ability, Phoenix Dance of the Ninth Heaven!

Blazing phoenix flame arrived front, but behind Huo Yuhao, actually shone two groups of eye-catching brilliance.

In January, day was on the 1st golden color, the moon/month is the blue color. The strange Sun-Moon connection, allowing his whole person as if to enter a special condition.

The phoenix flame falls on him, actually fierce circles, was flung to fly by the powerful centrifugal force outward. But outside Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain, had the strange change.

Hole, from the sky links up a piece by piece unexpectedly in together, changes into snow lines, then each other pesters, coils around, turns into Snow and Ice Chains, from all directions, goes toward that Fire Phoenix winding.

This is the Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain evolution version, Snow and Ice Chains.

Each Snow and Ice Chains, is the condensation and fusion of Absolute Ice, falls on Fire Phoenix, makes her shiver fiercely. The temperature of phoenix flame plummets. Regardless of but how she stimulates to movement own Soul Power, is unable to break through from front palm place.

In that palm, is containing strength of the formidable incomparable revolving, all energies rush.[!] Will be flung to fly instantaneously, is unable to break in truly.

Huo Yuhao back Sun-Moon light, became more powerful, Sun in upper air, before them, became is overshadowed.

What strength is this? All people are shocked, but actually nobody can name the character.

Zongli Wu is not good. However, he compared with many, because, his profound remembering that others actually know, once behind Beast God Di Tian, has seen similar Sun-Moon light shadow. The Beast God strength be much stronger than Huo Yuhao, but, that aura is actually extremely close.

Actually he comprehended what strength, so is unexpectedly formidable?

Zongli Wu while shocking, eyeground deep place joyful was also more intense, Huo Yuhao was formidable, means. So long as his plan success, Holy Spirit Cult Saint Child also even more will be then formidable in the future.

Good, good Saint Child!

The ice crystal chains disturbance, struggling of Fire Phoenix started becomes getting smaller.

Ma Xiaotao Soul Power under the limit of ice crystal chains. Plummets.

In the Huo Yuhao heart relaxed slightly, he has used oneself source the strength of Dual Soul Nucleus, can, in does not injure under the Ma Xiaotao premise, surrounds her by Ice Bear Dispution Snow and Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain. Must know that this is not easy, even is it can be said that difficult.

However, he succeeded after all. Even if consumes again in a big way, in his opinion is worth.

But when he just relaxed, Fire Phoenix that had tied up has lifted the head suddenly, the eyeground deep place. Is blooming nearly crazy ray.

Um? It is not good.

In Huo Yuhao heart one startled, but when he wants to have the response again, as if already without enough time.

One group of terrors to the Absolute golden red ray, erupt from Ma Xiaotao phoenix avatar suddenly. All Snow and Ice Chains will shortly change into the powder powder, blazing. Once more became the mainstream. But the paroxysmal phoenix flame of that terror, in instantaneously swallowed Huo Yuhao.

Yes, this is Ma Xiaotao ninth Soul Ability!

Phoenix Nirvana.

Phoenix, bath fire, Nirvana rebirth!

In that moment of Nirvana, is the phoenix is most formidable is also the weakest time. At the beginning of Nirvana, is very formidable. After the Nirvana. Incomparably weak. But similarly, will take to the phoenix freshman.

Phoenix Nirvana, this is Ma Xiaotao most formidable ninth Soul Ability, going all out Soul Ability.

If the enemy does not die, after having displayed Phoenix Nirvana. Definitely wants weak one month of her, must die without doubt. However, the prestige energy that this strikes, can actually meet the standard of close Limit Douluo. If she can become in the future Transcendent Douluo, even if Limit Douluo facing this strikes. Also is fearful and apprehensive.

This is one of the Zongli Wu cards in a hand, he had not been worried from beginning to end Huo Yuhao will strike to kill Ma Xiaotao, will not be worried that Ma Xiaotao Phoenix Nirvana is unable to use.

This Soul Ability, even does not need to gather the potential, so long as the thought moves, will erupt. Takes weak one month as the terrifying flame that the price erupts, the prestige can be able be imagined.

Huo Yuhao does not know, therefore, he was embezzled by Phoenix Nirvana. The entire sky, turned into flake gold red completely, looks like has the innumerable golden red class clouds from the sky to surge.

Shrek City to the hundred li (0.5km) range of Sun-Moon Empire big camp, as if instantaneously was entering the intense summer heat, scalding hot, making everyone be afraid the deep irritation.

Tang Wutong stands in the ground, dull visits airborne has all that she has not moved, but in the look is revealing the deep restlessness.

Zongli Wu has smiled, he smiles is very happy.

Did Huo Yuhao die? He will certainly not die, Zongli Wu has confidence 0.1 to cultivate to Huo Yuhao very much to achieve the Transcendent Douluo Absolute Ice owner, some body also that many formidable Soul Guidance Device, as well as that handle Absolute Ice Divine Tool common short blade edge, his where has is so easy dead.

However, under Phoenix Nirvana, he does not die, certain meeting, delaminates the skin!

This was enough.

Blazing golden red flame, in airborne has continued close one minute, gradually desalinates.

Form that first presents, is parallel float in the midair.

Strange golden red rune, circle regarding her body. Her tranquil lying down in airborne, the long hair hangs loose, the double pupil closes. As if all of outside, again have nothing to do with her.

Also to has recommended our bookstore new product time, peerless Tang Sect cartoon that everybody has watched, we have the pamphlet. At present leaves to the fifth volume, our first five volume have, the first three volume are the hard shell hardbound, 4,5 are also the double envelopes, is fine, the fifth volume also delivers two bookmarks. Each book 10 Yuan. Buys two volume also to deliver value four Yuan card signs, orders delivers a playbill. It is not feeling well crisply! You decide. Washes quickly, treasure, shop there search: Dazzles world Tang Sect, comes to see our good treasure!

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-579-part-2





Volume 12

#579 - Three Wars, Phoenix Saintess


Yes, she is Ma Xiaotao, at this moment, she no longer is the phoenix saintess. She lost the consciousness, looks like a red cloud, from airborne is falling quietly.

The Zongli Wu corners of the mouth place reveals one to sneer, a tip of the toe place, must shoot up to the sky, Ma Xiaotao following.

However, at this time, suddenly, jet black such as black hole of black ink, but also does not have the omen sudden appeared under the Ma Xiaotao body. Looked like the sky split a slit, the body of Ma Xiaotao, was swallowed instantaneously. Space closed, she disappeared. Has not stayed behind including a aura.

Zongli Wu is in airborne, some whole person delay. Didn't have? Didn't the phoenix saintess have? That is any strength.

The illusory light shadow twinkle, airborne were also many a person, is Huo Yuhao.

On his Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, ray was obviously gloomy, the profound dark blue as if had shoaled several points, on that formidable nine levels of Soul Guidance Device, even has also left traces.

Because is bringing the hard helmet, cannot see this time expression. When Absolute Ice aura also.

" I won. This is third. " The Huo Yuhao ice-cold sound resounds.

Zongli Wu looks up to him, in eye cloudy and cold discoloration more intense, " Huo Yuhao, where did you get so far as the phoenix saintess? " In his plan, absolutely does not have the phoenix saintess to be missing this.

Huo Yuhao said indifferently: " This did not need you to know. "

In Zongli Wu eye cold brightness greatly Sheng, " good, good, good! "

Those who make Huo Yuhao accidental is, this Holy Spirit Cult main after saying three good characters, turns around to fly unexpectedly, fell to the ground.

On this response?

Yes, this, in the Zongli Wu heart, so long as his final goal achieves, routs Huo Yuhao, after he controls Huo Yuhao, can't the fear retrieve the phoenix saintess?

Therefore he is not anxious. He has depressed the anger of innermost feelings. But after landing, has wielded starting toward one's own side immediately.

On behalf of Sun-Moon Empire, or on behalf of the fourth person who Holy Spirit Cult enters the stage, appeared!

The black form soars. Rushed toward Huo Yuhao directly. This time, Holy Spirit Cult did not give the Huo Yuhao half minute cushion again the time.

The Fire Phoenix saintess has defeated, but also was abducted by Huo Yuhao. Is unimportant! The Zongli Wu goal was achieved. He deeply believed that the Huo Yuhao strength is strong, facing the attack of that degree, definitely will have the enormous consumption. In this case, the following competion, how does he carry on?

May for all this, Zongli Wu in fourth not enter the stage as before personally. His thoughts are deep, never handles the matter that has not grasped. Therefore. This fourth, as before is the prelude.

When that black form fires into itself, Huo Yuhao saw clearly the match.

The acquaintances, absolutely are the acquaintances.

Scorpion Tiger Douluo, Zhang Peng!

In the past. Huo Yuhao first time meets Scorpion Tiger Douluo Zhang Peng time, Zhang Peng is chases down his. At that time side Huo Yuhao had Yan Shaozhe, Xian Lin'er two Dean. Xian Lin'er fights Zhang Peng, both sides play inextricably involved. But that time, is Huo Yuhao first time sees Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao similarly. Afterward approximately stirred up Long Xiaoyao by the gambling.

Some time ago Huo Yuhao in the breakthrough, learned from Dragon God Douluo Mu En there that originally Long Xiaoyao has been well-meant to oneself. No wonder, otherwise. First meeting time, Long Xiaoyao definitely is capable of killing itself.

At this time meets Zhang Peng again, he is not the past vulnerable youth, but is formidable Titled Douluo. But this Scorpion Tiger Douluo in the past years is the Transcendent Douluo powerhouse, these many years pass by, cultivate for naturally even better. Even if inferior to Feng Ling. Also will not differ too.

In low and deep tiger's roar sound, the Zhang Peng form almost appeared in front of Huo Yuhao instantaneously, the back, huge Scorpion Tiger light shadow reappeared, his fist toward Huo Yuhao, when the chest bang went.

On forehead. Eye of Destiny opens suddenly, the short distance, Soul Assault directly soared this Scorpion Tiger Douluo to rumble together in the past.

Huo Yuhao very much will always use own superiority, now is no exception.

Zhang Peng coldly snorted, intense black light bursts out from the body suddenly, changes into at the same time the small mirror of black glittering unexpectedly, appears in front of oneself.

Huo Yuhao Soul Assault falls on that small mirror, unexpectedly was refracted instantaneously has approached the one side.

Um? Can reflect the Spiritual Power ability? No wonder he does not have to purchase any mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device, no wonder Zongli Wu will make him enter the stage. Holy Spirit Cult background, is really out of the ordinary!

However, that small mirror, although has refracted Huo Yuhao Soul Assault, but is in itself also exudes one clearly " ka " sound. Obviously certainly was damaged, the Zhang Peng body slightly in a flash, his fist also arrived at the Huo Yuhao front.

The Huo Yuhao left hand directs, before the right hand, pushes. Tang Sect secret art, Controlling Crane Capturing Dragon.

Present he, was not initially just basic Huo Yuhao, this Controlling Crane Capturing Dragon uses in his hands, has to transform castoffs into delicaties the deep meaning greatly.

Zhang Peng only thought that a huge suction transmits, own fist walked arrived at the one side, at the same time, a Huo Yuhao hand pressed to approach his chest.

Zhang Peng lowers roars, whole body sticks out suddenly intense Wu light suddenly, the body inflates suddenly, another arm sets up the palm like the blade, directly soars the palm that Huo Yuhao pushes to slice.

The Huo Yuhao shoulders in a flash, the thrust force of pulling force and right hand of left hand gathers suddenly inward, immediately, strong whirlpool Soul Power erupts instantaneously. The formidable blasting power releases outward. The attack of Zhang Peng has not arrived, person had been hit.

One about the minute, looks like in the people of observing, between Huo Yuhao and Zhang Peng do not divide outcome. But on Zongli Wu face actually obvious.[!] Revealed the color of satisfaction.

He cultivates is, he can see from the response of Huo Yuhao, before Huo Yuhao strength, compared to drop. He has not used Absolute Ice immediately. Obviously is when the former and Fire Phoenix saintess resisted, was certainly affected.

Zhang Peng personal appearance backlash at the same time, in mouth has sent out a tiger to roar, has revealed own Martial Soul avatar. Huge Scorpion Tiger emerges out of thin air. Midair dim, Wu light from the sky congealment formation, unexpectedly is changes into the innumerable black glittering the sharp needle, directly soars Huo Yuhao to fly to shoot to go.

What gadget is this?

Scorpion tail needle!

Scorpion Tiger Douluo, scorpion tail is his sharp weapon. This is Zhang Peng very formidable Soul Ability.

That scorpion tail needle covers the route that Huo Yuhao all has been able to fend, uses by Martial Soul avatar, this is the attack of Transcendent Douluo level.

The Huo Yuhao body in airborne rolled up slightly, his whole person suddenly became illusory. Flash when scorpion tail needle arrives, his person changed into the fragment, disappearance of being quietly in the midair.

Stealth?

Sees Huo Yuhao that vanishes, responded that biggest, must be that side Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer.

Huo Yuhao this stealth ability, it can be said that makes Sun-Moon Empire suffer loss. If no this stealth ability, why Huo Yuhao can ruin that many Sun-Moon Empire upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device! If no this stealth ability, he possibly does threaten the Sun-Moon Empire army by strength of the?

In battling to the fourth situation, he used this stealth ability finally, made all people determine, before will fall Sun-Moon Empire massive upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device, was he!

The scorpion tail needle plunders to empty, has not actually hit any goal. The Huo Yuhao personal appearance presents again time, already above the Scorpion Tiger Douluo top of the head.

Bai Se (White Color) Halo departs from Huo Yuhao quietly, fell on Zhang Peng directly.

Scorpion Tiger Douluo only thought that a brain dizziness, the intense weak feeling spreads over the whole body instantaneously.

This is the Group Weakening promotion version, the single body is weak.

Spiritual Power is formidable, is not has a Soul Assault that usage-style merely. On Zhang Peng float that small mirror can resist the attack of mind impact class, but does not have the means to the mind abilities of these auxiliary classes.

Huo Yuhao Spirit Eyes Martial Soul, lets his forms of combat thousand strange Baibian, does not meet the tough head-on with toughness that simply.

While feeling weak, the Zhang Peng personal appearance dodges, from the sky accelerates instantaneously, two rib places branch out a wing unexpectedly, making him in airborne also complete a booklet to approach. Again facing Huo Yuhao. Scorpion tail needle everywhere flies to shoot once more, the range that this time, covers is bigger.

His mind cultivates to be inferior to Huo Yuhao, before he already own Spiritual Power full, but simply has not actually discovered the Huo Yuhao trail. Zhang Peng also understands that he wants to seek for the match through Spiritual Power is impossible. Such being the case, that seeks with the attack.

Scorpion tail needle that the wide scope covers seems played a certain role, airborne Huo Yuhao these time does not have the stealth, but the body became illusory.

When that scorpion tail needles pass through from him, he was only the body ray rippled unexpectedly, has not received any injury.

False? In the Zhang Peng heart is startled.

In this time, he is feeling a dizziness suddenly. All becomes is not as if real.

The person of observing can see, above his top of the head, were suddenly many a whirlpool. This whirlpool is revolving rapidly, seems attracting pulls Scorpion Tiger Douluo Zhang Peng soul.

Chaotic Mind, Huo Yuhao fourth Soul Ability.

The strong mind suppression, enabling Huo Yuhao the Soul Ability prestige to appear perfectly, the Spiritual Power superiority is biggest, can he not carry on the use? First three he has used part, but this competion, he depends upon, completely was the superiority in mind level.

Although Spirit Eyes Martial Soul also only then eight Soul Ring, even if facing present age strongest several Limit Douluo, Huo Yuhao has to socialize three points of assurance.

--

500 monthly ticket in addition deliver, anticipates 1000 ticket in addition!!

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-579-part-3





Volume 12

#580 - The Lizard Gecko Perishes, Zhongli To Leave


Another Huo Yuhao quietly appears, the position that this time, he presents is behind Scorpion Tiger Douluo Zhang Peng, but Huo Yuhao that formerly presented also in airborne. In the sky, simultaneously presents two exactly the same people, can this not be astonishing?

Spiritual Disturbance domain!

The Huo Yuhao formidable second domain ability.

Person who this domain notes are not many, does not have his Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain to become famous, but most times, its function actually be more intrepid than Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain. Initially Daydream Ice Silkworm 1 million years of Soul Ring entrusted with his four Soul Ability, did not have one to be useless.

The formidable Soul Power fluctuation bursts out in the air suddenly, Huo Yuhao Dark Gold Terror Claw has appeared, directly soars Scorpion Tiger Douluo huge Martial Soul avatar to pat.

By strong broken!

Zhang Peng receives the Huo Yuhao powerful Chaotic Mind and single body affects weakly, these is how regardless of unable to hide.

However, while Huo Yuhao this claw pats the Zhang Peng body, suddenly, the Zhang Peng whole person shivered fiercely, a black golden ray bursts out from him instantaneously.

Ripped smashing of Scorpion Tiger avatar in front of Dark Gold Terror Claw. However, appearance that the pitch-black form is actually together quietly behind Huo Yuhao.

The terrifying sharp knife blade, directly soars the Huo Yuhao back of the body position to insert.

Golden Cicada Shed Carapace! One of Scorpion Tiger Douluo Zhang Peng passive defensive Soul Ability. This Soul Ability may be called divine skill in his all Soul Ability.

When it suffers attack that is unable to resist voluntarily will be stimulated, once stimulates successfully, his main body will be separated, takes consuming 30% Soul Power as the price, was transmitted to the place that he wants instantaneously. After he cultivates the limit, this range is diameter one kilometer. Meanwhile he under Golden Cicada Shed Carapace amplification, but can also with oneself 30% Soul Power be the price, erupts in peak condition strikes. But at this time, he cannot use other Soul Ability again.

After this strikes, cultivating of Scorpion Tiger Douluo Zhang Peng to the sharp decline 60%, will obviously be not be suitable to fight again.

This strikes to be used to go all out well. Is used for the cloudy person, similarly also good! In Soul Master world, strange Soul Ability always emerges one after another incessantly.

Just and Huo Yuhao fought, Zhang Peng thinks. One can overcome the enemy in any event. After all before Huo Yuhao, has hit three.

But after, their start collides, Huo Yuhao formidable Spiritual Power, Spirit Eyes Martial Soul all sorts of Soul Ability make him understand, even if consumption enormous Huo Yuhao, he also similarly is not a match.

No matter Soul Assault uses, others do not use. Other Spiritual System Soul Ability, he cannot resist similarly. The Spiritual Power disparity of both sides, is really too big.

Therefore, Zhang Peng has to stake everything on a single throw of the dice. When he by that flash of Chaotic Mind hit. He was capable of weakening its part of effects, but he has not actually done, instead withstood the Soul Ability function completely. For finally this Golden Cicada Shed Carapace instead kills.

The success, he overcomes the enemy. If not successful. He leaves to draw back.

He is the person in Holy Spirit Cult crafty hall, but had not actually planned goes all out for Holy Spirit Cult.

His idea is very good, changed into the sharp claws of tiger claw also to arrive at the Huo Yuhao vest, all were in progress according to his plan.

What a pity, he has forgotten a matter, Huo Yuhao also depending on the unique skill of becoming famous. That is, Spiritual Detection!

Under the three-dimensional survey of Spiritual Detection. Even if that flash Huo Yuhao that he starts had not discovered that then, when he appears again, the Soul Power fluctuation in air, mind fluctuates, already in the Huo Yuhao sensation.

Therefore, his pair of tiger claw. Fell in the air as before. Without any gaudy falling in vacancy.

Strikes the feeling of failing fully, even be hit hard by the enemy is more painful, a tent nearly blood spouts.

But Huo Yuhao? On the tranquil appearance behind him, Dark Gold Terror Claw this time has not increased, one chi (0.33 m) half long five handle dark golden color sharp knife blade. Has inserted the Scorpion Tiger Douluo back of the body from the rear area maliciously. Has put from his chest.

The body of Zhang Peng has from the sky stagnated, the corners of the mouth place revealed an unwillingness, in the look has filled crazily. Soul Power in within the body, erupts instantaneously toward dantian.

Cardiopulmonary to shatter, he was impossible to go on living again. Able to move unhindered first, he is not willing such dead.

In dantian, steady Soul Nucleus instantaneously by the crazy Soul Power stimulation.

From exploding! This is his last option, rather relationship of form and spirit to completely extinguish, must draw Huo Yuhao is making 0.1 Transcendent Douluo of pad back from exploding, the prestige can not be lower than one nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely. Fierce so, worthily is Scorpion Tiger Douluo.

The whole body muscle contracts instantaneously, the skeleton in instantaneously to the chest place adduction, Huo Yuhao Dark Gold Terror Claw instantaneously was lived, Zhang Peng this is before using oneself at the point of death compensation eruption, locks Huo Yuhao.

At this moment, his look not gloomy, has, is only crazy. Unequalled crazy, crazy of hysteria.

Since chose from exploding, he must draw Huo Yuhao dead together, will not give the opportunity that the Huo Yuhao least bit survived.

Transcendent Douluo an eruption at the point of death, absolutely is extremely terrifying. This terror is Limit Douluo, a short time is unable to shake off his control.

Zhang Peng even lifts both hands, with Dark Gold Terror Claw that own tiger claw locking in chest place stubbornly finds out, exhausts own all strengths to stimulate to movement within the body Soul Nucleus and limits departure of Huo Yuhao.

But, he cannot see back Huo Yuhao, at this moment, Huo Yuhao, in Zhang Peng at the point of death under counter-attacks, not any startled actual, even does not have any changing countenance, in the look has, but pities.

[!]

This is to pitying of deceased person, to pitying of loser, to pitying of powerhouse.

Followed that the left hand is quietly pats, the brand mark behind Zhang Peng, at the same time, the Huo Yuhao entire torso position, has almost stuck to the back of Zhang Peng to erupt the intense aquamarine brilliance.

Powerful Ice Emperor Fury has swallowed the body of Zhang Peng instantaneously, making his whole person bathe in the aquamarine ray. But a coldness of web, spreads following the bloodlines suddenly. So the contact of short distance, in Zhang Peng all strengths uses in surrounding Huo Yuhao and detonates in oneself Soul Nucleus situation, he simply does not have any strength to defend.

Transcendent Douluo at the point of death counter-attacks no doubt intrepidly, but, similarly, Spiritual Power has been the Limit Douluo level, and has formidable Dual Soul Nucleus, Absolute Ice Martial Soul Titled Douluo, in occupied in the overwhelming superiority situation. How erupts to be also weak?

The body of Zhang Peng is suddenly stiff, he discovered with amazement, Soul Nucleus that oneself accelerated to erupt, velocity of whirl unexpectedly after that palm strikes started gradually changes slow. The blood of own within the body as if is also stagnating. Moreover, with the freeze of heart, his all strengths is vanishing at an exceptional pace.

" Zhang Peng wants to cry out crazily, but, the sound just exported by the card in the throat. He can only send out some " hui hui " sound, is actually not able to burst out originally the sonorous voice.

Dark Gold Terror Claw is quietly vanished, the blood that was frozen, the muscle and skeleton, are unable to limit its sharpness again.

Holds the tiger claw of Dark Gold Terror Claw to burst quietly, breaks 0.2 forms to divide suddenly.

light shadow twinkle, Huo Yuhao already beyond kilometer.

" Bang "

The aquamarine brilliance from the sky blooms. It looks like fireworks of being in full bloom, but, dominates the Continent many years, has Transcendent Douluo cultivates for strong Soul Grandmaster, perishes in light of this.

Huo Yuhao drops from the clouds. The imposing manner of his whole person as if increased in this moment Absolute.

The entire fight is not magnificent, but, the result of fight made audience solemnly silent.

Fourth, this is fourth, in the meantime, was second of dying in battle. Huo Yuhao told all people with the formidable strength, ten fights that he said before. Not necessarily is an unperformable duty.

Zongli Wu complexion embarrassed as if must drop out the suffering. But, this time he, has been unable to back down, in the situation of losing such big, if cannot have capture, this Holy Spirit Cult greatly will be attacked. Incessantly is in the strength, is psychologically. He is Army Supervisor of entire Sun-Moon Empire army, if his prestige so heavily were attacked, these did not have Soul Engineer of any good impression to him, will see him?

The Zongli Wu gloomy complexion becomes ice-cold gets up gradually. Things have gotten to this point, only has Huo Yuhao captures, achieves the success of this fight, before can make up, all that has.

Huo Yuhao is falling gently slowly, but Zongli Wu is looking up him, vision brilliant. In look, what beside ice-cold is crazy of hysteria.

Same crazy, appears on Zongli Wu, completely is different from beforehand Zhang Peng. Crazy of Zhang Peng counter-attacks at the point of death, but crazy of Zongli Wu, actually likely is a handle pointed knife straight thrust Huo Yuhao chest.

The breath of Huo Yuhao somewhat is slightly rapid, as if four fights had the huge consumption to him one after another, but his look actually as before tranquil, because of breathing the change was affected. His similar vision brilliant is looking steadily at Zongli Wu.

If the Zongli Wu look likely is a handle pointed knife, then, at this time the Huo Yuhao look is an iceberg, regardless of the pointed knife is sharp, is unable to prick that just like the mountain that ten thousand years of thick ice has generally. Moreover this mountain is dropping from the clouds by the potential of crush. Engages in factional strife downward.

Besides Huo Yuhao, now actually nobody knows his consumption in a big way. Zongli Wu also can only before he carries on certain judgment in Soul Ability that in the fight uses.

Peerless Tang Sect entity book 24 th has promoted. Everybody can our washing, the valuable shop: Dazzles world Tang Sect to select and purchase. For these days can buy peerless Tang Sect of complete set to obtain, then next Monday will start, can buy this 24 th alone. I will go to that side the company to sign one batch to everybody.

Then our other works can also buy. Everybody goes to the shop to select and purchase, what our custom services will be careful is everybody introduces. Including our card signs, has receipted successively, turns head I to introduce to everybody in the prestigious platform specially.

Next week, our, stands will get online officially, quickly pays attention to our platforms, we present the new things for everybody with the extremely gorgeous way.

Joins our prestige - platform is very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is our families.

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-580-part-1





Volume 12

#580 - The Lizard Gecko Perishes, Zhongli To Leave


On the Huo Yuhao face reveals a ice-cold god light, the both arms open by the body, ice blue halos bloom and proliferate from his Extreme Ice Battle God Armor outward, invisible Ice Element goes toward his body gathering immediately at an exceptional pace.

Octagonal Ice Source Concentration.

A long and loud cry erupts from the Zongli Wu mouth suddenly, that is just like the dragon roar tiger's roar common sound, Soul Ring also slowly raise from the Zongli Wu under foot along with it. Formidable aura, unceasing promotion and bursting out.

The Zongli Wu Soul Ring color, has two types, is black and red.

When Yan Shaozhe of distant place sees this time Soul Ring color also with amazement discoloration.

Previous Yan Shaozhe and he fights, the Zongli Wu Soul Ring color is also not so, but now, is actually six black three red! Even if compared with it Huo Yuhao, has no time to let.

Although the Soul Ring color does not represent all, but regarding Soul Master, is the strength symbol. Let alone, Zongli Wu is Evil Soul Master, Evil Soul Master Transcendent Douluo. This Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master strength, imagines anybody absolutely is more formidable.

The Huo Yuhao complexion also becomes dignified, he knows, after undergoing the front four consumptions, Zongli Wu this, will be the most difficult time that he faces today.

If cultivating of front these Evil Soul Master each people inferior to him, the Zongli Wu true strength, certainly will not be then inferior in him, even be stronger than him. His only superiority, is own Dual Soul Nucleus. But whether to defeat Zongli Wu, was deciding whether his this pair of ten competion can succeed truly. This war, will certainly be a decisive war.

The right hand of Zongli Wu in void, black Soul Ring instantaneous sparkle, handle huge Staff appears during he grasped.

This handle Staff is all over the body jet black, when he appears, behind Zongli Wu raises immediately a person's shadow, this person's shadow seems is not huge, seems only and body of Zongli Wu is similar-sized. However, that flash when he presents, presents all person actually hearts instantaneously to be clutched the tight feeling.

What is this?

Even if were initially Yan Shaozhe that once and Zongli Wu has fought, not completely clear Zongli Wu Martial Soul is anything.

The distant place, the Old Xuan complexion became extremely dignified, muttered thought aloud: “In the past, Ye Xishui Variant Martial Soul was Blood Soul Devil Puppet. This Zongli Wu Martial Soul as if wins Ye Xishui, certainly had once more variation. Does not know is anything, feels that is quite formidable. But the source should somewhat resemble with Ye Xishui Blood Soul Devil Puppet.”

“Ye Xishui Blood Soul Devil Puppet takes the human soul as to nourish Martial Soul that but continually promotes, this was Old Mu afterward is unable to approve her important reason in any event again. On Ye Xishui, has destroyed the souls of too many humanity. This Zongli Wu Martial Soul should reach the same goal or conclusion from different approaches with Ye Xishui. Does not know, he can formidable to what kind of degree. Yuhao this, is very difficult.”

The Yan Shaozhe forced smile said: “This child such did is really too dangerous, challenged the Sun-Moon Empire powerhouse by strength of the. He is really......”

Old Xuan actually shaking the head of gently, “I can understand that his idea, this is preparing the ground to own future, in the meantime, he has certain assurance, perhaps assuring will not be big, most has 50%. So long as is 50% assurances, was worth wrestling. So long as this he can pass safely, then faces other people, he lost finally, can certainly the whole body draw back. Once today, he had lived, then, Yuhao will certainly take to us in the future a huge pleasant surprise.”

“?”Yan Shaozhe surprised looks at Old Xuan, said: “Pleasantly surprised? What pleasant surprise?”

Old Xuan looked at Yan Shaozhe one, said: “Our Soul Master, no doubt must deal with any issue sanely. However, when our cultivating to be certain extent, not only needs to accumulate and diligently, needs to be crazy. I lacked crazily, therefore delayed was so long. Yuhao must do, stimulates own potential by these external strengths thoroughly. After he has second Soul Nucleus, his potential has been far in excess of us.”

In the Yan Shaozhe eye reveals color looking pensive, fight stimulates potential? He is not does not want this. However, to this cultivating is, wanted to find to constitute the match of threat to his life and death, was really too difficult. Shrek Academy has, is, will the person of Academy, who wrestle with his life and death? But facing bystander time, life and death wrestles is extremely also dangerous, moreover was very difficult to find such match.

Huo Yuhao has shortly after second Soul Nucleus, he whets himself with this way at present, and Dual Soul Nucleus fuses by oneself perfectly, simultaneously stimulates a more formidable potential, will give his future to prepare. In the future? The Yuhao future is what kind of?

Yan Shaozhe could not see clearly completely. He can only be now Huo Yuhao prayed in the heart silently that prayed he in wins with Zongli Wu the showdown. But squeezes own procedure actually not to dare to approve to Huo Yuhao this force. Facing the Evil Soul Master powerhouse, such does is the what kind danger?

At this time, airborne Huo Yuhao and Zongli Wu fight started.

Zongli Wu has not launched the attack to Huo Yuhao immediately, greatness in his right hand ** stick in airborne, a low and deep roaring sound gets up, a giant animal head appears before his body.

That impressively is Dragon Head, all over the body jet black like black ink, but above is actually emitting the sparkling stone green gloss, in Shuanglong is beating the intense green flame. It a appearance, entire airborne is the intermittent cold wind reverberation.

What is this?

Yan Shaozhe once and Zongli Wu has begun, but that time, he in burning oneself, brings up the rear for the companions, but Zongli Wu whole-heartedly, had not seen that at this time Zongli Wu releases huge Dragon Head unexpectedly, moreover as if that as if no what relations with him behind with Martial Soul related light shadow, is startled, has this Zongli Wu strength, actually been how the degree?

Let alone is he, even if a Holy Spirit Cult people, few people know how the Zongli Wu true strength has been the level.

Huge Dragon Head appears is not end point, but is the beginning.

The jet black huge body drills slowly outward, quick, dragon claw has extended. The huge body also gradually appears. This impressively is a jet black big dragon! Stated differently, this jet black big dragon does not have the scale, not to have the muscle, but is the jet black skeleton composes completely. But its aura, actually as if not compare the genuine big dragon difference.

Huo Yuhao has not released the time of this jet black big dragon to attack to him while Zongli Wu, but is static float is waiting for in the midair, because there is covering up of Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, no one can see his present expression. But his Octagonal Ice Source Concentration also continuously in rapid restores Soul Power for him.

Why didn't attack while this time? In numerous position powerhouses heart of Shrek Academy anxious.

That black Bone Dragon appears before all people completely, has used for ten seconds. Its complete body has hundred meters fully, the wingspan has about hundred meters similarly, compared with Martial Soul avatar of top powerhouse, this size is nothing, cultivates like Old Xuan that type is, Martial Soul avatar can be above the kilometer easily.

But, this black Bone Dragon seems is actually the entity! Moreover, as soon as it appears, in the entire sky various illusion also unceasing glitter, battle scene, moreover is Soul Beast, the sad and shrill pitiful yells of innumerable Soul Beast from the sky reverberate. As if some innumerable Soul Beast Wraith Soul were crying out crazily.

How many Soul Beast can this strike to kill to create so the picture?

Zongli Wu stands above the skull of that huge Bone Dragon, his body and Bone Dragon compare, although tiny, may have planting to breathe the impeded terror constriction.

“This dragon bone is I in a vestige discovered that Dragon Hun did not extinguish at that time. Although it is not top Dragon Clan, even is not pure the blood relationship. On the form fitting has actually had a Silver Dragon aura. The Dragon Clan history compares you also to hear. Dragon God split Golden Dragon King and silver dragon king in the past, in addition ninth dragon, these are the Dragon Clan genuine emperor's clans. But descendant Dragon Clan, Duoduo little little has some of their bloodlines. May in fact, some secret.”

“In the Dragon Clan descendant, inherits the bloodlines truly, only then ninth dragon. Golden Dragon King and silver dragon king that Dragon God itself splits do not have the descendant. Golden Dragon King it is said after the fission does not know why perished, silver dragon king disappears without a trace. Thus has caused the decline of Dragon Clan. However, when Dragon God is divided into their two, actually erupts the massive energies. And, separately contains is belonging to the Golden Dragon King the element control of ultimate strength as well as silver dragon king. At that time bathed Dragon Clan in this huge Dragon God gracious favor, the part came under the influences of these strengths. They afterward publicized, oneself body has Golden Dragon King and silver dragon king bloodlines aura, from this comes.”

The dragon bone that “I found in the past had withstood the silver dragon king gracious favor. Therefore, its not only Dragon Hun does not extinguish, but also has certain silver dragon king ability. In all my Beast Spirit most formidable existence. In order to captured it, I have used for ten years, in this period could not have any external force help. But ten years later, its strength also actually makes me cultivate from Soul Douluo is, breaks through Transcendent Douluo directly. Thus has taken over the position of Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master.”

“Usually, I think that does not hate to use its strength, because it is my Life Source Beast Spirit, even is my Martial Soul part. Today, you can compel me to release the Bone Dragon king, can be proud fully.”

The Zongli Wu sound is low and deep and cold and gloomy, but each character puts out, the sky will become the dark several points, aura powerful several points of Bone Dragon king, but Zongli Wu Soul Ring ray throughout in this black ray partly visible, could not see that actually he whether stimulated his Soul Ability.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-580-part-2





Volume 12

#580 - The Lizard Gecko Perishes, Zhongli To Leave


Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “You spoke these many idle talk, did not fear that my strength all did restore while these days?”

Zongli Wu laughs, “how restored? You believe that was one-to-one you to be able with me to contend? Let alone, the strength of saintess, as well as you formerly consumed, so is can it be that easy to restore. I and you wasted breath these many, was only, can have confidence to defeat you. The world changes, the wind and cloud gets up!”

Drinks with Zongli Wu one greatly, strange appeared, his big dragon, turned into the green suddenly, at the same time, in the sky black Wu Yun (black clouds) also simultaneously turned into the green. Airborne, strong winds writings, suddenly, unexpectedly are the real world discoloration.

Wind, this is the strength of wind, at this time, Zongli Wu completely likely is not Evil Soul Master.

The strong winds sway, in the sky has formed the little dragon volume wind unexpectedly naturally, directly soars Huo Yuhao to take away as many things as possible. The terrifying strong winds assail, not only makes the water element in air quickly reduce, makes Huo Yuhao Octagonal Ice Source Concentration be twisted broken.

Good strength big wind power. The element control of silver dragon king talent?

Such strange forms of combat, have gone beyond the ordinary Soul Master category completely. Even nobody can see the Zongli Wu use Soul Ability is anything. Depends on fights in Beast Spirit. His Beast Spirit and Huo Yuhao spirit is completely different two exists.

At this time, the genuine clear person, had Huo Yuhao.

Although he cannot see Zongli Wu Martial Soul as before is anything, what can affirm, Zongli Wu has certainly captured this only Bone Dragon king Beast Spirit by own Martial Soul, but he usually aims at should also be Soul Beast. That many Soul Beast wails, Beast Spirit has one. Means that these by Soul Beast that Zongli Wu kills, perhaps became at present the tonics of this Bone Dragon king!

No wonder he must chase down Beast God Di Tian, if his really success. He will certainly not swallow Beast God with this Bone Dragon king, but is controls Beast God Di Tian becomes new Beast Spirit, in turn swallows this Bone Dragon king. In this type unceasing swallows in the process of weak one by the powerhouse, Zongli Wu own strength continually is increased. But every time swallows, he must undergo a transformation.

Own Beast Spirit enough formidable time, swallows increases the Beast Spirit strength, when own Beast Spirit is not very formidable, is reverse swallows, replaces Beast Spirit.

From initial Soul Scholar, cultivates present Transcendent Douluo, dies Soul Beast in his hand has many, perhaps he is not clear. But Soul Ability that Zongli Wu have, in fact should be the auxiliary kinds, assists own Beast Spirit. Good Evil Soul Master, really to have his own characteristics and overbearing.

Huo Yuhao is in the strong winds, both arms inspire, pulls up to the upper air rapidly. However he discovered with amazement, own body unexpectedly some uncontrolled. This clashes unable to succeed suddenly unexpectedly.

Any flight must draw support from the air current the strength, in air current with the aid of air, sends out the air current through oneself, is the same. But this time releases Soul Power once more time, the body surrounding air instantaneously was actually found time. Soul Power that he is assigned away from the capital falls on the vacancy, the body slightly moves, has stopped.

But also at this moment, together the Daoist priest reaches several rice, the width surpasses over one meter huge green wind blade edge, from toward him has strangled to death in all directions, but. In grating fulmination sound, air splits slits, suddenly, to person Huo Yuhao body surrounding all air already to shatter, but he must along with the it torn into shreds feeling.

Such strength, was really too fearful.

Hid and cannot hide, even control own displacement, what to do but can also? Shoulders hardly?

The strength of this wind, unexpectedly is formidable in this way!

The double pupil of Huo Yuhao shines suddenly, his right hand in the body previous stroke, the body moved.

The ray dodges, he baseless disappeared. Thinks when all people, he has displayed his Teleportation. He reappeared in formerly position.

But this hidden reveals, happen to have actually avoided initial several wind edges. Body of Huo Yuhao unexpectedly that in same place unceasing flashing before, position, although also has the slight change, but is not big.

In the Zongli Wu hand Staff lifts up high, looks at such situation, on the face the look was cloudier. But in his eyeground deep place, some is actually only shocking.

At this time what Huo Yuhao uses is what strength, ordinary Soul Master cannot look, couldn't he have seen? This clearly is, space strength!

What person can control space force, Zongli Wu was too clear. Limit Douluo, only has Limit Douluo, can grasp the space strength. Why will appear on him.

Such strength, Zongli Wu has seen on mother, has seen on Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao. Before soon on Di Tian that he chases down has also seen. Relies on to the control of space force, Di Tian is making them fly back without any results. Was injured obviously, actually as before to they have launched a series of instead kills, causing them to dirty escaping. If runs slow, the final result can only be the death.

But, such strength actually should not appear on Huo Yuhao! He how old? What is he cultivates is? Why to grasp space force mystery?

Has Huo Yuhao controlled the space force? Answer actually negative. In realizing from experience of space force, he initially peeps the access.

The doubts of Zongli Wu also right, truly are only then Limit Douluo can control the space force, but said accurately that should be Dual Soul Nucleus can control is right.

After the human body has second Soul Nucleus, among the relations through two Soul Nucleus, all energies that can a finer feeling in this world have. And, has the space force.

But in this, cultivates the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus powerhouse, feels to want easy many. Because of this time, the strength of their within the body, through Yin-Yang both sides to collision and fusion production. These involved certain correlation in space.

Therefore, Huo Yuhao now to space force control, although is very shy, but his comprehension ability even must above several other Limit Douluo.

Light ray twinkle, the look on Huo Yuhao face also becomes strange. Each shuttle in the space, he also became regarding the understanding of Space Power more profound a point.

What is the space force? Actually is different time nodes, wants to control the space the mystery, cannot leave to the control of time variation, the mystery of implication, is it may be said that broad and profound.

That wind edges, quite therefore force him to comprehend the space force. Because somewhat is unfamiliar, therefore he cannot avoid all wind edges. But, the sole wind blade edge wants to injure to being in Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, is really actually unlikely.

Why as for cannot glitter through Space Power to other places, that is not because is not very skilled to the control of Space Power. If there is traded Beast God Di Tian, what not having the air can borrow is? The direct shuttle space can arrive in front of Zongli Wu.

May so, Zongli Wu also be surprised.

The wind blade edge stopped suddenly, the tornado reappeared, these time actually no longer was independent tornado, but was the small tornado collections, overlapped toward the center. Tornado start to fold unexpectedly put together, turn into a bigger tornado.

Air torn irrelevant to shatter, even the strengths of some tornado can also break the space.

Can't you reply on space force? I break the space, confuses all, looked how you also control.

If Beast God here, naturally has the means control, may begin studies Huo Yuhao that practices for the first time, naturally not Taihang.

The body drags in the strong winds, on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor is releasing the intense dark blue halo, the surrounding strong winds isolation outside. But even if cultivates for very low Soul Master can also be able to see that such does, regarding the Soul Power consumption of Huo Yuhao, is absolutely huge.

But Huo Yuhao as if not care, his movement is very slow, the both arms joint hold before the body slowly. During a strange strength in this joint held appears.

That is one group of small air currents, behind Huo Yuhao, presented Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion light shadow. This group of air currents look like Huo Yuhao is protecting the gem are common, slowly formation. But way that it revolves, is just opposite with that tornado.

He planned that resists my tornado violent with this group of small air currents? That can only be makes tornado violent swallow it instantaneously.

On the Zongli Wu face has filled disdaining. But he has not actually taken any action. He must cope with Huo Yuhao, actually do not kill him. Only then holds Huo Yuhao, turns into oneself Holy Spirit Cult Saint Child him, has the biggest benefit.

Therefore from the beginning he adopts consumes the tactic, who knows that in this consumption tactic own consumption was too big.

Sends out four people, two died in battle, was redeemed, was missing directly. This Huo Yuhao strength has also surpassed his judgment, at least was also equal to Transcendent Douluo. Moreover is limit Martial Soul Transcendent Douluo. His Soul Guidance Device definitely has strangeness. Otherwise, he is impossible such young to have the Transcendent Douluo strength.

However, how? Even if Transcendent Douluo cultivates is, must be consumed similarly. Therefore, so long as consumes continually, he will certainly defeat.

Therefore, Zongli Wu most wants to see, is the consumption of Huo Yuhao Soul Power. Consumes the certain extent, he can only admit defeat.

In this tornado violent is containing the extremely terrifying strength, but Zongli Wu have the means large scale reduction consumption, this is the function of his Bone Dragon king Beast Spirit, controls the wind element perfectly, the consumption is also smallest.

During the Huo Yuhao both arms joint held the air current become bigger and bigger, but this greatly was also only relative. One group of small air currents start to bloom outward its aura. So long as but meets the tornado violent, will immediately be destroyed.

Three finished, asks the monthly ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-580-part-3





Volume 12

#581 - The Wind Fire Changes


However, what Zongli Wu cannot see, under the Extreme Ice Battle God Armor mask, on the face of Huo Yuhao, reveals, is actually the smiling face. A very satisfied smile.

Huo Yuhao is smiling, at present this situation, just started cultivates Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus the time with him how resembles! Just, he initially wanted the bad risk in the practice are too many and are too many.

Although this tornado violent is strong, but shook compared with oneself first Soul Nucleus with initially him, what was also considered as?

But by disciplining of this tornado violent, he in disciplining continually promotes by the ice storm that Tang Sect secret art Controlling Crane Capturing Dragon forms, makes him sense in that tornado violent to be the deep meaning of wind unceasingly.

This was not the Soul Ability category thing, but is an own comprehension, is the self-created Soul Ability category.

Although Beast God Di Tian never gives Huo Yuhao to narrate, but through the several fights, Huo Yuhao had discovered gradually that Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus takes to itself the biggest advantage is anything.

That is: Perception!

This perception, came from the understanding to the world highest good, but is not the inborn perception.

The world divides the Yin-Yang, the Yin-Yang Dual Soul Nucleus formation, letting Huo Yuhao can see before many, thing that cannot see. For example space strength, for example the strength of element, many subtle points.

Therefore, when he in the fight, the thing that many others cannot feel, he can actually feel. Thus unceasing promotion own sensation.

At this time he sensation, is the strength of this wind. The mystery of wind element.

These wind elements were controlled forcefully, but, is very obvious, Zongli Wu, is his Beast Spirit Bone Dragon king, relies on Soul Power to control, the Bone Dragon king is Beast Spirit, has not controlled Dragon Clan of mystery of wind truly, although he has the ability of stimulation of movement wind. But will not have the true meaning of genuine wind. Otherwise, he is not the Bone Dragon king, but was silver dragon king.

But Huo Yuhao are actually feeling, goes to the change of feeling getting a chill element through Ice Element. The feeling gets a chill light and lively.

When like this good opportunity not to have, normally, on him where looks for these many wind elements?

As for the tornado striking power, Huo Yuhao a little wants to smile. This Zongli Wu eventually Soul Master, but is not Soul Engineer. If nine levels of Soul Engineer attacks him, absolutely will not use such scattered way.

How Huo Yuhao Extreme Ice Battle God Armor sees is nine levels of Soul Guidance Device, although the tornado violent is strong, but the strength is scattered, wants to break the defenses of this top nine levels of Soul Guidance Device is extremely difficult. Let alone, the Extreme Ice Battle God Armor leading role of Huo Yuhao is amplification and defense, own Extreme Ice Divine Crystal material quality defensive power strong. This wind is not Ma Xiaotao such Absolute Strength, broken against difficult, therefore, Huo Yuhao seems on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor the ray twinkle, that confuses Zongli Wu, his actual consumption is not absolutely big.

Zongli Wu eventually is a wily old fox, is less than a half minute, he thought that some are not right. Because he discovered that his tornado color has the change.

The green tornado, mixed with blue color gradually. This blue color is not his wind element!

What Huo Yuhao is Martial Soul? Lord Martial Soul is Spirit Eyes. The Spiritual Detection time is covering the audience, discovered that here Zongli Wu aura has the change, he has made dealing immediately first.

In the hand air current of condensation has promoted very suddenly, outrageously and tornado violent collides together. Immediately, strange appeared.

Behind Huo Yuhao, gold sun blue moon halo sparkle, the Ice Dragon volume and outside Wind Dragon volume when he releases collide together in instant, each other fused unexpectedly mutually.

The giant tornado in airborne slightly has stopped, along with it being defeated and dispersed, changes into the little dragon volumes toward to fly in all directions. But that huge wind element group, had broken away from the control of Zongli Wu immediately, dissipates toward all around.

Zongli Wu has the type sadly feeling that wants to spit blood, Huo Yuhao this move, looked like from him has stripped strength of massive element instantaneously. Moreover, Huo Yuhao itself as if has not received any injury.

Zongli Wu has realized own issue, although he does not know Huo Yuhao Dual Soul Nucleus, but also felt that some were not right.

In the under foot Bone Dragon Wangkou sends out low and deep roaring. The giant head raises, has spouted one group of green bright sphere toward Huo Yuhao.

This group of green bright sphere volumes are not big, when the head size, puffs out, because somewhat differs so much as to be beyond comparison with the volume of Bone Dragon king, gives people a uncoordinated feeling.

In the Zongli Wu hand Staff aims at that green bright sphere, a body Soul Ring ray rhythm, halos fall on that green bright sphere, bright sphere color immediately became profound.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection falls on this bright sphere, immediately had a scare.

Although he does not know that this move is any name, but, he has the trembling feeling of the heart. When this feeling, looks like his first time searches to observe the breaking cannon shell feeling to be similar to Spiritual Detection. In that small bright sphere, must contain how terrifying wind element, can so! Perhaps that might, compared with breaking cannon has not known that wanted formidable many times.

The sky-blue sword light drops from the clouds together, accurate cutting falls above bright sphere. Emperor's Sword and Peerless Extreme Ice.

When going smoothly everywhere Absolute Ice was just contacting that green bright sphere disappeared unexpectedly instantaneously.

Tore into shreds? Was Ice Element torn into shreds? But so the condensation wild wind element, can Zongli Wu also control? Has drawn support from the silver dragon king strength fellow worthily!

bright sphere arrived at the Huo Yuhao near shortly, Space Power has had more than enough, in front of that wild wind element, the surrounding space was confused completely, Huo Yuhao even had more than enough including Teleportation.

Perhaps this gadget, Extreme Ice Battle God Armor cannot block.

Then, good!

Huo Yuhao right fist recycling, a fist rumbles!

The Zongli Wu corners of the mouth place, sneers to reappear.

This green bright sphere, named, wind. In wind system strength that he can use and control most formidable strikes. Wind element extreme concentration. The might that this strikes, he had seen with one's own eyes, levels a mountain.

Merely by the strength of fist? Doesn't use Soul Ability?

However, his self-satisfacation has continued the flash, the next quarter, green bright sphere, disappears!

“Is this impossible?”Zongli Wu is almost stamps one's foot said.

Even if after is a large explosion, Huo Yuhao calm shoulders, he so will not be surprised. But, that green bright sphere, disappeared unexpectedly, this was makes him not accept in any event.

Then wild wind element! How saying that disappeared disappears?

Huo Yuhao will certainly not tell him answer. Time that his fist rumbles, in fact draws support, is Space Power.

The surrounding space truly was the disorder, but, he actually continuously in silently was reciting the incantation. Door of the small space opens on the fist, this leaf is the front door of undead Demi-plane channel, the stress, does not induct that wind instantaneously.

Can have big destructive effect as for it in undead Demi-plane, Huo Yuhao this little while did not have the count-down, will not fall in any case with the Ma Xiaotao similar position.

However, this, Huo Yuhao does not feel better. Inducts forcefully, he needs the stability of control space. If not has comprehended to Space Power, this, he also was really a moment ago not necessarily able to succeed.

The wind vanishes, the space naturally returned to normal. The body of Huo Yuhao also flickered to vanish below.

The gloomy sky suddenly becomes cold, the snowflake dances in the air!

Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain.

Was cloudy the face, the Zongli Wu mood has been stabilizing quickly. The air actually instantaneously becomes manic. The green wind vanished, displaces, is blazing, flame fire.

The sky turned into the red instantaneously, the temperature of just reducing has jacked unexpectedly. The bolide from the sky wreaks havoc, undifferentiated bombardment.

Is this strength of silver dragon king the control to element? After the wind, is the fire!

Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain and flame meteor shower front impact. In the sky, red and blooms blue the magnificent brilliance.

Zongli Wu through the meteor shower that the Beast Spirit Bone Dragon king releases is not Absolute Fire, but wins in the huge quantity, with his formidable Soul Power support, this meteor shower almost seizes every opportunity, moreover is having the terror explosive force. Huo Yuhao Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain unexpectedly oppressed is unable to take shape completely.

Around the Zongli Wu body, releases flame rays unceasingly outward. Keep Huo Yuhao from approaching.

The strength of flame, is more fearful than the beforehand wind, a more explosive strength.

The skeleton of Bone Dragon king turned into the flame color completely, the giant wings flaps, just likes huge fire dragon.

By the fire to subdue|grams ice, is without doubt good to choose. Especially in Huo Yuhao has consumed in the huge situation.

Zongli Wu is in progress according to his tactic completely, the goal must consume dead Huo Yuhao. An opportunity does not give him.

If everybody puts together the skill, perhaps Huo Yuhao also has the sudden opportunity. But what spells is Soul Power, looked at the strength and background. This undifferentiated attack, whatever Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection is formidable, is impossible to avoid. To Zongli Wu this cultivating is, achieves any attack slit has not been not difficult.

Therefore, Huo Yuhao appeared the personal appearance in sky quickly. Body surrounding Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain is still having an effect, each bolide shells, by Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain snowflake decomposition and to shatter.

Huo Yuhao as if oppressed somewhat has suppressed, on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor appeared some burned black.

Zongli Wu consistently stands in the head of Bone Dragon king, the complexion sinks to congeal, cannot see too many expression changes. But the situation from battlefield everyone could see that he had the superiority.

This forms of combat are very shameless, fight in which several persons take turns fighting one person so as to wear the opponent out, but also hits the consumption. But, will Evil Soul Master care about the appraisals of shameless these two characters?

The Huo Yuhao sigh spreads over the audience, he as if did not have the means.

Although Zongli Wu is shameless, but this without doubt is also a move of open intrigue. Is the frontage hardly spells. Moreover, his meteor shower can also control the direction. Special concentrated fire Huo Yuhao, forcing him to resist.

Like this continues, finally can be imagined.

Is this hot strength? Manic and fierce. Huo Yuhao during sigh, is feeling the change of outside fire element with smile on the face.

In the legend, silver dragon king can control all elements the strengths, including: Water, fire, earth, wind, Light, darkness and space. As well as various variations elements. For example: Thunder, ice wait / etc..

Zongli Wu this Bone Dragon King Zhishi withstood some silver dragon king gracious favors, is impossible to control these elements completely, but hopes that it can control to be many some are good.

When Huo Yuhao feels the Zongli Wu plan by the fire to subdue|grams ice, almost smiles to make noise.

He has, but Absolute Ice! Moreover this Extreme Ice Battle God Armor main body builds with Extreme Ice Divine Crystal. Extreme Ice Divine Crystal, does not know that many ten thousand years can breed little. Inborn has the huge restraint function to all fire attribute. The wind was not good, the present bolide is not better. Does not know that actually this Zongli Wu how thinks, attacks with this way unexpectedly.

However, experiences the fire element charm to be also good.

What a pity, Huo Yuhao is the Ice Attribute owner, regardless of his perception strong, to realizing from experience of fire element is also not entirely as desired. This is the issue in attribute, has nothing to do with the perception.

Persistent bolide attack is invalid, in the Zongli Wu hand Staff wields once more, under the body the Bone Dragon King Juda head raises, a blue fireball directly soars Huo Yuhao ** however leaves.

Like the beforehand wind, the might of this blue fireball without doubt is also extremely terrifying.

Its fate gentle breeze is also same. Huo Yuhao can only to undead Demi-plane say that was sorry.

Sky suddenly strange peaceful.

The fight of both sides looks like has been at one type balanced and is the condition of probe. The surface seems, seemed Huo Yuhao suffers a loss. May in fact, Zongli Wu consumption Soul Power should many that he is more. At least Huo Yuhao thinks so. Although he is also consuming these days, may rely on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, his consumption was smaller.

“Huo Yuhao.”The Zongli Wu cloudy and cold sound reverberates in the air.

Huo Yuhao tranquil looks at Zongli Wu, “what did Sir Cult Master have to say?”

Zongli Wu has smiled suddenly, as if smiles very happily, “you thought that you are very intelligent? Relied on nine levels of Soul Guidance Device, the consumption has little been dealing with my attack?”

“Um?”Huo Yuhao surprised looks at Zongli Wu, “what do you want to say?”

Zongli Wu said with a smile: “I must tell you am, you made a mistake. All that I made a moment ago, in fact, are gathering the strength!”

“Gathers the strength?”Huo Yuhao somewhat is perplexed.

Zongli Wu said: “Told you not to have anything, was in any case quick we are the whole family.”His sound only then Huo Yuhao can hear.

4000 character big chapters asked the monthly ticket.

Bought our Douluo Continent hardbound hard shell to reprint the first volume of book friends, saw beyond Tang Sect and Tang San? This is only then this set of hardcover has. This set of hardcover has made my a lot of efforts, altogether 14 books, will promote one after another. Each will have beyond independent, all before is, has not issued. I am Douluo reprint to write specially. Will promote one after another. Purchases from our shop, can buy the signature version. Has a look quickly, naughty, treasure, shop there search: Dazzles world Tang Sect, can find our shops.

We have the Tang Sect card sign that the entire net starts exclusive, plays the Tang Sect world book friends to have a look, certainly will feel very kind.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-581





Volume 12

#582 - Who Has Planned Who?


“My this Bone Dragon king, itself after is not the real dragon, cannot adjust the adverse impact that the element change brings through the Dragon Clan formidable body. Therefore, when displays any element ability, requires the time to adjust. Let the body adapt. Even if I have swallowed that many formidable Soul Beast souls to it, needs this repugnant warming up link as before. Only then after warming up, it can display the biggest battle efficiency. It inherited the silver dragon king attribute, although only then winds and fire two types. However, the controls of these two types of elements, actually approached Absolute. Therefore......, Then you must face, is, wreaking havoc of wind and fire.”

The voice falls, Zongli Wu body surrounding sudden ray Sheng, the Bone Dragon king under body turned into the black greatly. But the sky, actually turned into the azure red bi-color.

The bunch bolide appears in the midair again, but, this time, they are the blue color.

The bunch green wind also appears, the wind helps the fire intensity! Next flickers, blue bolides, just like leaving the chest cavity shell are ordinary, directly soars the Huo Yuhao bombardment to go.

Xuan imposing manner, making surrounding area in the air within hundred li (0.5km) be full of the burnt flavor, the terrifying oppression strength, making the person not gasp for breath.

The aura that the mood very stable Old Xuan discoloration, Zongli Wu has released finally at this time, has been enough to contend with him!

Such attack, even if is Limit Douluo him, must concentrate carefully treats fully, even must display Martial Soul avatar to be good. This Zongli Wu strength, has gone far beyond Old Xuan sentences in advance.

Zongli Wu itself obviously is also not Limit Douluo, but, cultivates for at least also over 97 levels, what is more fearful, he is relying on this special Beast Spirit, stiffly the battle efficiency will be increased to be able with the degree that Limit Douluo resists. Worthily is the eminent character in Evil Soul Master. In the future, if he can achievement Limit Douluo, its strength and battle efficiency, will certainly exceed Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui.

Facing including Limit Douluo must feel that like this frightened attack, how Huo Yuhao does deal?

Ju Zi(orange) has stood from own seat, the double fist grips tightly, double pupil stubbornly is looking steadily at the upper air, she naturally not because Zongli Wu likely must win to stand up, he is worried about that during the wind fire occurred simultaneously the man.

Such attack, can he resist really?

Light ray twinkle, on the Huo Yuhao face reveals a ice-cold chill in the air, came! This is the Zongli Wu true strength. Also then, should make him have a look, my strength.

A light ice blue color ray blooms from Huo Yuhao outward, this ice blue color ray shoots up to the sky suddenly, in the sky, the dry and hot aura was washed the majority in the flash unexpectedly. The terrifying Soul Power fluctuation made that airborne plunge the Huo Yuhao wind and fire slightly has stopped unexpectedly.

The Zhan blue light beam diameter exceeds ten meters, has broken in the upper air, a higher sky will lighten completely, behind Huo Yuhao, the blue moonlight ray puts greatly, his Extreme Ice Battle God Armor is also so, the intense blue halo from the sky reverberates, terrifying Absolute Ice is going toward his body condensation at an exceptional pace.

In the beforehand fight, Zongli Wu has not used throughout fully, did Huo Yuhao never use fully? Now, their fights just started.

A handle short blade edge, appearance of being quietly, in Huo Yuhao during grasps. Saw that this handle short blade edge appears, the pupil of Zongli Wu has contracted slightly, this impressively is one of the Huo Yuhao gambling stakes, Divine Tool that in his mouth said.

Regarding this handle short blade edge, the hearts of Zongli Wu too many coveting, this has not filled the weapon of Absolute Ice aura, even if gives him, does not come in handy. Naturally, nobody will think that treasure are many, if can fall in the hand, naturally is also the big good deed.

He wants to have a look actually very much, this handle short blade edge when resisting own wind bolide can play what kind of role.

Huo Yuhao told him with the motion quickly. Right hand short blade edge before the body cuts, the movement is not quick, but is very elegant. Blue blade glow the electricity shoots immediately, blade glow continuously ** leaves about ten meters.

That blue meteors arrived at the Huo Yuhao near, when that blade glow falls, the blue bolide disappeared instantaneously, even links mist and dust not to stay behind.

The Huo Yuhao movement starts to speed up, is in the midair, treadons Ghost Shadow Perplexing Track, whole person elegant looks like gust. But on him that blue light beam actually throughout moves along with his motion. In that blue light beam, the found time air current cannot become the strength that restricts him to move. His movement like the lightning, each blade cuts quickly, the piece of bolide along with it disappearing, that strange quick incomparable bolide, unexpectedly somewhat will unable to follow his speed. Overall striking power clearly be much more formidable than Soul Power that Huo Yuhao releases, but, contacts with him truly, actually throughout only then few parts.

Huo Yuhao looks like in the chef solves the cow to be ordinary, unceasing in the short blade edge with oneself hand solves the fire meteor, but these bolides how to attack and outflank, regarding, even is the concentrated fire, throughout is actually not able to hit on him.

If Zongli Wu has controlled the situation, Huo Yuhao has controlled snow and ice formidable Gods in this situation.

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath and Morning Dew Knife! In his hands finally bloomed the true brilliance, that formidable blade glow, making any flame not have the strength of half minute resistance before it. Is relying on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor and Morning Dew Knife amplification, lets Huo Yuhao, in this can threaten during the attack of Limit Douluo top obviously stiffly!

Has he retained in the beforehand fight unexpectedly?

Yan Shaozhe dumbfounded looks at airborne Huo Yuhao, he now is clear, after the powerhouse, why Huo Yuhao defeats four Transcendent Douluo ranks one after another already dares to face Zongli Wu. His strength, has surpassed similarly also own judgment! Transcendent Douluo? Absolute Martial Soul Transcendent Douluo? Perhaps not only is also so simple. The equipment is no doubt important, but similarly, does not have absolutely the formidable strength, can the strong equipment play the major role?

Huo Yuhao only thought that at this time Morning Dew Knife became extending of oneself body, oneself each simplest movement, can make Morning Dew Knife accurate sways the blade glow of that chilly fan.

Blade glow everywhere one visit, in the air dry Ice Element will appear unexpectedly naturally, on the knife, has dim mist throughout.

This is Morning Dew Knife, mounted has iced stone of Xue Nu god Morning Dew Knife. This is true Divine Tool! Although Huo Yuhao knows, when he said Morning Dew Knife is Divine Tool, Zongli Wu or Ju Zi(orange), have not believed. Because, this belongs to Soul Master world, most formidable weapon, should be Soul Guidance Device is right. Divine Tool? What is Divine Tool? In their eyes, nine levels of Soul Guidance Device were Divine Tool. But this handle Morning Dew Knife, actually obviously is not Soul Guidance Device.

But, this belongs to another world strength!

The light smile appears on the face of Huo Yuhao, he does not need others to believe itself, so long as he with the strength showed that was enough.

The attack of wind bolide has continued several minutes, when the last meteor disappears under Morning Dew Knife, all in sky as if became normal. That Bone Dragon king restored the black.

Zongli Wu looks that airborne grasps the short sword to face own Huo Yuhao fearlessly, his nod of gently, said: “I somewhat believe finally that you said this handle blade was the Divine Tool truth. Without it, you cannot block my attack.”

Huo Yuhao had not denied, nod of gently, “if you did not live compared with me for over a hundred years, does not have the qualifications to stand in my front.”

Zongli Wu satirized him to draw support from the external force, was he is also satirizing Zongli Wu to live spatially for hundred years?

Zongli Wu coldly snorted, in the hand Staff holds up once more, the Bone Dragon king under body has lifted the head. The giant wings shakes slowly. But Zongli Wu own body, at an exceptional pace is increasing. Behind him continuously float light shadow is gradually only with his body superposition. Seventh Soul Ring, red seventh Soul Ring, ray twinkle.

Is this Huo Yuhao first time sees clearly Soul Ability that Zongli Wu must display, Martial Soul avatar?

His shouldn't Soul Ability be the amplification kind? Then, his Martial Soul avatar is what affects? And that does Bone Dragon fuse by oneself completely together?

Huo Yuhao is not quite clear, but he was actually not worried that this fight, is to the biggest test. Meanwhile, is best tempering, the enemy is more formidable, is also best to his tempering effect.

The worry of Yan Shaozhe does not exist Huo Yuhao here actually, he has not thought will be killed by Zongli Wu, this was one had the self-confidence of Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus powerhouse.

Zongli Wu body continuously amplification to about ten meters high time, stopped, his whole person has covered in a darkness completely.

With Titled Douluo Martial Soul avatar the kilometer altitude of hundred meters and compared with, ten meters high Martial Soul avatar seems is frequently nothing, even the broad imposing manner does not have continually. However, after Zongli Wu Martial Soul avatar completes, the Huo Yuhao complexion, first time after surface armor, changes.

In the Zongli Wu hand long Staff with the change of his body is also increasing, after he completes ten meters change the bodies, his Staff has also evolved to complete, that is a handle sickle, a handle giant sickle, the knife edge has ten meters, giant sickle grasps in the height ten meters Zongli Wu hand, seems some are uncoordinated.

However, after he completes changes body, an indescribable terrifying pressure from all directions extrudes to Huo Yuhao, he only thought that invisible strength as if must pull out from the body his soul.

---

I in prestige - platform sent our Tang Sect card sign to introduce and picture in detail, everybody was interested to go to the platform to have a look. The new friend can transmit: The Tang Sect card sign, will have the automatic reply.

Joins our prestige - platform is very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number, searches Tang three few, has the authentication was our families. Everybody can watch out, our micro stations, officially got online over the two days, inside has various functions, hopes that everybody likes. It is estimated that tomorrow will be similar.

Also welcome everybody to come our washing, the valuable shop: Dazzles world Tang Sect, selects and purchases our Tang Sect signature book and Tang Sect card sign. The following peripheral product one after another will also be released.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-582-part-1





Volume 12

#582 - Who Has Planned Who?


This feeling is absolutely fearful. He also finally indistinctly understands that Zongli Wu Martial Soul was anything.

His Martial Soul, is not pure amplification and auxiliary so is absolutely simple. Itself, has the formidable battle efficiency similarly.

This battle efficiency, through the fusion of soul and flesh and blood, in addition variation, sublimation of Martial Soul.

Evolved into like initially Xu Sanshi Martial Soul Black Tortoise Shield, this Zongli Wu Martial Soul should also in he cultivates for in the unceasing promotion is evolving unceasingly product. Its true name, should be called, Grim Reaper Devil Puppet?

Yes, Grim Reaper Devil Puppet.

Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui Martial Soul, is Blood Soul Devil Puppet, is existed very formidable, but Zongli Wu Martial Soul, but must surpass his mother.

Grim Reaper Douluo? From the present situation, Zongli Wu should be true Grim Reaper Douluo is right. His Martial Soul avatar, is god of death avatar! That Beast Spirit Bone Dragon King Zhenzheng status, should be, god of death mount!

This is complete condition Zongli Wu, no wonder he before resist he attacks time and time again, has not revealed the mood that anything is irritable, because of beginning to end, him still in has retained!

Huo Yuhao has not displayed Martial Soul avatar, Snow Emperor and Ice Emperor all in the deep sleep, Eye of Asura does not suit the close combat, but to them at present this situation, the close combat is the only choice, nobody can evade.

“Roar”Bone Dragon King Yangtian roared, the giant body shot up to the sky instantaneously, the terrifying wings flapped, obstructs the cloud to block out the sun. Is having the god of death on top of the head, directly soars Huo Yuhao to flush away.

The speed that it that huge body, flies unexpectedly is that astonishing, seems only a twinkle, huge Grim Reaper's Scythe, arrived in front of Huo Yuhao.

Six wind hot whirlpools, appears in all directions, limits way that Huo Yuhao all can fend. Terrifying oppression strength, as if must instantaneously tear into shreds his whole person.

In the Huo Yuhao double pupil, the ray puts greatly, on the forehead, Eye of Destiny already opened. Purple gold colored light glow attacks together outrageously above that Bone Dragon king.

Quiet green Fire of Soul immediately fierce beat, six wind hot whirlpools also because of losing control, but is defeated and dispersed instantaneously, and erupts the wild air current.

Similarly is in the air current, itself controls Zongli Wu of strength of wind fire to come under the influence naturally to be smaller, Grim Reaper's Scythe in his hand even links a tremor not to have, arrived in front of Huo Yuhao.

“Bites!”Ice and Snow Goddess Breath has supported Grim Reaper's Scythe. But body instantaneous flying upside down of Huo Yuhao, the whole body is actually filling black air currents. The black air currents of these terrors are permeate to his within the body unexpectedly directly, to his forehead permeating, as if must corrode his soul to be ordinary.

Zongli Wu slightly rocked in the Bone Dragon king top of the head, in hand on Grim Reaper's Scythe were many a blue misty gloss. Under strong black aerodynamic impact that on him releases, these blue color are melting at an exceptional pace.

This is the strength, the god of death strength.

The Huo Yuhao body is flying upside down backward, in eye the ray has actually filled frantically, yes, he wants is the oppression strength of this level! Even if Old Xuan does not have the means to have such oppression strength to him, because of Old Xuan to him, does not have the murderous intention.

Within the body Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus is revolving at an exceptional pace, that collides to produce the whirlpool Soul Power chain link unceasingly, the running rate at least is usual over three times, within the body Soul Power gushes out unceasingly outward.

Dual Soul Nucleus is he dares to resist the Zongli Wu genuine card in a hand, because of existence of this Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, making his resilience go far beyond ordinary Soul Master. Therefore, his consumption absolutely does not seem that big like the surface.

However, the Zongli Wu battle efficiency also similarly surpassed him to sentence in advance, Grim Reaper's Scythe, good handle Grim Reaper's Scythe! This handle Grim Reaper's Scythe seemed his first Soul Ability Staff transforms to come from before, but has covered Huo Yuhao of audience actually to be able by Spiritual Detection to feel clearly, this Grim Reaper's Scythe clearly was Zongli Wu eighth Soul Ability.

Seventh Soul Ability god of death avatar, eighth Soul Ability, Grim Reaper's Scythe, makes him in addition so formidable. Can not drop the wind perhaps facing Limit Douluo.

That collided a moment ago, even if Absolute Ice on Morning Dew Knife, cannot seal up the death air/Qi that on Grim Reaper's Scythe contained completely. The death air/Qi of these terrors, are corroding the body of Huo Yuhao at an exceptional pace. Extreme Ice Battle God Armor can filter part, but the part infiltrated as before. That type is similar to the maggot of tarsal bone, moreover permeating ability that seizes every opportunity, anybody meets, can creepy feeling.

But Huo Yuhao cannot. After that death aura drilled into his body, must wreak havoc crazily is swallowing his vitality. These death aura through swallowing vitality unceasingly expands itself, till Huo Yuhao relationship of form and spirit to completely extinguish, this is the strength of god of death!

What a pity, after these death aura entered Huo Yuhao within the body, greeted them, was small whirlpools, was containing Spiritual Power and Absolute Ice whirlpool. The strengths of these swirls are unable to melt the god of death aura directly, but, can actually adsorb them. Then through Huo Yuhao own control, discharges outside the body.

On Morning Dew Knife, were many black, if examined in extremely near distance that will discover, that is a small black whirlpool, above seems containing the extremely terrifying strength.

“Admits defeat. You possibly are not my match, I do not want to destroy you. By your talent, in the future, decides to become my Holy Spirit Cult successor.”Saying of Zongli Wu coldly, but look seemed has actually been full of the bemoaning the state of the universe flavor.

From collided, Huo Yuhao that a moment ago he can feel although is relying on Humanoid Soul Guidance Device and that Divine Tool blade and contends, but in fact, his true strength has not arrived at Transcendent Douluo absolutely. But own cultivating is, is actually 98 levels of Transcendent Douluo really! In this case, the disparity between both sides is the insurmountable gap. By Beast Spirit, oneself can level the disparity between Martial Soul.

Huo Yuhao stubborn shaking the head, “won me to say again!”At the same time was saying, in his hand Morning Dew Knife has held up once more, the look also suddenly becomes stagnates. The strength of surroundings violent wind fire is attacking his body unceasingly, ripples a piece by piece halo on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor.

Hasn't he come under the influence of god of death aura? Zongli Wu somewhat surprisedly visits him, and impossible not to have been affected. Should be suppressed.

Huge Bone Dragon roared again, wings flapped, flushed away toward Huo Yuhao. Huo Yuhao gave his Soul Assault to injure to it a moment ago is not small, but its soul is in itself and a Zongli Wu body, the injury of therefore, receiving was eventually limited.

The big dragon just flew, Zongli Wu has gotten rid, huge Grim Reaper's Scythe wields once more, the terrifying black great blade edge from the sky flashes through together, the huge black blade edge shade almost breaks the space, arrived in front of Huo Yuhao instantaneously.

Huo Yuhao only with enough time keeps off Morning Dew Knife before the body, next one flickers, the whole person was cut to fly, this time, he even continually displays the Soul Assault opportunity not to have.

The body from the sky flies upside down, on him has black light fog in the twinkle and corrosion.

Bone Dragon King accelerates suddenly, almost appears in the Huo Yuhao point of descent instantaneously, giant Dragon's Tail flung horizontally, directly soars Huo Yuhao to pull out to strike around the middle.

The body of Huo Yuhao, seems like hit the violent that the baseball pulls out generally strikes to shoot. Extreme Ice Battle God Armor has made the sound of tooth acid.

What is more terrifying, although his body pulled out flew, but around the body also has the massive wind hot whirlpools to wreak havoc, is tearing his body.

Zongli Wu has not left Bone Dragon king top of the head throughout, in the hand Grim Reaper's Scythe cuts once more, the space splits, black light shadow dodges not to have.

The distant place, the Huo Yuhao body was struck on the road which must be taken that flies, the black form together is quietly rips open the space to appear in the midair.

It looks like Zongli Wu doppelganger is ordinary, in the hand the sickle sweeps away, cutting maliciously to the body of Huo Yuhao.

The person who below observes has turned very quiet at this time, looks at this.

Ended, perhaps Huo Yuhao these really ended.

“Bites!”In the middle does not allow to send, Huo Yuhao reversed the personal appearance suddenly, in the hand Morning Dew Knife pulls up at the inconceivable angle, has blocked fatally this struck. However, his body again was actually struck to fly, in the Extreme Ice Battle God Armor surface has covered entirely the black air current. Saw that the whole person looked like must be swallowed.

He does not have to attempt to fight again, but turns around runs, airborne flies toward the distant place.

“To run? With enough time?”Zongli Wu sneers, under foot Bone Dragon King He his regard is interlinked, a giant wings racket, is almost similar to Teleportation is suddenly common, the twinkling appears beyond the kilometer, directly soars Huo Yuhao to pursue.

The fight carried on this time, as if all have been away from finished are not far. Falls into this degree of leeward, in the confrontation of Titled Douluo rank powerhouse, almost lost the possibility of make a comeback.

That several attacks, Huo Yuhao was injured a moment ago without a doubt, since he has been incapable of resisting the strength of that god of death to look.

He escapes now, but must suppress these god of death as far as possible the strengths. But, then? The attack of Zongli Wu will also continue to follow!

Pursues one to run away, what making Zongli Wu somewhat accidental was, Huo Yuhao Extreme Ice Battle God Armor actually can also use, moreover always does not allow to send in the middle erupted the speed instantaneously, pulled open with him the distance, moreover from the sky circled.

This degree of speed erupts, is also enormous to the Soul Power consumption, does this boy, actually want to do?

Following on the heels that Zongli Wu sneers, now he is not anxious, the sky changed gloomy. From airborne shone in Huo Yuhao blue color light beam, at this time vanished quietly. Without this supplies, seems, he should unable to insist too for a long time.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-582-part-2





Volume 12

#582 - Who Has Planned Who?


In this time, suddenly, is wiping the strange Bai Se (White Color) ray to be quietly has shot.

Zongli Wu one startled, subconscious is Grim Reaper's Scythe cuts. But actually falls on the vacancy, then the strength of formidable god of death, was passed through by that Bai Se (White Color) ray unexpectedly, falling that the white light is quietly on the Bone Dragon king.

This Bone Dragon king had been practiced Life Source Beast Spirit by Zongli Wu, each other regard is interlinked. Although that white light falls on the Bone Dragon king has not had any injury to it, but intense restless instantaneously appears in the Zongli Wu heart.

Also at this time, front continuously in running away Huo Yuhao has turned around 0.1 strange strengths to bloom from him suddenly outward.

Attached to the black air current on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, is changes into small eddy currents to disperse to four unexpectedly, then welcomed in the Zongli Wu direction.

In that black whirlpool, already, not only the strength of god of death, but also is mixing with the ice and mind.

Zongli Wu does not dare to neglect, under foot Bone Dragon king spits the breath blowout broadly, this melted the strengths of these small eddy currents, the speed that but it flies therefore was also affected.

In this time, Zongli Wu was hearing Huo Yuhao cold snort|hum.

He notes at this time, after these black air currents compel Huo Yuhao, on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor the profound blue color vanished, displaces, is clear grey colored.

Appearance that huge phantom is quietly behind Huo Yuhao, this phantom is very unusual, unexpectedly is a great turtle. All over the body golden yellow great turtle.

" Hey, the counter-attack, started! " Shrek City, somebody hey low saying with a smile.

golden light dodges, instantaneous connection on Huo Yuhao and Zongli Wu. Under all person shocking gazes, they instantaneously has exchanged the position.

Zongli Wu appears in airborne that formerly Huo Yuhao was, but Huo Yuhao appears above the Bone Dragon king top of the head that him has stood.

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife, turned into both hands to gather grasps, since the knife point downward 0.1 Bai Se (White Color) rays brave from the Huo Yuhao whole body suddenly. White light Sheng, emerges in Morning Dew Knife instantaneously greatly suddenly.

The Bone Dragon king of under foot has gone all out to struggle at this time panic-stricken, is, Huo Yuhao both feet. Actually likely mounted on it has resembled.

Meanwhile, a golden halo sends out from the Huo Yuhao top of the head, just completely covers the entire Bone Dragon King Juda head.

" Soul Shaking Burst! "

Silent thundering resounds in Bone Dragon King Danao, the huge wound made its quiet green Fire of Soul China-foreign brave from skull all slits unceasingly.

The round trip that Zongli Wu of distant place goes all out catches up, but also stuffy snort|hum, huge god of death avatar reduced several points.

Is impossible, Fire of Soul of Bone Dragon king is quite formidable, this Soul Burst clearly did not have beforehand Soul Assault to be formidable! How it can receive heavy wound instantaneously.

Was that spoken parts light a moment ago?

Yes, is that spoken parts light. Three Eyed Golden Lion leaves Huo Yuhao one of the two big divine skill, Soul Expropiation. Falls zero the mind defensive power instantaneously.

Sharp Morning Dew Knife, maliciously pricked in the skull of Bone Dragon king at this time.

Bone Dragon King Yangtian called out pitifully. In an instant, took the crack on skull for the beginning, the faint trace Bai Se (White Color) ray continuously has covered toward its forehead instantaneously.

Its Fire of Soul bitter experience to this Bai Se (White Color) ray. Immediately was the snow and ice sprinkles the hot oil to be ordinary likely, suddenly ablation. The entire Bone Dragon King Pangda body also instantaneously became unbending.

Power of Purification!

Before Huo Yuhao, so is why passive, has been coming under attack, his corners of the mouth place currently also has the blood to flow. For wins the time to oneself, recited the incantation.

Why lets the god of death the strength clothes on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, must conceal the Necromancer ability that oneself release.

This fight. Already not only the competion of strength, is the collision on intelligence.

Actually was who to plan who?

The body that Zongli Wu clashes rapidly stops in the midair suddenly, the pitiful yell of sad and shrill sounds of people from the sky does not reverberate, that god of death huge body withers rapidly, quick changed the human form, blood in gulps emitted from the Zongli Wu mouth unceasingly.

Beast Spirit is no doubt formidable. But is interlinked with his mind, even can be said as part of his body. Huo Yuhao was extinguishing unexpectedly instantaneously has killed his Beast Spirit, without a doubt, was instantaneous heavy wound he.

This is Zongli Wu has not thought. He is not clear, by the great strength of Bone Dragon king. Why strikes including Huo Yuhao cannot resist.

Undead Creature is Undead Creature, regardless of Bone Dragon king strong, inescapable Undead Creature category.

But Huo Yuhao, is actually now on Douluo Continent, only, Necromancer!

Power of Purification, is any Undead Creature difficult adversary, formidable Undead Creature is no exception, let alone, the soul fluctuates, Soul Burst before. Sharp Divine Tool Ice and Snow Goddess Breath. This all, is makes a conductor and medium to Power of Purification.

In this case, the strength of this Bone Dragon king is no doubt formidable, possibly can't withstand?

Huo Yuhao has been waiting for the opportunity, from feels the match suppression to promote itself at first, releases the potential. To afterward show the enemy to weakly, as well as the instantaneous eruption of this most critical moment, all during his computation.

The Zongli Wu biggest problem is, he has forgotten, Huo Yuhao in fact, is control system Battle Soul Master!

Bai Se (White Color) Power of Purification rapid toward the Bone Dragon King Pangda body spread in the past, it completely lost the soul, the strength of all elements, no longer listened to him to control at this time.

[!] Zongli Wu stagnates in the airborne body, looks that the Huo Yuhao look has filled cloudy and cold and evil. Like this loses, he is not willingly, he is not really willingly! He looks certainly, cultivating of Huo Yuhao for and is inferior to him. Has used he not clear strength, can therefore turn defeat into victory.

But, he has not actually thought that reason that Evil Soul Master when facing ordinary Soul Master has the superiority, in fact not also for this reason?

When the Zongli Wu hand Staff holds up once more, really had some shivering. The terrifying aura spreads once more, his imposing manner as if had not been affected by heavy wound by oneself.

Huo Yuhao has also relaxed, the dark blue ray reappears above Extreme Ice Battle God Armor.

On Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife, blade glittering, the dazzling halo from the sky reverberates. The Absolute chill in the air releases outward.

" Huo Yuhao, you won. " Zongli Wu nodded to Huo Yuhao, ", but, starting from this moment, you are our Holy Spirit Cult life and death archenemy. In the near future. We will kill you not at any cost, but is not the priests and disciples subdues you. On you have one type to make me feel the frightened strength. In any event, we will not make you Limit Douluo. Because, means our Holy Spirit Cult end on that day. Today you won. But the next time, you perish inevitably. "

The voice falls, on Zongli Wu blooms suddenly the dazzling glare, he changes into one group of black meteors to be common, runs away toward the distant place. Even has not returned to the Sun-Moon Empire army.

He lost, according to the written pledge to fulfill a military order, he must be handled by the military law. Therefore, he can only choose to leave now.

The Holy Spirit Cult subordinate, at this time is also vacant. They even are not quite until now clear. Why Cult Master such inexplicable losing. This was really too inconceivable.

Sun-Moon Empire, solemnly silent, but Shrek, has been stopping a moment later, the cheers resound through the horizon instantaneously.

Fifth. This is fifth fights!

Huo Yuhao is relying on strength of the unexpectedly, struck to kill the Holy Spirit Cult two powerhouses successively, seized one person, but also defeated them. Must know that this is the powerhouse of Transcendent Douluo level, one, is Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master!

Regardless of following competion Huo Yuhao whether can also win. What without a doubt is, today has made his war become famous.

Starting from this moment, his name, formally entered Douluo Continent the forest of powerhouse.

The huge Bone Dragon king body crashes, falls broken the smashing in the ground.

Huo Yuhao also together drops from the clouds with it, falls on not far away. on one knee knees down, in gulps is panting for breath.

This war, he wins how difficult? The attack of Grim Reaper's Scythe, has had not the small wound to him eventually. In order to create finally opportunity of this turning defeat into victory, to conceal the Necromancer ability. He must bear patiently. The price of bearing patiently, is the huge consumption and injury.

On Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, the ray is glittering lightly, Huo Yuhao slowly standing body.

Because is away from the armor, nobody can see clearly his present appearance, on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, the ray did not even weaken anything compared with before.

Flavor that the Sun-Moon Empire army, somewhat keeps silent greatly.

One after another five fights, all are Transcendent Douluo, is Evil Soul Master Transcendent Douluo, has lost unexpectedly to him. Even if Limit Douluo wants to achieve such success not to be easy? However, he actually such achieved.

Stands in Ju Zi(orange) behind nine levels of Soul Engineer, in the eye revealed the color of fear.

No one wants such dead in the battlefield. Dies in the Huo Yuhao hand.

Although clearly knows that present Huo Yuhao is the consumption is huge, but, at this time, nobody proposed unexpectedly one must go to battle.

Holy Spirit Cult has defeated, the surplus Holy Spirit Cult powerhouses return to remove quietly, under the leadership of Feng Ling, arrives in front of Ju Zi(orange), after bowing salutes, anything had not said that has arrived at behind the team.

Zongli Wu ran, he is not willing to withstand military law handling, but, what without a doubt is, Ju Zi(orange) in this army, will not have other sounds to question again. Without Army Supervisor, War-God Empress is this army true control.

……

The 24 th volume of our peerless Tang Sect simplified form has published, in our washing, the valuable shop sells, I just went to the shop to sign yesterday 500 books, first come, first served. Selects and purchases quickly. Buys one also to throw in our Tang Sect card sign to propagandize the playbill as well as value four Yuan card signs. Comes quickly.

The first volume of Douluo Continent first second edition, I also supplemented have signed 500 books, everybody can also continue to select and purchase, has a look outside our exclusive, Tang Sect, Tang San. Waits for second outside, I want to write Xiao Wu before meeting Tang San, story in Star Dou Forest.

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-582-part-3





Volume 12

#583 - Knife Skill Of God


The Ju Zi(orange) goal has been achieved, in this time heart even has the joyful feeling. With the hand of Huo Yuhao, massacres these Evil Soul Master, expels Zongli Wu, this has made her plan successfully complete. As for does not attack Shrek City, retreats in light of this, what was also considered as? Domestic strength keeps away foreign aggression, this truth, Ju Zi(orange) is clear.

However, the joyful mood has actually maintained very short time, many worry also appear. Because, Huo Yuhao, was too strong!

Understanding of Ju Zi(orange) Huo Yuhao, has gone far beyond his side these nine levels of Soul Engineer, at this time, showed such strength, was not any good deed.

Although Ju Zi(orange) knows, since has destroyed the massive Sun-Moon Empire upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device person is Huo Yuhao, but that is he achieves after all in secret. Most Sun-Moon Empire people and high levels do not know that has such existence of person.

However, this time is different, Huo Yuhao has routed the Holy Spirit Cult five big powerhouses by strength of the unexpectedly one after another, includes Cult Master Zongli Wu, under this is a focus of public attention, without a doubt, he a war became famous. Meanwhile, he also inevitably becomes the object who Sun-Moon Empire most important will strike to kill in the future.

This kind of young and promising Soul Master powerhouse, will certainly be the mainstay of Shrek Academy in the future, even is the entire Soul Master eminent character, but he is doing with Sun-Moon Empire right, does not solve him, Xu Tianran will sleep on pins and needles surely. Meanwhile, Holy Spirit Cult certainly with all might and main will also cope with him.

The heart of Ju Zi(orange) is a little chaotic, great strength of Huo Yuhao, even has very tremendous influence to her plan, but, since the mentality transformed, these she instead haggles over are not quite many, but feared that Huo Yuhao has an accident.

Huo Yuhao standing body, his respite as before is slowly rapid, but in the eye pupil, does not have the half minute to be weak, instead bright.

With Zongli Wu this war, displayed their wisdom and bravery, defeats a superior enemy, compels to draw back this Holy Spirit Cult Lord. This war, the effect on Huo Yuhao is enormous, Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus of his within the body is operating at an exceptional pace, the huge consumption similarly at an exceptional pace is also restoring.

Reason that Titled Douluo is formidable, because of having Soul Nucleus, but reason that Limit Douluo stands in the world peak, is because has Dual Soul Nucleus!

In this oppression strength huge fight, Huo Yuhao experience even more Dual Soul Nucleus has taken to own advantage. Present he, but also is not very mature, but must draw support from Extreme Ice Battle God Armor as well as the Morning Dew Knife strength, reluctantly can contend with the powerhouse of Zongli Wu that level. But, he deeply believed that with the help of Dual Soul Nucleus, oneself breaks through Limit Douluo not to have any difficulty.

“Next.”The Huo Yuhao ice-cold sound resounds through the audience.

Believes in all people that he should delay the time as far as possible, to oneself restore the free time time. He presented the challenge to the Sun-Moon Empire aspect unexpectedly.

This selects ten fights, suffers defeat and flees after Zongli Wu, the flavor started somewhat to change.

From nobody believes at first Huo Yuhao can complete this war, started to have the frightened mood to the present Sun-Moon Empire powerhouses heart. Huo Yuhao showed to all people with the strength that he may complete.

Without impeding of Holy Spirit Cult, all Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer went to Ju Zi(orange) the vision.

Ju Zi(orange) has also recovered at this time, before her calls out in alarm as if not to note, at least nobody understands true meaning.

“Does which consecrate to be willing it to defeat?”The Ju Zi(orange) sinking sound asked.

At this time, side her, several nine levels of Soul Engineer, has the Soul Engineer Corp regimental commander, there are from consecration of Sun-Moon Empire Imperial Family Worship Hall. Only then these nine levels of Soul Engineer, have to get rid to cope with the qualifications of Huo Yuhao.

However, these Soul Engineer, without any exception, cultivates without one for can be the Transcendent Douluo level, they want to contend with Huo Yuhao, can rely on, only then own Soul Guidance Device.

The fight they all looked a moment ago in the eye, who can have confidence? Moreover, this is the war of life and death. Facing such one including the match who the Holy Spirit Cult main this grade of powerhouses defeat, in their hearts hesitates.

Enough several seconds, nobody spoke, the Ju Zi(orange) complexion gradually became ugly, the surroundings cultivated for low Soul Engineer, particularly various Soul Engineer Corp members, on the face revealed the ashamed color. One's own side actually do not have a powerhouse to dare to enter the stage the challenge, this is the what kind insult! Since the Sun-Moon Empire army has swept away all obstacles, does not have toward is disadvantageous, when has met such awkward situation?

“Marshal, I am willing to go to battle!”A clear and bright sound resounded, came from has stood Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer. He is only ordinary Soul Engineer, provides from his Soul Guidance Device can see, most is five levels of Soul Engineer. However, in his sound fervent, does not have the timidness of half minute.

This shouts, the command presents all nine levels of Soul Engineer complexions changes, gloomy is bringing several points of shame.

And Soul Engineer face muscle twitched, then walked, the anger shouted to clear the way: “Overreaches oneself, what thing you are, there is qualifications to go to battle on behalf of the army? Get lost, otherwise, handles according to military law!”

The person that walks, jet black Humanoid Soul Guidance Device covers the whole body, the back also carries two handle long blades, the whole body is lending the greatly strengthened sharp aura.

Sees him to come out, that young Soul Engineer wanted to say anything, but lowered the head eventually under his swift and fierce imposing manner oppression.

This wears black Humanoid Soul Guidance Device Soul Engineer to turn around, bows to say to Ju Zi(orange): “Marshal, please allow me to represent the empire to go to battle!”

Ju Zi(orange) nodded, said: “Good, Commander Liao all careful.”

“Marshal Xie.”

Soul Engineer that this walks, naturally will not be voluntarily, but, he will not have the means not to stand. Because he is Terror Claw Commander Soul Engineer Corp, Liao Mengkai.

Some own subordinate guts proposed that must go to battle for the country, if he withdraws again, later also how commander this Soul Engineer Corp? Therefore, although in his heart does not have any assurance, has stood eventually.

In Sun-Moon Empire Hand of the National Protector five big Soul Engineer Corp, most formidable without doubt is Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, is Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp, again, is Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp and this Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp.

And, the Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp most formidable place lies in their background, as well as material reserves. But Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp since War-God Empress Ju Zi(orange) has taken over control, the overall strength promotion is also quick. What Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp most excels is speed, the thousand li(500 km) long-range raid is their specialties. Then, this Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp? In Hand of the National Protector complete five Soul Engineer Corp, they are the absolute different races.

Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp like their names, they most excels, is attacking a fortified position.

Dark Gold Terror Claws Bear is honored as tackles strongest Soul Beast, close combat ability same level Soul Beast is nearly invincible. But this Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp is also so, they some necessary linkage Soul Guidance Device, itself all members most excel, is the close combats. In other words, this is one in fact Soul Engineer Corp comprised of close combat Soul Engineer.

The long-distance attack took up the mainstream of Soul Engineer fight most times, but, close combat Soul Engineer battle efficiency, in fact closest Huo Yuhao initial tentative plan. Is Soul Master and union of Soul Engineer ability.

Comes the amplification Martial Soul battle efficiency by Soul Guidance Device, thus achieves strong the striking power in certain distance. This is close combat Soul Engineer pursues.

Like Sword Mad Ji Juechen, in fact is close combat Soul Engineer. Huo Yuhao now in some sense, similarly is close combat Soul Engineer.

The close combat cultivates Absolute, its battle efficiency, even must surpass the long-distance attack. Meanwhile, the survival capability in battlefield is also much stronger.

Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp frequently was arranged as the strength use of attacking a fortified position. Member's quality is also extremely high. Fierce does not fear.

Similarly Liao Mengkai is this Soul Engineer Corp regimental commander, the close combat is also he excels. The strength is greatly strengthened.

Since decides to fight, Liao Mengkai again does not have the half minute to hesitate, the tip of the toe in the ground, the body has been similar to arrow Yaichi leapt up, the person in the airborne acceleration, directly soars Huo Yuhao to hit.

Actually Huo Yuhao consumes to have many in the beforehand fight, this point no one knows, but can actually affirm that is not relaxed. Then, must give the time that he reduces restores as far as possible, has the victory to be possible. Although the Titled Douluo resilience is strong, but also has the limit. Moreover, Soul Power restores relatively easily, the energy of consumption restored not to be simple.

At the same time that Liao Mengkai clashes, on body black Humanoid Soul Guidance Device burst out the dark golden ray immediately, both hands has gripped the hilt of back handle long blade respectively, forward area. Two handles are five chi (0.33 m) sword grasp in the hand.

His pair of sword, all over the body jet black like black ink, does not reflect any gloss, but has to plant to swallow all feelings. Even if the sharp aura the distance is very far, can feel. Place visited, air by incision two slender traces easily.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection first fell on him.

This person of good exuberant vitality!

Huo Yuhao somewhat surprised looks at Liao Mengkai, the vitality that on this Soul Engineer sends out could not miss many compared with him. Wants powerful many compared with it general Titled Douluo.

Although the vitality cannot decide battle efficiency, but, has the powerhouse of strength of formidable vitality, and endurance of fight will be continually greatly strengthened in the strength that in the actual combat can show.

However, how?

Signs the hand cramp of name tag, yesterday in we dazzled in the world Tang Sect shop to lie one in the afternoon, has signed the small 1000 books, had the Douluo Continent first second edition, has the peerless Tang Sect simplified form that we were newest 23,24, peerless Tang Sect cartoon. Died of exhaustion me. Because I pass for two days to travel on official business for several days, therefore first multi- bamboo slips, first come, first served.

Right, wants to know that our card sign details, everybody in our prestige - platform transmits: Tang Sect card sign.

Finally, particularly grateful these in our shop shopping book friends' blessing, you made the blessing that the customer service conveyed they tell me, the cares thank you, I will try hard to take care, was good to give everybody a better symbol. Remembers many to us the high praise. We already five hearts!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-583-part-1





Volume 12

#583 - Knife Skill Of God


Huo Yuhao float in airborne, static waiting arrival of Liao Mengkai. This person has not released Martial Soul! This is the Huo Yuhao accurate judgment.

Even if Soul Engineer, generally first will also release Martial Soul in fight, is used for amplification to be also good, auxiliary, compared with not release effect good many. Like him, relies on Soul Power to stimulate to movement Soul Guidance Device purely, Huo Yuhao has seen one, that is Ji Juechen.

But, he actually obviously can judge, the route and Ji Juechen that this person of walking are different. If same, he will not have Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, but was only the sword is enough.

Jet black such as blade glow of black ink instantaneously in overhead crossing, changes into the overlapping cross to cut together, directly soars the Huo Yuhao bombardment, but . The sharp sharp knife blade from the sky gives people a feeling of destroying the hardest defenses.

In the Huo Yuhao hand Morning Dew Knife selects to, on the Morning Dew Knife knife edge, bursts out to ice the blue blade glow immediately together, happen to cuts in the core position that overlapping cross cuts.

Jet black blade glow has from the sky stopped, turned into Bai Se (White Color) unexpectedly, is similar to the mist is ordinary, from the sky dissipated.

The Liao Mengkai heart sinks.

Before below, looks at Huo Yuhao successively and five big Evil Soul Master powerhouse confrontations is a matter, faced his time truly, was a different matter.

From Huo Yuhao, Liao Mengkai has not felt any oppression strength, as if this person does not have any imposing manner inherent.

But, is this, his pressure is also bigger. He has seen with one's own eyes this person to defeat five big Transcendent Douluo Evil Soul Master successively! This thought looks like a mountain general suppression in his heart. Let his fighting intent weaken.

After the first exploratory collision ended the next flash, Liao Mengkai arrived in front of Huo Yuhao.

A pair of long blade, one after the other, simultaneously cuts to Huo Yuhao.

Soul Engineer little uses Martial Soul avatar, because such will affect the display of Soul Guidance Device might. But like him, does not release Martial Soul is actually few.

Sharp blade glow as before by Morning Dew Knife easy blocking. Meanwhile, the Huo Yuhao left hand lifts, the dark blue sword glow, before arrived at the Liao Mengkai body, together.

Emperor's Sword, Peerless Extreme Ice!

The piercing chill in the air only then a Liao Mengkai person can feel that comprehended Huo Yuhao of true meaning of ice, already can achieve by own Absolute Ice is congealed not to put.

The Liao Mengkai personal appearance dodges, the whole person suddenly became illusory several points.

“!”A light sound, Peerless Extreme Ice the black form will freeze the ice sculpture together, crashes downward. However, in addition the black form actually arrived at side Huo Yuhao together, the sharp blade glow erupts one group of glares suddenly, directly soars Huo Yuhao to take away as many things as possible.

The Huo Yuhao personal appearance dodges, vanishes in same place, Teleportation.

That black form also instantaneously disappeared unexpectedly . Moreover, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection is unable to discuss that looks up its exact location.

“Well?”This is......

In the Huo Yuhao heart is startled.

From beginning to end, Liao Mengkai has not started his Martial Soul, then, this Teleportation ability, should entrust with by Soul Guidance Device. Is this Humanoid Soul Guidance Device ability Teleportation? No, not only is also so simple, this fellow looked like in airborne completely disappeared, but did not appear like Teleportation in another place suddenly. This means that his Humanoid Soul Guidance Device had nearly was mastering the Space Power ability. This may be extraordinary!

During the Huo Yuhao thinking, form does not have the omen is appearing behind him together suddenly, black blade glow instantaneously near body.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection has covered the audience, the reaction rate is also wonderful quick incomparable, on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor bursts out a dark blue halo instantaneously. That jet black blade glow one close, immediately as if fell into the viscous mire, has stopped instantaneously . Moreover the extremely cold aura also in an instant counter-attacks to him.

The Absolute Ice influence is everywhere, although Huo Yuhao its contains not to put, has not displayed Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain again, so long as begins, this Absolute Ice prestige can arrive on the match.

Does not have hesitation of least bit, black ray to dodge, Liao Mengkai vanished. Let Huo Yuhao a blade that puts on quietly from the armpit fall on the vacancy, has not moved any entity.

Cannot hit, far escaping thousand li(500 km). This is the assassin general forms of combat.

Huo Yuhao is intelligent, he almost understood instantaneously Liao Mengkai must make anything, he was the same with the idea of former Zongli Wu, must hit the consumption with. Must consume own energy and Soul Power with this way.

Good to plan!

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth place reveals one to sneer. Do I cope with Zongli Wu to be strenuous, cope with your one to cultivate to less than 95 levels of Soul Engineer be strenuous? You have Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, I have similarly. Moreover, something, you do not have.

In the Huo Yuhao hand Morning Dew Knife holds up slowly, has lifted the top of the head, on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, the dark blue ray has restrained inward suddenly, the blue light blooms suddenly outward.

Liao Mengkai that just in his side came to once again after feeling this Absolute chill in the air, almost did not have hesitant any immediately escapes into the space.

In the Huo Yuhao hand Morning Dew Knife cuts instantaneously, in that flash, nobody sees clearly his movement, his whole person looks like dark blue bright sphere is common, instantaneously outward blooming innumerable rays.

Immediately, is centered on his body, in a diameter kilometer range, is filling the dazzling blade glow. Ices blue ray easy incision space.

This radically is the undifferentiated attack . Moreover, even if before is, when facing Zongli Wu, Huo Yuhao has not displayed such attack.

What knife skill is this?

Luckily Ji Juechen not here, otherwise, that Sword Mad certainly after this war ended cannot help challenging to Huo Yuhao. Even if loses does not matter. Time that Huo Yuhao this knife skill wielded a moment ago, entire sky for it discoloration. In the sky, presented the magnificent design, that seems an ice blue big dragon from the sky wreaks havoc, each scale is clear.

This and this are the knife skill can achieve?

The Tang Sect people are also bewildered, they do not know when similarly Huo Yuhao had such knife skill.

This was not the Douluo Continent knife skill! It came from, Gods!

Dragon Sacrifical Gathering Dancing Knife Technique!

This is first of Huo Yuhao in the battlefield time uses this move of knife skill, in the instance of displaying, he only thought Soul Power of own Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus implication is similar to by Morning Dew Knife heavy drinker absorbing water general crazily swallows instantaneously.

The black form is almost the wrestling from airborne is departing. In the swing hand that Liao Mengkai goes all out the double blade, protects the body.

May be this, on him as in successive 13 blades.

Nine levels of Soul Guidance Protective Cover, to shatter!

Paragon Protecting Cover, to shatter!

On Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, were more ice blue rays. The piercing chill in the air, almost permeated in his bone instantaneously.

Although his Humanoid Soul Guidance Device is also nine levels, but in front of the terror Morning Dew Knife blade glow, the effect of defense by far is not good like the imagination.

Internal Core Formation already by irrelevant to shatter that the terror blade glow tears, if not in him also one similarly is nine levels in armor, perhaps at this time he turned into an ice sculpture.

Too fearful, this was really too fearful. Actually this is what knife skill! Unexpectedly can in tear into shreds the entire sky within diameter kilometer range instantaneously. Such knife skill, he has actually borne patiently to use now, some of his actually how many cards in a hand?

Sun-Moon Empire powerhouses, in heart all scared.

What a pity, they do not know that Huo Yuhao was also regretting now.

Although this blade shocks the audience, the price of but paying was also too big, his within the body Soul Power collapses, Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus this formidable resilience could not catch up with the consumption of this blade.

The entire sky was torn to turn into a dragon xing picture to continue for a half minute completely to vanish! The sky turned into the Absolute Ice sea. Is this what kind waste?

“Dies!”Roars to erupt from the Liao Mengkai mouth suddenly, two handles jet black such as the long blade of black ink has been similar to shoots toward the Huo Yuhao electricity at top speed generally. But Liao Mengkai, then crashes just like the freely falling body generally downward.

In anybody opinion, throws flies own weapon, goal one, that gives own running away manufacture time.

Although nine levels of Soul Engineer battle efficiencies not necessarily compare favorably with nine levels of top Soul Master, but, their survival capabilities are certainly stronger than Soul Master.

If at least a moment ago traded one to cultivate with Liao Mengkai similarly is, even cultivate compared with him for higher Soul Master in front of Huo Yuhao Dragon Sacrifical Gathering Dancing Knife Technique, definitely had been cut the fragment, but he was also living.

Jet black blade glow, one after the other, is separated by three chi (0.33 m), almost arrived in front of Huo Yuhao instantaneously.

The Huo Yuhao look, actually suddenly becomes dignified. Unprecedented dignity.

On Morning Dew Knife selected, selects to fly the first handle black sword. He makes the movement that all people could not understand. His body one side, actually with own left shoulder, withstood the attack of that second handle long blade slightly.

“Pū!”The long blade hurls the body to enter, penetrated his shoulder instantaneously, Extreme Ice Battle God Armor such defensive power, unexpectedly cannot block this handle long blade.

Flows out without the blood, the body of Huo Yuhao actually shook shaking, then crashes toward the ground.

The Tang Wutong complexion big change, on the strategic place in the past, was actually lifted the right hand by Huo Yuhao, to her compared with the hand signal that do not come.

“Pū and pū!”Two.

Liao Mengkai and Huo Yuhao fall to the ground successively.

When Liao Mengkai falls to the ground, body staggered, takes a seat to fall down. Huo Yuhao actually steadily falls to the ground, but the shoulder is inserting a handle black long blade, is very towering to the person, the strange feeling.

……

Erupts fourth day continuously, pleaded everybody monthly ticket and recommendation vote support.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-583-part-2





Volume 12

#583 - Knife Skill Of God


“Ha Ha! You were hit by me.”Liao Mengkai self-satisfied laughs to make noise. Even if Holy Spirit Cult Lord Zongli Wu unable to injure to at present this young people, oneself actually achieved.

Huo Yuhao nodded to him, said: “Has not thought that will meet your this type person who pursues Absolute. If not I have been staring at you, when feels you to release Martial Soul, perhaps, I will be more miserable at this time. You can actually lock my vitality with your vitality combustion for the price. If I have not guessed that wrong, your Martial Soul, should be a blade.”

Liao Mengkai nodded, in the look even revealed the color of admiration, “good, my Martial Soul was a blade. Said accurately that should be, Blade Soul! My Blade Soul, does not have the real shape, is different from many Tool Martial Soul. However, it can actually integrate in any metal, and metal completely fusion is one. When I just started to practice, it is very small and weak. But along with the promotion of my strength, I discovered that originally its wondrous use is infinite.”

The Huo Yuhao connection said: “Therefore, your this struck a moment ago, seems like brings up the rear to oneself, may in fact, in two handle blades, the first handle throw normally, but in the second handle, actually integrates in which Martial Soul, and takes the combustion vitality to lock me as the price. It seems like that you certainly have usually eaten the thing of big making up, strengthens own vitality.”

“Yes. I displayed a moment ago, is my ninth Soul Ability, the blade soul is overwhelmed! You died. My blade soul enters your within the body, even if your brave soldier breaks the wrist, takes the shoulder to be pierced by the price is blocked my this blade to be also useless. My demon magic knife is nine levels of Soul Guidance Device. Another handle is eight levels. Is overwhelmed nine levels of Soul Guidance Device that by the blade soul stimulates to movement, destroys the hardest defenses. Even if were in Limit Douluo the move, definitely will be attacked in within the body by the blade soul, the meridians completely broke to perish. Originally, you have the opportunity not to be locked the vitality by me, what a pity, you should consume in the beforehand several fights greatly. Therefore after releasing that big move, although looked for me, but your own consumption was also too big, this cannot shunt my locking.”

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “I acknowledged that I underestimated you. This is the price of having a low opinion of the enemy. However, extremely do not look at your blade soul high. Although it can make me be injured, but wants to kill me, is not easy.”

At the same time was saying, the Huo Yuhao right hand grips the demon magic knife hilt, unexpectedly that little is a handle five chi (0.33 m) black sword draws out from the shoulder outward.

The distant place, Tang Wutong has closed the eye not to dare to look, her double fist grips tight, really what she wished one could the blade was one! But, Huo Yuhao does not make her pass, these time selects ten, belongs to his fight, is the fight of man.

Looks that Huo Yuhao really also has the ample force to draw a sword, the Liao Mengkai look is somewhat absent-minded, “this is impossible, will you have the strength? Your all shouldn't Soul Power be used to suppress my blade soul? Why do you have the strength to pull out blade?”

Combustion vitality, even takes the Martial Soul compensation as the fountainhead, started staking everything on a single throw of the dice struck, attacks successfully, was, effect as if not like judgment good of that. Does he possibly draw out this handle long blade?

Liao Mengkai dares to go to battle today, actually also has another reason, that is greedy. To Ice and Snow Goddess Breath, greedy of Morning Dew Knife.

Is one has the powerhouse of blade soul, he deeply believed that even if are not Absolute Ice Martial Soul, can certainly control that handle magic knife. Once that handle magic knife succeeds in obtaining, in addition own blade soul, soon, certainly can help itself break through to Transcendent Douluo that level.

Must know that Transcendent Douluo cultivates is, is becomes ten levels of Soul Engineer foundations! That is he has been long-awaited.

Five chi (0.33 m) long blade, flows out without a drop of blood, slowly drew out from within the body by Huo Yuhao. On the Huo Yuhao face has armor to cover, no one can see his expression. But from his stable movement, as if the pain is not that huge.

Finally, the entire handle demon magic knife had been pulled out by Huo Yuhao completely, his body rocked slightly, grasps that nine levels of Soul Guidance Device demon magic knife in the hand.

The characteristics of this demon magic knife have one, is sharp!

This Liao Mengkai pursues Absolute in the fight extremely, his weapon is so, absolute sharpness. Even if sharpness that Extreme Ice Battle God Armor cannot block. Under the stimulation of movement of blade soul, a moment ago that flash, the striking power that the demon magic knife burst out, can describe with Divine Tool. If not the Huo Yuhao discovery is not right, when it is the ordinary attack, pierced is the heart.

“How you and do you achieve?”Liao Mengkai dull looks at Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao instead grasps being bewitched magic knife, lifts own cheek with the palm side, reveals somewhat palely, but actually as before tranquil calm face.

“I keep you to the present, must make you see, your attack, is useless to me. Does not have any possibly to kill me. Now, you can!”

“Shows mercy!”Ju Zi(orange) of distant place gives a loud shout.

What a pity, this is the battlefield!

“Bang”in fierce bellow, Liao Mengkai body exploded irrelevant to shatter, before the point of death, in his look also filled has not dared to believe.

For that strikes finally, he has burnt his vitality, even does not give a thought to own defense, pours into all Soul Power, and conceals the Soul Ring ray with Soul Guidance Device, sent out that fatally has struck. But, why hasn't the enemy died?

Stakes everything on a single throw of the dice means to give up defending, in fact, under Dragon Sacrifical Gathering Dancing Knife Technique of Morning Dew Knife stimulation of movement, his all passive defensive abilities all had also been torn into shreds.

Absolute Ice enters the body, landing time, Liao Mengkai received heavy wound, within the body meridians most freezes. In this case, Ice Explosion Technique finally is fatal strikes.

Has turned around slowly, facing the direction of Sun-Moon Empire army, Huo Yuhao leans on with five chi (0.33 m) demon magic knife on the ground, is supporting own body.

Suddenly, he stuffy snort|hum, two blood from the pores of the feet almost simultaneously from his left shoulder lasing, when this blood lasing in airborne, forms an appearance of handle sword unexpectedly. Moreover crazy plunging Huo Yuhao.

golden light bursts out from Huo Yuhao forehead place, covers in which that scarlet Blade Soul, in the silent engine'knock', extinguishes in invisible.

The blood stops, but has left the traces of some blood stains on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor. But Huo Yuhao stands there as before, looks like anything has not occurred.

“Next!”

The blood, has not made him appear weak, instead seemed has increased for several points ferociously severe, a pale face indifferent expression, has not looked like the real demon god arrives general.

Six, this is sixth. Six fight three dead, injuries suffered by both sides, to be captured. Relies on the strong strength, Huo Yuhao has been winning streak absolutely six.

If the failure of beforehand Holy Spirit Cult was unable to touch Ju Zi(orange) truly, then, this Terror Claw Commander Soul Engineer Corp dying in battle of Liao Mengkai, let her heart intermittent colic. This is nine levels of Soul Engineer! Moreover is Commander Soul Engineer Corp. Such talented person, dozens years can train one. The absolute ten thousand li (0.5km) select one, each is the Sun-Moon Empire most valuable strategic resource.

Ju Zi(orange) somewhat understands that now Huo Yuhao proposed selected ten goals is anything. His goal, not only need force itself to repulse the enemy. Meanwhile, is whets own strength at the same time, weakens the Sun-Moon Empire strength.

Holy Spirit Cult is not Ju Zi(orange) can control, but also belongs to Sun-Moon Empire here strength similarly! In the face of the attack of Huo Yuhao, Holy Spirit Cult loses seriously. But then, lost was Soul Engineer. Nine levels of Soul Engineer, Sun-Moon Empire, although has, but is also limited! In addition in recent years new promote, not over 20. May successively by Huo Yuhao their to get rid of, already more than one.

Another reason that Ju Zi(orange) loves dearly, naturally is the wound of Huo Yuhao shoulder.

This time Huo Yuhao, the breath somewhat is slightly rapid, his injury is truly heavy. A Liao Mengkai blade, before is him, has no way to sentence in advance. So strong staking everything on a single throw of the dice, he is also first meeting.

The attack of Liao Mengkai, is the sharpness of Absolute. All develop in that direction. Absolute sharp Soul Guidance Device under Blade Soul and amplification of blade soul, has been the extremely terrifying degree.

When Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection feels, he knows that he is impossible to resist that blade completely. He in has deadlocked the meridians of oneself left shoulder with Absolute Ice instantaneously, has blocked that blade.

Extreme Ice Battle God Armor played the defense role, the blade soul was filtered at least had 50%. After the blade soul enters the body, wreaks havoc crazily. Just like such of Liao Mengkai expectation, wants to twist broken all of Huo Yuhao within the body.

Luckily, Huo Yuhao is having Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus. Under moistening of Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, the Huo Yuhao body intensity even can compared with initial Golden Eyed Black Dragon King Di Tian. That sharp strength cannot the earliest possible time tear into shreds his body. In this case, his whirlpool Soul Power played the enormous role.

Locks that Blade Soul by whirlpool Soul Power, then through unceasing revolving and oppression, forces Blade Soul in certain position, does not make it invade the main body important organ.

Reason that Huo Yuhao falls to the ground, was that time truly somewhat cannot control the body.

To finally, him has compelled outside the body the blade soul through Soul Power finally, entire process in fact thrillingly extremely. If before he has not completed Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus cultivates, this is fatal heavy wound. He must die directly.

However, the blessing in disguise knows Non- luck. Receives heavy wound at the same time, let a Huo Yuhao about step feeling the function of oneself Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, when as well as control all sorts of wondrous uses.

Consumption of Dragon Sacrifical Gathering Dancing Knife Technique, heavy wound of body. Finally made Huo Yuhao somewhat weak. Within the body Soul Power surplus also less than 20%, body function also by heavily wound. However, standing of his coldly there, Sun-Moon Empire here powerhouses was blown.

Huo Yuhao in going all out stimulation of movement own Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, restores Soul Power whole-heartedly. He naturally must continue to challenge, he also has formidable Spiritual Power,......

--

The Tang Sect card sign receipts on all fronts, welcome everybody to dazzle world Tang Sect Duoduo to select and purchase in us. Buys book also Song Ka, the fine cartridge, the big playbill can select and purchase.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-583-part-3





Volume 12

#584 - The Tang Three, Small Dances, Read The Ice Friendly


The low and deep incantation recited to resound in the Huo Yuhao mouth, under Imitation Soul Ability and function of Spiritual Disturbance domain, nobody can hear or is detected that he such was doing.

Ju Zi(orange) takes a deep breath, she has not definitely been able to take responsibility on her position. The Huo Yuhao powerful, she of oppression has the feeling of not gasping for breath.

What to do? Then can be what to do good? Always brilliant she, at this time in heart unexpectedly is vacant. She is not willing to look at Huo Yuhao dead, but, if at present these completely unfair selects ten to be defeated to come to an end by the army finally, will be unprecedented regarding the morale of troops attack of entire Sun-Moon army. All effort that she made before even may put to the running water.

“I come!”The sinking sound drinks in the sound lowly, before has stood in Ju Zi(orange) Old Su walked in big strides.

Ju Zi(orange) opened mouth, wants to stop by calling out him, but has not called the exit / to speak finally. At this time, she cannot shake military morale.

Old Su moves toward the location center slowly, he walks at the same time, the body starts each article Soul Guidance Device quietly to appear, in the clear metal clangour, is covering his body each, ultimately forms completely personal Humanoid Soul Guidance Device.

Huo Yuhao visits him, the pupil contracts slightly.

This fights from today, Sun-Moon Empire truly was knew the Humanoid Soul Guidance Device core science and technology. Moreover, they also really had certain method to use.

The research of Xuan Ziwen showed that wants to control Humanoid Soul Guidance Device to agree with oneself completely, that needs formidable Spiritual Power to achieve the accurate control. But this Spiritual Power level needs to be, Titled Douluo level.

Is formidable Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, controls on need more formidable Spiritual Power, such can have at one's command.

These nine levels of Soul Engineer have their Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, Huo Yuhao does not feel strange, what he is quite strange, why Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer can also use. Certainly used any special method.

“You are very strong! To so the age achieve such achievement. Has saying that you are I have seen in Soul Master, most has the talent. What a pity, our is his Lord. Your great strength, is meaning you threat to our Sun-Moon Empire. The old men will not hesitate at all costs, ruins you.”The Old Su sinking sound said.

Huo Yuhao tranquil visits him, said: “Come.”

Dodges the jet black front door not to have the emergence of omen suddenly in him behind, in a low and deep roaring sound, the huge body drilled from that jet black front door. Corpse Ice Bear King, Second White!

Fought seventh, Huo Yuhao could not bear invite the reinforcements finally.

Huo Yuhao jumps, but moves sideways, arrived at the shoulder of Second White, sits cross-legged to sit there, the whole person looked like has stucked.

Second White face upwards to roar, immediately in big strides overran toward Old Su.

The Old Su corners of the mouth place reveals one to disdain, he is not close combat Soul Engineer, but most excels at the long-distance attack. Although Second White the personal appearance is huge, moreover aura is quite powerful. However, in his eyes, this is an unwieldy target.

On the Humanoid Soul Guidance Device both sides shoulders, presented a red cone-shape artillery respectively. The volume seems not big. Two red beams, project toward Second White instantaneously.

To nine levels of Soul Engineer this levels, the Soul Guidance Device might, did not discuss at the size.

The Second White build is huge, even if not aim, is very easy to hit.

However, surprising appeared, two beams soon will fall shortly, on it, Second White that dashed about wildly is sideways suddenly, movement extremely keen, even has also made a movement of tip of the toe place. Unexpectedly that from one side shunt the attacks of two beams.

“Um?”In the Old Su eye reveals surprised, but after his attack locking, sends out, is this escapes?

Spiritual Disturbance domain and Spiritual Detection and Sharing.

This is the answer!

Answer that Huo Yuhao gives!

Was Old Su this scruple instance, Second White arrived at the near, a pair of giant fist, directly soared the Old Su thump to strike under. Xuan imposing manner, fist has not arrived, the earth started the downward collapse.

Under foot two Daoist believers light ** however leaves, the Old Su personal appearance explodes instantaneously draws back, tries to avoid this to strike.

Second White lowers roars, the big mouth opens, Bai Se (White Color) spits the breath to spurt crazily, directly soars Old Su to take away as many things as possible.

Old Su Humanoid Soul Guidance Device chest place gigantic rod-like crystal suddenly ** leaves a glare, the light beam runs out instantaneously, drills has spat the breath, falling maliciously on Second White.

Even if there is Spiritual Detection and Sharing to be auxiliary, the body of Second White was extremely also huge, he withstood with the solid chest this has struck.

On Old Su this Humanoid Soul Guidance Device has provided the strong speed to him, while sending out attack, draws support from the recoil to escape instantaneously, avoided that to spit the breath, and has spread out.

However, what making him shock, Second White of oneself artillery, is only the body shook shaking unexpectedly, flushed toward him in this.

Is this possible? That is eight levels of Soul Guidance Device Gold Melting Cannon.

Even if nine levels of Soul Engineer, all Soul Guidance Device are impossible is nine levels, when one because of nine levels of Soul Guidance Device manufacture difficulties, another reason is the use consumes too in a big way.

Like milk bottle that type of thing, regarding high level Soul Engineer, the function wanted slightly were many, was impossible to supplement the consumption promptly, what was most reliable was own Soul Nucleus. Therefore, on formidable Soul Engineer, Soul Guidance Device of various ranks match one is very reasonable.

Although Gold Melting Cannon is only eight levels of Soul Guidance Device, but takes melting the iron melt [gold/metal] as the characteristics, is single body attack, the attack prestige can be greatly strengthened.

May on that great bear, actually stay behind a piece of burned black trace, as if cannot cause any damage.

Ice Bear King Second White and Xiao Bai (Little White) have not the small difference. Xiao Bai (Little White) was formidable snow and ice control, Second White itself inherited the body of Xiao Bai (Little White), but actually cannot inherit the strength of Xiao Bai (Little White) formidable snow and ice control, can say, the strength of this snow and ice controls remaining very small part. But Second White also has its superiority, that is its formidable body and spirit. Its body in undead Demi-plane becomes undead, comes under the undead aura influence, has had the variation. The tenacious degree, is entire undead Demi-plane, otherwise, it cannot become entire undead Demi-plane most powerhouse.

Therefore, this eight levels of Soul Guidance Device want to injure Second White, was quite difficult. Let alone, Gold Melting Cannon is fire attribute, just by the Ice Attribute restraint of Second White.

The Second White left leg layer on layer stamps in the ground, the giant bellow spreads outward, stands up from failure general just like Earth Dragon. The earth trembles, has conducted inside and outside dozens, Sun-Moon Empire army, even had the under foot not steady condition.

With the aid of the terror reacting force, the Second White huge body shoots up to the sky, from the sky brings together unexpectedly, then goes toward the direction hit of Old Su in the way of super revolving. Xuan imposing manner, Ice Meteor that crashes from the upper air is ordinary just like one. This was the Xiao Bai (Little White) only inheritance has also given the Second White ability. But in the Absolute Ice prestige can on, have a disparity with Xiao Bai (Little White), but impact actually still have it.

Old Su after short being startled, quickly returned to normal, facing Second White such offensive, he did not fear. Speed? One most excel is speed. Moreover, on him nine levels of Humanoid Soul Guidance Device have to relieve the strong capability of locking, in other words, Second White absolutely does not have the means to lock his position.

The personal appearance dodges, when Old Su almost does not allow to send in the middle, made way the attack of Second White, in the meantime, on his shoulder were also many jet black such as nine levels of Soul Guidance Cannon of black ink. Eight levels is not good comes nine levels, hot department is not good, that trades a line.

Regarding nine levels of Soul Engineer, the striking power is always not the issue.

However, locks the Second White position in Old Su, instant, suddenly, a sense of crisis that beyond description on the shoulder nine levels of Soul Guidance Cannon can finish close sufficiently appears in his spiritual sea instantaneously. This is from cultivates in Titled Douluo for the feeling of instinct.

Old Su believes to own premonition extremely, because this premonition does not know that many time has saved his life. He is almost without hesitation stopped the shoulder Soul Guidance Device sufficient energy, the rave the nose oven, Soul Guidance Thruster full, tries to fend.

The quiet blue ray in airborne dodges not to have, the body of Old Su rapidly nose oven in airborne slightly stiff, big blood fog from him ** however leaves.

If carefully looked that can discover, his nine levels of Soul Guidance Protective Cover and Paragon Protecting Cover, even is on Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, presented a penetration eyelet. The eyelet is not big, but actually sufficiently fatal. Because, it appears in the Old Su forehead position.

“Bang”the Second White huge body falls to the ground loudly. The form appears together slowly on his shoulder. Huo Yuhao.

Just, this time Huo Yuhao has stood in the Second White shoulder, but formerly such did not sit above meditate.

The quiet blue ray draws an arc from distant place together, during returns him to grasp.

The Old Su corpse drops from the clouds, falling maliciously on the ground, but he any had not responded.

Had finished, the seventh fight, such had ended, another nine levels of Soul Engineer, died.

As for the reason of falling from the sky, actually even nobody knows.

The body of Huo Yuhao shook shaking, supports the big end of Second White, reluctantly coming to a stop personal appearance. Then he sat on the shoulder of Second White, this time, he has not urged the Sun-Moon Empire aspect, but was static sitting cross-legged sits there.

A complexion paleness of Ju Zi(orange).

From beginning to end, that huge Ice Bear is a bait, bait that attracts the Old Su attention! Starts truly, is Huo Yuhao.

……

Our micro, station, has gotten online officially, in our prestige - under platform, clicks on micro, station, can enter. Serializes the button exclusive, I just had issued beyond our Douluo Continent exclusive there: Tang Sect and Tang San first part, everybody can look. To look at the full text, can wash in us, valuable shop: Dazzles world Tang Sect, purchases our Douluo Continent hardbound second edition first volume.

Has a look quickly.

In the future, I also in our prestige - exclusive of platform serializes on, serializes outside our Douluo Continent the God Realm legend. However, perhaps this wanted next year.

Pays attention to our prestige - platform, is very simple. Prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - below public number - searches Tang three few, has first of authentication.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-584-part-1





Volume 12

#584 - The Tang Three, Small Dances, Read The Ice Friendly


When the Ice Bear King incarnation is Ice Meteor, Ju Zi(orange) felt that some are not right, because while changing into meteor, Huo Yuhao on its shoulder vanished. But Old Su completely was actually attracted by the corpse Ice Bear King Second White huge body and Xuan imposing manner, has neglected most fatal somebody.

That is together gloomily blue the colored light glow sends out, almost instantaneously appears before the Old Su body, moreover path that the complete computation clear he has fended. That sentences the attack completely in advance!

The forehead of Old Su was passed through, under such injury, can he possibly live?

Ju Zi(orange) pain has closed eyes, her battle efficiency under reduced once again. Two nine levels of Soul Engineer!

Seventh, this is seventh. If, he can achieve complete ten success of fight, means that oneself side can also have three nine levels of Soul Engineer to fall from the sky?

It is not good, cannot again this. Rather makes the army morale drop sharply, cannot continue again.

Ju Zi(orange) deeply clearly has become at this moment aware, from the beginning, oneself on working as of Huo Yuhao. Who always most excels at the open intrigue, Huo Yuhao open intrigue.

Huo Yuhao clearly takes oneself to carry on this challenge as the bait, but, oneself have actually forgotten, the Shrek Academy person, most excels is the one-to-one fight!

Without linkage Defensive Soul Guidance Device, did not have linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device, one-to-one, Soul Engineer and Soul Master of contest same rank, does not have the too big superiority. But this point, because these years overwhelming superiority of Soul Engineer Corp when facing Soul Master, making all people somewhat neglect, in these people, included itself.

Ju Zi(orange) has closed double pupil ashamed, sighed, said: “We admit defeat.”

“No, Marshal, we have not lost. We are willing to challenge to him.”Old Su died, the eyes of numerous position nine levels of Soul Engineer were red. Because Old Su is the personal connection is usually extremely good in them. At this time two fellow soldier died in battle shortly successively, timid in their heart had been covered gradually angrily.

“I said that we admit defeat! This is the order.”Ju Zi(orange) opens the double pupil suddenly, shouted angrily to make noise, “I cannot look that you brought death in vain. From the beginning, we made a mistake. We should not carry on any single Tiao with the Shrek Academy person. We were swindled. Lost, must recognize. All responsibility for an offense, my shoulder undertakes. Passes on me to order, the army sets out, retreats.”

At the same time was saying, Ju Zi(orange) has turned around, in big strides goes in the direction of Sun-Moon Empire army. Her sound also through amplifying Soul Guidance Device spreads by far.

“Huo Yuhao, this time, we admitted defeat. However, among us the fight, just started, the hope next time, you have like this good luck. The Sun-Moon Empire subordinate, removes!”

Sun-Moon Empire numerous powerhouses, Soul Engineer Corp retreat slowly. When blood energy of innermost feelings ascension returns to normal gradually, these Sun-Moon Empire powerhouses also secretly relaxed. Did not need to challenge that terrifying fellow finally.

Although seems, his consumption was close to the limit, but, has that giant corpse Ice Bear King, has not known he who when can erupt, such fight, nobody is willing to continue. Nobody reason goes all out with him again.

The life of person, has one time after all!

The light ray glitters around the Huo Yuhao body, he is absorbing Ice Element in air to supplement oneself rapidly.

Today, he can insist now, relies on is the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus formidable resilience.

The Ju Zi(orange) sound he listens is very clear, in his heart even somewhat sighed, in fact, he really also has the card in a hand. If not the reasons of numerous card in a hand, he is impossible to propose that selects ten this not too realistic forms of combat.

storing ring of Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp that regimental commander, in Huo Yuhao. There said goodbye did not have, to decide to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball specially many, but also many nine levels.

If compelled really anxiously, in own security did not have under the premise of guarantee, Huo Yuhao wanted not to attend to exposing itself to strike to kill the risk of Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp, uses these to install Soul Guidance Cannon to shoot surely.

These gadget, may be nine levels! Facing Sun-Moon Empire these Soul Engineer Corp, is sole nine levels of Soul Engineer, the effect will not be bad. At least, wins enough relaxation time not to have the too major problem to him.

Huo Yuhao also clear remembering, initially Teacher Xuan once was Second White has customized one ultra enormous surely installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball launcher. That gadget withstands any rank to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball multilaunching sufficiently surely.

Ju Zi(orange) truly is intelligent . Moreover, has the brave soldier to break the determination of wrist very much.

Exposes itself to strike to kill Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp regarding the present, is not anything. Holy Spirit Cult died in battle two Transcendent Douluo, Cult Master lost, oneself also saved the Xiaotao elder sister. In this case, the Holy Spirit Cult overall strength surely is the sharp drop, if Sun-Moon Empire Imperial Family has not used, that also too waste.

Therefore, frames by planting stolen goods on them to be not quite important. More importantly, can kill some Sun-Moon Empire nine levels of Soul Engineer. If these nine levels of Soul Engineer die again. Then, restricts the strength of Shrek Academy top powerhouse large scale to weaken, to that time, hey!

Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp removed by far. Huo Yuhao takes a deep breath, this place is unsafe, went back to say first again.

When he must jump down from the body of Ice Bear King Second White, suddenly, a strange feeling spreads over the whole body. That feeling, looked like oneself whole person is blocked the throat suddenly generally.

It is not good!

In the Huo Yuhao heart cries, going all out stimulation of movement own Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, tries to work loose this feeling. However, some late, his present strength, compared with the peak, is really the phase difference too much and are too many.

Faint trace black air/Qi is quietly spreads from Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, behind Huo Yuhao, a black form appears quietly. A handle jet black such as short dagger of black ink, maliciously behind the position insertion of cervical vertebra toward Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao at this time, only thought that whole body was blocked. The whole person cannot the move slightest. To fend cannot achieve completely.

In this important time, suddenly, a swift and fierce severe howl resounds. The Purple gold colored light glow is almost is similar to Teleportation is together common, appeared on Huo Yuhao suddenly.

“Pū!”The black dagger pricked the body of Huo Yuhao as before, but, behind Huo Yuhao, actually slowly reappeared a form. The whole body is blooming Purple gold colored light glow Tang Wutong.

When Ju Zi(orange) announced repulsed the enemy, Tang Wutong is the first person who flushed from Shrek Academy. She most understands the Huo Yuhao strength, when she noticed that Huo Yuhao on the Ice Bear King shoulder rocks, she knows that this time is not an attire. Yuhao fought before consumes was too big, but also was injured.

Therefore, she must rush to side her man immediately, protects him, treats and cures him.

Form when that black air current gushes out appears behind Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong has been away from his less than hundred meters. In an instant, she is burning her Soul Power, in the way of Martial Soul Fusion technique, invests into Huo Yuhao behind.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong altogether four big Martial Soul Fusion techniques, final one, is Ice Frost Solo Dance, Raiment of Light.

This is a synthesis technique, can make their strengths fuse in together, bursts out more formidable battle efficiency.

When they display, each other strength will also pull closer the opposite party, Tang Wutong is in this manner, in addition Teleportation, making oneself attach on Huo Yuhao. When that short dagger punctures, she is also prompt and Huo Yuhao separates. With own body, withstood this has struck.

In the stuffy pshaw, on Tang Wutong bursts out formidable aura beyond description suddenly, Purple gold colored light makes her as if behind a Huo Yuhao purple Sun, the intense Light aura makes these black air currents surge immediately crazily, but attacks actually has no way to arrive to Huo Yuhao on again.

Huo Yuhao can move finally, when he has turned around, when sees from the Tang Wutong right chest place prominent black sword blade edge, the whole person only thought that own brain as if must blast out.

The left hand finds out suddenly, hugs into to cherish Tang Wutong, Huo Yuhao rave, the right fist rumbles outrageously, rumbles in the airborne shadow toward that condensation.

Without a doubt, this shadow is the strength of god of death, came from the Grim Reaper Devil Puppet strength. Yes, Zongli Wu does not have to escape from beginning to end, his strength, already quietly attached on Huo Yuhao. Even if Spiritual Detection cannot detect.

Weakest, most relaxes to Huo Yuhao. The strength of this god of death suddenly erupts. The Zongli Wu goal, from the beginning is Huo Yuhao and corpse Ice Bear King Second White, this Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master, has had the subsequent party.

Appearance that light shadow is quietly together behind Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong looks is very clear, this light shadow is one has the man of golden long hair, he is with smile on the face, the double pupil is actually glittering the different rays, in an eye, is the black whirlpool. Another eye is actually the Bai Se (White Color) whirlpool, seems incomparable strange.

A special aura, appears on Huo Yuhao. That fist that he rumbles, is the golden ray, but arrives at the halfway, actually instantaneously transformed whirlpool light beam that for the black and white bi-color circles.

“Pū”in fist glow bang that black light shadow, black light shadow just started also tries to resist, but in an instant, the Huo Yuhao back golden hair light shadow sudden ray spreads. That black and white bi-color ray burst out one strange strength instantaneously.

Tang Wutong feels, is thick moved and sad intent. Then, that black light shadow, had been twisted the fragment, changes into the innumerable mist, disappears in the midair.

Three also three, asked the monthly ticket!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-584-part-2





Volume 12

#584 - The Tang Three, Small Dances, Read The Ice Friendly


Inside and outside ten. In shrubberies.

Zongli Wu stuffy snort|hum, in mouth the blood spurts crazily. Face whiten like paper. This time, he true receive heavy wound.

Beast Spirit no doubt fuses with him, but that is also not the complete fusion. Part of souls integrate. But he keeps on Huo Yuhao, is his Martial Soul avatar, even can be said as the Martial Soul main body, Grim Reaper Devil Puppet.

It looks like in Zongli Wu, weak Huo Yuhao mind relaxes, is the best getting rid opportunity. His Grim Reaper Devil Puppet does not seem that simple like the surface, although was compelled by Huo Yuhao, but in fact, actually as before can attach on Huo Yuhao. This attachment, takes dead souls as the premise.

Simply speaking, is, Huo Yuhao has killed a person, on him will be disturbed on some dead air/Qi, this type of dead air/Qi will not exist too for a long time, the time is long, voluntarily will dissipate.

But Zongli Wu Grim Reaper Devil Puppet, can actually attach above this dead air/Qi. The dead air/Qi invisible does not have, even if Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power is strong, is unable to discover. But Zongli Wu can actually stick out suddenly by own Grim Reaper Devil Puppet offends somebody.

If the Huo Yuhao strength maintains under peak condition, this sneak attack naturally is for him useless. Is relying on formidable Soul Power, he can work loose directly, even counter-attacks.

But, what Grim Reaper Devil Puppet most excels is the sneak attack! Fights successively that many, the last attack relies on Demonic Engraving God Knife to add on the technique release of Tang Sect secret art Yama's Invitation, the vigor strongly under that strikes. If not so, where has is so easy to strike to kill nine levels of Soul Engineer, and shocks the audience?

This time Huo Yuhao was too weak, weakly to letting Zongli Wu saw the opportunity. This opportunity also truly is very good, therefore Zongli Wu has succeeded, his Grim Reaper Devil Puppet has sneak attacked Huo Yuhao successfully.

What a pity, he has forgotten, after this selects ten fights had ended, Huo Yuhao no longer is a person. He also has the partner, has friend. More importantly, lover.

Tang Wutong receives heavy wound with oneself body is the price, was Huo Yuhao withstands this has struck. Has given the Huo Yuhao cushion time. But in a fist that Huo Yuhao rumbles finally, finally made him about one step comprehend. Power of Emotion.

Hao-Dong Three Absolutes, after Tang Wutong returns to the Huo Yuhao side, lost the function.

But, in a moment ago, Huo Yuhao clearly felt that oneself must lose Tang Wutong, in that flash, in the past missing to Dong'er and pain, instantaneous ascension. Oneself planted mood seed takes root to germinate finally, that fist, it can be said that condensed the Hao-Dong Three Absolutes essence to be. Power of Emotion inspiring, the mood, mind, Soul Power as well as the thought of Huo Yuhao grief and indignation, all condenses above that fist. Then bang stiffly has broken to pieces Grim Reaper Devil Puppet.

Martial Soul was broken to pieces, Zongli Wu received heavy wound immediately, this wound even is irreversible. First made his Soul Power drop directly two-level. Moreover possibility that needs to recuperate for a long time.

After Huo Yuhao rumbles this fist, approached the oil lamp to be completely dry, but he actually as before tight is holding Tang Wutong.

Grim Reaper Devil Puppet died, that handle condenses the short dagger that becomes also to dissipate with the strength of god of death. But the intense death air/Qi as before crazily is actually attacking in Tang Wutong within the body.

The Purple gold colored light corona started becomes gloomy, on the elegant face of Tang Wutong is the scarlet completely sheds.

Huo Yuhao visits her, the tooth fastens to nip, whole body in fierce is shivering.

“Wutong and Wutong......”

Light golden ray from the Tang Wutong forehead bright. That makes the golden trident design that Huo Yuhao once somewhat resented appear. Looked like on the Tang Wutong forehead were also many vertical eye.

But the golden form that Huo Yuhao behind, formerly dissipated also appears.

“Rong Nianbing, your what meaning?”The ice-cold sound resounds, but this sound actually only then Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong can hear.

“Any meaning Ah? I have not looked for a successor to myself. I thought that Yuhao is very appropriate. The sincere feeling truehearted nature, is a good child. Moreover you looked that he started to comprehend to my Power of Emotion. This way. Soon, he can inherit the position of my Gods truly.”

“Rong Nianbing! Do you know that he is the person who I select?”The ice-cold sound resounds once more.

“Does not know! Although I have paid attention, sees you and his some occurring together. May see each time, is you are suffering him, to maltreat him. Also has not had anything to direct to him. You look at me, the seed of my Gods gave him. Sorry! Tang brother, you came late.”

“You”the ice-cold sound suddenly becomes angry.

Hears here, Huo Yuhao could not insist finally, an intense dizzy transmission, a brain paleness, but he actually as before tight was hugging Tang Wutong, fainted.

......

God Realm.

Around high mountain peak white clouds misty. The fairyism lingers, dark fragrant fluctuation.

On the summit is standing two people, has two people.

A man of blue long gown, after the brain, the blue long hair hangs loose, has hung the ground. In the hand grasps is sparkling the radiant ray golden trident.

In him opposite, is standing is also a man, but actually wears the Bai Se (White Color) chef clothing, but has not worn the chef's hat. Both hands surround in the front.

“Rong Nianbing, if today you do not give me a reasonable explanation, do not want to leave!”Makes the male voice blue low and deep was roaring.

Rong Nianbing shows a faint smile, “Tang San, like this. The good seedling not to be good to look, has bumped into, I cannot miss. Moreover, I misunderstood. I think that you are the specially repugnant that boy. I thought that he and your daughter is thick as thieves, has actually been stopped by you, is very pitiful. You should not satisfy his family background, therefore such to him. You looked that now is good, I pass to him the position of Gods, he and your daughter was a match. Said that I am also first-level Gods. Although with your this Law Enforcer also a little disparity, but also differs not many.”

“You”the Tang San look suddenly becomes bone-chilling cold, “Rong Nianbing, you dare saying that you don't know my goal? In front of the honorable people did not tell the lie, takes back the position of your Gods, this matter such considers as finished. Otherwise, do not blame me not being impolite.”

Rong Nianbing both hands change to hold the head, “line, do not install. Your what temperament haven't I known? You is a good-hearted person, will not violate the God Realm custom completely, I have not offended the God Realm article of law, you radically not to the reason that I begin. This matter this. You look for one again.”

Tang San cold sound track: “You said with ease, where do you make on me look again? You think that is individual can inherit the position of my Gods? These years, your fellows are one by one lazy, all pressure load bearings on me. Recently if were not God Realm is not steady, my monitoring to the Huo Yuhao has relaxed, how to make you go well?”

Rong Nianbing said: “Takes back the position of Gods is impossible, this child started to comprehend my Power of Emotion. At this time took back, will have the irreversible wound to him. We do not have the means to affect them to practice the development. Once this wound emergence, even if you, did not have the means to make him inherit the position of your Gods.”

“I acknowledged that this time matter I am do is not quite typical. Like this, before Yuhao grows truly, God Realm, I help you share. Until Yuhao can assume sole responsibility for an important task, I exit to loaf again. How?”

Tang San sighed, on the face revealed a forced smile, what “I pursued was free! Don't you know?”

Rong Nianbing ill-humored [say / way]: “Amn't I? Also was not good and evil these two shameless Godking runs. Moreover runs is so quick, thus caused God Realm not to be steady, otherwise you did not need to be so laborious.”

One hear of he mentioned that good and evil two big Godking, the face muscle of Tang San twitched.

“Rong Nianbing, this time matter, we have not ended. I cannot be what kind to you. However, do not forget, since you have robbed Huo Yuhao, from now on, I will again not regard him am my inheritance regard. But Wutong is my daughter. Wants with my daughter in the same place, is not easy.”Tang San wicked saying.

Rong Nianbing said in consternation: “Won't you be intense? Tang San, do not go too far.”

Tang San coldly snorted, “that looked at your performance. You completed your commitment to say first again. Had not seen my daughters for that did mix the boy injured? My daughter and I am the blood relationship am close, I can come slightly the working sentiment using the God Realm article of law reasonably. But you, actually anything did not do. Only if that boy inspires your mood Gods once more.”

Rong Nianbing brow tight wrinkle, “Yuhao this child is very pitiful, Tang San, you let off him. How gives me to select the face?”

The Tang San big sleeve wields, person fluttered, integrates in the fog to vanish does not see.

On the Rong Nianbing face reveals a helplessness, shook the head, the [say / way] that thought aloud: “Yuhao Yuhao, is not I do not help you. But does not have the means! Who made you like on others daughter? However, hey. Pulls a tooth from the Tang San tigers mouth, this feeling is really good yeah. Ha Ha!”

“San Ge. Such considers as finished? Rong Nianbing that fellow was too hateful!”

“Xiao Wu, you think really I will lose to him? If were not I have let loose to the blockade of Huo Yuhao aura, you think that Rong Nianbing can feel his existence?”

“Ah? are you intentionally? Why? You did not plan that makes Yuhao inherit your God Position?”

“Most suitable is best. Rong Nianbing God Position suits him compared with me. Moreover, perhaps in a short time, I cannot inherit God Position. God Realm not only is in itself not steady, perhaps some time ago, my far view celestial phenomenon, soon, will have a big change. Concrete is any present has not known. Two Godking are not, I must hold God Position to solve this matter. Our roaming through plans, must retard. Sorry.”

“Do not say, regardless of where, so long as with you in the same place, I were very happy.”

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-584-part-3





Volume 12

#585 - Flamings The Rubber! Fire Of Ma Xiaotao Acme


When Huo Yuhao sobers from the deep sleep, outside is the star light all over the sky.

The whole body has sour pain of not being able saying that but while being sore, as if also has the innumerable vigor to burst out outward.

With the recovery of mind, the vitality of his whole person also restores, within the body Soul Power starts to flow, but in regards slightly, he clear seeing, own Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus very stably is revolving.

Moreover, compared with before, his Dual Soul Nucleus had the progress obviously.

When Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus just took shape, whirlpool Soul Power that produces, the size is not completely unified, changes along with his breath and Soul Power and Spiritual Power fluctuation.

But now appears changed, under two big Soul Nucleus strengths each other collide, whirlpool Soul Power unexpectedly big or medium are completely same, moreover before compares, even if biggest whirlpool Soul Power is inferior to the present. Moreover, that whirlpool is very stable, Soul Power condenses, [gold/metal] blue bi-color. Spiritual Power and Absolute Ice coexist.

Although mind and body somewhat are weary, but Soul Power in within the body actually restored in peak condition, and has the so obvious progress, does not need to ask that definitely cultivated for has promoted.

This is Absolute squeezes own potential, Dual Soul Nucleus fuses the formation gradually completely the advantage. This time selected ten challenges not to waste, has served the Huo Yuhao original purpose.

However, excited is only the flash, along with the recovery of memory, Huo Yuhao recalled the situation before oneself to lose consciousness immediately. Almost is the instantaneous body, has jumped down the bunk.

Wutong, Wutong how? She where?

Almost is only the thought moves, his Spiritual Power outward has covered. He discovered immediately that he is in Sea God Pavilion, but Tang Wutong, in the side not far room.

Three and do two steps. Huo Yuhao fast rushed to the Tang Wutong room.

In the Tang Wutong room, Xiao Xiao is sitting in the bedside, is taking care of him. Other people have not existed, see Huo Yuhao to come. Xiao Xiao hurried to give the hand signal of keeping silent to him.

The double fist of Huo Yuhao grips subconsciously tightly, formerly also the somewhat hazy condition completely sobered.

“Xiao Xiao, Wutong how?”Huo Yuhao asked in a low voice.

Xiao Xiao shaking the head of gently, stands up, draws him to walk outward.

Out arrives, Xiao Xiao look somewhat complex looks to Huo Yuhao, in their this generation of Shrek Seven Devils, sentimental road roughest was Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong this is right. Even if First Senior Brother. Now already with Little Ya in same place.

“Yuhao, you are calm.”Xiao Xiao understood Tang Wutong very much in the Huo Yuhao heart is what kind of status.

Huo Yuhao heart one tight, takes a deep breath, then sinking sound track: “Said that I am very calm. At least Wutong is also living.”

Xiao Xiao said: “The Wutong situation is not quite good, Old Zhuang looking. In her within the body, had the intense death aura to occupy, these death aura, were her own Soul Power are unable to melt, each other has pestered with her Soul Power and Spiritual Power in one. Has sealed up the consciousness of Wutong. Therefore she will fall into to lose consciousness. Now no one has the means to draw out that death aura, because of such words of doing, will possibly injure to Wutong itself. Only can rely on her willpower. When her own Soul Power and Spiritual Power can all repel the strength of these deaths, she can restore.”

Huo Yuhao sip tightened the lip, to lose consciousness, Wutong to lose consciousness.

Initially, Wang Dong'er was to lose consciousness, he returned to Wang Dong'er Clear Sky Sect, now, Wutong also to lose consciousness. Also can make same mistakes over again?

This time, if sends back her again. Huo Yuhao did not have the face to see Clear Sky Sect two sect master.

Xiao Xiao sighed, said: “You already to lose consciousness three days. Yuhao. Do not worry, Wutong will be certainly good.”

The Huo Yuhao sinking sound asked: “These three days, can the death aura of her within the body once reduce?”

Xiao Xiao has hesitated, is not cruel enough to deceive Huo Yuhao eventually, shaking the head of gently.

Closing eyes of Huo Yuhao pain, crashes in the room, falls down in the Tang Wutong bedside, closely grips her hand.

The hand of Tang Wutong is very cool, her elegant face is a paleness. It seems does not have the half minute scarlet. The life aura is weak pity.

The words that Soul Power slight searching enters Tang Wutong within the body, before Huo Yuhao understands Xiao Xiao, spoke immediately. Right, the Tang Wutong present condition, cannot save her with any method.

Soul Power of her within the body becomes the disorder, should be Purple gold color Soul Power, now were many grey-black colored, this grey-black colored integrates in Soul Power completely, even also integrated her bloodlines. Luckily, in internal organs of Tang Wutong, as if the special strengths, protected the key position, otherwise, these death aura even likely wanted her life.

Huo Yuhao quickly on the explicit judgment, by own strength, is at least impossible to revive Wutong. He the best method, is brings Wutong to return to Clear Sky Sect now.

Only then Clear Sky Sect that two sect master, most understood that cultivating of Wutong is the condition, has the possibility to cure her.

Goes to there again, oneself have not protected her once again, how can face that two sect master? Huo Yuhao does not know. But, he naturally must go. One were how unimportant, more importantly, Wutong can be good.

Thinks of here, Huo Yuhao set firm resolve quickly.

He was not initially that Huo Yuhao, although in the heart filled was sad and pain, but he has stood strongly. Was excessively sad at this time, can only be the spiritless performance. He needs be strong.

“Xiao Xiao, troubles you to look after Wutong, I handle a matter first, then comes back to lead her to treat.”Huo Yuhao said to Xiao Xiao.

Xiao Xiao nodded, said: “You feel relieved. Old Xuan making an exception allows me to enter Sea God Pavilion to look after Wutong. This time you make great merit for Academy. To make anything, you do. Needs us to help, everybody, must cure Wutong whole-heartedly.”

“Um.”Huo Yuhao after she signals by nodding, stride went out of the room.

Outside door, Old Xuan, Yan Shaozhe and Xian Lin'er already static there.

“Old Xuan.”Saw Old Xuan, the Huo Yuhao sound somewhat shivered immediately, in heart sad intent to rush forth.

Old Xuan has patted his shoulder, said: “Yuhao, should not be sad, sorry, is we have not protected you and Wutong.”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “Old Xuan, can the Sun-Moon Empire army once retreat?”

Old Xuan nodded, said: “Retreated, evidently, is draws back into to belonging to Sky Soul Empire. Is unclear as for the following trend, they to reconnoitering blockade fierce of.”

Huo Yuhao said: “According to the agreement, at least she temporarily will again not attack Academy. Old Xuan, my something give you, there are these things, at least can assure the Academy security. Please as soon as possible let Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire elite returns to the country respectively, prepares momentarily to deal with the attack from Sun-Moon Empire army.”

“At present, the Sun-Moon Empire army this time is damaged is also heavy, has ruined a Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp military strength, died in battle several nine levels of Soul Engineer, Holy Spirit Cult also receives heavy wound. They also require the time to carry on recuperation inevitably.”

Old Xuan received storing ring that Huo Yuhao hands over, said: “What is this?”

Huo Yuhao said: “This is I nine levels that in the hand snatches from that Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, as well as some Soul Guidance Device material reserves. And nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to have 15 surely. If the simultaneous firing, can make all within over a thousand square kilometers be reduced to ashes. Has them, the Academy self-preservation does not have any issue.”

Old Xuan grows the tone, Huo Yuhao this time could be said as by strength of the has solved the major problem to Academy really! Had these to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, truly did not need Star Luo and elite of Dou Ling two countries continues to guard. Also can spare the strength to cope with the Sun-Moon Empire army.

Let alone, selects ten fights, although does not have to complete completely, but Yuhao wins streak seven, not only heavy wound the opposite party powerhouse, is makes the imposing manner of Sun-Moon Empire army be attacked unprecedentedly, temporarily was contained.

“Yuhao, what do you then have to plan? The Wutong situation......”the Yan Shaozhe words are somewhat low and deep.

Huo Yuhao said: “Dean Yan, I must treat the good Xiaotao elder sister first, then I bring Wutong to seek medical help. Now only then her family member, might be able to cure her. This time goes, I do not know when can come back. However, please forgive, for me, the Wutong life, is bigger than all.”

Xian Lin'er said: “Good child, you to make going that anything feels relieved. I the temper that likes your this daring to like daring to hate, you are Academy do were many enough.”

Old Xuan has patted the shoulder of Huo Yuhao once more, “Yuhao, this time, you is a war become famous. If possible, sooner comes back, Academy needs you.”

“Yes. So long as the Wutong situation stabilizes, I earlier will certainly come back.”

Spoke these words, Huo Yuhao said goodbye to Old Xuan and two Dean, left Sea God Pavilion, after having done obeisance Golden Tree once more, to the far place, recited the incantation. Opens Gate of the Dead.

Jet black front door opening, in gazing after of Old Xuan and under two Dean, Huo Yuhao integrates in that darkness to vanish quietly does not see.

Looks the front door that snaps, Yan Shaozhe sighs one lightly, said: “This child has grown up, in this case, obtains the clear relative importance as before. I when this age, is well below him.”

Xian Lin'er sneers, “particularly sentimental.”

The Yan Shaozhe corners of the mouth twitched, has not refuted anything, in Xian Lin'er that this aspect he may say never.

Old Xuan said: “Shaozhe, convenes three-country commander immediately, we meet to determine in view of the Sun-Moon Empire plan as soon as possible. This Sun-Moon Empire withdraws, to us, although can relax, but following dealing is certainly correct. Otherwise, that War-God Empress likely once more takes to us to shock.”( to be continued )

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-585-part-1





Volume 12

#585 - Flamings The Rubber! Fire Of Ma Xiaotao Acme


undead Demi-plane.

The ray dodges, Huo Yuhao walked from Gate of the Dead. Comes out, seeing that he is startled, the distant place, is a sea of fire.

The undead aura that the pitiful yell sound and sad and shrill roaring sound, surge crazily, is erupting in that sea of fire or the sea of fire.

Is the undead Demi-plane owner, Huo Yuhao can feel clearly that the undead aura in entire undead Demi-plane, weakened at least 1%. This must formidable destructive power be able to achieve!

A long and loud cry sends out from the Huo Yuhao mouth suddenly, the tip of the toe in the ground, he has soared. With the lift-off of body, the Absolute Ice aura rapid outward diffusion of surge, the temperature in sky reduces rapidly. The snowflake, soars and coils around regarding the body of Huo Yuhao.

From the upper air bird's eye view, the clarity that can look, not far away, in a surrounding area dozens li (0.5km) range, is a sea of fire. Luckily, initially Huo Yuhao, when receives undead Demi-plane Ma Xiaotao, choice was not initially nearby the Soul Engineer Corp camp, the commodity that otherwise, in undead Demi-plane stockpiles must commit to flames.

This time Ma Xiaotao, looks like person Ferocious Beasts is ordinary, is battering in the ground. The place visited, various Undead Creature are reduced to ashes in the pitiful yell all.

Although her Absolute Fire is impure, but, has the greatly strengthened destructive power. Here Undead Creature does not even fear the sacred aura, but actually very dreads to her Absolute Fire. Various Undead Creature facing her Absolute Fire, are very difficult the strength of resistance.

Luckily, competitive Ma Xiaotao has enraged several Ice Dragon in undead Demi-plane, under several Ice Dragon collaborate, reluctantly contained her crazy slaughtering.

Huo Yuhao has patted the forehead, Second White obviously not. At that time to lose consciousness in the past, cannot make corpse Ice Bear King Second White. Otherwise, has the Second White direction, Ma Xiaotao will not have such strong destructiveness.

The Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain release, the Huo Yuhao long howl spreads by far, he is here control, with the promotion of strength, already obtained the approvals of all Undead Creature.

In this undead Demi-plane, most formidable Undead Creature is Ice Dragon, naturally, Second White not in this row. These Ice Dragon actual battle efficiencies reluctantly are also equal to Titled Douluo. Three Ice Dragon collaborate, reluctantly contained Ma Xiaotao. Is scarred, hears the Huo Yuhao long howl, immediately sends out low and deep dragon roar, requests reinforcements to him.

Ma Xiaotao as if feels the Huo Yuhao aura, turned head to airborne to look that in the eye pupil of her pair of dark red sent out the intense crazy flavor immediately, the personal enemy met, particularly was jealous!

Before she was thrown by Huo Yuhao, restored, started to slaughter everywhere. Slaughtered already by the Holy Spirit Cult portray in her bone.

At this time sees Huo Yuhao, roars, the phoenix wings flaps, is similar to the meteor reverse is ordinary, directly soars airborne Huo Yuhao to overrun.

Huo Yuhao from the sky anchors, Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain launches instantaneously, the formidable snow and ice storm forms a giant whirlpool immediately, takes away as many things as possible to Ma Xiaotao.

Although on mind, Huo Yuhao somewhat is weary, but is relying on the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus formidable resiliency, his Soul Power actually already fully restored.

In this case, is Ma Xiaotao possibly his match?

Absolute Ice comprehensive suppression. Ma Xiaotao looks like in the moth that in Snowstorm struggles. She has been fighting before, consumption was very big, faces Huo Yuhao again, own Soul Power was affected by Absolute Ice, continually under consumption, finally Soul Power consumption completely. When she wants to detonate oneself Soul Nucleus finally crazily. Huo Yuhao rushes instantaneously, fetters firmly her with Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain.

Brings Ma Xiaotao to fall in the ground, looks at the body to be frozen stiff, she who the expression actually as before is full of the wild flavor, Huo Yuhao heaved a deep sigh.

“Elder sister, I am unfair to you. Is I cannot save you earlier, makes you turn into this appearance.”At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao stretches out the arms, supporting gently lives in Ma Xiaotao.

His within the body received the injury of that demon magic knife also already to heal and recover completely under the formidable vitality function, at this time within the body Soul Power surge, under his hug, the Absolute Ice prestige can immediately all-around permeated to Ma Xiaotao within the body, is suppressing her within the body evil fire.

Ma Xiaotao Soul Power under the function of Soul Nucleus, just started to restore, after Absolute Ice of this powerful emerges, her Soul Nucleus becomes slow.

Huo Yuhao holds her to sit cross-legged to sit down, then sits in the Ma Xiaotao opposite, attracts the double palm of Ma Xiaotao with the method of Controlling Crane Capturing Dragon, four palms relative. Is mixing Spiritual Power pure incomparable Absolute Ice Soul Power, searches into Ma Xiaotao within the body slowly.

Soul Power entered the Ma Xiaotao meridians, the heart of Huo Yuhao slightly twitched. The Ma Xiaotao situation and Tang Wutong are different, Tang Wutong was corroded by the death aura comprehensively, but Ma Xiaotao was disturbed by the evil aura. On the other hand, the Ma Xiaotao situation seems much better, but, the meridians, skeleton and the internal organs her within the body receive the evil aura etching time is very long, instead is more troublesome. Especially, her spiritual sea received the intense attack of evil aura.

However, present Huo Yuhao was not initially is the Ma Xiaotao treatment time. At that time, he in fact is at a loss, can only rely on own Absolute Ice Soul Power to suppress as far as possible. But is now different, his Spiritual Power initially did not know formidable many compared with it.

Under the precision control of Huo Yuhao, his Soul Power is suppressing the Ma Xiaotao evil fire forcefully, simultaneously starts to unravel, guides little evil aura of her within the body, these evil auras just started is very difficult to be guided successfully. But recited the incantation along with Huo Yuhao, Power of Purification slow after integrating in the Ma Xiaotao meridians. These evil auras became are obedient many. Or was purified directly.

Absolute Ice and formidable Spiritual Power, in addition Power of Purification. Doing three things at once. Is washing each part of Ma Xiaotao body slowly. The evil aura 11 will melt, but fire attribute Soul Power must retain.

The beforehand extreme consumption showed the enormous advantage at this time, did not have huge Soul Power, had been limited the resiliency by Huo Yuhao, this made Huo Yuhao be able in starting to aim at the body of this Ma Xiaotao to start.

Has used the free time of six double-hour, Huo Yuhao clean that the evil aura of her within the body melts. Then, was spiritual sea.

Only then also melts the evil aura in spiritual sea, Ma Xiaotao can true sobers.

This without doubt is an extremely difficult process. Complex of spiritual sea can be imagined, let alone both sides completely oppose.

After the careful thinking, Huo Yuhao decided finally that carries on with quite the way of risk. Because cannot delay. Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea is releasing the evil aura throughout outward, if cannot clean it thoroughly, before is very possible, all that makes put to the running water.

The thought moves slightly, Huo Yuhao Soul Expropiation fell on Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea.

Soul Expropiation can make anybody's mind defensive power reduce zero instantaneously. All mind defenses disintegrate completely.

After Soul Expropiation completes, Huo Yuhao has displayed rapidly Soul Shaking Burst.

Under his precision control, this Soul Shaking Burst might, only then in normal condition one-fifth. Through the fluctuation of Soul Shaking Burst, causes Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea big change. Also while this opportunity, Huo Yuhao coerced one slightly to roll Power of Purification to enter in own Spiritual Power Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea.

Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea, completely is dark red. If Huo Yuhao spiritual sea is golden sea, then, her spiritual sea is the dark red rock magma.

Power of Purification integrates one, immediately, rock magma ebullition. Flake dark red rock magma turned into the golden red. But also crazy counter-attacks to Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power.

Effective!

Huo Yuhao has made accurate judgment immediately, no longer retains, will be coercing Power of Purification releases completely. Immediately, the gentle Bai Se (White Color) ray has covered big piece of spiritual sea, has carried out the life-and-death fight with that evil aura.

Huo Yuhao while this opportunity, lifts right hand, a direction in the Ma Xiaotao between the eyebrows place, Power of Purification starts injection continuously to Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea.

Under the strength of protection Huo Yuhao their mind, these Power of Purification will not destroy to the brain of Ma Xiaotao absolutely. Moreover ingenuity that very he controls, starts from the Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea core position completely, such Power of Purification from central spread, not some important organs of premature moving around to Ma Xiaotao spiritual sea.

Time one minute one second passed, on the Ma Xiaotao face the ferocious expression starts to restrain gradually, the gloomy face also started one to be fair and ruddy. Evil aura every little bit was being melted.

The Huo Yuhao whole body is similar to the steamer general, the massive mist emit from him, transpiration in air.

This is also his sufficiently compares favorably with Limit Douluo formidable Spiritual Power, has changed another person, already collapsed.

He must supplement continually Soul Expropiation exerts on Ma Xiaotao, this can guarantee that own Power of Purification continues to pour into.

, Soul Power of Ma Xiaotao within the body is restoring under the Soul Nucleus function gradually. In her these Soul Power, has the evil aura to exist as before, but compared before, must desalinate were too many. But is sealed up by Huo Yuhao because of spiritual sea now, she does not have the means to carry on any motion. Is closing eyes, on elegant face the non- fashion reveals the color of pain.

Finally, the last evil aura in spiritual sea was melted by Power of Purification completely. Huo Yuhao takes a deep breath, takes back the finger slowly, presses on her palm. Own Absolute Ice Soul Power swarms to enter. That ice-cold chill in the air made Ma Xiaotao hit to tremble immediately smartly spirit, opens eyes.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-585-part-2





Volume 12

#585 - Flamings The Rubber! Fire Of Ma Under Xiaotao Acme


Just the opening eyes pupil, Ma Xiaotao appeared somewhat confused, when but she saw front Huo Yuhao, started the soul gradually.

On the elegant face, reveals several points of pleasantly surprised color, wanted to say anything, but felt Huo Yuhao that to emerge more powerful Absolute Ice Soul Power immediately. Hurries to hold the Yuan normalizing, revolution Soul Power and Huo Yuhao coordination.

Her coordinates from the beginning, must become smooth many. In Huo Yuhao formidable Yin-Yang Supplement double mixes Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus Spiritual Power under frightens formidable. Terrifying Soul Power sweeps across, quick, clears off the evil aura of her within the body. Meanwhile was purified by Huo Yuhao, Ma Xiaotao massive Soul Power.

After all, many Soul Power have filled the impurity of evil aura, does not purify in light of this, will only continue to affect her.

The Huo Yuhao double palm takes back, grows tone.

Ma Xiaotao is also takes a deep breath, the relaxedness that the whole body could not say, but also somewhat was void. The strength drops large scale, not only did not have Absolute Fire, but, fell including Soul Power close one-third. Although the following restoration will be quick, but, she also knows that her Martial Soul itself has the issue, if cultivated to restore, within the body evil aura also likely therefore restored part, the issue eventually also. But was good because of this time mind restored normally.

In this time, on Huo Yuhao ray is dodging, were many a jade box.

The jade box opens, together the golden red presents in front of just like the honey general grease Ma Xiaotao, the light fragrance is mixing extremely rich pure fire element, immediately makes Ma Xiaotao look at the looking blank eyeball.

Huo Yuhao gathers in front of Ma Xiaotao, feeds in Flaming Mucilage in that jade box the Ma Xiaotao mouth directly little.

Ma Xiaotao has not spoken throughout, has not rejected, little swallowed these Flaming Mucilage, in the eye socket was actually gathering completely the tears.

“Elder sister, sorry, I came late. Let you receive these many painstakingly. This time, I helped certainly you permanently cure your problem. From now henceforth, you are true Absolute Fire Soul Master. Does not need to worry for the evil aura. This is Flaming Mucilage, is a fire is the Absolute Immortal Herb essence, breeds for at least ten thousand years to appear.”

Flaming Mucilage enters the abdomen, rich fire element ascends in within the body. Formerly weak feeling was almost is substituted by the full feeling instantaneously. The Ma Xiaotao whole body spills over moving rose. The rich fire element fluctuation starts to continue to increase.

At this time, Huo Yuhao could not help her. If his Absolute Ice entered at this time to Ma Xiaotao within the body again, then, can only plays the reaction. Then, how broken cocoon to become butterfly, that is Ma Xiaotao own practice process.

Regarding the Flaming Mucilage prestige energy, Huo Yuhao did not suspect. Initially for this bulk Flaming Mucilage, he almost pressed out to do Infernal Delicate Apricot. A 100,000 years of Soul Beast essence, helped Ma Xiaotao purify her Martial Soul sufficiently completely.

Ma Xiaotao entered the sitting in meditation condition quickly, Huo Yuhao also finally grows the tone. Finally cured the elder sister. This also one of the he maximum several wishes.

He does not have to leave in light of this, but sits in the Ma Xiaotao opposite, is running own Soul Power silently, was resuming formerly consumption. Also for Ma Xiaotao protector.

The absorption of Flaming Mucilage, is quicker than the imagination . A double-hour, Ma Xiaotao aura started to have the earth-shaking change.

Around her body, the temperature in air continues to rise, the ground under body turned into dark red. With the breath, light golden red ray floods in 20 meters in diameter range. Huo Yuhao that scalding hot aura, forces has to draw back is farther, to avoid being affected.

“Áng”the resonant phoenix cry sound resounds through the horizon. Sees only behind Ma Xiaotao, a pair of huge golden red phoenix wing opens suddenly.

Yes, this time is the golden red, but no longer is dark red, her own fire attribute aura also shoots up to the sky.

Ma Xiaotao makes an effort after flapping below the wings, bringing her tender body to break in the upper air. In an instant. In the sky seemed to be many a golden red Sun to be ordinary. The glare is shining the earth, causes innumerable Undead Creature to call out in grief.

Regarding Douluo Continent, the sunlight is the life important component, but in this undead Demi-plane, the so intense sunlight can only mean the destruction and death.

The Undead Creature majority in trembling knock down. Is waiting for arrival of this ruinous strength.

Luckily, all these are only temporary.

In the sky, the golden red ray restrains gradually, a Ma Xiaotao rush of blood to the head red long hair restored the gloss, each likely is the ruby wiredrawing becomes.

The tender body falls slowly, has arrived in front of Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao already stood up, visits her with smile on the face.

“Elder sister, welcome back.”Huo Yuhao smiles was saying.

Ma Xiaotao stretched out the arms, gives him one not to have the big hug of slit, the plentiful tender body was extruding the body of Huo Yuhao, making him somewhat suffocate, was somewhat awkward. But more is actually joyful and happy.

Gains ground, Ma Xiaotao in has kissed one that on his face made an effort, “younger brother, thanked.”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, “was not the evening that I came. If can early, elder sister you not use by these many crimes.”

The face darken of Ma Xiaotao several points, “Holy Spirit Cult has owed me, sooner or later will make them also come back. Where is here? How these many Undead Creature? And looked that I killed one to say greatly again.”Saying, her was turning around to walk.

This state of mind restored, the irritable temper also restored similarly.

Huo Yuhao hurries to hold on her, narrated this undead Demi-plane origin simply, Ma Xiaotao then resentfully relinquishes.

“Elder sister, we exit. That side Academy, everybody also became impatient. Some of some of my also matters must process.”

Black Gate of the Dead opens, before Huo Yuhao brought Ma Xiaotao to return to Sea God Pavilion.

Sea God Pavilion is sending out light golden light as before, big Golden Tree, periphery familiar all. When Ma Xiaotao sees these, tears uncontrolled to rush forth, cannot help but knees down.

“Came back, I came back finally. Finally went home!”Ma Xiaotao cries loudly, this time she, only likely is a traveller far from home of going home, where has the appearance of least bit Titled Douluo powerhouse.

Since initially was seized now, had almost ten years, ten years such as dream! She always immerses during the evil aura and slaughters, unconscious. The midway was saved by Huo Yuhao after a period of time, she restrains forcefully, cannot maintain too for a long time. Afterward once again perished.

At this time, her Martial Soul sublimates finally, became true Absolute Fire Soul Master, the evil aura cannot become her puzzle, just like freshman.

Huo Yuhao kneels down side Ma Xiaotao, does not have to console her, these many years, she came under the enormous influence of evil aura after all, the mood in innermost feelings constrained was too fierce. Releases definitely very much to have the advantage to her.

Ma Xiaotao this cries, has continued of quarter, similarly some people have also left behind the tears, is not Huo Yuhao, but stands Shrek Academy Martial Soul Faculty Dean in front of Sea God Pavilion, Yan Shaozhe.

Finally when Ma Xiaotao cries was somewhat tired, gains ground sees Yan Shaozhe time, immediately is rending yells makes noise, “Teacher.”

An arrow step, she has jumped into the Yan Shaozhe bosom, weeps bitterly loudly.

She is Yan Shaozhe raises since childhood, priests and disciples affectionate. Yan Shaozhe do not have the child, has regarded the biological daughter to regard her, Ma Xiaotao has been missing these many years, he had not given up seeking. The boundless huge crowd, Ma Xiaotao was made by Holy Spirit Cult, how can unable to find!

At this time saw Ma Xiaotao not only came back, but also the state of mind has also replied normally, can Yan Shaozhe not the tears?

Ma Xiaotao this shocking weeping sound has also alarmed Ancient Elder, Ancient Elder walk successively from Sea God Pavilion.

Sees to restore normal Ma Xiaotao, on face reveals the gratified color all, finally came back . Moreover, was also Academy has added a strength. When Ma Xiaotao they may look with the strength that the Huo Yuhao fight shows in the eye. Although compares in Huo Yuhao also has disparity, but the whole, her talent still above Zhang Lexuan, had the standard of close Transcendent Douluo as before.

Before initially was seized, Ma Xiaotao is one of the Inner Court most outstanding students, now she returns finally, naturally is the big good deed.

When all people are excited, Huo Yuhao actually quietly enters Sea God Pavilion, arrives at the Tang Wutong room, static sat in her side.

“Xiao Xiao, do I want alone and Wutong later, Ok?”Huo Yuhao said in a soft voice.

Xiao Xiao nodded, turns around.

Looks that on the bed is lying down, face whiten Tang Wutong, on the Huo Yuhao face actually reveals a smile, gently reorganized the forehead both sides pink-blue color long hair for her, then light kiss on her fresh-faced tender face.

“I can do, has completed basically. Now the Sun-Moon Empire army retreats, the Xiaotao elder sister also came back, these two wishes had finished. Although also some matters can also need me, but, compared with them, you are most important. Our goes home, returns to your family, how regardless of two sect master to me, I must revive you. If you cannot live, then, where you go, where I go. In any case this whole life, whatever, I will not have separated with you, even if turns into a corpse.”

At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao fishes out a paper from bosom, above has written the character. Place nearby table on gently. Low and deep incantation sound gets up, Gate of the Dead opens quietly.

----------------------------------------------

Peerless Tang Sect final entire moon/month, third child recently really very diligently, is very laborious. Requested earnestly everybody Duoduo support, asked monthly ticket and recommendation ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-585-part-3





Volume 12

#586 - Sacrificed For Her? On


This is Huo Yuhao first time uses Gate of the Dead in Sea God Pavilion, is really because, he is not willing to alarm other people again.?.. Such leaves, perhaps is the best choice. He does not even know whether he can also come back.

With the bed, sends in Tang Wutong undead Demi-plane, Huo Yuhao, leaves Sea God Pavilion quietly, had found in Ice Bear King Second White that in the Academy corner rests, returns to undead Demi-plane to protect Tang Wutong it. He is jumps, leaves Academy to go.

When Xiao Xiao arrives at the Tang Wutong room again, saw that has a white paper.

Quick, this white paper has delivered to front of Old Xuan.

“Old Xuan, First Senior Brother, division commanders and partners. I brought Wutong to walk. The Wutong situation is not very good, we are at a loss, I must lead her to seek medical help, regardless of pays what kind of price, I must cure her. She is in my life the most important constituent, if she is irretrievable, perhaps then, I again am unable tranquil going facing this world. Everybody takes care. Yuhao.”

The words are very light, but in that light words, Old Xuan and people, felt a deep weariness, came from the weariness of Huo Yuhao.

Yes! These many years, on his shoulder has been shouldering the thing were too many and are too many. Some Tang Wutong in the side, he at least have the mind pillar, but now Tang Chinese parasol tree by heavy wound, Huo Yuhao has been chosen departure deeply, no, said accurately he does not leave, but is goes is the Tang Wutong treatment. Tang Wutong can whether be good, will decide whether his heart can also change for the better. Ma Xiaotao standing silently side Old Xuan, the character that Huo Yuhao leaves behind she also looked, although she has not known that actually to have anything, but, this time she, in the look has actually filled firm and resolute.

Younger brother. Handles matter that you want to handle, your responsibility, the elder sister shouldered for you!

“Old Xuan, Yuhao like this left, he position in Sea God Pavilion, sits by me.”Ma Xiaotao said to Old Xuan.

Nobody will think Ma Xiaotao to seize power, when this entire Continent is precarious, the authority means the responsibility.

Old Xuan nod of silently. “Good.”

Ma Xiaotao looks to Old Xuan Xiao Xiao, said: “You are also the Tang Sect person, told me, in these days, side Yuhao that I left what happened.”

Left Shrek City, the feeling that some Huo Yuhao instead whole bodies relax, this feeling many years did not have, feel relaxed, perhaps with this word explained that his present feeling is best. Is Huo Yuhao joyful? He does not know, but. He at least feels relaxed. Threw finally temporarily actually all these, he cannot think really tube in society all, was only the protection side Tang Wutong.

If were not this Tang Wutong to lose consciousness. He is impossible to set firm resolve such to do. In his heart, are many, a lot to do. But now, is unimportant, compared with Tang Wutong, what these matters was considered as?

The ray from the sky glitters, the fog passed over gently and swiftly in the side. Huo Yuhao unknowingly has pushed to rise Absolute own speed. Within the body Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus with his mentality of this feeling relaxed, has as if agreed with, between both did not repel again, as if fuses from that Yin-Yang Supplement direction really mutually.

Whirlpool Soul Power produce in within the body. Surging. Through consumes again rapidly. This consumption, regarding Huo Yuhao. Is equal to radically not having.

Goes to Clear Sky Sect to be not near from Shrek Academy, but is not too far.

Clear Sky Sect in Sky Soul Empire, accurately said that now should be in Sun-Moon Empire.

The Huo Yuhao speed was too fast, without enough time catches his form to these upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device quickly, but, everything presents upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device in Huo Yuhao perception area, actually cannot escape his evil clutches.

Does not need to take any effort, since a throwing knife strikes has killed nine levels of Soul Engineer, Huo Yuhao to Tang Sect hidden weapon had new realizing from experience, looks like gives up affectation to be the same, that feeling is very wonderful. Therefore, even if widely separated by several kilometers, so long as is a scrap metal departs, destroys upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device Core Formation sufficiently. Thus its thorough destruction.

That feeling is very carefree, but present Huo Yuhao, pursue is this pleasant sensation. Therefore, his everywhere one visit, upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device had bad luck, does not know that many was destroyed by him.

Sun-Moon Empire army.

Ju Zi(orange) sitting silently in commander tent, her bearing the blame copy clerk just sent off, returns to Sun-Moon Empire Bright Capital City. This time, she lost. Loses is very miserable.

When the army retreats, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp and Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp vestiges also came back. Comes back, Evil Tyrant Commander Soul Engineer Corp must go all out with Evil Soul Master, two Soul Engineer Corp altogether surplus are less than 300 people, but actually shares a common hatred, enters the military compound, directly soars the Evil Soul Master base to go.

But this time Evil Soul Master, was actually a group of people without a leader, Zongli Wu disappears without a trace, moreover Evil Soul Master of Transcendent Douluo above level or was injured and either died in battle, the overall strength reduced greatly.

A big internecine strife erupted in the military compound directly.

After other Soul Engineer Corp hear the news, the goal of first catching up with put down a rebellion, but when they heard from Emperor Dragon and Evil Tyrant two Soul Engineer Corp mouths that Holy Spirit Cult has sneak attacked them unexpectedly, making their these fellow soldier lose the serious time. Their eyes were also red.

Looked at Evil Soul Master pleasing to the eyes is not a day two days of matters. As the matter stands, in the entire military compound suddenly erupted the mutiny.

Such mutiny, even if in armed forces could not suppress by War-God Empress dignity of Ju Zi(orange).

The final result is, the Holy Spirit Cult powerhouses in military compound, the Titled Douluo above rank, almost ran away, but the Titled Douluo following rank, was all ripped the fragment by angry Soul Engineer.

Is this matter on the big strip, what Holy Spirit Cult? That is the national religion of Sun-Moon Empire! Even if they are Evil Soul Master clan/sect, but protects country god reputation also.

Numerous Commander Soul Engineer Corp, under the Evil Tyrant Commander Soul Engineer Corp leadership, kneels down in front of Ju Zi(orange), requested to punish.

But, at this time, can punish them really? First did not say, law does not punish numerous offenders, what is more important, these Soul Engineer Corp are the Ju Zi(orange) supporters!

Therefore, Ju Zi(orange) can only be is stationed the army in first temporarily belonging to Sky Soul Empire, then got up the bearing the blame copy clerk, waits for processing of emperor. Only has indicates the manner like this, is the best means that otherwise, was equal to revolting.

Yuhao, you really quite ruthless! Has said you to be tenderhearted, does your this give me to come hard look?

Others do not know that was who sneak attacks two Hand of the National Protector Soul Engineer Corp, Ju Zi(orange) has been able not to know? The Ice Attribute ability, undead summon ability, this Huo Yuhao has. Moreover, is Huo Yuhao that she told personally, Sun-Moon Empire must sneak attack Dou Ling Empire.

Yuhao Yuhao, you were really too intelligent, you can actually guess correctly what I must launch was the Decapitation Strike. The evening of although going, you can also maintain sober unexpectedly, lets my army civil strife with the way of this stratagem of sowing discord.

Yes, you prevailed. This, Sun-Moon Empire army civil strife, in addition the morale of troops is scattered in disorder, in a short time, did not have the means to get rid to attack again, let off the golden opportunity in vain. That side Dou Ling Empire also spreads the news, said that had the emperor's clan to be remaining, has used the shortest time, has reorganized the Dou Ling Empire capital, has not imagined the serious civil strife appearance.

If these matters and Huo Yuhao irrelevant, Ju Zi(orange) is will not believe in any event.

Yuhao, good Huo Yuhao! You imagine compared with me really also want fierce many. Did you also finally start in the war maturely?

Has you as the match, for me, does not know that is the good fortune or unfortunate. Yuhao, worthily is the man who I have a liking. Although you have brought such big trouble to me, why, am I unexpectedly very happy? Is because looks that my man did grow up?

Actually, I hope that you can become the king who rules in the future Continent, I certainly spare no effort will help if so you, our children, will be the future successors. That is I hopes to see to offend the perfect result, although I know, this result appears possibly approaches in zero infinitely.

Ju Zi(orange) detained all participated to attack the Holy Spirit Cult military officers, at least the face work must be done. But he has also comforted them, she is a armed forces head, had this problem, first responsibility for an offense in her, if your majesty blames, she can a strength undertake.

“Marshal, this matter and you have nothing to do, is we do. You are empire pillar, without you, we cannot destroy Sky Soul Empire, making entire Continent shiver. How can make you come for us to take punishment for somebody else?”Nine levels of Soul Engineer excited saying.

No one has thought that their this martial-looking female war-gods, actually will say a strength to undertake such words, she is an empress! Moreover is the marshal. She can definitely put the blame on all mistakes the interior mutinies. The army mutiny, is truly related with commander, is, the reason of this mutiny, made her get rid sufficiently punishes.

But she not only has not done, but also indicated that wants to shoulder the responsibility, this lets numerous Commander Soul Engineer Corp as well as consecrate, had the brand-new understanding to this empress. Dares to shoulder the responsibility commander, is any serviceman most is absolutely desired.

----------------------------------------------------

Why did not know, has thought recently specially tired, not only the body was tired, the heart was also tired. Sometimes, bewildered having a fit of temper. Loses temper with the wife, apologized to her. Perhaps, was the pressure is too big. 11 years unceasingly, full, in the future will create the duty that is used to give itself to arrange even to arrange for five and six years later. I stretch was too tight?

Recently in the brain also will have presented the new book the bridge section, had me to write very amusing thing, only then thinks these times, will feel that was stimulated and happy. Like the drug addict.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-586-part-1





Volume 12

#586 - Sacrificed For Her?


Ju Zi(orange) shaking the head of gently, said: “The responsibility of this matter originally in me. Is I issues the order, making Evil Tyrant and Emperor Dragon two Soul Engineer Corp attack Dou Ling Empire. Also only then from here, can obtain the accurate news. But the military action of this scale, I have no alternative but to report to Army Supervisor. Therefore, the responsibility in me, everybody was needless to say anything much. Since I said takes a strength to undertake, is a strength undertakes. Even if considered from the benefit, but punishes me, can preserve the mainstays of your empire finally.”

The Ju Zi(orange) sound is very tranquil, but listens in the numerous position Soul Engineer ear actually tranquil? Suddenly, numerous position Soul Engineer lowered the head.

They are very clear, this time matter will be what kind of responsibility. Person who the attack protects the country god arbitrarily, even if there is evidence and rational. This is also equal to at the rebellion! The rebellion big crime, this wants the extermination nine generations. Yes! Ju Zi(orange) undertakes all these for them, truly can fall to lowly the loss, Ju Zi(orange) is any status they knows.

Initially, this War-God Empress by the orphan who your majesty rescued, for this point, when Xu Tianran decided to marry Ju Zi(orange), but also received has criticized much. Does not have the empress of backstage, is Imperial Family does not permit.

If not Xu Tianran resists opposition, Ju Zi(orange) radically could not become the empress. But now this does not have the status and background actually became the best situation, because she is alone in the world, even if the responsibility for an offense is heavy, so long as she undertakes, is only crime one person.

But, she is an empress! Is War-God Empress. Although she appears that tranquil, but these can Soul Engineer be tranquil?

“Wish to undertake with the marshal together. Although dies not regrets.”A Commander Soul Engineer Corp the knees knees down, has done obeisance to empress. His pays respect to the courtesy of king, as Commander Soul Engineer Corp, besides the king, nobody can make his knees kneel down.

Had first to have second, in quick, entire commander tent has knelt a piece.

Ju Zi(orange) has also knelt, this time she. On the face the expression cannot maintain tranquil. Tears uncontrolled flowing under.

“Thank fellow soldier concentricity. However, this matter, Ju Zi(orange) must alone undertake as before, the empire cannot do without you. I here. One small request, invited to comply.”

Oldest nine levels of Soul Engineer gained ground, looks to Ju Zi(orange), the look is somewhat fierce, but has actually filled sincere.

“empress please say. So long as is we can achieve.”In this old Soul Engineer heart had a resolution, at this time, truly was undertakes by Ju Zi(orange) is the best situation, because she may be able to escape the responsibility for an offense very much, after all, she has that many merits. It is not necessarily able dead. But they. If takes punishment for somebody else, actually must die without doubt. Holy Spirit Cult will not let off them, military law will not let off them.

Ju Zi(orange) said: “Has trust, although I die not regret, but the crown prince is young. If I died. In the future will have another empress. I am only a mother's status plead now, please preserve the crown prince, lets his joyful growth, even if will be will not be the emperor in the future, nothing. So long as he safely good.”

This moment Ju Zi(orange), appears very timid, even filled feared and sad. But also this condition she. Most can touch the will of the people. Able to move unhindered invincible War-God Empress, so weak side will show before them holds the lofty one, such atmosphere, even if the blood and iron servicemen cannot bear.

Another nine levels of Soul Engineer stood up suddenly, goes forward to support by the arm Ju Zi(orange), “marshal. No matter, I will stand this side you. You will not die, everybody will not die. Our commander, but the entire empire surpasses two-thirds strengths. We......”

“Shut up.”The old Soul Engineer tian eye shouted angrily, “do you want to lose the lives of all people really?”

The words spoke of here. Did not have the means to continue again. Ju Zi(orange) returned to normal, has comforted all Jiang, making them go back to rest. How to process as for this matter, defers to original. However, she must obtain, obtained.

Sometimes, is more important than the morale of troops the heart. Thoughts of returning home, then the army decides. The army decides, then, the world decides!

Ju Zi(orange) for her future goal, took solid one step.

Regarding these, Huo Yuhao does not know the circumstances of the matter, in fact, he reached his trip of destinations of now.

, The snow white snowy mountain toward, is being the mist fills the air by far as before. Just, regarding Huo Yuhao, these mist cannot prevent him to lead the way now. Even if has formidable Soul Beast similarly not to be good in the mist.

Gentle Spiritual Power releases outward, all sensation gently everywhere, but Huo Yuhao, look like Specter is common, being quietly has climbed up the Clear Sky Mountain Peak peak.

On Clear Sky Mountain Peak, Clear Sky Castle as before palatial standing and waiting for a long time there, without any change.

This was Huo Yuhao fourth time comes Clear Sky Castle, each feeling was not same. The first time time, feeling is best. He here, obtained treatments of two sect master, but, is here, because the Snow Emperor embryo has brought terror Sorrow turns to Joy, nearly razes entire Clear Sky Castle.

Those who keep Huo Yuhao forever from putting behind, is here, own Teacher, Holy Necromancer, Slumbering Calamity and Elux, forever left themselves.

But the second time, Wang Dong'er to lose consciousness does not awake, oneself deliver her. That time, he wants grievedly, finally departs, but that time departs, again did not have Wang Dong'er.

News that third coming, he knows Dong'er leave.

This is the fourth time, as if every time arrived here, follows unlucky. But in order to makes Tang Wutong restore, he does not have other choice.

Before arriving at the Clear Sky Castle gate, Huo Yuhao has not knocked on a door, has not summoned, but was, directly has knelt in front of Clear Sky Castle, to fort gate.

The time is not long, Clear Sky Castle fort gate opens, Clear Sky Sect Second Sect Master Tai Tan walked from inside.

He has not spoken a few words to Huo Yuhao, arrives in front of Huo Yuhao, raises legs, a foot kicked to fly Huo Yuhao.

This foot, rudely, the body of Huo Yuhao is common just like the shell, was rumbled directly beside Clear Sky Mountain Peak.

Tai Tan has not kept the hand, but Huo Yuhao has not revolted. The fierce ache is nearly broken the second Soul Nucleus bang in his chest.

Blood in gulps, emits from the Huo Yuhao mouth, but, on his face, instead presented the color of feeling relaxed.

Falls returns to Clear Sky Mountain Peak, in front of Huo Yuhao arriving Tai Tan silently, kneels down once again. Was anything had not said as before, but lowered the head.

Tai Tan coldly visits him, naturally does not need to ask anything, this mixes the boy to arrive at Clear Sky Mountain Peak with this stance, the only explanation is, Wutong had an accident.

“Person?”The Tai Tan sinking sound asked.

Huo Yuhao recited the incantation, opened Gate of the Dead, has delivered Tang Wutong, delivered to front of Tai Tan.

Tai Tan is holding Tang Wutong, returns to Clear Sky Castle to go, the Clear Sky Castle front door, the serious closure, exudes the low and deep bellow.

Tai Tan this goes, in Clear Sky Castle again nobody walks. Huo Yuhao has not moved, that kneeling silently there. Static waiting.

Does not eat and drink, to this cultivating for the powerhouse is nothing, kneels for several months unable dead. Moreover, under the formidable function of Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, his injury gradually is also restoring, has only used day of time, the medicine does not recover, all returned to normal.

Huo Yuhao kneels is very steadfast, he even felt better.

This time delivers Tang Wutong, he had not prepared to live going back. If Tang Wutong cannot cure, he commits suicide together in the name of love for her. If Tang Wutong has cured, then, even if dies, he must see her again. Therefore, kneels not only here to forgive, to wait for here, is waiting for the result. This time, regardless of there is any matter, will not make him leave Clear Sky Mountain Peak again, he has been waiting here, is good to Tang Wutong, or is not good.

In the Huo Yuhao heart was not sad, because he has regarded himself is Tang Wutong part, Tang Wutong is good, he is good, Tang Wutong is not good, he is not good. Originally is a body, what has to be quite sad?

This kneels, is seven days. Seven days seven nights, in the past.

The coldness of Clear Sky Mountain Peak, has left behind incorruptible on Huo Yuhao. But even if kneeling, Huo Yuhao own Soul Power silently is also revolving, according to Huo Yuhao own estimate, after previous an accumulation of war, in addition the aggression of Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, own Soul Power estimate had almost 94 levels.

Regarding general Titled Douluo situation that 90 levels had been very difficult to practice the promotion, has not appeared on him, the foundation that Dual Soul Nucleus builds was good. Speed of promotion, simply is similar to the blowout is voluntarily ordinary. According to Old Xuan that at least has helped him promote to 98 levels, will again not have any bottleneck. Naturally, because of so, after he reaches 98 levels, wants to break through 99 levels again, perhaps is a life and death term examination.

However, these are not the matters that present Huo Yuhao needs to consider, he not wanted not to strive to his strength, in his present heart, is only thinking that person.

Seven days seven days. 14 days passed by, Huo Yuhao kneels there, on the face full is the beard, turned into ice sculpture. On the whole person has covered thick snow and ice.

When 15 th day just arrived, the Clear Sky Castle front door opened finally, walks, is Tai Tan.

The Tai Tan complexion is very gloomy, when he walks, originally was Huo Yuhao of ice sculpture responded immediately, subconscious gaining ground.

Snow and ice “ka ka”make noise, with gaining ground of Huo Yuhao, presents fissures.

A Tai Tan foot flew, but this time that he trampled, put one's foot down lightly, at least again has not made him be injured.

:

Every day shouted asks the monthly ticket, I was tired of me. But I am the Tang Sect lead horse, if I do not proceed to clash, Tang Sect what does come magnificently? But I also hope, in my behind each splendid steed, can, when I tired, tired, holds my regulation. Let I have relax points slightly time. Ok?

Asked the monthly ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-586-part-2





Volume 12

#586 - Sacrificed For Her? Next


Huo Yuhao that flies although somewhat is as before sloppy, Hu is very long. But was the body does not have the snow and ice finally.

“Comes.”The Tai Tan sinking sound said two characters, turned around to return to Clear Sky Castle.

Huo Yuhao hurries to follow, his heart, finally no longer tranquil, but is beating fiercely. Wutong actually how? He does not know, determines his destiny time.

Entered Clear Sky Castle, Tai Tan has brought hall it him. One sit down, has not made Huo Yuhao also sit down.

Hall it, Niu Tian also, sitting silently on the seat of honor, the complexion also wants the gloomy several points compared with Tai Tan.

“The Wutong situation is not very good. Do you such protect her?”Saying of Niu Tian coldly .

The Huo Yuhao heart sinks, has not said anything, has knelt.

“Get lost, we want your to knock the cephalont to be useful. Even if you kneel here for 10,000 years, turns into the turtle, can make Wutong good?”Tai Tan angry saying.

The Huo Yuhao forced smile said: “I, only then this body, the admitting mistakes words, I was not many say. So long as can revive Wutong, how lets me. If could not revive, I together go with her. To another world, I have protected her again well.”

The Niu Tian face muscle has affected, “if can choose, I should, when first time sees you on to get rid of you, avoid also our treasure by these many pain.”

Huo Yuhao also can only respond with has smiled bitterly, Niu Tian said also right, if Tang Wutong did not follow him, will not receive really that many are painful.

“Now, the means have one.”Niu Tian said suddenly.

“Ah?”Huo Yuhao pleasantly surprised looks to him, the eye had the vitality immediately.

Niu Tian light [say / way]: “But, needed you to make sacrifice. Do you want?”

“Wants.”Huo Yuhao had not asked what sacrifice is anything, immediately readily agreeing without hesitation. He assigns can Tang Wutong, but also there is any issue.

Niu Tian sinking sound track: “The Wutong body received the comprehensive corrosion of death aura, these death aura already with her whole person, even was spiritual sea merges into one organic whole. Then caused her not clear to wake. Now the only means are, making her compel these death aura by own strength, this can restore. However, she own strength is insufficient at present.”

[Say / Way] of Huo Yuhao doubts: “Should that be what to do good?”

Niu Tian said: “If I have not felt wrong, you already achievement Dual Soul Nucleus, moreover should Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, right?”

“Yes.”Huo Yuhao nods immediately. The heart also secretly is simultaneously startled, must know that Zongli Wu that powerhouse has not seen him is Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, this Clear Sky Sect Great Sect Master actually looked. At the Huo Yuhao eyesight. To the present could not completely understand that this Clear Sky Sect Great Sect Master real strength is formidable. This is existence of Limit Douluo level is also inadequate? Before him, sees one have Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, has Beast God Di Tian!

Niu Tian light [say / way]: “Wish made Wutong be able by own strength to compel the death aura, then, must let her also achievement Dual Soul Nucleus, with your same Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, had the opportunity. Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus will discharge that death aura voluntarily. This point, I and brothers cannot achieve. Our strengths. Different with Wutong. Moreover Martial Soul does not agree with. Only then you, have the gang her possibility.”

“Head-family has secret technique, can map the opposite party within the body own Soul Nucleus temporarily, thus helps opposite party revolution Soul Power. But itself Martial Soul and Soul Power must agree with are very good. Wutong sole Soul Nucleus now is light attribute. Also is her, Radiant Dragon Goddess Butterfly Soul Power. Then, now her second Soul Nucleus, only then a possibility is easiest to realize, is Spiritual Power. But your Spiritual Power is also formidable enough. Therefore, needs you own mind Soul Nucleus mapping in her spiritual sea, helping her also achievement second Soul Nucleus. Thus completes Yin-Yang Supplement. Understood?”

“Has the danger?”Huo Yuhao asked.

“Has. This secret technique principle altruistic damages oneself. The Wutong risk is not big, so long as you are firm enough, the chance of success is very big. However, you will therefore likely lose Soul Nucleus, even there is a possibility, because Soul Nucleus weakens, but injures and source. Because is mind Soul Nucleus, the most serious consequence, you will probably turn into the idiot. Even if not turn into the idiot, the strength greatly will also reduce, forever is not likely able again to become Titled Douluo.”The Niu Tian sinking sound said that “therefore, you must consider clearly. Once secret technique starts, will be very difficult to terminate, terminates definitely will make Wutong be killed violently instantaneously.”

Huo Yuhao stands up, free and easy shaking the head, “did not need to consider, started.”

Tai Tan said: “You may, to be clear, this is the irreversible damage. You practice Dual Soul Nucleus that becomes to have problems laboriously inevitably. As far as I know, you should be in human history first complete the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus person. Moreover after being possible, does not have the future.”

“Uncle Tai Tan, Uncle Niu Tian, we let us not lose the time. Delayed a while, the body of Wutong is corroded a point by the death aura. This starts. So long as can make Wutong good, wants my life to give. Let alone is reduces cultivates. However, I must request two uncle matters.”

Niu Tian said: “You said.”

The Huo Yuhao eye reveals color of the renouncing, “if I after secret technique carries on turned into the idiot, please two uncles immediately strike to kill me, then ruins my corpse, must do not make Wutong see. Told her I send her, abandons her not to attend, left voluntarily.”

Tai Tan said curiously: “Why is this?”

Huo Yuhao said: “By her temperament, if I turned into the idiot, she will certainly accompany my one generation, is impossible to be joyful and happy. Let her think me to leave, she will be very sad, but the time grew, would desalinating. But cannot make her know that I died. That will play the counter-effect. Therefore, please two uncles help.”

Listened to his these words, Niu Tian and Tai Tan look was gentle, Niu Tian nodded, said: “Good, I promise you.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Our starts. Where has the thing of eating, I must eat a thing first, rests, the condition adjusts best, must help Wutong restore perfectly.”

Tai Tan said: “I lead you to go.”

Wolfing down has eaten the thing, does not know completely is any flavor. It looks like in this time Huo Yuhao, these food are just an energy supplement.

Has eaten meal, he starts meditate, after a double-hour, he reappears in front of Tai Tan.

Great Sect Master Niu Tian does not know where, Tai Tan inquired whether again Huo Yuhao regretted. After getting the firm answer, he then brings Huo Yuhao to walk toward the Clear Sky Castle building, to most top layer, stops the footsteps.

The top layer only then a room, all around actually four windows, can clear seeing outside sea of clouds, the fog drift about, to person one type such as near fairyland feeling.

Tang Wutong on static lying down on the room Yang's bed. She appears very tranquil, like sleeping soundly. The complexion is as before pale, the body is also lingering light death air/Qi.

Dying of Grim Reaper Devil Puppet struck was too after all strong, Tang Wutong withstood that to strike to be able with own body to live, is the miracle.

Sees her, Huo Yuhao some facial expression convulsion.

For beforehand Dong'er or present Wutong, withstood too many misery, the Huo Yuhao present does not know how should face Wang Dong'er or is Tang Wutong, perhaps this way, he must first fall insanely.

As a man, not only cannot protect own woman, instead because of protecting oneself receives heavy wound by own woman, came to the verge of death. This pain bites the heart.

Huo Yuhao is withstanding this painful feeling. When he listened to Tai Tan and Niu Tian said when saved the Tang Wutong means that in fact, the heart of hearts had a feeling relaxed feeling. Looked like must extricate.

For Wutong, what sacrificed the strength to be considered as?

Huo Yuhao turns head to look to Tai Tan, “Uncle Tai Tan, how do we start?”

Tai Tan said: “You sit to the Wutong opposite, I hold her to get up with your four palms to balance, then you said according to me does.”

“Yes.”Huo Yuhao helps the Tai Tan same place, cautiously held Tang Wutong, suspends to sit cross-legged to sit the good type her.

The head of Tang Wutong is hanging down, the pink-blue color long hair hangs loose, sees this type her, the Huo Yuhao tears cannot bear “”one got down.

Four palms balance, his palm even somewhat shivers.

“Calms the mind to wash the worry, the heart does not have the nonego. Otherwise harmed you also to harm her.”The Tai Tan low and deep sound resounds in the Huo Yuhao ear.

Huo Yuhao alerts immediately, hurries with rapt attention reserved, making own mind stabilize.

Tai Tan said: “Pours into with your Soul Power to Wutong within the body slowly, carries on the entanglement with her Soul Power. After that type of death aura underwent our controls, was collected, although the offensive was stronger, but the chaotic degree was better. After your Soul Power integrates, these death aura will definitely follow your Soul Power also to enter your within the body. To complete secret technique with Wutong, then, first you must have this type of death aura.”

Huo Yuhao stimulates to movement Soul Power, fused with the death aura of Tang Wutong within the body slowly, the process of entire fusion was very slow, that death aura not was extremely overbearing, integrated to his within the body following Huo Yuhao Soul Power, but the effect was not quite good. Because Huo Yuhao own Yin-Yang Dual Soul Nucleus was too strong. His Soul Power is in itself swirl, the death aura entered his body, will immediately cast off.( To be continued...)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-586-part-3





Volume 12

#587 - Mapping! Fusion!


Present Huo Yuhao is not that little while selects ten later weak conditions the time. Even if present Grim Reaper Devil Puppet directly inserts a blade behind him, that death aura in a short time will directly also drive out leaving country by powerful Soul Power that Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus will have.

In order to introduced these death aura, Huo Yuhao has to control own Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus revolution is slow, making Soul Power quite temperate, that death aura was similar to the maggot of tarsal bone is then common, the spread entered his within the body slowly, tried to corrode his body.

Tai Tan has been observing their sound in side, after the Huo Yuhao skin surface also started to reappear a light death aura. He once more sinking sound track: “Your Soul Power enters Wutong within the body, starts to attempt to communicate with her Soul Power. Your Soul Nucleus Soul Power and she is different, but before you after all, can Martial Soul Fusion, agreeing with be very high, at least she will not repel you. You want the heart to divide two to use, attempts to contact with her Soul Power, while careful enters her spiritual sea own Spiritual Power. Releases Spiritual Power with your Eye of Destiny, the entrance in the Wutong forehead similar position.”

Huo Yuhao has not spoken, Eye of Destiny on forehead actually quietly opened, golden-rose color sun mark disperses on the forehead outward, gentle Spiritual Power immediately to rush forth.

Takes cultivating of Tai Tan as, when pure Spiritual Power that in feeling Huo Yuhao sends out, on the face revealed the surprised color. The strength promotion of this boy was really too quick. He arrives at Tang Wutong behind, helping up her forehead.

Huo Yuhao controls Spiritual Power to search cautiously to the Tang Wutong between the eyebrows position, his very clear there has anything, in which place, the trace of golden trident, but this trace will usually not appear. Only then moved to be Wutong seal, or is she stimulates to movement desirably will appear. Uncle Tai Tan was punctured ī by oneself, should be there.

In gentle Spiritual Power punctures under ī, the Tang Wutong between the eyebrows place spreads the light mind fluctuation gradually, although the fluctuation is not strong, but actually very much somewhat resists person and the feeling outside thousand li(500 km).

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong are so familiar, he can also feel that seal clearly to his repel.

Appraises from Spiritual Power purely, but Huo Yuhao now the standard of close Limit Douluo, this repel is also not enough to affect him, he continues punctures ī Tang Wutong that position with Spiritual Power.

, The forehead of Tang Wutong has lifted gradually voluntarily, does not need Tai Tan to support again. On her forehead, started to present the light golden trace.

At the beginning was only one, that golden trace transferred gradually gradually. The mind fluctuation also starts becomes is getting more and more powerful.

The Huo Yuhao surprised discovery, these mind fluctuations that sends out from the Tang Wutong forehead really has the feeling that planting makes him also probably lie prostrate in worship.

From the Spiritual Power intensity, has the enormous disparity with him, but this is unimportant. More importantly, the feeling of that keeping aloof, own Spiritual Power and her contact, look like are been ordinary by the bird's eye view.

This type felt that Huo Yuhao had, but also once let him and Tang Wutong has the misunderstanding. In Tang Wutong first time appears shortly after his front, he tries and Tang Wutong carries on Martial Soul Fusion time, at that time Tang Wutong Soul Power had this feeling.

Afterward with Huo Yuhao oneself cultivated for promotion, this feeling desalinated, is as for vanishes finally.

Now, this feeling appeared, that golden trident rune in Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power punctures under ī to be getting more and more clear, but the pressure that Huo Yuhao feels becomes is also getting bigger and bigger.

“Soul Power and Spiritual Power continually output, do not stop.”The Tai Tan sound resounds once more.

Huo Yuhao can only be continues maintains, Tai Tan has not taught him any secret technique, but makes him maintain this condition.

Huo Yuhao has Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, Soul Power restores Spiritual Power to restore, that speed can be said as present age one of the most powerhouses. Even if Limit Douluo, not necessarily compares favorably in this aspect he, he must be first cultivates the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus person unexpectedly!

In this case, Huo Yuhao throughout is maintaining the present condition, the interior restores to be quicker than own output, for him, naturally is not the burden.

But integrates with his Soul Power unceasingly, the death aura of Tang Wutong within the body as if had been sent by completely ī, permeates Huo Yuhao within the body are getting more and more. In order to did not affect to the treatment of Tang Wutong, Huo Yuhao outward does not even discharge these death aura, but whatever they occupied in their within the body.

However, this time he, body is strong just like the copper pouring, within the body meridians and internal organs are sending out the light golden color, vitality under formidable Soul Power and existence, these external forces is not enough to have any influence to him, all that the death aura made were the futile efforts.

Outside ray gradually faded out, because Huo Yuhao has been opening Eye of Destiny, therefore he knows that daytime time passed by.

After daytime, is the dark night, after the dark night, is daytime.

In an instant, a one day night passes by. Huo Yuhao throughout is maintaining posture originally.

His Soul Power currently had enters Tang Wutong within the body, pesters in Tang Wutong Soul Power together, does not attack. Although Tang Wutong Soul Power does not fuse with him, but does not repel.

But in mind level, the golden trident on Tang Wutong forehead, in his Spiritual Power punctures under ī unceasingly, burst out dazzling golden light completely. Under that intense golden light blooms, glistening that the entire room shines, but pressure that on Tang Wutong that gold trident releases, even makes Huo Yuhao feel that was somewhat strenuous.

At this moment, Huo Yuhao within the body suddenly resounds buzz the cry, a cool feeling spreads to Eye of Destiny instantaneously, golden-rose color Eye of Destiny had covered an ice blue gloss quietly.

This ice blue color emergence, the pressure that transmits from the golden trident place, immediately is nothing left. Without a trace of disappearance.

This is......

Huo Yuhao has discovered existence of this cool feeling pleasantly surprised. Isn't that coming from the Morning Dew Knife aura?

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath, Morning Dew Knife. Comes from the inheritance of God of Emotion Rong Nianbing. Exterior receives punctures ī, its naturally has passed to Huo Yuhao own aura.

The aura of Wutong that gold trident, is the god? Otherwise, why needs is the aura of god melts similarly?

The pressure of golden trident could not feel, but, this doubts actually deep Indian in the Huo Yuhao heart.

The Spiritual Power output starts to increase quietly, that golden trident seems simply is at this time common just like the material object, sent out golden light not to say all over the body that has been full of the sense of reality.

“Yuhao, stimulates to movement comprehensively your mind Soul Nucleus, then through the mind relation that you establish now, pours into your mind Soul Nucleus to Wutong spiritual sea in gradually. Is that golden trident.”

Huo Yuhao hesitated. He does not have first to do according to the view of Tai Tan.

To move own Soul Nucleus, this is not an easy matter, Soul Nucleus is the Soul Master basis . Moreover, most needs to stabilize. Once Soul Nucleus has the problem, then, under the large explosion, by the Huo Yuhao Soul Nucleus strength, entire Clear Sky Castle will certainly change into the powder powder instantaneously!

This is not Huo Yuhao most was also worried that because he believes that his controlling force, has to move the Soul Nucleus possibility, what is important, can Wutong unable to withstand? Her can spiritual sea withstand own Soul Nucleus? But own can Soul Nucleus, rely on the present mind relation shift really in the past?

“You do not need to be worried that I must start to start secret technique. You according to doing that I said are. Will I also deceive you to be inadequate?”Tai Tan as if saw the Huo Yuhao regard, immediately the sinking sound said.

Huo Yuhao did not have other choice at this time, he can only believe Tai Tan. The tooth fastens to nip, he started to control his mind Soul Nucleus to move.

Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus is a golden vortex, in the whirlpool deep place, has a golden crystal to exist indistinctly. At this time, under his thought control, mind Soul Nucleus starts the slight migration.

This mind Soul Nucleus source in Eye of Destiny, or is Eye of Destiny each other is actually interlinked. His touches mind Soul Nucleus, immediately has mapped in Eye of Destiny.

The Eye of Destiny pupil deep place, the bright golden color mind Soul Nucleus whirlpool is revolving fiercely, but is very stable, moreover gradually becomes there clear.

golden-rose color sun mark vanished gradually, what replaces it is radiated golden traces, Eye of Destiny on Huo Yuhao forehead is also golden light greatly puts, the ray intensity is not weak on the Tang Wutong forehead the golden trident. In the entire room, floods the formidable incomparable mind aura to fluctuate immediately. Clear Sky Castle, because Huo Yuhao started to stimulate to movement mind Soul Nucleus to cover light golden light.

Outside Clear Sky Castle, white clouds, some nearest clouds, looked like by the sunlight are shone generally, have sent out golden light gradually. These golden light spread toward the distant place gradually. Mountain peak that this, Clear Sky Castle is, was more like the place of deity.

Tai Tan has sat cross-legged to sit behind Tang Wutong at this time, feels the formidable mind aura that Huo Yuhao that mind Soul Nucleus is lending, on his face reveals a joyful color.

Low and deep incantation sound resounds in his mouth, his both hands also lift, pressed quietly on the shoulder of Tang Wutong.

Strange halo circulation, because there is a Tang Wutong mask, what Huo Yuhao cannot see, in Tang Wutong back Tai Tan, the personal appearance reduced several points gradually, gentle light shadow appears before the Tai Tan body, sits cross-legged to sit there, is one has the man of blue long hair impressively.

He lifts the hand, a direction in the Tang Wutong cerebellum place.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-587-part-1





Volume 12

#587 - Mapping! Fusion!


Immediately, the golden trident ray on Tang Wutong forehead restrains suddenly, the ray that scattered in all directions collects instantaneously, directly soars the Eye of Destiny place electricity on Huo Yuhao forehead to shoot.

The golden light sparkle, hit Eye of Destiny, Huo Yuhao only thinks whole body big change, he felt a powerful suction unexpectedly, was attracting pulls own mind Soul Nucleus to move outward.

The mind Soul Nucleus stable revolution was destroyed immediately, revolving becomes crueler, making the Huo Yuhao entire forehead turn into the golden color.

Outside Clear Sky Castle, in hundred li (0.5km) range, all fog turned into the similar gloss.

Huo Yuhao fixes the eyes on to look that immediately saw, that golden light transmits from the golden trident of Tang Wutong forehead place, this suction, likely is a bridge, builds between him and Tang Wutong.

Without any does not abandon, Huo Yuhao collects own mind Soul Nucleus to bloom with own Spiritual Power whole-heartedly outward.

Must know that his Soul Nucleus is Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, once the mind Soul Nucleus thorough exsomatize, Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus of his within the body will possibly erupt the major problem.

Regarding this, Huo Yuhao thought was very clear, he believes that Tai Tan does not know own this Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus characteristics, therefore before will have, judgment that said. But in fact, judging from the present situation, after mind Soul Nucleus complete exsomatize, Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus of oneself within the body will immediately perhaps erupt. At that time, oneself body will possibly produce the large explosion.

After having this judgment, Huo Yuhao has thought the countermeasure. Gives Wutong own mind Soul Nucleus, can revive her. This was enough. As for oneself.

Huo Yuhao is very full to own confidence, he has the confidence at least short time internal control to trig within the body Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus. So long as recited the time of incantation to him, was enough.

At that time, he will open Gate of the Dead, escaped into to go to undead Demi-plane voluntarily. Closes the front door. In there from exploding.

In undead Demi-plane from exploding, in a big way possibly ruins entire Demi-plane, or ruins part. So long as does not injure arrived here person, was enough.

This is the idea of Huo Yuhao, his thought is very direct. Therefore, when he chooses to listen to the Tai Tan opinion dutifully, treats and cures Tang Wutong time, has been holding the thought of being unafraid of death.

If two people can only live, he will certainly choose Wutong.

The light ray glitters in the air, the golden ray that the Huo Yuhao body sends out is getting more and more powerful, was migrated gradually with mind Soul Nucleus, the chain link of his within the body Dual Soul Nucleus communication gradually was also elongated, the Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus operating speed also starts the unceasing enhancement, that powerful, as if becomes very cruel.

The Huo Yuhao mind controlling force showed perfectly at this time. Is suppressing own two Soul Nucleus actually, wild degree control in certain range.

Eye of Destiny turned into the golden vortex at this time completely, could not see including the eye pupil, but golden light that the opposite golden trident, sends out is becomes more and more powerful.

“Mapping!”The gentle sound suddenly resounds. Huo Yuhao can judge is only, this sound should not belong to Tai Tan, does not belong to Niu Tian.

Huo Yuhao thought that a gentle ray fell on oneself, this ray was somewhat warm, but was flooding a pressure beyond description. Before received the pressure of golden trident to appear once again, moreover compared with former more powerful many.

What is this?

In Huo Yuhao heart one startled, but also not waits for him to respond the time, he felt that Soul Power and Spiritual Power of own within the body almost simultaneously drop. In his Eye of Destiny, soon exsomatize, but mind Soul Nucleus trembles suddenly. Huo Yuhao only thought that strength of the strong revolving passes the body, the weak feeling spreads to spiritual sea instantaneously.

A golden vortex, appears in airborne his body previous foot away. Not is just the mind Soul Nucleus appearance?

However, what making Huo Yuhao surprised was, mind Soul Nucleus in oneself Eye of Destiny therefore has not vanished, but also exists as before, but the mind aura of implication compared with wanted small and weakly many many. Most also only then original about 1/10.

Limit Douluo Spiritual Power 1/10, there are about close 90 levels of Titled Douluo standards. But from loses 90% Spiritual Power extremely formidable suddenly, that weak feeling is extremely obvious.

This feeling is very painful, what at least Huo Yuhao now feels is. But Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus of his within the body also instantaneously becomes the powerful, the communication chain link central location each other collided to produce the whirlpool place, but now is actually the rapid upward movement, direct throat, enters to stabilize to the spiritual sea surrounding.

Two big Soul Nucleus some are not balanced, whirlpool Soul Power that produces what are more is having the Absolute Ice chill in the air, but was the Spiritual Power mind aura clearly to weaken.

What situation is this? Why own can Soul Nucleus actually be separated part? Separates 90%?

Mapping? That sound a moment ago what said is the mapping, the mapping what's the matter? This belongs to Clear Sky Sect secret technique? Really is quite mysterious!

Although Huo Yuhao is weak, but can clear seeing, that float follow golden light that the golden trident sends out to fly slowly in the Tang Wutong direction in the airborne golden whirlpool.

The speed of flight is not fast, but is very stable, that as if completely has broken away from the control of Huo Yuhao, that some Spiritual Power Huo Yuhao somewhat could not even feel. But his own mind Soul Nucleus operating speed also compared with reduced many and many. Just as such that Tai Tan said that his mind Soul Nucleus now is becoming extremely weak.

“With rapt attention. Waits a minute Wutong, when absorbs your mind Soul Nucleus, will also touch you to enter her ** Soul Power, will simultaneously cause your own mind Soul Nucleus resonating. You are careful, if you cannot control own Soul Power and Spiritual Power, then, will turn into the idiot, understood?”The Tai Tan sound resounds once again, yes, this time is Tai Tan, Huo Yuhao affirmed.

At this time, naturally had no way to say anything, Huo Yuhao hurried to restrain the mind, was suppressing that intense weak feeling, is felt the change of own Soul Power and Spiritual Power that oneself can try hard.

The golden vortex arrives in front of Tang Wutong slowly, to the position of that golden trident, then the golden Soul Nucleus whirlpool stagnated there.

The Tang Wutong whole person was shone upon the golden color, Huo Yuhao can feel obviously that the Soul Power fluctuation of Tang Wutong within the body starts instantaneously becomes intense, he integrated Soul Power of Tang Wutong within the body also to follow this intense Soul Power fluctuation to operate, Soul Power of his within the body also starts massively suction by Tang Wutong.

If there is changed others, likely can be startled thinks that this is Tang Wutong is absorbing own strength to strengthen oneself. At least this secret technique, looks like the Evil Soul Master ability.

But Huo Yuhao actually does not believe that even if gives Tang Wutong his all, he also has no complain and regret.

Therefore, he simply does not have the least bit to revolt, the body relaxes completely, whatever Tang Wutong is absorbing own Soul Power. But meridians of Tang Wutong, became with Soul Power unceasing increase more and more bright, internal death aura as if felt not to be wonderful, Zuo Chongyou who gone all out suddenly. But facing Soul Power that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong collaborate, they do not have the means to destroy.

The golden trident front golden color whirlpool gradually changed small, or was inhaled Tang Wutong within the body by that golden trident gradually.

But Huo Yuhao immediately felt that Soul Nucleus in Tang Wutong dantian surges instantaneously, strong Soul Power flushes away toward the forehead of Tang Wutong.

This type felt that he is familiar, initially cultivated Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus time, hasn't he faced such aspect? In six big spirits add on under the help of Old Mu, barely escapes, finally achievement humanity in history first Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus.

Feels the crisis that Tang Wutong faces, Huo Yuhao gets rid immediately, pestered in together Soul Power to move with Tang Wutong rapidly, the goal had one, that was the sluggish Tang Wutong Soul Power revolution.

to lose consciousness these many days, Tang Wutong own Soul Power has been at the dormant state, in this case, her own function has dropped.

The Huo Yuhao Soul Power total quantity be more than her, before absorbed that many, moreover was whirlpool Soul Power, at this time Huo Yuhao one moved, the Soul Nucleus running rate in Tang Wutong dantian was slow immediately, even was lived temporarily sluggishly.

But in Tang Wutong spiritual sea, a golden vortex is taking shape slowly.

She when condenses this second Soul Nucleus, be easier than initial Huo Yuhao, mind Soul Nucleus ready-made, directly absorbs Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus, but in own dantian original first Soul Nucleus was limited forcefully by Huo Yuhao. As the matter stands, Tang Wutong own practice speed initially Huo Yuhao quick are too more than and are too many.

Huo Yuhao quite therefore drew support from Tang Wutong own Soul Power not to repel his superiority, has achieved this point. Naturally, more importantly, that came from Clear Sky Sect secret technique, does not have this secret technique, Tang Wutong is how regardless of being unable to absorb Huo Yuhao Soul Nucleus, this as if radically is not the ability that Soul Master can have.

On the Huo Yuhao face reveals the color of feeling relaxed, he saw the successful dawn. On the Tang Wutong forehead, golden light is as before powerful, but mind Soul Nucleus soon had been absorbed by her.

Huo Yuhao has not done to person married the determination of clothes, instead has filled joyfully, can give Tang Wutong own thing, for him, is the happiest matter.

The Soul Nucleus rebellion in Tang Wutong dantian was getting more and more fierce, moreover unceasing to rush forth, but Soul Power start has made Huo Yuhao Soul Power somewhat unable to limit.

--

Does obeisance to ask the monthly ticket!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-587-part-2





Volume 12

#587 - Mapping! Fusion!


Huo Yuhao without hesitation breaks in many Soul Power the Tang Wutong body on own initiative, is limiting this Soul Nucleus as before. Meanwhile, relaxes little, reveals some Soul Power and that side Tang Wutong mind Soul Nucleus attacks.

Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus wants to complete, mutual impact and adaptation are inevitable. This point, nobody had the experience compared with Huo Yuhao.

Naturally, Beast God Di Tian is also experienced, but stated differently, it is Soul Beast, is not humanity! Huo Yuhao is first has forms humanity of Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus experience completely. In this point, nobody can compare.

The smile on Huo Yuhao face became more and more rich, how long he did not know, but felt that oneself was getting more and more weak. Within the body already, not only Spiritual Power has consumed 90%, Soul Power is also so.

But as the matter stands, the feeling was instead more comfortable, Dual Soul Nucleus of oneself within the body has formed the state of equilibrium. Stated differently, Soul Power consumption, but can also restore through the practice, but that side mind Soul Nucleus, likely was the source is actually made 90%, for a long time, a point restored the sign not to have.

Regarding this, Huo Yuhao does not care slightly, this is anything, so long as Wutong can live well. He hopes now, when all finished, oneself will not turn into the idiot. He believes that Wutong will certainly not shut out own.

But in fact, he even can affirm, even if turns into the idiot, Wutong will not shut out itself similarly, reason that wanted that guarantee with Niu Tian and Tai Tan, because, if turns into the idiot, he will shut out himself, he is not willing to become implication of Wutong!

The golden halo on golden trident finally started to restrain, Tang Wutong as if completely has absorbed Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus, but her Spiritual Power collided with own Soul Power mutually, started to present not too stable small eddy currents. Although is unstable, but actually continues to appear, in other words, two Soul Nucleus were starting each other to adapt.

This is good, this is good!

In sight shortly successfully, Huo Yuhao great happiness. He is very clear, this is the sign that Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus will soon complete.

Wutong now is 90 multistage Soul Power, so long as this Dual Soul Nucleus completes, then, almost can affirm that she at least can also attack the Transcendent Douluo level. As for own cultivating to drop many, Huo Yuhao does not know, does not have the time to ponder these.

Light ray twinkle, the Soul Power fluctuation in air became more and more powerful. Huo Yuhao closes eyes, Eye of Destiny also has closed. The intense weak feeling, making his complexion appear somewhat pale, but on the face is having the light smile throughout.

The form stands up from Tang Wutong together slowly, the figure is slim, sends to hang loose blue after the brain, the handsome face could not find a slight defect.

Look somewhat complex looks at Huo Yuhao, after long time, he sighed gently, lifts the hand, has pressed on the Tang Wutong forehead gently. Immediately, on that golden trident ray dodges, as if has any thing to pour into, had any thing to vanish likely.

Tang Wutong behind, two groups of rays shine gradually, one group, is golden Sun, another group, is the Purple gold color moon. [Gold/Metal] and purple, blends mutually, looks like particularly moving.

Sends on the male face to reveal a satisfactory smile blue, nod of gently, both hands wield, a gentle ray simultaneously covered on Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

Two big Soul Nucleus of Tang Wutong within the body simultaneously shivered, within the body Soul Power is similar to the blowout erupts immediately generally.

Huo Yuhao was limiting her Soul Power immediately in this erupts is involved, seems like whirled away by the tornado, but in the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus chain link of Tang Wutong within the body also along with it completion.

golden light projects from the golden trident trace on Tang Wutong forehead together suddenly, fell on the Huo Yuhao between the eyebrows position directly, Eye of Destiny unexpectedly under the powerful of this external strength poured into is opened voluntarily.

Huo Yuhao felt that in own spiritual sea survives many Spiritual Power to be found time instantaneously, the brook drop does not remain.

The Soul Nucleus surrounding whirlpool vanished, surplus, be only not a big golden crystal, this flickers, Huo Yuhao only thought that at present one black, all consciousness vanish to disappear.

Can turn into the idiot eventually? This is the Huo Yuhao last thought. If he can also ponder that one second, then, he definitely can only hope Niu Tian and Tai Tan can keep their promises, who will turn into the idiot carry off, forever vanishes in front of Tang Wutong.

Instantaneously found time, not only Spiritual Power, Soul Power in Huo Yuhao dantian, pure Soul Power suction, but on Tang Wutong, bursts out the unequalled strong ray.

This time, being one's turn was Tang Wutong adsorbs the body of Huo Yuhao to sit there, the head of Huo Yuhao, dangled slowly.

In this is, light shadow together is quietly shines behind Huo Yuhao. That is one is having the man of golden long hair.

“Sufficed?”Golden hair man sinking sound track.

Sends male nod of gently blue, said: “Looked, in he is willing to be Wutong sacrificed in all shares, he inherits your Gods matter such to consider as finished. However, wants to marry my daughter, he must diligently be again good.”

At the same time was saying, sends male both hands to advance blue, immediately, the Tang Wutong back Sun-Moon ray puts instantaneously greatly, but that golden hair man also makes the movement that empty presses toward Huo Yuhao on. Behind Huo Yuhao, presented gold sun blue moon immediately. Just, compared with Tang Wutong back gold sun purple moon, the ray wanted gloomy many.

The golden ray just like the bridge, two gold sun each other shines, intense golden light is mutually supplementary, the gentle halo them links.

Huo Yuhao back gold sun, behind Tang Wutong under shining of gold sun unexpectedly gradually becomes bright. What stranger is, the powerful mind fluctuation also appeared on Huo Yuhao.

Moreover, Huo Yuhao back blue moon also similarly releases a ray, blends with Tang Wutong back purple moon in the same place.

Sun-Moon blends, each other Soul Power and Spiritual Power, starts to communicate.

Two big Soul Nucleus of Huo Yuhao within the body revolve, whirlpool Soul Power blooms outward.

Faint trace black air/Qi starts from Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong dissipates, sends out in the air. Vanishes gradually does not see.

The golden hair man ill-humored [say / way] of: “You did not think that this is cheating? We cannot interfere world of mortals all matters.”

Sends the male light [say / way] blue: “Cheats? I do not have! I inspired on my daughter to be my aura. This is my daughter, has my bloodlines, this who can say what? As for Huo Yuhao, he to save my daughter, receives the feedback of my daughter strength, will have such situation. This is not I does, is they do. I have used Clear Sky Sect secret technique.”

[Say / Way] that the golden hair man disdains: “That secret technique clearly is you creates.”

“Right? That is. Good, I must walk, can't you walk?”

“Walks walks. Tang San, I suddenly especially want to punch your, why doesn't know? Moreover, how I thought more and more that I have not profited actually.”

“Hasn't profited? Good! We trade, makes your Gods, I divide the minute to handle him, making him inherit my Gods, has Wutong, I do not believe him to dare to reject me.”

“Beauty that you think!”

“I walked. Being disinclined manages you.”Sends the man one step to step forward blue, during the body integrated was void, vanished instantaneously does not see.

Golden hair man look somewhat complex looked at Huo Yuhao, lifts the hand to press in his top of the head lightly, satisfied nod.

“To snatch the successor with me, daydreams.”Same one step steps forward void, the golden youth also dissipates in the air.

Tai Tan does not know where from drilled, hey said with a smile: “Is this deity fights?”

Niu Tian opened the door to walk, “any deity fought, the deity fought, can only in the space, but not in underground. Anything do not say that all defer to him to tell does. This time, these two kids, finally were after the bitter comes the sweet.”

When Huo Yuhao sobers gradually, he first feels is warm, warm, comfortable that the whole body could not say.

Am I also living? Did I arrive at another world? Originally, will have felt to another world warm?

The consciousness restores gradually.

“You are also certainly living, moreover lived cannot be good.”Sounds of some humorous interests resound, Huo Yuhao has gawked staring, he felt an incomparably familiar aura. Subconscious thought fine motion. He saw his spiritual sea.

spiritual sea turned into a stretch of land, familiar forms present before him.

A handsome man is holding appreciatively his golden long hair, visits him with smile on the face. On a Bai Se (White Color) long gown, the fine dust does not dye.

“Brother Daydream.”Huo Yuhao excited calling out.

Not only human form Daydream Ice Silkworm, in his line of sight, several other. For example, Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass.

Octagonal also turned into the human form now, is an appearance of simple and honest youth, stands side Daydream Ice Silkworm. Another side, two big beautiful woman vision chilly looks at Huo Yuhao, although the vision is chilly, the happy expression of but on the elegant face actually completely not being able to conceal.

Stature obese gigantic Ice Bear King, in smiling looks at Huo Yuhao, stretched out the arms to clash, gave him a big bear to hug.

Beautiful moving Mermaid Princess Li Ya be with smile on the face looks at Huo Yuhao, the interesting to listen to music sends out from her mouth, sounds together just like hundred birds.

“Did you and you awake? Did I converge with you in another world?”Huo Yuhao by the Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White) hug nearly must not gasp for breath, his sound passes on to be fuzzy, but each spirit can clear understanding to his meaning.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-587-part-3





Volume 12

#588 - Double Rises Super To Fight Luo!


“Our where has is so easy dead! Brother lived for 1 million years, the life is very hard. However, we do not know that what's the matter, but thought that had very huge energy to emerge, helping us accelerate to repair the source, therefore successively woke. We must ask you what's the matter, because we cannot feel outside situation. Your present Spiritual Power was too formidable, only if you permit, we do not have the means to realize outside all.”

“Hasn't died? Huge energy?”Huo Yuhao has also somewhat tarried, turns head to have a look at Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor they, they are approaching themselves to nod.

The Huo Yuhao thoughts are detachable immediately, I did not turn into the idiot at that time, said that the present all are the dreamlands? No, is not right, I as if can control the surrounding all, such being the case, then, oneself should also live is really being right.

Thinks of here, in Huo Yuhao ton vision heart nice and warm, the whole body has not being able to say strength.

“I have a look first.”Then, his thought moves, returned. Simultaneously in regards own physical state.

This in does not regard importantly, Huo Yuhao saw one of the shock immediately.

First he sees, is two eddy currents, is the Soul Nucleus whirlpool. Each whirlpool, increased close one time compared with before, originally partly visible crystal in the Soul Nucleus whirlpool, now became extremely obvious.

Two big whirlpools, one is the golden color, one is the blue color, each other is releasing Soul Power of surge, mutual fusion, entanglement. But the [gold/metal] blue ray, is surging to pace back and forth.

That whirlpool Soul Power, full looks like pearls is ordinary, if carefully did not look, even thinks that they are wholes.

This type felt that Huo Yuhao first time has. Simply was too wonderful. That powerful feeling, making his entire body enter another boundary.

The meridians, in the internal organs, as if vanished, he only thought in own body looks like piece of Continent, but two Soul Nucleus, separately were this piece of Continent date and moon/month, was shining all.

gold sun blue moon. That practical feeling, making him present a clear(ly) to become aware gradually. Soul Nucleus, as if, not only treats as the energy fountainhead to use.

However, the change of body is also not Huo Yuhao most shocks, what is more important, why will have this situation? If are all right, that Wutong? Wutong how?

The consciousness returns completely, Huo Yuhao opens eyes slowly. When his opening eyes pupil, immediately discovered that oneself also in that room of Clear Sky Sect top layer, but, in the room, did not have Tai Tan and Tang Wutong form, entire room only then he.

Wutong?

Huo Yuhao one startled, but the thought moves, his whole person fluttered, falls in the ground.

Huo Yuhao subconscious looks to the surroundings that Spiritual Detection also instantaneously blooms.

When he displays Spiritual Detection, oneself had a scare. Simply has not stimulated to movement Spiritual Power, is almost only the thought moves, the entire Clear Sky Castle stereoscopic view appeared in his mind, all living thing and details, even if were the slightest place, clear incomparable presented.

, Has not had Tang Wutong. He knew that has Niu Tian and Tai Tan that two groups of incomparably powerful vitalities.

Moreover, this time he confirmed completely, Clear Sky Sect Great Sect Master Niu Tian, certainly is existence of Limit Douluo level, but Tai Tan also at least is Transcendent Douluo. In two human bodies, has the terror explosive strength. Releases in the surface, already so formidable, but their sources, as if have any more terrorist strength.

Wutong? Huo Yuhao now in brain, only then this thought that the wind general running out room, direct Teleportation, appeared in front of Tai Tan and Niu Tian.

Niu Tian and Tai Tan they, in a spacious room, the respective end one cup dark red such as the wine of blood are tasting.

Huo Yuhao suddenly appears, making them be also startled. Sees is he, on the face revealed a light smile.

“Uncle Niu Tian and Uncle Tai Tan. Wutong? Wutong how? Can the death aura of her within the body once all discharge? Her person where? What has not good place?”Huo Yuhao is similar to Soul Guidance Cannon, Niu Tian and Tai Tan that one string of interrogative sentences, listen to one.

“Boy, you are calm first.”Tai Tan he he said with a smile.

Huo Yuhao one cuts irritable, present he, how possibly calm getting down!

Niu Tian has referred to out of the window, said: “Oneself look.”

Before a Huo Yuhao arrow step rushes to window, looks to out of the window. Saw picture that he will not forget his entire life.

The pure white fog from the sky drifts about, the fog is fluctuating unceasingly various shapes, from time to time is similar to the mighty waves is turbulent, from time to time transforms various modeling. Just like sculpture, instantaneous avalanche.

In these thousand strange Baibian fog, a beautiful pink-blue color form is dancing lightly. She treadons the fog, the whole body is sending out the light golden halo, looks like fairy maiden that in that fog walks.

The beautiful graceful dancer's posture, the pink-blue color long hair of big wave moves, the tender body sends out is letting the charm that the person is unable to resist.

Above her top of the head, gold sun purple moon shines in airborne, has increased several points of deity aura to her.

The strong Soul Power fluctuation is fluctuating in the air unceasingly. Let the surrounding cloud also unceasingly transform the color.

A Huo Yuhao tip of the toe place, the person leapt up, flies toward that fog . The gentle Soul Power fluctuation sends out from him, no, not only Soul Power, cordiality.

Pure sentiment and being in love, is the best mood! Huo Yuhao behind, belonged to God of Emotion Rong Nianbing light shadow to sparkle quietly, the next quarter, the surrounding cloud turned into the golden color completely.

Huo Yuhao stretches out the arms, flew in the Tang Wutong direction, in his eyes, at this time only then the inverted image of that beautiful form.

Tang Wutong naturally also saw him, on the elegant face reveals a smile, beautiful pupil midwave light circulation. The personal appearance dodges gently, has avoided the hug of Huo Yuhao, chuckle, escapes into the fog.

Huo Yuhao has gawked staring, hurries to throw toward that fog, but actually came up empty-handed. Subconscious when displays Spiritual Detection, the discovery, in the surrounding fog has actually covered entirely Tang Wutong Soul Power, his Spiritual Detection is unable to search her form unexpectedly.

Yes! She should have Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, in this case, her Spiritual Power and Soul Power perfectly are also unifying, the strength that releases simultaneously have the spiritual attribute nature, oneself are not certainly able to compare broken.

In the Huo Yuhao heart is somewhat anxious, he is really good to fear that the present all are the illusions, he only thinks that now moving of short distance arrives at her, determined that all these are real.

Blue moon/month being quietly raises behind Huo Yuhao, a Huo Yuhao light palm pressed above the fog.

In an instant, he only thought blue Soul Nucleus of own chest place moved, the blue whirlpool of that surge as if instantaneously appeared in the palm.

Immediately, outside Clear Sky Castle, the fog was covered immediately extremely coldly.

All water elements all instantaneously congeal, is almost only instantaneous, the surrounding area all fog within several hundred li (0.5km), change into the shaved ice to fall to the ground.

The Tang Wutong form appears in Huo Yuhao once again at present, she somewhat surprisedly visits him, the beautiful pupil deep place, is revealing the color of several points of rebuking, seems blaming him to destroy the present beautiful scene.

Huo Yuhao may, no matter these, he is not willing to be suffered by the present separation, Teleportation, arrived in front of her, stretches out the arms, hugs to her.

Tang Wutong displayed Teleportation similarly, but actually retroceded one foot, both hands lifted, simultaneously has gripped both hands of Huo Yuhao.

Four palm readings grasp, when Huo Yuhao feels that familiar pleasant warmth, the heart of whole person as if must dissolve.

He just about to says anything, actually felt that emerges two Soul Power from Tang Wutong within the body suddenly, he stares slightly, had not responded with enough time that he discovered that his Soul Power with the Soul Power fusion of Tang Wutong in one, their bodies almost simultaneously has shone unexpectedly directly.

Above Tang Wutong top of the head gold sun purple moon flutters instantaneously to the Huo Yuhao top of the head, but behind Huo Yuhao, raised gold sun blue moon.

gold sun overlaps, the thorough upper air, blue moon and purple moon overlapped, turned into the royal purple full moon, complemented each other fresh splendor with gold sun.

The body of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong simultaneously became somewhat illusory, the ray that their bodies sent out was similar to the essence is common.

The ray first was reserved, erupted suddenly outward. In an instant, Huo Yuhao only thought that a brain blank, the surrounding space, as if becomes in their Soul Power ejection process irrelevant to shatter.

The fusion, I and Wutong Martial Soul can fuse!

Yes, they can fuse. Also had Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus with Tang Wutong, their Martial Soul Fusion, completed.

Hao Dong Power, as before is Hao Dong Power. But, before had the earth-shaking change.

Soul Nucleus in two human body, almost simultaneously increased over one-third, do not despise these three points of it, the diameter increases one-third, volume amplification may be much more! The overall strength almost turns time once more. Moreover, is the strengths of two people simultaneously turns time.

This is the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus might.

At this time, each of them has pair of Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, their themselves likely is two Soul Nucleus, the male is positive, female for cloudy, similarly is also Yin-Yang Supplement. This amplification, is absolutely unprecedented.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong merge into one organic whole instantaneously, together radiant golden light toward distant place sky suddenly to launch.

This golden light diameter width has hundred meters fully, length cannot look at the edition.

When this was initially their first Martial Soul Fusion Martial Soul Fusion technique that shows.

Fading in Radiance, Golden Road.

This is Golden Road of ultimate version! To endless horizon.

After they almost instantaneously change into that huge vertical eye, returned to normal. Huo Yuhao to own cherishes area, already tight supports into Tang Wutong the bosom, is holding her pleasantly warm fragrance tender body, this had several points of third dimension.

The promotion of strength, is in his opinion unimportant. So long as she in side, so long as all her are good, that is best.

“You are quite silly, why can keep off that blade for me?”The Huo Yuhao sound filled shivered and sobbed.

Tang Wutong pū smiles, “you are silly. Has changed you, won't do? You are my lover, only allows you to protect me, doesn't allow me to protect you? Equality of the sexes.”

Huo Yuhao closely grasps her, “you may know, if you walked, I as you like will certainly go. You where, I where.”

“I know certainly. Therefore I do not hate to leave your this fool!”Tang Wutong winning smile sweet saying, but under the dimple, the tears actually quietly has flowed.

Before Clear Sky Castle window, Niu Tian and Tai Tan stand there, looks two who airborne closely supports, on the face revealed the genial smile.

“These two kids arrived at the same place finally. Was really happy for them. Like initially looks that Wutong her mother and that fellow are resembling together. Yuhao this boy was willing is Wutong gives up oneself cultivating to touch that fellow finally, was relying on Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus Martial Soul Fusion, this time, two kids were also turn misfortune into a blessing, double rose Transcendent Douluo. So young Transcendent Douluo, must catch up really for ten thousand years ago that generation of!”Saying of Tai Tan sigh.

Niu Tian coughs, said: “Has resulted, how I remember when you initially also had liked human form Xiao Wu?”

“! Big brother, your dot sound. You do not know that fellow does like being jealous? You looked that his sons-in-law so are been miserable, this that he suffers if love rival, perhaps the sediment not remaining.”A Tai Tan face appearance cautiously, is slightly incompatible with his straightforward semblance.

Niu Tian laughs.

Huo Yuhao tight is holding Tang Wutong, wishes one could to rub into own body her. Long time, his state of mind sobered gradually several points, in the heart actually suddenly had a question.

I hug very tight! How to have that type to respond? The seal has not revolted against my Ah?

At the same time is thinking, he is subconscious, hugs tightened a point.

Had not responded.

“Light.”Tang Wutong some sounds of rebuking resound.

Huo Yuhao hurries to relax the arm, looks down to her, “how to have responded?”

Tang Wutong elegant face one red, “father has come, looked that you are willing to pay all appearances for me,......”

In the Huo Yuhao eye reveals the wild with joy color gradually, if were not clear to this time, he was really a fool.

“Father-in-law long live!”

Lowered the head, his vision immediately becomes fiery, looks at that close at hand the powder delicate pink lip, slowly bent down.

Tang Wutong elegant face bashful red, but has not actually fended, lifts the both arms, encircled his neck.

……

4000 character big chapters, asked monthly ticket and recommendation ticket!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-588





Volume 12

#589 - The Sleepiness Of Xu Three Stone


The fog that diverges assails gradually from the distant place, covered the color visionally to this sky.

Sits in the fog, he is hugging her, she is walking arm in arm he.

“I think really another time must lose you, Wutong, do you know? That feeling nearly made me go crazy. From now henceforth, I must give you my soul, together with my good and my badness, my weakness, all problems. It is very repugnant, but only, loves you.”

“Fool.”

If not the Tai Tan summon sound, perhaps they really will sit well in that cloud in ancient times.

Must return to reality world eventually, returns in Clear Sky Castle. In the Huo Yuhao eye, all become seem to be different. Clear Sky Castle unlucky as if also in three stops at matter. This completely is the feeling of Sorrow turns to Joy.

Looks at Niu Tian and Tai Tan faint smile vision, Tang Wutong blushes the face to draw Huo Yuhao to run.

The food in Clear Sky Castle is somewhat monotonous, but in the honey in mixed with oil general two population, that is the delicacy delicacy. Fine food, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong before the love surges to recall matter that has.

“Our Martial Soul can fuse probably, Hao Dong Power can use. What's the matter? At that time I clearly felt itself by your suck dry! How not only to cultivate for has not fallen, instead promoted. Feels that I should enter the Transcendent Douluo level now, you are also similar. Moreover, we were also Dual Soul Nucleus.”

Huo Yuhao somewhat curious asked to Tang Wutong in bosom.

Tang Wutong shook the head, said: “I do not know that what happened, after waking, the discovery turned into this. Uncle Tai Tan said that is you cures me through secret technique. Probably said that after I achieve Dual Soul Nucleus, our Martial Soul and Soul Power level was consistent. Then forms Soul Power to return nurturing to parents, injects into your within the body, collected Hao Dong Power to practice voluntarily. So has circulated for nine days. We became now this.”

“Nine days? Have we cultivated unexpectedly together for nine days?”Huo Yuhao surprised saying.

Tang Wutong nodded, said: “Uncle Tai Tan said that you lead me to come back already almost quick one month. You anxiously going back? Words that you worry, our walks.”

Huo Yuhao embraces tightly her. “No, I do not worry. Before this time comes out, I have thought that also told everybody, I will again not possibly go back. I helped the student draw back the Sun-Moon Empire army. The Xiaotao elder sister has also cured, at least in a short time, Academy should not need me again.”

He will bury in the Tang Wutong shoulder, he enjoys present's feeling really very much, Wutong was good, he looks like again the world manner. Even is willing to forget that beforehand all sorts, best is forever settles down in this Clear Sky Castle with her is good, does not go to the tube outside all chaotic.

Feels his hair, the Tang Wutong be with smile on the face [say / way]: “Wants us in the same place, any matter. Can joyful faces! You do not have the means tranquilly really forever here. In our hearts, worries. Person this for a lifetime, cannot only live for oneself. Although you have been living for other people, is, without you, how many people some will be worried for you that was worried for us? We must return to belong to our world eventually. At least. Before all settle down, cannot evade, cannot the recession.”

“Present we, are no one can injure, we had gradually changed this world ability, such being the case. We had no reason to withdraw. Academy and Tang Sect, this is we must protect. Let alone, you have also had the wish not!”

The Huo Yuhao body shakes, looks up to Tang Wutong, four items of relative. He knows certainly the wish that Tang Wutong said that has not been anything.

Although Huo Yuhao has told itself. Was put down by oneself, but, can put down really completely? That is impossible. Now is at least impossible. Not only he requires the time, more importantly, must go to face.

takes a deep breath, Huo Yuhao nod of gently, “you said right. Since cannot evade, then, makes us change. Passed through these many, my present heart perhaps really can tranquil faces. However, I do not walk today, must make us treat again well for day. Anything does not think that such is accompanying you. Accompanies you to watch the sunset and sunrise. Accompanies you to look at that Yun Piao fog has lifted.”

“Good.”

They support are sitting on the Tang Wutong bed, Huo Yuhao anything has not done, they mutually are walking arm in arm, even little spoke, but looks at the beautiful scene of out of the window, was listening respectfully to each other heartbeat, was breathing each other aura. That sitting silently. At this moment, in their hearts lingers, only then happy.

When approaches in the morning once more, morning dew strong morning.

The warm hot soup drinks, eats some simple food again, the happy heart fills the air as in the hearts. This time, was reborn, not only the body, is the mind.

For a long time exhausted, pain and responsibility, as if thoroughly clean of wash within this month. The double pupil of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, became compares was clearer before, was brighter.

“Uncle Niu Tian and Uncle Tai Tan, we walked.”Huo Yuhao stands in front of two Clear Sky Sect sect master, deeply has done obeisance to them.

Although does not know how one and Tang Wutong restores, how oneself strength grows, but wants to come certainly unable to separate with these two plane cold-hearted hot sect master.

Niu Tian gives a calm smile, said: “Goes. You currently had able to move unhindered the Continent ability, so long as you are not separated, on this world can defeat your people to have, but, can destroy your people, actually almost did not exist. Looks after Wutong well. Otherwise, but also punches your boy.”

“Yes.”Huo Yuhao respectful is complying.

Tai Tan curled the lip, said: “Your this boy is unamusing, walks, walks. The Wutong young little darling, turns head time, comes back to see the uncle.”

Tang Wutong walks to go forward, has given Tai Tan and a Niu Tian big hug separately, the eye socket is red, soars with Huo Yuhao, hand in hand, goes toward the distant place flight.

Gazes after them to leave, on the Niu Tian face reveals color of the feeling relaxed, “our duties basically were accomplished finally. Can go back.”

Tai Tan also nodded, “! Should go back.”

The flight in the midair, the soldier who the air as if obeys the direction, is promoting Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong body shoots to go toward the distant place electricity.

Tang Wutong said: “Yuhao, first where do we go?”

Huo Yuhao has gawked staring, “I have not thought......”

Tang Wutong “pū”smiles. Said: “This not like you. You usually always do not provide for a rainy day, is the wisdom idea full of?”

Huo Yuhao thinks that said: “That first goes to Dou Ling Empire, that side Spirit Dou City. Also does not know Third Senior Brother that side situation processing how. What is more important is. The Sun-Moon Empire aspect does not know whether resorts to arms to Spirit Dou City. That I set the foreshadowing for before, should make the Sun-Moon Empire army have certain confusion. Does not know that will develop any degree.”

Tang Wutong nodded, said: “Right, goes to Spirit Dou City. Ju Zi(orange) lost to you, Academy and Tang Sect will not have the issue temporarily. Most dangerous is Dou Ling Empire. Third Senior Brother they not necessarily can block!”

Spirit Dou City.

Armed forces reported the unceasing load imperial palace main shrine.

In the main shrine throne, sits above high, is stature big and tall Eternal Defense Xu Sanshi.

The Spirit Dou City imperial palace suffered the ruinous attack before, in a short time, was only the simple reconstruction this main shrine, but also in the position of original imperial palace. But actually appears alone, surroundings is a stretch of open area.

The ministers had to propose that must change a position, said that is this place is unlucky. However, Xu Sanshi actually resists opposition. Where tumbles, where must stand.

Therefore. The Dou Ling Empire imperial palace, established in place originally. But actually all simplify.

One month, Xu Sanshi actually seems before had many changes, the lazy smiling face in those days in always revealing vanished, what replaces it is dignified. But is also this short one month passes, he seemed actually wants old several points. Obviously big of mental effort consumption.

“Report. Prince regent your highness, Dancing Cloud City was captured. The defense officers fight to the final soldier, in the city the people can evacuate safely.”

Also is a sad news.

Although the Xu Sanshi surface is tranquil, but complexion is actually a paleness, grips the both hands of sovereign place, turns into piece of azure Bai Se (White Color) because of overstrain.

Jiang Nannan stands side him, lifts the hand. Places on his shoulder gently, is comforting his mood slightly.

Since this month, Dou Ling Empire had a lot.

The imperial palace destroyed news, is unable to block eventually completely, spreads over the nation quickly. Land, has the different sounds immediately.

Although Dou Ling Empire enfeoffs aspect to control regarding the emperor's clan territory very strictly, but in long ago, some emperor's clan branches separate. And has the small number of people to have the real power.

The imperial palace was destroyed, almost all Imperial Family directly-related family members pass away completely, after this ruinous news spreads, heart movement will not have. The empire, is suddenly flustered. Had the ambition fellow to have the trend of being ready to make trouble quickly.

In this case, Xu Sanshi under Minister Spirit Dou City and officers' support, has controlled some peripheral cities the domination of centered on Spirit Dou City rapidly, and drawing in army as far as possible. Highly centralization.

And, the most important part of armies, are go to support the Shrek City elite army, only then has this elite army's support, the empire interior can stabilize, can suppress these careerists not to dare to act rashly.

--

Today is three! Continues to plead the monthly ticket and recommendation vote support! 20 : 00 pm, reach agreement with everybody: Outside, outside, 4095, carry on the pair of 11 big drawing events, the third child has accompanied everybody from 20 points to 0 points, simultaneously opens us to dazzle the second of world Tang Sect shop to kill the activity. We, outside move outside, will have the massive prizes to send out, signature book, Tang Sect card sign and playbill. Before purchased the book friend who we have limited the quantity the card, will also have the exclusive inquiry time. The third child also will sing simultaneously to everybody listens, singer standard!( I have thought! arrogant and pampered shape......)

Therefore, in the evening must come.

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-589-part-1





Volume 12

#589 - The Sleepiness Of Xu Three Stone


But this series armed forces book of easier said than done Ah? that elite army is Emperor Dou Ling ** Fang Zhongjiang, after obtaining accurate news, the first round trip catches up, but directly has not actually returned to Spirit Dou City, but after entering Dou Ling Empire within the boundaries, is stationed temporarily in southern big city. Gives the euphemistic name, does not participate in the struggle of Imperial Family. Only accepts the most outstanding emperor's clan to control.

This clearly sits the appearance that mountain Guanhu fights. If this general is not body does not have the Imperial Family bloodlines, perhaps the situation will be more awful.

In this case, Xu Sanshi seems like put up roasts, the aspect of facing simply in the fire is quite difficult.

Respectively led the army to initiate the rebellion in the northern two emperor's clans with the name of Emperor Qin, Dou Ling Empire was void, the armies of these two emperor's clans, immediately set out toward Spirit Dou City. And an army stops at no evil, kills and burns to plunder all the way, unceasing and slaughters to expand itself through plundering.

Although the army quantity of Xu Sanshi here control are many, because before Spirit Dou City elite, was reassigned by that elite army, therefore surplus is the ordinary army, the battle efficiency can only be equal to of strengths that two emperor's clan rebellion armies. These two armies also come, the pressure can be imagined.

Regarding emperor position, Xu Sanshi is not attached, but, he cannot handing over easily. If trusts the wrong person, then regarding entire Dou Ling Empire, is the ruinous disaster.

Luckily, in this month since, the Sun-Moon Empire aspect has not launched the war to Dou Ling Empire, otherwise, the situation can only be more awful.

In the hand controls the strength to be limited, in this case, simply does not have the good means to deal.

Xu Sanshi when had just controlled Spirit Dou City, showed the enormous ability, controlled the aspect rapidly. But, must say that control entire empire, is really the prestige is insufficient, how regardless to say. He not with emperor's clan same surname. It is not genuine emperor's clan inheritance.

The Xu Sanshi family has not come to help him, this point is Xu Sanshi has not expected, comes, only then his mother. Also is the Dou Ling Empire princess.

But the Xu Sanshi father actually refuses to come to rescue, because he does not favor Dou Ling Empire under this situation, cannot bet the destiny of entire Xu, as the head of household, he must consider the interests of entire family.

Beset with difficulties both at home and abroad, can Xu Sanshi not be anxious? What can he make now? Divides forces to resist that two emperor's clans to march, the final outcome, can only be annihilated it by the minute. He can do now, only then issues the order, lets suffer to torment that side Urban People to evacuate. Meanwhile. Is the central defense line arranges in Spirit Dou City fast. Only then blocks the attack of that two emperor's clan rebel armies, he may the and Dou Ling Empire elite army to negotiate.

Although that elite army looks on with folded arms, but actually not official military commanders many attacking a fortified position by empire. Standing by has the reason, Imperial Family is on the wane, only saves some final bloodlines. Moreover not direct line.

From the bloodlines, the Xu Sanshi bloodlines are also purest, but he is surnamed Xu, but is not the snow of emperor's clan surname. This became the biggest problem. Then, in this case, who is most outstanding, who had to inherit the authority of Datong. Present Dou Ling Empire. Most needs is an outstanding king.

commander of that elite army, is testing Xu Sanshi and that two rebel armies? In their battles, who can achieve the final success, means who can be capable of inheriting Datong.

Meanwhile, that elite army position, is the strategic point. And arranges rapidly, is stopped up above border area, prepares to greet the attack from Sun-Moon Empire army at any time. Therefore, they do not listen to Xu Sanshi here order to dispatch, actually as before nobody can blame that series armed forces heavily. It looks like in many official military commanders. He has not made the mistake.

Xu Sanshi has thought must leave to go, but, can leave really? The rebel army of that two Imperial Family branches, is not the good successor. But on him, is flowing the Imperial Family blood eventually! He does not hope to see really that future Dou Ling Empire was destroyed by Sun-Moon Empire.

Therefore, after mother discussed that Xu Sanshi decides to insist. Even if must leave in the future, must make the entire empire stabilize to say first again.

Processed various official business finally, took cultivating of Xu Sanshi Soul Douluo rank as, had an exhausted feeling unexpectedly. The civil and military hundred officers retreat in abundance, in the imperial palace main hall, immediately becomes empty.

“Side that two fellows should not have what powerhouse, was inferior that we also carry on a Decapitation Strike, their to get rid of, all issues was easily solved.”Nan Qiuqiu grips the fist to say to the Xu Sanshi suggestion.

For serveral days she also thought very aggrieved, just started all were smooth, but since the empire elite army is not willing to turn back in order to help friendly forces the imperial capital, whatever the tripartite struggle position started, Xu Sanshi has been in the inferior position, the civil and military hundred officers in Spirit Dou City, the manner started becomes ** got up.

Xu Sanshi shook the head, said: “The Dou Ling Imperial Family bloodlines were already on the wane, cannot continue to bleed again. I do not prolong contact actually this position, but I do not think they can do is better than me. The empire dangerous situation, they dispatched troops into battle for the authority at this time unexpectedly, shortsighted, definitely Non- clear(ly).”

Nan Qiuqiu ill-humored [say / way]: “That what to do? Has waited for their attacking army has reached the city? to get rid of they, in the war, have not known that must die many innocent person. Haven't you heard? Urban several thousand garrison troops were slaughtered a moment ago unexpectedly, did this person keep him to do?”

Xu Sanshi looked at Nan Qiuqiu, said: “Decapitation Strike is not that easy, these two fellows dare to dispatch troops into battle, side at least over Titled Douluo support, otherwise, you think why they do compete for the throne? The elite army and Dou Ling Empire powerhouse all does not manage that side the border now. If we move rashly, once is defeated, will be more disadvantageous.”

Ye Guyi muttered the tunnel: “If Yuhao because of were good, has not thought really that he now so was unexpectedly formidable, by strength of the to Sun-Moon Empire proposed that selects ten wars, only used seven to force the Sun-Moon Empire army to admit defeat to retreat. Academy gives him to confer a title upon personally, Eye of Asura, Ice Spirit Douluo. Wutong is also labeled as Dragon-Butterfly Douluo.”

Xu Sanshi sighed, the pressure that “Yuhao shouldered was too big, First Senior Brother spread the news saying that Wutong to save him was seriously injured, Little Junior Brother brought Wutong to seek to treat, did not know the trace. At this time, we can depend upon only then oneself. Waits again, Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp already on road, so long as they can rush promptly, the issue that we face can be easily solved.”

“Sanshi, you were too weak.”In this time, a gentle sound is resounding. A stature tall Tiao middle-aged female walked from behind.

She wears a magnificent and expensive long skirt, although the age was not small, but as before is actually old yet still graceful, in the Xu Sanshi look, at least six and seven points resemble with her.

Right, this is the Xu Sanshi mother, is the Dou Ling Empire princess, Xue Lingxun.

“Mother, did you come out? Your was healthy to select?”Xue Lingxun arrives at Spirit Dou City time, saw that the Dou Ling Empire imperial palace changes into stretch of ruins, own family members skeleton not saves, at that time sadly excessively to lose consciousness past. Until the recent several days, mind slightly restored.

Xu Sanshi wants to invite mother chancellor, but this situation, he also can only go against now in front.

“Son, the struggle of throne, is forever brutal. At this time, did not pay great attention to the issue of bloodlines. That two fellow who makes use to rebel, the itself Imperial Family bloodlines were very already light, but they can such quickly react, explained that it early lives the protruding bones in the occipital region. In this case, you need to do, in most in a short time, disappears all issues in initially. This miss said a moment ago right, your weakness, will cause the deaths of more person. If, uses the potential of Myriad Great Thunder to go to his head, draws in his soldier. In controls the domestic situation most in a short time, this can make our Dou Ling Empire have a vitality.”

“I had seen prime minister Sir before. You are not willing to change the surname, this also by you. But for Dou Ling, for mother, mother pleaded you and Nannan, your future first son, adopts to our Xue Clan, inherited the Sun-Moon Empire throne, how? So long as you agreed that at least the official military commanders in imperial capital, fully will support you, resists that two rebels.”

“This......”the Xue Lingxun sudden suggestion makes Xu Sanshi somewhat dumbfounded, Jiang Nannan is the bashful elegant face is redder.

Regarding Jiang Nannan this future daughter-in-law, Xue Lingxun extremely likes, but after all Xu Sanshi and Jiang Nannan have not gotten married officially, this type directly involves the issue of having a child, how can not make her shy.

Xu Sanshi subconscious looks to Jiang Nannan, Xue Lingxun also turns around facing Jiang Nannan, her eye socket was instantaneously red, unexpectedly is the knees one soft, has knelt to Jiang Nannan.

Jiang Nannan cultivates is, that is also the powerhouse of Soul Douluo rank! Discovers right, first does not respond that stretches the body forward forward, one has supported Xue Lingxun, the pliable but hard to break waist catches up slightly, held Xue Lingxun.

“Aunt, is your this does do?”On the Jiang Nannan forehead the perspiration came out.

Xue Lingxun was sobbing the [say / way]: “Child, this does obeisance you to receive, I count the ten million people for Dou Ling Empire, for the entire Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family future. I as Princess Dou Ling Empire, request you now.”

“Aunt, I and I promise you, do not cry.”Jiang Nannan is good-hearted, facing this situation, how she possibly to reject.

Xue Lingxun great happiness, tight grips the hand of Jiang Nannan, “good child and good child, thank you.”

---

Second, sought the monthly ticket and recommendation vote support. This month besides yesterday, was over three chapters renewals, the third child has been trying hard!

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-589-part-2





Volume 12

#589 - The Sleepiness Of Xu Three Stone


Xu Sanshi in the side somewhat depressed [say / way]: “You have not asked my opinion! My son also has my half!”

“At the same time!”Xue Lingxun ill-humored white his eyes. Jiang Nannan, in high spirits walks toward behind, which also a little sad meaning.

Nan Qiuqiu dumbfounded looks to transfer sad Weixi Xue Lingxun, [say / way] that muttered: “Third Senior Brother, was the aunt before an actor?”

“The Imperial Family person, where has one simply. Does not know how really my father initially was deceived my mother. Now I am somewhat clear, why my father is not willing to come. If perhaps, he came, my mother will entangle him to make me change surname.”

“Be careful!”Has stood Ji Juechen that has not opened the mouth to give a loud shout suddenly.

Xu Sanshi is also the earliest possible time responds that the body ray dodges, has changed a position with Nan Qiuqiu instantaneously.

Black Tortoise Shield appears before the body suddenly.

“Bites!”Resounds crisply, the sharp aura scatters in all directions to flutter about, is air of separate “”makes noise unexpectedly. A shadow also reappeared from the air along with it.

In this shadow hand has a handle short dagger, presents for the dull purple all over the body, is sending out the quiet cold ray.

Cannot hit, his body in a flash, has avoided slightly the Black Tortoise Shield frontage instantaneously, to Xu Sanshi body side, is a sword punctures. The rapidness of speed, is similar to electric light flint is ordinary.

Although Xu Sanshi has been blocking his first attack in a hurry, but, his shocking feeling, by the Black Tortoise Shield defensive power, cannot download the opposite party striking power unexpectedly completely, part of sharp aura extend the arm meridians to drill into within the body, made his arm colic. If not his own Soul Power is tyrannical enough, these will let his heavy wound.

Good strength big striking power, agility-attack system Battle Soul Master. No, said accurately that should be agility-attack system, seals! Number! Fight! Romania!

By Xu Sanshi present defensive power, agility-attack system Battle Soul Master that even if most is good at attacking impossible to make his Black Tortoise Shield unable to defend under a simple direct attack. Can achieve this point, the opposite party certainly is the strength of Titled Douluo rank.

A pale golden halo was almost outward has sent out from Xu Sanshi instantaneously, dispersing at the same time, golden instantaneous tarnish. Was ordinary just like the dark golden liquid, has covered the surrounding big piece space.

Sixth Soul Ability, Black Tortoise Domain.

The fight experience of Xu Sanshi is how rich, discovered right, does not use own domain ability immediately.

Under the function of Black Tortoise Domain, the speed of assassin definitely extremely will be limited.

Him starts at the same time, other three people also responded.

Sword of Trial appears in Ji Juechen both hands, but, he stands there has not moved, is only dense Sword Intent. Locks directly to that assassin.

Takes they four people of cultivating as, even if facing Titled Douluo rank powerhouse, but also did not fear.

“In the name of sacred.”The chilly sound resounds from the Ye Guyi mouth, golden light shot up to the sky together instantaneously, has covered the entire main hall. Under golden light shines, forms have also appeared. Behind Ye Guyi, three pairs of pure white wings open quietly. Six wing angels!

Right, now in their four people, cultivate to high is not Ji Juechen and Xu Sanshi, they are away from Titled Douluo, has the one pace. The true strength is most formidable, is actually Ye Guyi.

Relied on previous time was purifying massive Wraith Soul, after Ye Guyi closed up, finally successfully breaks through, became Tang Sect another Titled Douluo.

At this time, sacred light opening. All covert abilities, all does not have to hide.

Xu Sanshi treadons Ghost Shadow Perplexing Track, the speed, although cannot compare the enemy, but is relying on wonderful of Ghost Shadow Perplexing Track, has flashed through the opposite party following strikes. Meanwhile. Black Tortoise Shield changed into the innumerable shield shades, protects oneself. Keep the attack of that assassin from starting.

The fight experience of assassin also is very obviously rich, lost the opportunity shortly, feels crazy Sword Intent that on Ji Juechen is transmitting, he has chosen the retreat immediately. Converges with other people.

At this time, in imperial palace main hall is a peace, the opposite under the sacred light shines, appears really has twenty people. They disperse rapidly, by the potential of half surrounding, has surrounded toward the Xu Sanshi four people.

The eye-catching Soul Ring ray is that striking, in more than 20 people, unexpectedly four is the Titled Douluo rank powerhouses, surplus is also cultivating of Soul Douluo rank is. Two people seem cultivate to be weak, the middle-aged person who a year makes the forty years of age, cultivates for in the Soul Saint boundary. A complexion cloudy and cold youth, seems about 30 -year-old appearances, is six rings Soul Emperor.

The Xu Sanshi face muscle twitched slightly, looked at side not far away Nan Qiuqiu, “Decapitation Strike.”

The back room, two forms also rapidly return, is not just Jiang Nannan and Xue Lingxun? From behind, emerges several people similarly, Titled Douluo leads, other is also Soul Douluo and powerhouse of Soul Saint rank. They were surrounded.

The youth of that face darken sneers, “does not need to try to run away or seek the reinforcements, that possibly does not have any. Except that in this alone imperial palace main shrine you did not have the live person, all bodyguards were solved, outside has us to tie from eight levels of Soul Guidance Device isolation of Sun-Moon Empire purchase, even if here has overturned the day, will not spread a sound to go.”

Xu Sanshi coldly looks at the present youth, the sinking sound track: “Are you Xue Leng or Xue Kui?”

The youth laugh, breathing one's last of that arrogant happy expression extremes reveals, “this duke Xue Leng. This, is marquis Xue Kui, has not thought. We will arrive at the same place.”

At the same time was saying, he has referred to that 40-year-old middle-aged person.

“Xue Leng and Xue Kui. It seems like that you bail out to plan from the beginning well?”At the same time was saying, the Xu Sanshi vision fell on that named Xue Kui middle-aged person.

The Xue Kui look is ordinary, is that type absolutely not striking the type in the crowd, seems somewhat is even simple-hearted, who can think that is such a middle-aged person, in fact is actually a hormicidal mania demon?

That kills, will meet any city cleanly, will be he who the garrison troops will slaughter. secure province feudal lord Xue Kui.

But Xue Leng, is day and the province feudal lord.

On the title, the Xue Leng title is higher, his ancestor was Dou Ling Empire had performed the distinguished service. In the past, Heaven Dou Empire split Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire time, his ancestor once helped Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family escape chasing down of Sky Soul Empire Imperial Family successfully, finally founded a nation successfully. Therefore obtained the title of hereditary duke. In Dou Ling Empire, is platoon the merit of on position is expensive.

But Xue Kui must miss, although is also a feudal lord in province, but the title is actually a marquis.

They bring the army of territory to dispatch troops into battle with the name of Emperor Qin separately, directly soar Spirit Dou City to come, all the way, Xue Leng restrains, match who so long as does not meet the active threat, his not under cruel methods. But Xue Kui exactly opposite, meets any city, launches the attack by the potential of Myriad Great Thunder.

Dou Ling Empire originally void, a military strength of his province is the elite force, naturally sweeps away all obstacles.

However, who can think that this Xue Leng and Xue Kui bright Bright Capital City competes for the throne, actually walked in one, moreover seemed, among them was very familiar, even a little resembled including the look.

Xue Kui sinking sound track: “Xu Sanshi, your mistake lies in this turbid water. If no you, Xue Leng already sat the throne. Today, is your times of death.”

Xu Sanshi coldly visits him, said: “I am not clear, you are willing to ruin your reputation, for what? Don't you covet the throne?”

Xue Kui sneers, said: “You immediately were a deceased person, told you nothing. Xue Leng, is actually my son. In the past, I when the day and province travelled for pleasure, incautiously, knew a woman, was on the wife of a day and duke. Surplus, did not need me to say. Why must kill and burn to plunder as for me, that nothing but to serve as contrast my son. Must have the green leaf to match, safflower can be brighter, not?”

The words spoke of here, does not need to continue again, the Xue Lingxun been mad elegant face was red, angry could not speak.

“You already deliberate?”The Xu Sanshi sinking sound said.

Gives a calm smile, Xue Kui said: “Sun-Moon Empire War-God Empress promised us, so long as we have attained the dominant position, only will need to submit to Sun-Moon Empire in the future, becomes the vassal state, our Dou Ling can escape by luck. This without doubt was the present this time best choice. Resisting stubbornly does not have any significance, Sun-Moon Empire was too formidable, is not we can contend. We such do, is good for the empire.”

Xue Lingxun said fierce: “Is Soul Engineer Corp of that two sneak attack capitals, you puts?”

Xue Kui desolate [say / way]: “This type of sewage do not sprinkle on us, we will not acknowledge. That is only Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp is formidable. Or original Imperial Family small and weak result. Now, all these must finish. Xue Lingxun, you came also well, Imperial Family direct line, remaining your mother and child, so long as today you die here, then, again nobody can prevent my son to meet the position.”

Xue Leng coldly snorted, said: “What also rubbish with them? On. So long as I die.”At the same time was saying, he actually backward retreats, seems over 40 years old, in fact the age approached 60-year-old Xue Kui also similarly to retrocede.

They arranged this bureau already long time, now, arrives at yielded the achievement finally the time finally.

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-589-part-3





Volume 12

#590 - Hopeless Situation


Xu Sanshi does not need to guess, can want to obtain at present these powerhouses, certainly has to be existence of Sun-Moon Empire. Otherwise, by the abilities of two province feudal lords, but also is insufficient net so numerous powerhouses, that is five Titled Douluo, massive Soul Douluo and Soul Saint rank powerhouse!

But Xu Sanshi them, altogether has six people. True Titled Douluo has Ye Guyi one.

At present this aspect, without doubt became a dead end, wants to find a way out, only then breaks through.

Xu Sanshi retroceded quietly one step, kept off before mother body. Although Xue Lingxun is a princess, but her own ability is not strong. Is relying on the emperor's clan bloodlines and numerous resources, cultivated Soul Emperor to cultivate is, was in the people weakest one.

Xu Sanshi squatting down body, “mother, you lies to me slightly carries to come up. Today the mother and child, live and die together.”

Xue Lingxun gets angry: “Anything lives and dies together. You do not need to manage me, quickly breaks through, this palace does not need you to protect.”

“Walks quickly. Sanshi, you break through.”

In the free time who they spoke, the masters who Xue Kui and Xue Leng fathers and sons brought have opened up the offensive.

Five Titled Douluo almost also separate, has sealed up five positions separately, other Soul Douluo and Soul Saint also in abundance surround, just like iron bucket general.

In Ye Guyi eye golden light sparkle, back six wings gently is flapping, the strong sacred aura blooms outward, nine Soul Ring are similar to the wave is glittering generally the ray.

From the overall strength, the Xue Kui fathers and sons got the absolute winning side, but they actually do not dare to be negligent. Because Xu Sanshi they come from Shrek Academy. So long as there is a person to run away, then, for them, can definitely be the total destruction. Therefore, today must all keep here to be good them.

Assassin Titled Douluo that before that began first quietly was hidden in the air, obviously has used any stealth ability. Other four Titled Douluo separately occupied the east, south, west and north, releases own Martial Soul respectively.

Positive Titled Douluo Martial Soul is the lion, is sending out the intense flame all over the body, should be flame Wild Lion and so on. attack system Battle Soul Master.

The left and right two Titled Douluo looks are almost exactly the same, is a twin, in the hand is grasping a handle long stick unexpectedly, this obviously was their Martial Soul.

Rear Soul Master, seems somewhat strange, the personal appearance is quite huge, the body of whole person at least wants on big one time compared with the normal person. The height exceeds about three meters, the muscle sticks out all over the body, simply likely is not humanity. This is in he has not stimulated to movement under oneself Martial Soul premise.

By the experience of Xu Sanshi, sees, this should be strength defense system Battle Soul Master, his function is mainly cuts off the people the escape route, does not make them have the opportunity of running away.

Although does not have most fearful control system in these Titled Douluo, but coped with them also to be as if enough.

Positive Wild Lion Douluo face upwards to roar, a long hair turned into the flame color completely. Just likes the long neck hair of lion inflates generally. The strong fire element fluctuation bursts out instantaneously, dreadful Lie Yan, directly soars the main hall central six people to attack, but.

Meanwhile, both sides two Titled Douluo also moved. In their hands the long stick instantaneously rises suddenly, flings high, changes into two great columns, maliciously from airborne pounds to fall under.

If Yuhao because of were good. In Tang Sect people heart. At the same time almost raised similar thought. If there is Huo Yuhao, even if he does not participate in the fight, has his direction. This fight enemy are many, they will not have the heart of least bit fear.

What a pity, here does not have Huo Yuhao, they can rely on, only then own strength.

Xu Sanshi lowers roars, personal appearance rises suddenly, golden light dodges, Black Tortoise Shield turned into the bright golden color, Golden Hawksbill Turtle has taken possession.

Ye Guyi that gets rid of first, her tip of the toe in ground, person already float, the back six wings open, even can see with the naked eye, some innumerable golden luminous spots toward her direction gathering in the past, emerged crazily.

Handle golden color Sacred Sword appears during Ye Guyi grasps, this time she, seems looks like the appearance that the deity arrives at really very much.

Before Sacred Sword cuts, the radiant golden ray, launches front Lie Yan together from out of the blue suddenly, the sharp sword glow, directly soars the dead ahead Wild Lion Douluo to go. Great column that pounds as for the both sides, she like has not seen.

Crystal pink ray also quietly glistened at this time, has not participated directly in the attack, but integrated in that Sacred Angel from the rear area quietly. The pink color dodges, quietly vanished.

In the Xu Sanshi hand Black Tortoise Shield suddenly to upcasting, Black Tortoise Shield changes into shield immediately, protects completely the people sky over.

Strong and viscous Black Tortoise Domain blooms instantaneously. Covers in which all people. Some Black Tortoise Domain, that assassin of hideaway in hidden place go into action to be affected, in the meantime, the attacks of all enemies, will be weakened and slowed down the speed.

Although facing so numerous powerful enemies, but is coming up, the forms of combat of Tang Sect people actually do not appear disorderly, instead is very orderly.

Wild Lion Douluo lowers roars, the double fist rumbles suddenly, second, third, fourth, third Soul Ring almost simultaneously shine. Also has the powerhouse of Titled Douluo rank, simultaneously uses three Soul Ability to be able such having at one's command.

His flame turned into blue color instantaneously, at the same time that the fist rumbles, sky-blue lion light shadow has run out suddenly, collides with the Sacred Sword sword glow together.

Instance that both collide, that lion suddenly strange from the sky has stagnated, blue color originally actually does not have the omen turned into the pink color, then changed into the class to vanish all at once, after the air current, the Sacred Sword sword glow almost arrived in front of Wild Lion Douluo instant.

“Well?”Wild Lion Douluo calls out in alarm one, personal appearance retrocedes rapidly several points, very big and tall body of inflation contracts suddenly simultaneously, exudes one to roar to the front.

Immediately, the forehead of his main body turned into the lion, the sixth Soul Ring ray puts greatly, one group of whirlpool air current to rush forth, block the Sacred Sword sword glow, and at an exceptional pace is wearing down it.

It seems, the attack of Sacred Sword had been blocked, but Wild Lion Douluo suddenly has the sense of fear emergence beyond description. This feeling came from innermost soul.

It is not good!

Together jet black such as sword glow of black ink, appeared at this time. Position that this sword glow presents is very covert, because the Sacred Sword ray is extremely bright, this black sword glow appears a commonplace, when the roar blocks the Sacred Sword sword glow, this black sword glow arrived.

What is that? Unequalled sharpness!

The roar bitter experience to this black sword glow, was almost the flash is cut. The strength that in the roar roared crazily truly affects this sword glow, but he, although was weakened, but actually as before used its sharply, destroyed this sixth Soul Ability thoroughly, showed to combine and complement one another unexpectedly the common effect just like the double sword with the Sacred Sword sword glow. Black and white bi-color sword glow, the flash once more arrived in front of Wild Lion Douluo.

Cold sweat “”one got down.

All these came quickly. Although that Wild Lion Douluo is responsible for the frontage, but he is also only the deceptive attack. Their people are many, everyone displays Soul Ability, sufficiently made internal Tang Sect people have too many problems to tackle. This fights they to plan to be primarily is steady, must kill off inside these people at the minimum price. Moreover, because superiority in the overall strength, they to oneself are also very confident.

But regardless of, how they cannot think that Tang Sect these people erupt so to be unexpectedly quick, altogether has six people, three people collaborated the direct attack unexpectedly the frontage.

Wild Lion Douluo wanted to display own Martial Soul avatar at this time already without enough time. Only can be roars lowly, inspires own eighth Soul Ability with the quickest speed, tries to resist with oneself powerful Soul Ability.

But also at this time, the Ye Guyi back six wings simultaneously opened the maximum degree, a clear and bright long and loud cry sound got up.

In the sky, does not have the omen suddenly splits a slit, the Saint light drops from the clouds together, suddenly bombardment on Wild Lion Douluo.

This does not have the attack that the means fend, Wild Lion Douluo only thought that whole body one tight, within the body Soul Power starts to burn crazily. What is more fearful, the eighth Soul Ability flash of his displayed was broken unexpectedly.

Sacred Light Illuminate!

This is Ye Guyi entering step Soul Ability, even there is a certain self-created nature. Is she through comprehends unceasingly diligently. Originally was first Soul Ability Sacred Light Illuminate makes her comprehend the interruption effect unexpectedly voluntarily. Once were hit, Soul Ability that will be broken display.

Sacred Angel Martial Soul as Martial Soul of world most top, is in itself not now inferior in Huo Yuhao Absolute Martial Soul, since Ye Guyi cultivates to break through Titled Douluo, in fact from individual battle efficiency, she is next to Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, is the Tang Sect true third person.

Even if Ji Juechen and Xu Sanshi and she compares has certain disparity.

Ye Guyi is very clear, today such aspect, needs under the pain the killer, everybody has the opportunity of going on living, therefore, she comes up not to have any to keep the meaning of hand.

The Wild Lion Douluo biggest mistake, despised her. Ji Juechen and Nan Qiuqiu have truly gotten rid, helping Ye Guyi attack, unifies three people of strength.

This made Wild Lion Douluo have certain misunderstanding, thinks that these three person single strengths of were not too strong. Especially Ye Guyi this Titled Douluo, was really too young! Moreover, what he cannot even recognize Ye Guyi Martial Soul is, wing are many, what is this?

It is not each Soul Master has Shrek Academy Soul Master that insight.

Therefore, when Ye Guyi true eruption, Wild Lion Douluo has paid the price for own general idea.

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. Today the pair 11, welcome everybody to arrive at us to dazzle the world Tang Sect shop to select and purchase the Tang Sect signature book and peripheral product, some massive preferential activities send out. Naughty, treasure, shop, search: Dazzles world Tang Sect, can find us!( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-590-part-1





Volume 12

#590 - Hopeless Situation


golden light is almost triggering -type instantaneous lightening. On this Wild Lion Douluo has Paragon Protecting Cover impressively.

However, to the contest of Titled Douluo this level, the function of Paragon Protecting Cover is not that obvious, black and white bi-color sword light arrival, almost instantaneously the Paragon Protecting Cover smashing. Remaining sword glow falls on Soul Ability broken Wild Lion Douluo.

Wild Lion Douluo stuffy snort|hum, front were many a trace, has Paragon Protecting Cover and his own tyrannical Soul Power luckily, this truly has not received the too big injury.

However, at this moment, Angel Douluo Ye Guyi erupted, radiant golden light bursts out from her suddenly outward, intense golden light is centered on her body bursts out outward.

It seems, that looks like huge golden light barrier outward, in process that before fought, other Soul Master that Xue Kui and Xue Leng brought also respectively started long-distance has attacked Soul Ability.

These Soul Ability sole, might is not too powerful, but wins in the person are many! These many people attack together, striking power is very fearful.

In this case, Ye Guyi started.

The surrounding all long-distance attacks fall above golden light that in she releases, was opened by the instantaneous ball, golden light to shatter time, all attacks either were refracted one side, either was resisted directly. Two great columns that airborne drops both were blocked a hindrance, falls above the Xu Sanshi shield wall.

“Bang”a dull thumping sound, the shield wall thunders fiercely, Xu Sanshi stuffy snort|hum, but actually stiffly blocked this has struck.

Is relying on collaboration of Xu Sanshi and Ye Guyi, they such resisted first round besieging of so numerous powerhouse unexpectedly.

But the Ye Guyi offensive then just started, she displayed a moment ago, is own Soul Ability Holy Light Spirit Formation. The body of her whole person turned into the radiant golden color suddenly. The power of golden light, making her seem looks like carves with the gold becomes.

The back six pieces of wings also turned into the similar color. Seventh Soul Ability, angel avatar.

Sacred Angel just like arrives at the common, formidable sacred aura from God Realm releases suddenly outward. Make all hostile her person instantaneously to feel the huge oppression strength.

Arranges the eighth Soul Ring ray on her puts greatly. Together golden form instantaneous separation, but moves sideways, appeared behind Wild Lion Douluo.

Wild Lion Douluo was just broken Soul Ability, just wanted to display Soul Ability, releases own seventh Soul Ability Martial Soul avatar. But appears in that golden angel form in his back flash, the body of his whole person stagnated.

Wild Lion Douluo only thought own soul as if instantaneously had been deadlocked, he goes all out to revolt, how regardless of is actually unable to work loose. That golden light shadow. Integration that unexpectedly is quietly to Wild Lion Douluo within the body.

The Wild Lion Douluo whole person turned into the golden color, with the breath, the golden air current overflows from the seven orifices outward.

Such strange, making Wild Lion Douluo people have a scare. Also at this moment, the jet black sword glow flashes through together instantaneously. The surrounding space as if stagnated flash. Soul Master of Soul Douluo rank called out pitifully, the body had been cut both sides.

In the battlefield, the striking power is most formidable, forever is having terror Sword Intent Sword Mad!

The terrifying attack erupts instantaneously, the person of first dying in battle appeared.

Xue Kui and Xue Leng drew back, but actually as before cannot bear some discolorations at this time very much. In situation that in these many powerhouses besiege, came up unexpectedly these to kill one, really worthily was the powerhouse who Shrek Academy came out!

Hears that Xu Sanshi. One of this generation of Shrek Seven Devils.

Strikes to go well, in the Ji Juechen hand Sword of Trial another sword crosswise cuts, although this time cannot kill people once more, but the positive massive enemies will also compel to draw back.

The powerful fight launches completely, at this time, Wild Lion Douluo suddenly shouted wildly one, whole body golden light erupted instantaneously outward. His whole person as if soul was stripped, the eye pupil turned into Bai Se (White Color) completely fiercely, the body is shivering. Massive fire attribute Soul Power gush out from the pore, follows has the blood to appear.

Actually this and are this what Soul Ability?

A Titled Douluo rank powerhouse. This Soul Ability, has linked unexpectedly as if an ability of resisting not to have. This simply was too inconceivable.

All Soul Master on the scene see this, was completely shocking. They could see that this is eighth Soul Ability that Ye Guyi has.

Eighth Soul Ability, considers Death Angel!

After the golden color spurts is thin, burns, changes into a giant light beam to shoot up to the sky, Wild Lion Douluo crazily was calling out pitifully in this light beam, how regardless of is actually unable to run out from this light beam outward.

Also is golden light barrier bursts out together outward, as before is Holy Light Spirit Formation, melted the majority of attacks for everybody once more.

Ye Guyi whole body golden light rises suddenly once more, based on Martial Soul avatar, a golden wing launches in pairs successively, but on her ninth Soul Ring has also shone.

This, Xue Leng and Xue Kui felt the fear. This woman was too fearful, seems the 20-year-old age, why has the so fearful strength? The outcome that she displays was what kind of ability Ah? a moment ago eighth Soul Ability, has made a Titled Douluo rank the powerhouse life and death not know that then, what then she must display was ninth Soul Ability! Also will have what kind of situation?

Six pairs of angel wings doubled directly, from six wings originally, increased to 12 wings. In this flash, the Ye Guyi aura continues to select for promotion, arrived at the extremely terrifying region, as before is Holy Light Spirit Formation, but this time, these seven rings and eight rings Soul Master attack collectively, is actually not able to reconstruct any to destroy.

The so terrifying strength, has surpassed these Dou Ling Empire Soul Master cognition completely.

Xue Kui and Xue Leng before today's pursuer Decapitation Strike, after the close investigation, have certain research regarding the strength of Xu Sanshi side people.

However, they completely have not actually thought that these seem very young, biggest is also 30 -year-old over youth men and women, actually has such powerful strength.

Especially Ye Guyi, before then, they have not taken seriously her! Nobody knows that she unexpectedly is the Titled Douluo rank powerhouse, moreover is so formidable Titled Douluo.

12 wings, what 12 wings represent is what? The big angel is long. That was not humanity worried, but is the god!

Therefore, Ye Guyi ninth Soul Ability, is the big angel long arrives, is called, Angel God!

Terrifying golden light spreads from her, displays Angel God, she can only continue for ten seconds. But within these ten seconds, she can have close Limit Douluo boundary strength temporarily. If she is Transcendent Douluo cultivates now is, this time will lengthen to 30 seconds.

Ten seconds, could not handle too many matters, but killed several people, were.

Sacred Sword of golden light sparkle appears in the big angel long hand, the wrist|skill shakes, Sacred Sword changed into Saint light to sway outward.

Both sides that two hold the Titled Douluo powerhouse of stick all additionally to be looked, when the Saint light cuts next, they can only go all out stimulates to movement oneself Martial Soul avatar, integrates in oneself that long stick completely, going all out resists the Sacred Sword prestige energy.

When the Saint light finished completely, their long sticks cut off close half, moreover cut off some disappears directly.

Moreover, positive Soul Master, at least over six people, purify in the Saint light. Back that defense system Titled Douluo similarly was also divided to fly by a sword.

An eruption of person, unexpectedly intrepidly in this way.

“To!”Xu Sanshi explodes drinks one. golden light dodges, he has changed the position. When he appears again, arrived at side Xue Kui, but beforehand Xue Leng, then to originally the Xu Sanshi position.

Jiang Nannan already waited there, Waist Bow, locks in the opposite party instantaneously, Xue Leng by pounding maliciously in the ground.

Black Tortoise Shield hits hard Xue Kui. Although Xue Kui stimulates to movement Soul Power promptly, but was patted to fly, and was affected by Mystic Deep Tremor, the whole body is lacking in vigilance.

Xu Sanshi explodes to drink one, the Golden Hawksbill Turtle prestige can show comprehensively, in the hand the Black Tortoise Shield numerous bombardments in the ground, in the fierce bellow, the big piece black wave expand beyond the Black Tortoise Domain introversion, the frontage surplus numerous Soul Master shakes the footsteps in Black Tortoise Domain staggers.

In the Ji Juechen hand the Sword of Trial black and white bi-color almost also sparkles, is three people falls from the sky under his sword cuts, pushes to the front, runs out forward.

Huge soft muscle python from Jiang Nannan within the body separation, in the direct winding that Xue Leng, has held up him high, sweeps toward the rear area. Forces following Soul Master not to dare to come up actually.

The eighth Soul Ring sparkle, Nan Qiuqiu elegant face piece of ice-cold, shines huge Rouge Dragon light shadow, that Rouge Dragon dragon mouth big, emits outward bunch of glittering and translucent carving pink bright sphere, bright sphere in airborne explodes in abundance, behind all regions will block completely.

Rouge Dragon Annihilation Martial Soul formidable eighth Soul Ability, Annihilation Storm.

Terrifying Annihilation Power, making all Soul Ability that behind attacks be cut off completely outside, too quick Soul Saint that flushing bangs into that Annihilation Storm, instantaneously disappeared to vanish, has not stayed behind including a trace.

Xue Lingxun is also a smart person, how this opportunity will let off, hurries to follow in Ji Juechen behind outward runs out.

In the Ye Guyi hand in sky Sacred Sword crosswise sweeps once more, Holy Light Spirit Formation is fully outward one.

Angel God Soul Ability finished, but this final Holy Light Spirit Formation expands outward, actually collision stiffly flew in all people including several Titled Douluo.

--

Newest cartoon everybody who we stand looked, later will also continue to issue that the entity books of all cartoons, our shop had, everybody can go: Dazzles world Tang Sect, selects and purchases. ( to be continued )

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-590-part-2





Volume 12

#590 - Hopeless Situation


Nan Qiuqiu appears side Ye Guyi at the right moment, Ye Guyi floating falls, the back 12 pieces of wings also take back, vanish. She was also face whiten bending down behind Nan Qiuqiu.

She just became shortly after Titled Douluo, the ability was unstable. But Angel God arrives, consumes Soul Power extremely, in the back of strong capability, is huge overdrawing.

After having displayed this Soul Ability, in a short time, she did not have the battle efficiency. But is relying on her eruption, gave everybody to strive for means of livelihood eventually.

Nan Qiuqiu just carried on the back Ye Guyi, at this time. The black form does not have reappearing of omen together behind Ye Guyi. The sharp deep purple short dagger, directly soars the Ye Guyi back of the body insertion.

It looks like in all people, the threat is biggest, is this is having the mysterious Angel Martial Soul powerhouse, because of her existence, lets all these time follow the powerhouses who Xue Kui and Xue Leng come to fall on leeward.

Therefore, must first to get rid of she.

This assassin Titled Douluo bore patiently was very long, at this time, could not bear get rid finally.

However, in the flash that he gets rid, the form suddenly appeared in Ye Guyi together behind, intense golden light eruption. Has blocked stiffly this time.

Blocks this to strike for Ye Guyi, is Jiang Nannan, fourth Soul Ability, Paragon Golden Body.

That black clothed Titled Douluo has gawked, a pink big hand appeared before him, Hand of Annihilation. Nan Qiuqiu contains ones anger to erupt.

Jiang Nannan soft muscle python also followed, Soul Ability that Jiang Nannan has, it can use, this is it most formidable place.

Must say in the people, the spirit is most practical, in fact was Jiang Nannan.

The soft muscle python giant body crosswise moves, compels to draw back that black clothed assassin. Although Hand of Annihilation was melted by his later attack, but also gave the people to win the time.

Here must be the Dou Ling Empire capital, the Spirit Dou City imperial palace is at unexpectedly.

Although outside had been sealed up sound by Soul Guidance Device, so long as can clash from this main hall. Then had the hope. So long as has alarmed the surrounding garrison troops, although these enemies are formidable, actually also insufficient dreads.

Shield hit of Xu Sanshi maliciously on wall, loudly in bang. This just constructed soon imperial palace main shrine to be broken a big piece of wall by him, Xu Sanshi has not let off the meaning of that Xue Kui. Takes his cultivating as, Xue Kui before him radically is not anything.

Soul Saint that ordinary Soul Master cultivates, before the Shrek Academy Soul Douluo rank powerhouse, absolutely does not have the possibility of least bit revolt, let alone, Xu Sanshi itself approaches existence in Titled Douluo level.

The Eternal Defense name is not Bai Jiao.

The big hand lifts, toward Xue Kui direction one move. This is the Black Tortoise Replacement variation ability, golden Golden Hawksbill Turtle behind the ray dodges in him, giant gold appeared on Xue Kui. Stiffly entrains backward his.

However, at this time, on Xue Kui and Xue Leng unexpectedly shone the similar ray, two silver light dodged, they simultaneously disappeared unexpectedly.

Teleportation? Did they actually grasp this Soul Ability?

No. It is not right, that as if likely is not Soul Ability, but likely is the Soul Guidance Device ability.

Xu Sanshi is startled. However, at this time, he could not attend to other, first flushed to say again. In the hand holds up Black Tortoise Shield, he directly flushed to outside. Tries to rush to outside, so long as outside, has been able to summon the garrison troops.

However, he just ran out one step, next quarter, his body on flying upside down. Returned in the main hall.

The low and deep bellow, red-orange ray, almost also blooms.

“Nine levels of Soul Engineer, outside has nine levels of Soul Engineer.”Xu Sanshi angry was roaring.

At this time, under the leadership of Ji Juechen. Other partners arrived at side him, happen to saw that he was shelled.

Hears Xu Sanshi to mention nine levels of Soul Engineer these characters, the complexion of people instantaneously all becomes ugly.

If one-to-one, Xu Sanshi had not feared that really nine levels of Soul Engineer, are relying on his own formidable defense capability, even if could not defeat the opposite party, socialized or does not have the issue, once gave him the opportunity, nine levels of Soul Engineer will possibly fold in his hands.

But, the present situation is different, these many Soul Master in! Although Wild Lion Douluo at this time in considering the Death Angel Saint light withered away thoroughly, but in this main hall, four Titled Douluo. Two by Ye Guyi heavy wound, but battle efficiency also, but was weakened. May also assassin Titled Douluo and defends Titled Douluo.

Has in the situation that nine levels of Soul Engineer eye covetously outside, they want to run away became the almost impossible matters.

What to do? Actually can what to do?

A series of eruptions, had consumed up Ye Guyi Soul Power a moment ago, cultivating of other people, although also, but, they want to show that round eruption not to be impossible again a moment ago.

Ye Guyi lost the battle efficiency now, cultivates for weak Xue Lingxun must protect. At this time, as if truly fell into the dead end.

The Xue Leng gloomy sound passed from outside, “died, you died. If not my Teacher Teleportation pouch, perhaps you also really can go well, what a pity, this all already during our computations. Therefore, you died, cannot go on living. Has killed them, they the quick strength have used up.”

At this time, in main hall, but also surplus more than 20 Soul Master, that assassin Titled Douluo has also appeared the personal appearance, four Titled Douluo bring numerous position Soul Master to surround from the different directions.

The desperate color, appears gradually above the face of Tang Sect people, Nan Qiuqiu clenches the teeth, puts back Ye Guyi. On rapid clothing own Extreme Ice Battle God Armor.

Although this Extreme Ice Battle God Armor is inferior to Huo Yuhao that but also sufficiently makes her have the strength of close Titled Douluo rank temporarily.

Although Xue Lingxun actual combat experience is not rich, but the basic fight accomplishment, her is still very clear, oneself this cultivating is, can only add to the chaos to the people, therefore withdraws very much on own initiative, protects side Ye Guyi.

Ye Guyi sits cross-legged to sit, in both hands is grasping a milk bottle respectively, does not pay attention to the outside completely all, starts to restore Soul Power fully. Can restore some are, at present this aspect, wanted to break through directly was not too possible, they can do, was as far as possible spells with these enemies.

Outside nine levels of Soul Engineer have not planned to come in obviously, the outside broad space most favors him displaying, but this quite unenlightened space in the main hall facing top Soul Master, the wise is not. Let alone, all people believe that inside Soul Master dealt with the surplus people enough.

The Xu Sanshi facial features are solemn, the hand grasps Black Tortoise Shield, has arrived at the Nan Qiuqiu front in big strides, Ji Juechen and Nan Qiuqiu respectively by his body, Jiang Nannan in his rear area, four people arranges the simple battlefield.

Opposite party four Titled Douluo forward gradually, but eagerly has not actually attacked. Before the round eruption of Tang Sect people, had made the extremely profound impression on them.

Time that several times breathe, on to get rid of Titled Douluo! Although they also because of this eruption, causing Titled Douluo to lose the battle efficiency temporarily, but this and directly by to get rid of but different.

Moreover, that formidable Titled Douluo is trying to restore Soul Power, this is not the good phenomenon. But they do not dare to be too anxious similarly, no one is willing to make the person who takes the lead. The life only then one time, a risk, will possibly lose the life, in the situation of overwhelming superiority, they will not make such piffle.

Four Titled Douluo behind Soul Douluo and Soul Saint, released their Martial Soul avatar. Only then under the Martial Soul avatar condition, they can show the most formidable strength.

This is the matter that they must handle now, Martial Soul avatar, formidable Martial Soul avatar. Terrifying battle efficiency, soon will launch in this moment.

The tyrannical aura fills the air in the air, four Titled Douluo have not displayed Martial Soul avatar, because this is more flexible. They only need to block Xu Sanshi and the others the eruptions, surplus that twenty Soul Saint and powerhouse all-out attack of Soul Douluo rank, sufficiently submerged them. This strategy, is nothing less than sinister, but Tang Sect people, even cannot retrocede.

Dissimilar in shape and form Martial Soul avatar have shown slowly, the air as if became dignified, Xu Sanshi ray twinkle, in the hand the Black Tortoise Shield golden light senior branch, was releasing the radiant halo, so long as the opposite party began, he will display his Black Tortoise avatar immediately, by the Black Tortoise avatar condition, he had the confidence to defend these match some time attacks. Eternal Defense is not Bai Jiao.

As for these days, the partners can strike to kill many enemies, that can only meet one's fate with resignation, since cannot get away, that striking as far as possible kills the match.

In both sides at daggers drawn, the war is ready to be set off, suddenly, outside transmits a short pitiful yell.

“Um?”Hears this pitiful yell, Xu Sanshi opposite four Titled Douluo are the complexion changes. Outside simply does not have Xu Sanshi their people, will send out the pitiful yell, and passes on, only then their people are right, in other words, very possible was the Xu Sanshi reinforcements comes.

In this case, which their also dares to have retention of half minute, four Titled Douluo simultaneously explode drinks one, has attacked toward the people. In their behind Soul Saint and Soul Douluo, whole-heartedly is releasing their Soul Ability, suddenly, various Soul Ability just like blotting out the sky general, from all directions to rush forth, but, the goal refers, is positive Xu Sanshi.

So long as has routed Xu Sanshi, although the battle efficiencies of other people are strong, but the defensive power is actually absolutely insufficient, in a short time, they can strike clean that kills these people.

--

Double 11 next day, opening! The preferential benefit continues, altogether three days of preferential activities. Everybody is washing, treasure, shop there search: Dazzles world Tang Sect, can find us.

(.)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-590-part-3





Volume 12

#591 - Spirit Cirque Luo Arrives


However, at this time, these four Titled Douluo saw, Xu Sanshi not only does not have the least bit to be startled, on the face instead revealed the strange smiling face. Right, is strange smiling face.

He has turned around suddenly, even with the back to this these people, in the hand Black Tortoise Shield toward void wields at present, fourth Soul Ring, the ray puts greatly.

This is Eternal Defense Xu Sanshi formidable divine skill, Black Tortoise Replacement.

The ray dodges, Xu Sanshi lost the trace.

All followed Soul Master that Xue Kui and Xue Leng came to be shocked, did he such walk? Although does not know how he leaves. But, he walks, the following Tang Sect people, as well as his mother must face this all attacks, will die. At this time, did he run unexpectedly?

Rapidness that this thought that presents, but finished similarly also quick. The ray dodges, the next flash that Xu Sanshi vanishes, the form has replaced in addition his formerly position together.

From this form, bloomed the unequalled radiant gloss.

The air suddenly becomes extremely cold, the temperature in entire main hall instantaneous falls crazily, the innumerable ice thorns, are common just like the ice flower that opens instantaneously, take the body of that person as the beginning, spreads toward audiences Xue Kui and Xue Leng subordinates.

That ice punctures has three meters high fully, flies that the Soul Ability complete puncture and interception that outrageously shoots to come. Four Titled Douluo also can only attack these ice thorns with respective Soul Ability, in order to avoid own body was pierced.

Wears the man of Bai Se (White Color) long gown, appears before the position that Xu Sanshi was, unexpectedly is only Soul Ability, is only one! Completely has prevented the attacks of all people.

That three meters ice thorns, that hard, is containing energy, is Soul Saint and Soul Douluo rank powerhouse is unable to shake completely. Even if four Titled Douluo, can only be shot to fly away.

“Soul Shaking Burst.”The low and deep sound resounds from that white clothing youth mouth, the air became illusory.

Soul Master headed by four Titled Douluo, only think the forehead such as the great hammer to be ordinary, in body fierce shivering, stuffy snort|hum backlash, Soul Ability that wants to continue to display, was all broken. These Soul Saint cultivate for the Soul Master situation is most miserable, relieves directly from the Martial Soul avatar condition, falls draws back at the same time backward, the seven orifices bleed, received heavy wound.

“Group Weakening.”A Bai Se (White Color) halo spreads, has covered all people once more. The intense weak feeling, is destroying their physical strength rapidly.

Why that white clothing youth as if must all tell them oneself, his sound resounds once again, “Chaotic Mind.”

Four whirlpools, appear, appears on four Titled Douluo respectively, making them all fall into short vacant.

The white clothing youth right hand lifts, the dark blue ray appears together during he grasps, that is a handle slender dark blue long sword.

The long sword cuts instantaneously, four Titled Douluo, all change into the ice sculpture, falls to fly to go backward.

Strikes frozen four Douluo. Is this what kind prestige energy?

However, more terrorist also in behind.

“Blows, Snowstorm.”Innumerable snowflakes, that float appearance in void, manic Snowstorm, swarms to go toward that crowd of Soul Master just like the blowout generally.

The temperature in the flash, dropped two hundred degree celsius below zero below, but that white clothing youth behind, was actually as warm as in spring.

The whole body blood has as if frozen, in addition Group Weakening and Soul Shaking Burst effect. In these ordinary days very formidable Soul Saint and Soul Douluo, can only roll up the body, going all out stimulation of movement Soul Power and Soul Ability, defends oneself.

What a pity, all these as if are futile efforts, in front of that manic Snowstorm, the terrifying ultra-low temperature they are only because cultivates for the height is different, the time of resisting has a difference. After ten seconds, one side of the entire main hall, completely is world of ice sculpture.

From appearing finished to the fight, the entire process is just dozens seconds. All, were peaceful.

Outside the main hall, two body shadow bands two forms were walking.

In the Xu Sanshi hand grabs Xue Kui, another has the female of pink-blue color long hair, in the hand grabs Xue Leng mail-armor and helmet, this snow fathers and sons complexion schungite, all lowers the head, keeps silent.

The white clothing youth has turned around, looks to people, unfolds the face to smile, “hello, did you think me?”

The Nan Qiuqiu working as chest gratefully is a fist, “how do you come now?”

The white clothing youth says with a smile painstakingly: “You cannot gentle.”

Nan Qiuqiu snort|hum, “wanted gently, looks for your family Wutong to go? Wutong, you have been all right, was really good.”

Right, is this white clothing youth not just Huo Yuhao? That and Xu Sanshi walks together, naturally was Tang Wutong.

Reason that on the Xu Sanshi beforehand face will reappear the strange smiling face, because he felt oneself most familiar Spiritual Detection and Sharing once again! Huo Yuhao told him, must trade with him, thereupon, Black Tortoise Replacement has delivered to Huo Yuhao the main hall.

The following process, was simple.

Let other people already the somewhat desperate powerhouse, in front of Huo Yuhao, unexpectedly is similar to easily accomplished general, such solved.

Ye Guyi also no longer meditate, stands up, has same extending with Ji Juechen, they look at present Huo Yuhao, seems like looking at monster.

A [say / way] of Huo Yuhao face forced smile: “You leave think so me to be good, I will be shy.”

A Ji Juechen arrow step arrived in front of Huo Yuhao, maliciously is looking steadily at him, “said that you do achieve? Even if you broke through Transcendent Douluo, should not Ah? basic on useless any formidable Soul Ability, such has solved these many powerhouses, this was really too inconceivable.”

This Sword Mad was usually few to speak these many words, said these words, even some stammeringly.

Huo Yuhao smiles, said: “I and Wutong Martial Soul Fusion restored, a moment ago we continuously in the same place . Moreover, now our Martial Soul Fusion effect, under desirably control, even if our two separate, can maintain for about ten seconds. But in these ten seconds, you saw that approaches in the Limit Douluo standard infinitely, and has Absolute Martial Soul Huo Yuhao! These mixed fish, was considered as anything.”

One month ago, before he did not have achievement Transcendent Douluo, relies on strength of the to make the Sun-Moon Empire army repulse the enemy, say nothing of now. Does not need to put on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, he can make these cultivate to high 92 levels of Titled Douluo at present be annihilated.

However, under the freeze of Absolute Ice, these people have not died, but was frozen all, life symptom also, but, their present lives, all grasp in the Huo Yuhao hand.

Xu Sanshi throws Xue Kui on the ground, looked that does not look at his one eyes. Regarding this Xue Kui and Xue Leng, he already has the thick murderous intention.

Xue Lingxun also arrives at side Xu Sanshi, a face curious looks at Xu Sanshi to ask: “Sanshi, this is? Is the senior in your Shrek Academy? It seems so young, the senior, how do you maintain?”

Xu Sanshi face muscle tics, oneself maid anything is good, sometimes is a little off-line, naturally, if because of this point, initially the father were not necessarily able walking that the maid kidnaps, generally speaking, is off-line good.

“Mother, you comedy. This is not the senior, is my brother, said accurately that is my Junior Brother, Huo Yuhao. Some time ago spread the news, by strength of the, wins streak seven, routed five Titled Douluo to add two nine levels of Soul Engineer Eye of Asura, Ice Spirit Douluo Huo Yuhao. This is Dragon-Butterfly Douluo Tang Wutong.”

Xue Lingxun stared in a big way the eye, had a look at Huo Yuhao, had a look at Xu Sanshi again.

Huo Yuhao hurries to draw Tang Wutong to go forward to salute, said: “Aunt, hello.”

Xue Lingxun has swallowed saliva, suddenly, a palm of the hand arranges on the Xu Sanshi arm, “brat, you simply is a waste! You have a look at others, is younger than you.”

[Say / Way] that Xu Sanshi does not know whether to laugh or cry immediately: “Mother, can the normal person compared with monster? But my this Little Junior Brother the monster in monster. Your son was good, being content Chang Le!”

“.”Nearby Jiang Nannan coughs two, said: “Sanshi, Aunt, are we present matter will process first?”

Xu Sanshi complexion one cold, immediately nodded. Then looks up to Huo Yuhao, in look reveals the color of inquiry.

Huo Yuhao shook the head to him, said: “I begin by all means that here, I am Third Senior Brother your goon, you make me do, do I do, but the idea wants you to take. These people have not died, naturally, they also momentarily can die. You look at the office.”

The Xu Sanshi look has stagnated, looks again to mother.

Xue Lingxun has also replied at this time normally, complexion ugly [say / way]: “Should kill.”

Xu Sanshi silent, actually shook the head, said: “You stay here, I exit to call the person. It seems like that something must talk clearly are good.”

Before outside knot by Huo Yuhao, has relieved, after the quarter, the news all spread. After half double-hour, in imperial palace main hall, has stood the Dou Ling Empire official military commander.

All in main hall, Xu Sanshi has not made the people move, including Xue Kui and Xue Leng fathers and sons.

The father and son at this time are the surface like dying embers, in front of audiences so formidable Soul Master, they simply does not have the possibility of least bit revolt.

As for formerly outside that nine levels of Soul Engineer, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong came the time, they collaborated to give him Celestial Emperor Hammer. Fully examines them to collaborate to show the Martial Soul Fusion technique now the might. Does not know on any case that nine levels of Soul Engineer has any Defensive Soul Guidance Device, has anything to be useless, died directly.

---

On that day outside outside moved, read beyond our Douluo and new book Little Duan to everybody, does not know that everybody felt what kind, at present looked that the echo was good, later we will also hold similar activities, I gave back to everybody to study to listen.

Today is we dazzles the world Tang Sect pair of 11 second day. The massive preferential activities, ten million do not miss.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-591-part-1





Volume 12

#591 - Spirit Cirque Luo Arrives


Huo Yuhao even also somewhat loves dearly, nine levels of Soul Engineer, that may be the motion treasure houses! The body good thing to have numerous number, what a pity, with enough time has not grabbed, the fellow * fell.

Xu Sanshi sits above the throne high, the side sits Xue Lingxun, Huo Yuhao and the others, stands in both sides.

The situation in main hall was very obvious, until now, the temperature in entire main hall is very low, after each official military commander comes, because of cold, but somewhat shivers.

Repair to high fortunately, is not Soul Master these, but was miserable. Freezes the complexion to be pale.

Xue Kui and Xue Leng fathers and sons tied up by Huo Yuhao, throws in the main hall central ground, they lower the head, do not say a word. But other these were frozen become Soul Master of ice sculpture, at this time also ice sculpture. Each stands erect there, maintains was attacking the time the appearance.

“What this and this had?”In each official military commander heart, had almost the similar thought. In them, some many people can recognize Xue Kui and Xue Leng fathers and sons appearance.

And some people, the complexion also became specially ugly.

“Prince regent your highness, what this and this had? Xue Kui and can the Xue Leng two people, why here? These ice sculptures, what's the matter?”The prime minister could not bear finally, walked, on one knee knelt down, asked to Xu Sanshi. It is not the emperor, but also receives not to the knees big ritual.

The Xu Sanshi surface sinks like the water, said: “These two captives, prime minister recognizable?”

The prime minister said: “Feudal official knew that this is day and the province feudal lord, Duke Xue Leng, this is secure province feudal lord, Duke Xue Kui. How they can......”

Xu Sanshi said indifferently: “Won't their here you be why clear? That thirty ice sculptures, are the people who they bring. And five Titled Douluo, in ground this burned black, was stayed behind by one person that we struck to kill a moment ago. But outside, making the bodyguard look carefully, a nine levels of Soul Engineer corpse.”

Such remarks, the audience is all startled. Nine levels of Soul Engineer mean anything, they were too clear. Especially a moment ago on these faces the look unnatural person, at this time was the complexion big change.

On Continent, has such 1-2 nine levels of Soul Engineer besides Shrek Academy, other nine levels of Soul Engineer, all in Sun-Moon Empire.

The Shrek Academy person, is naturally impossible to obey Xue Kui and Xue Leng to dispatch, the answer was then self-evident. The Dou Ling Empire imperial palace, may just thoroughly be ruined by Sun-Moon Empire, all Imperial Family were killed cleanly! This is the intense and deep-seated hatred.

“You talked nonsense! Where has any nine levels of Soul Engineer, even if has, is your people. Why otherwise did you use the strength of this person to defeat our that many Titled Douluo?”Xue Leng have a strong sense of righteousness is roaring. He is very clear, if no longer spelled at this time, again did not have the opportunity.

Xu Sanshi stands up, from the stair, “Xue Leng, you were clear my origin?”

Xue Leng do not go excessively, does not visit him.

Xu Sanshi said: “I come from Shrek Academy, attains contemporary Shrek Seven Devils by luck. Sun-Moon Empire army, before soon, outside our Academy city. Why as to defeat your ineffective and worthless troops, I only needed saying that a name, everybody understood.”

At the same time was saying, he arrives in front of Huo Yuhao, sinking sound track: “This is my Junior Brother, believes that on the scene has many people to see him, then, I emphasized his name. He called Huo Yuhao. Believes that this name everybody does not feel strange.”

“Huo Yuhao?”The prime minister muttered talked over one, but was quick, he gained ground, on the face full is the color of shock, “your highness, what you said before was soon, in the Shrek City extroversion Sun-Moon Empire army proposed that to select ten, won streak seven, forcing Sun-Moon Empire War-God Empress to admit defeat, that Eye of Asura and Ice Spirit Douluo that Huo Yuhao the army withdrew?”

Xu Sanshi nodded, “good, is he. Moreover, I must tell everybody again a matter, after the confirmation of Yuhao, the sneak attack has attacked our Dou Ling Empire imperial palace, causes Ferocious Beasts that Imperial Family nearly exterminates, is Sun-Moon Empire two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp and Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp. Yuhao and Wutong two people pursue continuously, by own ability, these two Soul Engineer Corp destruction half, was strikes to kill Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp, was reported part of enmity for our Dou Ling Empire.”

“Laughable!”Xue Kui screamed one, “Sun-Moon Empire Beast King Level was Soul Engineer Corp what kind of existence? That is becomes Hand of the National Protector, the Sun-Moon Empire strongest strength, two Soul Engineer Corp both can ruin our imperial palaces, but can they cope? That two Soul Engineer Corp linkage is Soul Guidance Device decorates? Xu Sanshi, this words can you also say?”He spoke of the final time, can emphasize the Xu Sanshi surname.

Xu Sanshi has smiled, laughs, in very carefree, entire main hall that smiles is reverberating his laughter.

“Know-nothing party is dauntless. You may know, what level my this brothers' strengths are? You had not seen a moment ago, your under these ineffective and worthless troops, including four Titled Douluo, in front of my Junior Brother, but is the range chicken earthenware dog, is only Soul Ability, they turned into this appearance. I told you, my Junior Brother, was Limit Douluo. Yes? 20-year-old, Limit Douluo.”

Xu Sanshi such remarks, the audience is all startled, the screams almost resound continuously, the vision of people simultaneously coagulated on Huo Yuhao.

What is Limit Douluo? Is the legend. Only then in the legend exists! In entire Dou Ling Empire, most formidable cultivated to reach as high as 97 levels of Heavenly Sun Douluo. However, that is all. Including 98 levels does not have, say nothing is Limit Douluo exists.

But at present this only then over 20 years old, was actually called Limit Douluo by Xu Sanshi, in their hearts besides does not dare to believe that does not dare to believe. This, in the prime minister eyes, revealed not the color of believing. How possible? 20-year-old Limit Douluo, in entire Douluo Continent historical, as if also only then ten thousand years ago, has presented one time?

Let alone they, Huo Yuhao, were at a loss, his there was any Limit Douluo! Just broke through the Transcendent Douluo level. Third Senior Brother this cow blows a little greatly!

Xu Sanshi gives a calm smile, said: “I know that you do not believe. However, you think not to have, the news that the Shrek Academy aspect spreads means anything, selects ten, Lien Chan seven, seven fight seven victories, strikes to kill Evil Soul Master, strikes to kill nine levels of Soul Engineer, even if Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master Zongli Wu, defeats in my Junior Brother subordinate, thus the name of achievement Ice Spirit Douluo. Zongli Wu, is 98 levels of Transcendent Douluo Evil Soul Master, this point, undergoes the Academy confirmation, believes that everybody understands this means anything. Evil Soul Master of same rank, be more formidable than Soul Master, is, in front of my Junior Brother, he has defeated, besides my Junior Brother is Limit Douluo, what good explanation but also there is? Damage as for Emperor Dragon and Evil Tyrant two Soul Engineer Corp more than half, Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp * fell this matter, can look up greatly, this is not difficult to look up.”

Xu Sanshi was saying at the same time, the eye color of disdaining is also more and more powerful several points, spoke of finally, has the flavor that the people present were less than and seek greatly.

Xu Sanshi elaborated was the facts, before both armies, selected ten magnificent feats to be indelible, at that time some that many people look. Yes! Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master Zongli Wu defeats in his hands, what does this mean? Moreover, in civil official military commander also has Soul Master, they know certainly, when fight must consume Soul Power, at that time selected in ten processes, first five Huo Yuhao face is the powerhouse of Transcendent Douluo level, even if Ma Xiaotao cultivates for does not arrive at Transcendent Douluo, but Absolute Fire Martial Soul makes her have is not inferior in the Transcendent Douluo strength.

In this case, the Huo Yuhao succession of victories, the middle does not have any recuperation, yeah, one wants to come, said that he was Limit Douluo is also the most reasonable situation.

Limit Douluo, behind Xu Sanshi is standing unexpectedly Limit Douluo.

Must know, before nine levels of Soul Engineer appear, Limit Douluo was on this world the biggest deterrent. Before Sun-Moon Empire these years rose recently, had never heard besides Shrek Academy, where have Limit Douluo to exist.

What strength is Limit Douluo? In the legend can the moving mountains to fill the seas, easily a destruction city. But Limit Douluo exists, supports Imperial Family, that means that any they touched again lightly.

Even if now the Soul Engineer status is getting higher and higher, even there are to surpass the Soul Master trend, may spread along with the view of Shrek Academy, everybody understands gradually, in the future true formidable Soul Engineer, inevitably if first formidable Soul Master.

Sun-Moon Empire why so expansion war hurriedly, must in unify Continent most in a short time, this is an important reason.

Once lets belong to the Soul Guidance Device levels of Douluo Continent three countries' develops, is relying on accumulations of three-country Soul Master, they can certainly surpass Sun-Moon Empire in the future, how long as for this time is, that nobody can be clear.

Only then also has the overwhelming superiority while present Soul Guidance Device, unifies Continent thoroughly, Sun-Moon Empire can not have the extra worries, but, without a doubt, has developed Soul Guidance Device also to that time Sun-Moon Empire with the Soul Master union, Sun-Moon Empire must acknowledge that the theory of Shrek Academy is correct.

Therefore, Limit Douluo, as before is on this world existence of most peak, only then ten levels of Soul Engineer in legend, may and Limit Douluo to compare favorably.

But, never have also presented one ten levels of Soul Engineer to the present, Limit Douluo, is the peak!

Our shop pair of 11 last day, everybody in Taobao, shop there search: Dazzles world Tang Sect, can find our shops. Right, forgot to tell everybody, the Magic Chef of Ice and Fire complete set books got online, bought the complete set, the first volume was the signature version. Moreover the price is very cheap, everybody has a look, for these days bought, but also delivered the double card signs.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-591-part-2





Volume 12

#591 - Spirit Cirque Luo Arrives


Therefore, when the civil and military ministers on the scene start to believe Huo Yuhao is Limit Douluo, they looked again the Xu Sanshi vision becomes is different. But Xue Kui and Xue Leng father and son's complexion actually becomes even more ugly.

They do not know that will have such situation, does not know that Huo Yuhao is Limit Douluo this matter. Today they are leading under the powerhouse, in addition Sun-Moon Empire that nine levels of Soul Engineer come, must accomplish the whole task at one stroke, after all, Xu Sanshi came from Shrek Academy, no one knows that Shrek Academy will have what kind of support to him, the Shrek Academy strength, is not their fathers and sons can contend, only then before Xu Sanshi control aspect, falls the homicide, the control imperial palace, when the time comes, their fathers and sons are the final emperor's clans, in addition the military force of control, the control empire, was logical.

What a pity, they were defeated, regarding the loser, is always cruel.

Xu Sanshi arrives at Xue Kui and in front of the Xue Leng fathers and sons gradually. Light [say / way]: “The Imperial Family bloodlines are on the wane, you, actually lack consideration for the whole for the one's own selfish interests, when the Sun-Moon Empire army threatens launches the rebellion, and dares to come the imperial palace to kill the prince regent secretly, crime in not amnesty.”

“Your highness does not want......”to realize that not the good prime minister said makes noise, what a pity, already late.

Xu Sanshi both hands also lift, presses separately on Xue Kui and Xue Leng.

At this time, in military commander group ran out of several people rapidly, tried to prevent Xu Sanshi. However, before them, presented a Bai Se (White Color) form.

In the entire imperial palace thermal shock, is almost only the flash, the military commander who that several clash changed into the ice sculpture, even nobody looks how Huo Yuhao gets rid.

Military commander on the scene, many seven rings and eight rings powerhouse. When they feel the Boundless Soul Power fluctuation that on Huo Yuhao sends out, immediately keeps silent, does not dare the move slightest.

“Pū and pū!”Two, Xue Kui and Xue Leng father and son seven orifices hemorrhage, falls dead in the place.

Xu Sanshi fishes out a handkerchief from the bosom, scratched as if not to contaminate on bloodstain both hands.

“Xue Kui and Xue Leng, plotting a rebellion fact all, imposes the capital punishment, read his ancestor once to make the contribution for the empire, the Imperial Family bloodlines were on the wane, exempt it to extinguish the crime of nine generations, eliminated the title, the clansman reduced to the common people. The ministers believe that the trial of this king can be fair and just?”

The people died, before the body, is standing a powerhouse of Limit Douluo level, at this time, if who also dares to revolt, that was really a fool.

Xu Sanshi light [say / way]: “I know that presents some person and Xue Kui, Xue Leng is some connections, at present the empire is the personnel, these matters, I can treat as have not occurred. To retain the vitality to the empire, hopes that you are self-possessed. Prime minister, was decided by you that whom sending to accept Xue Kui and Xue Leng two people of armies.”

“Yes, Your highness.”The prime minister the face was saying painstakingly.

Xu Sanshi discards the handkerchief, happen to covered above the Xue Kui face of dying with injustice unredressed.

“Empire civil strife eliminated, foreign aggression also. But marches to go to war, is not, I who I excel the believers position good that likes the minister being able to process. This civil strife, is creates by the throne, looks like in Xue Kui and Xue Leng two people, my hating to leave the stable authority, wants to win the Xue Clan landscape by Xu, when this is also they start rebel the most important reason. Laughable, is really is laughable, my this live Xiaoyao is comfortable, throne for me, really important? Today, I told.”

At the same time was saying, Xu Sanshi lifts both hands, has picked head Purple gold crown, turns back on the first place slowly, lays aside the Purple gold crown above the throne.

“Empire civil strife, except that is also at present metastable. Who should make inherit the throne, the numerous positions discussed voluntarily are, my mother will stay in the empire, who sat the throne, must pass through her to agree. The position of this prince regent, gives back, from now henceforth, my Xu Sanshi and Dou Ling Empire do not have any relations again, the bloodlines blood relationship sentiment, I.”

Spoke these words, Xu Sanshi arrives at side, pulls up Jiang Nannan, with long hurried strides walks toward outside.

This, let present all civil official military commanders to be shocked.

What situation is this? Doesn't do? Others do not do, does not want this prince regent, even might fall the throne in his hand.

At present in entire Dou Ling Empire, the adult male of Imperial Family bloodlines, in fact had a Xu Sanshi person! As for Xue Kui and Xue Leng two people, their descendants, because this rebels determines the nature, is in any event impossible becomes the successor.

Xu Sanshi this walks, empire what to do? Throne what to do? Always the calm prime minister, at this time also had a big shock, hurrying knocks down, “your highness, you cannot walk!”

The civil and military hundred officers also kneel down, shout loudly: “Your highness please do not bother to see me off.”

Xu Sanshi is holding the hand of Jiang Nannan, stops the footsteps, “I am one in Shrek Academy, is one in Tang Sect. Usually, I always little think, joyfully, but, since arrives at Dou Ling Empire, I again had not smiled, every day is bearing the huge pressure, you with my disunity, never are also willing to strive for me truly. I understand you, my name is Xu, but is not surnamed the snow, this is the root is. I have never studied the technique of king, does not want to study, regarding the Dou Ling Empire throne, I do not have the least bit thoughts. My intent has decided that you have no need to stop me, you should know that this does not have any function for me, has my Junior Brother, I want to walk, living that anybody cannot detain. If you also thought of the Xue Clan former friendship, temporarily attended to state affairs by my mother. She is also surnamed the snow, you will accept to be much easier. The first boy who later I and my wife give birth, will make him be surnamed the snow, if when the time comes nobody opposes, delivers him, has empire's education. All has been said that bye.”

Then, Xu Sanshi draws Jiang Nannan simultaneously to jump, among the moment, put from the crack of imperial palace, fly to go toward outside.

Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong, Ye Guyi, Nan Qiuqiu and Ji Juechen follow, seven hominizations are seven light shadow, vanishes in a flash does not see.

Xue Lingxun sits goes to the first place slightly, corners of the mouth also is twitching, before then, she does not know that Xu Sanshi must such do, this brat, even has not discussed with her.

Such walked? Too bastard. Had to inherit possible person to get rid of others, oneself patted the buttocks to walk away, this was his retaliation, the interior stabilized basically, this was real, but, a group of people without a leader Ah? do not look that Xu Sanshi such walked, has left behind itself, but before him, why, when introduced Huo Yuhao is? Is tells official military commanders on the scene, behind Xue Clan, a support of Limit Douluo, even also has the support of Shrek Academy and Tang Sect. They want to shake the Xue Clan rule, wants to think over and think over.

Removes firewood from under the pot, is nothing less than ruthless, what lets the Xue Lingxun secret sigh is, oneself this son is putting Mr. of extremely easy to obtain country, unexpectedly such has surrendered something submissively, is really and is really, the rotten wood cannot carve!

Breaks in the upper air, Xu Sanshi starts to laugh, what smiles is that frank, vanished the long time smiling face, finally reappeared on his face.

Jiang Nannan is also looks to smile, since recently, Xu three bore the how huge pressure she is clearest, now, these pressures can relieve finally, can she not be happy?

“Sanshi, we such do, really?”Jiang Nannan said in a low voice.

Xu Sanshi receives the laughter, said: “What has not to be good? Our showed extreme tolerance. A broken throne, snatches the broken head. Thinks really father does cherish? On this world, besides Nannan that the parental family member and I most loves, does not have anything to make father care. Can that big authority do? Where has to bring your enjoying the beauties of nature joyful Xiaoyao. Finally got rid of this group of fellows, you had not seen that these person of complexion pale appearances were amusing a moment ago, look like have eaten excrement. Little Junior Brother, did these person of you process?”

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “Has processed, these Soul Master take orders in Xue Kui and Xue Leng, I have interrogated them successively, they expressed willingness to redeem oneself through good works, gives loyalty to Imperial Family. I have left behind the ban on them, and will control the method of ban to give the aunt, if they are not loyal, will die quickly.”

Is inheritance of Undead Magic master, this small skill is very simple. Has the support of these Titled Douluo, Soul Douluo and Soul Saint, Xue Lingxun had enough protection strength, this is also the important reason why Xu Sanshi can feel relieved.

“Has extricated finally, to continue to stay again in that place, I feared that I will be insane.”Xu Sanshi was sighing said.

Huo Yuhao somewhat helpless [say / way]: “Third Senior Brother, you may betray me. When I was Limit Douluo. The words that you speak today, will quickly perhaps spread over entire Continent. Original Holy Spirit Cult and Sun-Moon Empire must cope with me, what to do your this lets my Ah?”

Xu Sanshi smiles, said: “Does a bit less this set. Although you now are also not Limit Douluo, how many Limit Douluo but can you be worse than? Although I have not arrived at the Titled Douluo level, but the eyesight has. You coped with the aura that these fellow times lend a moment ago, could not miss to be too more than it Limit Douluo. Graces freezes that many powerhouses, does your battle efficiency compare Limit Douluo also energy balance how many? Let alone, you also told me, you and Wutong Martial Soul Fusion has been OK, what this means that came does not know from Shrek Academy us? Therefore, do not install, you add, now is equal to Limit Douluo without question. Later our Tang Sect, depended on you. I looked, after this time goes back, Academy will not let off your, Sea God Pavilion Pavilion Master position, after it is estimated that soon, is your. This called capable work more.”

Requested earnestly everybody to cast some monthly tickets and recommendation tickets supports us, for these days, will also have the eruption.

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-591-part-3





Volume 12

#592 - Direction


Huo Yuhao the face was saying painstakingly: “Third Senior Brother, you know that pressure big pain, amn't I painful? Let your such saying, I a little do not dare to return to Academy.”

Xu Sanshi sighed spookily, changes topic, said: “Our Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp came, assumes personal command in Spirit Dou City, sees my mother to tidy up these official military commanders. You do not know, my mother person, although sometimes somewhat off-line, but is very intelligent, I have inherited her intelligence. She controls the empire, compared with me, at least she since childhood is the imperial palace grows up, under is influenced by what one sees and hears, technique of many king. What can I? I by running around in circles that these official military commanders play, the surface seems I am a prince regent, order that may in fact, I issue could not realize, they can always find various reasons to dodge me, now was good, I flung to wave the arms about to leave, was our Tang Sect is comfortable! As for your issue, you solve, you must really not be willing to shoulder the responsibility, will not go also good, I help you have words to everybody, said that you and Wutong is well are good.”

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth twitched, said: “Are you good for me? On this world, the matter that hobbled were too many, can it be that said that put down can put down. Right, Third Senior Brother, do I have these days that Wutong treats, how Sun-Moon Empire that side situation? Did the Sun-Moon Empire army have the trend?”

Xu Sanshi shook the head, said: “It is not clear. You also know, Sun-Moon Empire most excels blocks off the flow of news, when they are determined to block, nobody knows that they have made anything. The Sun-Moon Empire army disappeared in any case, should in Sky Soul Empire, actually be clear as for where nobody. Who knows when they will appear? The goal of attack nothing but two, Dou Ling Empire, or is Star Lou Empire. Then, Academy probably was recently natural. Not only made Dou Ling Empire elite come back, but also is willing to dispatch Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp to assist, why Ah?”

Huo Yuhao smiles. Said: “In your hand, if several nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, you also steadfast.”

“Ah?”Xu Sanshi cries out strangely. “Yuhao, do not tell me, you have robbed Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace Ah? do that many nine levels where, otherwise comes install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely? That gadget may be strategic commodity, even if Sun-Moon Empire, little uses extremely.”

Huo Yuhao will rob the Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp matter saying that listening to his narration, Xu Sanshi to raise up the thumb, returned to Soul Engineer Corp of Spirit Dou City imperial palace to that two. He wishes one could to be all good it to get rid of.

“Yuhao, that this going back, what do you have to plan? Keeps our Tang Sect recuperation, is what kind of?”

Huo Yuhao thinks that said: “Now the aspect is somewhat complex, I must have the firsthand information, can decide then to make anything. I did not go back with you, after you go back, saw Old Xuan, told Old Xuan me and Wutong is well, we went to Sun-Moon Empire to inquire some news. Had information truly to pass on. Moreover, we will also take an action, protracted Sun-Moon Empire army the aggressive war of as far as possible.”

“Snort. Knows that your boy must run. Good, you go your, but, but must pay attention to the security! Yeah, I have groundless fears, by you and Wutong present strength, in addition the ability of that concealment, who must cope with you, is very difficult. Limit Douluo is inadequate.”

Huo Yuhao shook the head. Said: “It is not that optimistic, on this world. Did not have any impossible matter. Not only Sun-Moon Empire that side Holy Spirit Cult must cope with me. I estimated that Beast God is also staring at me, perhaps when will appear. You believe that by our present abilities, can contend with Beast God Di Tian?”

The Xu Sanshi body trembled the following, “Little Junior Brother, do not frighten me, if in this case, we as early as possible separate. You can also run. Do we run? The people have been short well.”

Huo Yuhao looks at his attire the fear appearance, cannot bear laugh, nearby Ye Guyi flies suddenly, [say / way] that some are not convinced: “How his Limit Douluo. Huo Yuhao, has skill our single Tiao.”

Huo Yuhao look at her, heartfelt tunnel: “Guyi, this time thank you, if not you, everybody is not necessarily able to insist that we dare to come.”

Ye Guyi is actually the complexion one cold, said: “You have not been regarded as a person on one's own side me.”

“Ah? what this word?”Huo Yuhao visits her surprisedly.

Ye Guyi cold sound track: “I am also a Tang Sect member, we protect oneself, I to protect the partner, this should do, does the countenance why you use keeping aloof thank me? I challenge to you. single Tiao!”

Huo Yuhao look somewhat complex visits her, sighed, said: “Good. Where?”

“Here.”Ye Guyi has referred to the sky, back six wing rackets, tender body already Ba empty/sky.

Huo Yuhao somewhat helpless shaking the head, also flew.

Jiang Nannan brow tight wrinkle, Xu Sanshi is the dumbfounded [say / way]: “Which type of Ah? this was must make then just to come out, how must hit. Yuhao also is really, why can promise her?”

Tang Wutong is with smile on the face in side, old god in [say / way]: “Others liked him being so long, vented with him, should be.”

A Nan Qiuqiu face curious [say / way]: “Do you know?”

The Tang Wutong attractive pink-blue color big eye reveals a helplessness, said: “I am not the blind person, Ye Guyi look that Yuhao look I can't see? Actually she most wants to challenge should be I, but feared one receive does not stop, this must vent anger with Yuhao. All right, so long as the will of the people here, making her vent anger does not matter, for our Tang Sect peace.”

Xu Sanshi is very admiring gave the thumbs-up to Tang Wutong, “atmosphere! Has to make the style of big woman, you make Yuhao receive several to be young again, I believe that so long as he is willing to open the mouth, our Tang Sect certainly strong quick, perhaps, Sun-Moon Empire that War-God Empress will arrive at our Tang Sect to come, finally rules Continent, perhaps was our Shrek Academy, ha, well, Wutong, why you used this look to visit me, I was not a little comfortable.”

Tang Wutong [say / way] maliciously: “I thought that you are looking for trouble, come, I also challenge to you. Since promoting to the Transcendent Douluo level, I did not have truely has fought well, happen to tries the hand with you, helps you give to break through Titled Douluo while convenient to build the foundation. The Nannan elder sister, won't you be blocking me?”

Jiang Nannan the expression also returned to at this time normal, “some people mouths are inexpensive, is owes to punch, Wutong, do not give me the face.”

Their the free time of here speech, in sky have hit. Facing Huo Yuhao, Ye Guyi that has not kept the meaning of hand. Comes up, the whole body is golden light four shoots, angel avatar has released.

Huo Yuhao painstakingly the face, is only defense constantly, whatever the Ye Guyi big move of frequency leaves, unceasing bombardment on him.

However, these attacks, were not revealed the melting of mountain and non- dew by Huo Yuhao.

Has saying that the Angel Martial Soul striking power is extremely tyrannical, this point links Huo Yuhao also to praise without cease. When this war ended, on him a white clothing had many breakages, many places turned into the burnt black. Has to change clothes to walk again.

But that side Ye Guyi, actually once again escaped the strength. She to consuming own last Soul Power, this had ended the continuous attack.

What Huo Yuhao pays is only a price of clothes, finished this has spelled to fight, the Ye Guyi complexion has as if felt relaxed several points. But in the return trip, throughout remains silent.

After half double-hour, the people separate from each other, Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, goes in the Sky Soul Empire direction.

Xu Sanshi waves to say goodbye with them, while rubs were being punched azure the cheek, the strength progress of Tang Wutong was too big, his Black Tortoise Shield is not enough to defend completely, but, Tang Wutong very much gives Jiang Nannan to save face, the pain has not played her. However, this dead girl, does not know that hits person of not a slap in the face? Xu Sanshi is twitching ill-humoredly reluctantly is roaring in the moral nature.

, The Sky Soul Empire border already was by far in sight, Huo Yuhao is drawing Tang Wutong, in the look actually full is the disconsolate color.

Sky Soul Empire did not have, thorough did not have, sweeps off from this world domain.

After Sun-Moon Empire has seized Sky Soul Empire throughout, now entire Continent had over 50% area during they control. Since there is Douluo Continent, but also the country has never controlled the so vast region.

Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire bind together, possibly is not the Sun-Moon Empire match. Individual battle efficiency, could decide outcome of war, but actually absolutely cannot change the entire Continent situation.

This point, Huo Yuhao is very clear.

The Sun-Moon Empire war is impossible to stop, with the constant development of Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, their strengths will have in a short time also a leap.

At present uses Humanoid Soul Guidance Device that from Sun-Moon Empire, is relatively crude and rough, only then nine levels has certain prestige energy. Does not know how these cultivate for low Soul Engineer control these Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, what can affirm, these Humanoid Soul Guidance Device might are quite considerable.

In this case, once after Sun-Moon Empire many Humanoid Soul Guidance Device will equip Soul Engineer Corp, the entire Soul Engineer Corp strength will again increase, does not use other, so long as these Humanoid Soul Guidance Device increase them to carry installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball and milk bottle surely, as well as increases the defensive power, sufficiently made their overall strength fly over.

Today three, to thank everybody's support.

Was right, in our prestige - platform, just renewed beyond Douluo Continent a following part, everybody can look. Joins our platforms, then under point that serializes exclusive, can find in.

Joins the platform to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number, searches Tang three few, has the authentication is our families. ( to be continued ) 861



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-592-part-1





Volume 12

#592 - Direction


But Humanoid Soul Guidance Device developed this degree, believed soon, merely relies on the milk bottle to stimulate to movement, once the ordinary soldier can also use simple Soul Guidance Device time, Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire final result has been doomed.

Thinks of these, Huo Yuhao thinks somewhat at a loss, he knows, since oneself such do is the futile effort, why can also probably such do? Future Continent, will certainly be Soul Guidance Device world, this is the inevitable situation of technological progress. A Continent series, perhaps is also not the misdemeanor. So long as Sun-Moon Empire restrains some slightly, the three-country good things will inherit, a unified big country, is not the misdemeanor.

Said that said that may think of these each time, he thought one are at heart suffocated, own motherland has the possibility destruction, this to anybody, is not the joyful matter.

Whatever, oneself whole-heartedly protects own country, regardless of the future how.

Even if Sun-Moon Empire unifies Continent, cannot be when exist. Moreover, at present that side Academy, Soul Guidance Hall also in ten thousand li in a day is progressing. And spreads to Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire these Soul Guidance Technology, both countries accelerating development Soul Guidance Device. So long as Sun-Moon Empire unifies the Continent time to be delayed, perhaps, in the near future, will have the possibility completely to relieve this threat. To that time, Continent saw will enter partitioning. But uses the Soul Guidance Device superiority to develop gradually along with Soul Master, Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire not necessarily do not have the opportunity to counter-attack.

Naturally, these are the idealizations, after the destruction Sky Soul Empire, Sun-Moon Empire has reorganized Sky Soul Empire some Soul Master?

It is not each Soul Master such has the strength of spirit like Innate Body Sect sect master Du Busi, at least now looks like, is not. Will Sun-Moon Empire baseless also be why many how many Soul Engineer Corp to come? Where does Soul Engineer come? Hasn't that equipped Soul Guidance Device Soul Master? Uses Soul Guidance Device not to be difficult, Soul Master after simple training, can use some Soul Guidance Device. Does not need them to manufacture.

The Sun-Moon Empire overall strength, is formidable! Star Luo or Dou Ling, so long as makes them destroy completely a country again, all these are irreversible. Now can only be places hopes in Sun-Moon Empire to have the problem to be good. For example, proposition of previous Ju Zi(orange).

If can to get rid of Xu Tianran, Ju Zi(orange) give Star Luo and Dou Ling two countries ten years of cushion time. Ten years later, what situation can be, but also who said well? At least, in ten years within, oneself is can certainly reach 98 levels, attacks unprecedented three Soul Nucleus Limit Douluo.

If the success, actually to any degree, that have been possible is very difficult to say really at that time formidable, perhaps, Soul Guidance Device is unable to threaten itself again, in that case, all become are different. Let alone, after individual battle efficiency achieves Absolute, can't change the aspect really? For example, do oneself again seize Ju Zi(orange) and her son? The Sun-Moon Empire unceasing civil strife, then, threat also relieved.

Thinks of here, Huo Yuhao was more painful, but, in his heart is actually starts somewhat to understand why initially by the pride of Innate Body Douluo Du Busi, must take that road, that was forced really! The country will perish, does not use that violent way, was unable to reverse anything.

Then, oneself really? No, definitely is incorrect, did not say other, in oneself heart that closes cannot pass.

Xu Yunhan, that kid does not know that now, to have thought how initially that kid and intimate appearance, in Huo Yuhao heart heavy relaxed several points finally, later and Wutong, must live several such kids, Wutong is so attractive, child who we have, will be very certainly attractive.

Gently is holding the hand of Wutong, the tender small hand has the sense of reality very much, the Huo Yuhao heart somewhat is fiery. The father-in-law Sir who own that has never met, has let off himself finally, the seal has relieved, matter that now as if can handle were many.

However, perhaps is because had the shadow at heart, or extremely in treasuring Wutong, at least until now, Huo Yuhao has not made any matter.

Enters in Sky Soul Empire, inevitable has bumped into that float in airborne superaltitude Surveying Soul Guidance Device, these Surveying Soul Guidance Device in airborne float, patrols unceasingly.

Every one time sees these superaltitude Surveying Soul Guidance Device, Huo Yuhao will have the curiosity, because they underwent the improvement.

In the Soul Guidance Technology aspect, Sun-Moon Empire has not reduced the speed of research and development throughout, moreover continually is promoting, the pressure of war, let their profound comprehending to the technical leading enormous superiority.

However, these upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device progressive speeds, eventually and Huo Yuhao own progressive speed cannot compare. Regardless in any case, how they could not discover Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong trail.

Sky Soul Empire the piece of plain topography is very gentle. To seek for an army in a big country, is not an easy matter. Huo Yuhao does not worry, brings Tang Wutong to loaf in Sky Soul Empire. When a city, goes in the inquiry and inquiry news, tastes the local good food.

Naturally, this wanders or has goal, first extended Sky Soul Empire to shake in the Dou Ling Empire border, if the Sun-Moon Empire aspect must resort to arms to Dou Ling Empire, must be stationed in the, but was contrary to what expects, has not had this situation, in other words, Sun-Moon Empire will not attack Dou Ling Empire in a short time. It is not Dou Ling Empire, is Star Lou Empire?

This discovery, makes the Huo Yuhao heart somewhat feel uncomfortable immediately, because is just familiar with Ju Zi(orange), he is clearer, in is actually Star Lou Empire that in the Ju Zi(orange) heart most hates! Her family member, dies during the conflict of Star Lou Empire and Sun-Moon Empire, therefore, so long as there is a possibility, she will certainly take to Star Lou Empire the war. Before reason that did not cope with Star Lou Empire, was because Star Lou Empire was belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries most formidable one, once coped with him first, under the leadership of Star Lou Empire, the support of Shrek Academy, the loss of Sun-Moon Empire will increase, if has not hit, then, under was in inverse proportion, really has not said.

Duke White Tiger, is Star Lou Empire one generation of famous commanders-in-chief, this is everyone knows. At least Ju Zi(orange) also has regarded the most important match him.

At present Star Lou Empire relies on as before is threatening the Sun-Moon Empire native place to the control of Bright Struggle Mountain Range. Diverted Sun-Moon Empire part of military strength.

However, now at this time resorted to arms to Star Lou Empire, on being considered as is a good opportunity. Sky Soul Empire did not say that already destruction. The Dou Ling Empire civil strife, cannot take care of oneself, to support Star Lou Empire besides Shrek Academy, the Star Lou Empire foreign aid did not have anything, put together the hard strength, Star Lou Empire is inferior to Sun-Moon Empire eventually.

Thinks of here, Huo Yuhao hurrying brings Tang Wutong to fly toward the Sky Soul Empire deep place, he must go to nearby Heaven Dou City to have a look first, then goes to that side the Star Lou Empire border. If Ju Zi(orange) resorts to arms to Star Lou Empire, then, he must intervene.

Had not thought including Huo Yuhao, with the lapse of time, he care to Duke White Tiger has surpassed the hatred now.

Before Heaven Dou City, seems does not have what difference, after having experienced the baptism of war, it once deteriorated after a period of time, but is quick, in Sun-Moon Empire under can construct, Heaven Dou City not only restores to the original condition, but also after joining of civil Soul Guidance Device, became more prosperous.

Enters in Heaven Dou City, Huo Yuhao has an misconception, as if this city has not experienced the baptism of war. On street bustling, the people cross as if is very happy, as if extinguishes the pain in country's, clean that extinguished.

The common people truly are the easiest satisfied people, so long as can eat to the full to put on warmly, has the place to live. Was enough regarding them, who as for the ruler is, for them, is really not that important.

Sighed, Huo Yuhao shaking the head of gently, bringing Tang Wutong to walk in the Heaven Dou City introverted imperial palace direction.

Initially, they had met formidable Darkness Sacred Dragon here, Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao, nearly died here. But now, they have not actually feared to Long Xiaoyao. That side the Heaven Dou City original Sky Soul Empire imperial palace, is easiest to inquire the news.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection in unknowingly all-around has released, takes his present cultivating as, Spiritual Detection covers the most city sufficiently.

The garrison troops in city are not many, here must unexpectedly be the inland city, moreover no longer is the capital, is only a big city.

Sun-Moon Empire not too has been strict regarding the defense of internal city, as if Huo Yuhao initially took to Sun-Moon Empire owes greatly has not made them grow the memory.

After Huo Yuhao currently also has the idea goes back, again commander own three Soul Engineer Corp, enters in Sun-Moon Empire to disturb once more, wins the time to Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire. But looking back now, this idea some are not realistic.

Academy needs to defend, Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp went to Dou Ling Empire, another two situations are unknown, by Sea God Pavilion that side to Academy own attaching great importance to of defense, will not be dispatched by oneself in a short time.

Matter of this destruction, it seems like can only be is done.

The imperial palace close at hand, the soldier also finally became a lot . Moreover, can feel through Spiritual Detection Huo Yuhao that in this imperial palace, has various Surveying Soul Guidance Device to scan outside. Some Surveying Soul Guidance Device, Huo Yuhao has not seen.

“Do we go in? How?”Tang Wutong asked to Huo Yuhao in a low voice.

Second, behind also has. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-592-part-2





Volume 12

#592 - Direction


Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “No, first does not go, we observed to say again. Surveying Soul Guidance Device in this imperial palace has some me not to know. Is careful.”

Before arriving at Heaven Dou City, in Huo Yuhao actually heart some hopes, if the Sun-Moon Empire army needs well the recuperation, then, Heaven Dou City absolutely is most suitable. Here has the most abundant commodity.

What a pity, outside Heaven Dou City, does not have the trace of army, Huo Yuhao even has an misconception, as if the Sun-Moon Empire army disappeared. This feeling for him is very fearful.

Tang Wutong sinking sound track: “Catches individual to ask?”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “About military secret, perhaps only then in this imperial palace the genuine director may know. We observe in the nearby first, then I find the person, had found, in the evening asked him to come out.”

At the same time was saying, his Spiritual Detection already completely centralized in the Heaven Dou City imperial palace, detailed examination.

Quick, Huo Yuhao had found a specially familiar form, even the previous time, he had also bumped into this.

Jing Hongchen, that Sun-Moon Royal Soul Engineering Academy Dean.

Naturally, original Sun-Moon Royal Soul Engineering Academy did not have, Bright Virtue Hall is withering away. Now does not know to have the reconstruction, from Jing Hongchen continuously this city, even if the reconstruction, should not have what relations with him.

A dynasty emperor royal courtier, Jing Hongchen, although intelligent support Xu Tianran, but after Xu Tianran true superior, throws this old official in the one side. Naturally, Heaven Dou City is also very important, can when here City Lord, said that is Xiaoyao is also comfortable.

Not only has discovered Jing Hongchen, Huo Yuhao had also discovered two very familiar people, on the competition stage, caused many troubles to them. Has not thought that they are also living.

“Wutong, you guess that whom I did discover?”Huo Yuhao mysterious asked to Tang Wutong.

Tang Wutong curious [say / way]: “Whom has discovered? Looks at your appearance, should be we knows.”

Huo Yuhao nodded, “still remembers that had unrequited loved your miss? Others to you are really good.”Here, he could not bear smile first.

“Unrequited loves me?”Tang Wutong stares, she has thought that “you said should not be Meng Hongchen? I have thought that that large explosion she died.”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “No, has not died, this little while in imperial palace, not only she, Xiao Hongchen also. This also is really the enemies often cross each other's path! Initially between we and them, what spelled on the competition stage was life and death. Xiao Hongchen heavy wound, has not thought that actually also lived. Moreover, their strengths now are not weak. Should have cultivating of Soul Douluo level, although is inferior to us, but in Sun-Moon Empire Soul Master was also the outstanding person. Then, these two people cannot be regarded are actually Soul Engineer, is more like Soul Master. The Xiao Hongchen talent is astonishing. How did not know now their actual combat capability.”

Tang Wutong complexion somewhat strange [say / way]: “Why does not know, we clearly should be hostile. But you mentioned them, I instead thought somewhat excitedly. Really was the old acquaintance, Yuhao, this time let off them, do not kill them to be good?”

Huo Yuhao nodded with a smile, said: “I some with your same feeling, do not kill them, I have not thought must kill them. We well greeted with them and that's the end. As for Jing Hongchen, so long as told us to know that also let off him is. Initially, must not have them to take to our pressure, we did not have rapidness that the means grew.”

They smile, after an ability of person has been the certain extent, the thing that before there are many, cares becomes does not need to continue to care. At least at present they are this feeling. Jing Hongchen, already cannot threaten their existence.

The night falls, Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, leisurely strolls walks in the Heaven Dou City imperial palace direction, their forms, integration of being quietly to the dim light of night.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection and Imitation Soul Ability perfect links Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain that in addition slightly controls changes their body temperature, Space Power is changing the path that they are having. Similarly has Dual Soul Nucleus them, has been able to achieve the degree of actual situation exchange on this world.

Fluctuation Soul Guidance Device and heat energy Surveying Soul Guidance Device or mind Surveying Soul Guidance Device, fall on them, will be sentenced by Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection ahead of time in advance, then makes the corresponding response.

Xu Sanshi said right, present Huo Yuhao truly had was certainly the ability of Limit Douluo level. These Surveying Soul Guidance Device for him, any have not affected.

Only if Sun-Moon Empire can develop blockade space Soul Guidance Device, otherwise, wants to discover him, is very difficultly and is very difficult.

Enters the imperial palace, looks like walks into oneself garden.

The Heaven Dou City imperial palace is time-honored, can pursue new moon to the Heaven Dou Empire time, in the imperial palace constructs does not calculate that is brand-new, but is quite plain. Palatial is having intense dignity. In the imperial palace, the establishments of some Soul Guidance Lantern, making this plain somewhat discount slightly.

Looks at the somewhat motley wall, Huo Yuhao knows that the Sun-Moon Empire aspect, has not thought must restore this imperial palace. What a pity, was a pity.

Huo Yuhao also clear remembering, this city regarding the Tang Sect significance, Tang Sect is the origin in Heaven Dou City! Here also has the area enormous courtyard to be Tang Sect. Later in any event, must strive to take carry back that courtyard, that is also the Little Ya Teacher wish.

Under the direction of Spiritual Detection, they entered the imperial palace quickly.

In the Heaven Dou City imperial palace, is stationed in 500 soldiers, in addition, 100 Soul Engineer, these Soul Engineer are responsible for Soul Guidance Array place, defends the entire imperial palace, in the coordination various Surveying Soul Guidance Device, regarding the average person, can describe with the impregnable four characters absolutely.

Naturally, regarding Huo Yuhao, these four characters does not have any significance.

On the face revealed a light smile, before Huo Yuhao brings Tang Wutong was arriving at a palace front door, to stop the footsteps. Spiritual Detection and Sharing appears in the Tang Wutong mind directly, in their consciousness, 3 D image clear presents.

In palace.

Jing Hongchen is carrying one glass of good wines, sip gently, on the old face has revealed the comfortable color. “Nice wine, is really the nice wine! This type of good wine in Sky Soul Empire is also the high-grade, even if Xu Tianran, is not necessarily able to drink such good bar.”

On the Huo Yuhao face reveals color of the surprise, Jing Hongchen the what kind hero was aggressive in the past, now reduces unexpectedly appreciates the good wine here, this completely is not his style!

Back then, Jing Hongchen governed Sun-Moon Empire Bright Virtue Hall and Sun-Moon Royal Soul Engineering Academy, it may be said that was the power leans the government and people. Bright Virtue Hall is Sun-Moon Empire besides Consecrate Hall, studies the Soul Guidance Device highest organization. Played the huge role for the technological progress of Sun-Moon Empire.

But present he, only with initially differed in the aura is too big and is too big. His cultivating to have even regressed compared with it past years, it can be imagined, these years his mood had what kind of change.

“Grandfather, you little drink.”Meng Hongchen consoles to say in the one side.

Jing Hongchen doesn't coldly snorted, what “drink to do? In this Heaven Dou City, only if the peculiar circumstance absolutely does not have the place of need old man, so-called City Lord, but is sent to frontier service. Xu Tianran Xu Tianran, initially the old man helped your superior, actually ends up to turn out so is out. The Bright Virtue Hall reconstruction, you exclude, such being the case, me the old man unexpectedly besides here lead a befuddled life as if drunk or dreaming, what can also make?”

Xiao Hongchen anger sound track: “This Xu Tianran is extremely mean, in the past you have made that many contributions for him, when he chooses to support him unseconded. Now he actually like this to you, is not because he did grasp Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp? His elimination dissident wantonly, arranges on own person the key position, simply is mean and shameless. Only then these Consecrate Hall people he do not dare to move, I looked, if Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp is more formidable, Consecrate Hall, he also or paid attention. Grandfather, I am not clear, why you are not willing to go to Consecrate Hall Ah?”

Jing Hongchen sighed, said: “It is not I am not willing to go, but does not have the face! Bright Virtue Hall destroys in my hand, how making me see your grand preceptor grandfather? I do not have the face to see him, how can enter Consecrate Hall? You think why I will arrive at this Heaven Dou City to take office honestly? That Xu Tianran before being sent to frontier service me, if has not told your grand preceptor grandfather, he how dare so to me? But your grand preceptor grandfather has not opened the mouth, must punish me! What can I say? Only can come, this for a lifetime, it is estimated that was also withdraws here. However, do not study the grandfather, you have the extremely high talent, these years have also been progressing, I make you scoop up light raise dark, for soon future amazing the world with a single brilliant feat, after your achievement Titled Douluo, our Hongchen Clan can be on the Sun-Moon Empire stage inevitably. To that time, you have been able to look for your grand preceptor grandfather, I did not have the potential, but you have, when you entered Consecrate Hall that day, was the date of our Hongchen Clan again rising. When the time comes, in any event you must strive to grasp the Bright Virtue Hall strength, that is the core of our country!”

Is listening to the Jing Hongchen words, Xiao Hongchen and Meng Hongchen in abundance nods. Xiao Hongchen gets hold of the double fist, “grandfather, you could rest assured that our certain effort. One day, we become present age most powerhouses!”

Three finished, asks the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-592-part-3





Volume 12

#593 - Bustling Place Family


Jing Hongchen looked at Xiao Hongchen one, said: “Child, you are really somewhat go through life without a good opportunity! If misses this time, you in any time, inevitably are eagerly anticipate the entire time one generation of supreme talent, what a pity, this time, Shrek Academy left were too many, too many talents, suppressed you not to have the means to come to the end actually. You even consumed massive potentials to promote oneself to cultivate are, thus had the repercussions, otherwise, by the inclines of our these many resources, you already had to attack the Titled Douluo strength.”

Initially, on second Great Continental Soul Master Academy Fighting Spirit Competition that Xiao Hongchen in he participated, to promote to cultivate is, he has used secret technique ahead of time, stimulated own potential, soon became Soul Saint, was the preparation blossomed in radiant splendor on that great competition, who knows that finally actually as before was the disastrous defeat, even almost lost including the life. After that he recuperated five years, gradually recovers, although these years assiduously are also practicing, but in fact, his cultivating for also miss compared with younger sister Meng Hongchen, now just broke through the Soul Douluo boundary, but Meng Hongchen had 87 levels of Soul Power levels, soon, can launch the impact on the Titled Douluo level.

Xiao Hongchen arrives in front of Jing Hongchen, works on the Jing Hongchen beverage bottle, has filled two big mouths, eye some [say / way] of blushing: “Shrek, is Shrek these people. Killed my destiny. Some day, if I can enter Bright Virtue Hall, and controls it, in the future must ruin Shrek Academy thoroughly, lets the scene that Huo Yuhao they see with one's own eyes the Shrek Academy destruction.”

“Shut up!”Jing Hongchen has snatched the beverage bottle in his hand, gets angry the sound track: What nonsense that “spoke? Depending on you, can ruin Shrek Academy? You have remembered to me, after this thought that never appear, otherwise, not only you, will certainly be led into the abyss including our entire family, do you understand?”

Xiao Hongchen anti- sound track: “Grandfather, you are not taught since childhood I do want the ambition to be broad? Why can't I ruin Shrek Academy? Why?”

“Because you overreach oneself.”The low and deep sound resounds, Jing Hongchen grandparent and grandchild three people simultaneously one startled, looks in the direction that the sound conveys, night, the ray in palace is very gloomy, at this time actually slowly appears two people.

When they see clearly the appearances of these two people, is surprised.

The response of Xiao Hongchen is biggest, he is almost must throw immediately. The personal enemy meets particularly is jealous, when this state of mind is unsatisfactory, suddenly sees own big personal enemy, he can peaceful?

Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, silently looks at the Xiao Hongchen brother and sister and Jing Hongchen.

Xiao Hongchen and Meng Hongchen have grown up, was the initial young men and women appearance, Meng Hongchen is no longer better, is a beautiful young girl appearance, but the Xiao Hongchen under 30-year-old age, two temples somewhat were unexpectedly gray.

At this time, he looks at Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, the double pupil as if must spout the flame to be common.

However, he has not thrown eventually, in he must take flash before the action, was held by Jing Hongchen.

Meng Hongchen dull looks at Huo Yuhao, falls the vision on Tang Wutong again, the elegant face is also becomes a paleness. In her heart, can never forget that to have a pink-blue color short hair, handsome charming Wang Dong. That is the first love in her heart! May afterward, this first love actually only be able to turn into the endless pain, these many years, have actually been suffering her heart.

“What name should I call your?”Meng Hongchen crazy looks at Tang Wutong, muttered said.

The Tang Wutong expression is slightly is also awkward, nodded to her, said: “I called Tang Wutong.”

“Tang Wutong? Isn't Wang Qiu'er or Wang Dong'er?”Meng Hongchen somewhat is also surprised.

Xiao Hongchen is the anger exclaims: “Grandfather, you let loose me.”

“Shut up!”Jing Hongchen stands up suddenly, “!”A resounding, Xiao Hongchen pulled out to stagger by his palm of the hand.

This time Jing Hongchen, the body power and influence increases instantaneously, the formidable pressure aura caresses the face to go toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong direction.

Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, moves motionless, these belong to the pressure that Jing Hongchen brings, arrives at beyond his front ten meters, naturally dissipated, could not see him to use any method.

The Jing Hongchen complexion again changes, sinking sound track: “You walk, does not need to request reinforcements, immediately leaves here, returns to Bright Capital City to go.”His words, were say to the Xiao Hongchen brother and sister.

“No, I do not walk!”A Jing Hongchen palm of the hand cannot pull out obviously awakes Xiao Hongchen. His these many years, in heart depressing was really too fierce, if were not Huo Yuhao they, he will reduce to the potential exhausts, did these many years cultivate for the progress so slow region? He is a God's favored one, but now, forever has not actually touched this world peak the possibility, in his heart hates! And, person who most hates, is Huo Yuhao.

“Shut up! You get lost to me.”Complexion of Jing Hongchen air/Qi turns green. This mixes the boy, this time was swayed by personal feelings? Has lost to front this young people including Evil Soul Master of Holy Spirit Cult five big Transcendent Douluo levels, by them, and others fights with what?

Jing Hongchen had wielded Bright Virtue Hall after all, the informed sources are very rich, he will not think in the imperial palace that 100 Soul Engineer to be able to block Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong two people now. Perhaps, that 100 people already silent death here.

He only wants by his strength, to seek a way out to two children now.

“Grandfather, we do not walk, today dies, we must with you die together.”Meng Hongchen arrives at side Jing Hongchen, the body appears slowly white fog, Vermillion Clear Ice Toad Martial Soul releases quietly, the light Bai Se (White Color) air current fills the air, actually not transmits toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong direction, because she is very clear, own fatal violently poisonous to Absolute Ice not any function.

Xiao Hongchen also sobered at this time several points, clenches the teeth, stands in Jing Hongchen another side, body dark golden color ray twinkle, Three Legged Golden Toad Martial Soul release, has prepared fight.

The appearance that looks at their grandparent and grandchild three people of sharing a common hatred, Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, said: “Hall Master Hongchen, if I said that our time comes and well-meant, has not thought must injure you, do you believe?”

Jing Hongchen has gawked, the tight heartstrings therefore have not relaxed, “what do that you want to make?”

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong silent appearance here, not to be potential achievement? He already heard that Huo Yuhao once led Soul Engineer Corp to stir the wind to stir the rain in Sun-Moon Empire, has incurred the massive loss to the empire. Now will he here, show mercy? Must know, the Sun-Moon Empire army may just encircle shortly after Shrek City, he draws back the soldier.

Huo Yuhao sighed one lightly, said: “I do not want to kill you. To be honest, crossed these many years, past actually until now still at present flash through in us. Although we once were the matches, but if did not have the hostility between countries, we should not be the enemies. Xiao Hongchen and Meng Hongchen, actually, we should thank you. Is you takes to our tempering, can make us grow quickly.”

The Xiao Hongchen eye one was red, “do you regard the hone me?”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “No, never has. Now recalls initially, has this feeling. Initial we, by strength, actually might as well you. But we have formidable fighting will. Finally, we won. Has not thought that you took the extreme path, if you were not past over excitation own potential, we now as before are the matches, what a pity.”

“I do not match, when your match?”Xiao Hongchen is angry, the right hand lifts suddenly, changes into a dark golden metal artillery tube, a dark golden shell, has shelled the past in the Huo Yuhao direction instantaneously.

Huo Yuhao shook the head, the right hand lifts, wields gently, thermal shock in air, next one flickers, that dark golden bright sphere quietly vanishes to disappear.

Only then Tang Wutong sees, on the road which must be taken of that shell, the air split a small slit, swallows in which that shell directly, where explodes as for it, that not in their ponder scopes.

For these days they in process that Sky Soul Empire loafed, each other was practicing, seeks for the feeling of that Space Power, after all, Space Power is very possible is they must break through Limit Douluo most important one ring in the future. But now, they had some comprehensions to Space Power, now uses, won initial success.

Jing Hongchen complexion changed changed, he knows what own grandson displays is any ability, has not thought can injure Huo Yuhao, but by such easy melting, is he is unexpected, this Huo Yuhao strength, is really as if more formidable than the imagination. Ah? that his small age, actually how achieves

Meng Hongchen gets angry: “Huo Yuhao, you little here bluff and bluster, you are what kind, we then and that's the end.”

Huo Yuhao actually does not visit her, but falls the vision on the Jing Hongchen old face, “Hall Master Hongchen, we do not want to kill people today, therefore, please let your two grandsons restrain some. I only asked that an issue, you told me the answer, we walk immediately, moreover ensure cannot come back in view of you again.”

Jing Hongchen coldly [say / way]: “If I didn't reply?”

Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “I did not mind that removes some potential threats for our Shrek Academy. In recent years, in my hand strikes the Sun-Moon Empire person who kills to have many, I already could not count, does not miss again many two.”

The Jing Hongchen complexion changes, “do you threaten me?”

……

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-593-part-1





Volume 12

#593 - Bustling Place Family


Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, “you, if thinks is, that is. I threaten you, again?”

The strength is all background, Jing Hongchen clearly results in the complexion blanch by the Huo Yuhao air/Qi, does not have any means that he has no alternative but to dread that he is very clear, relies on the grandparent and grandchild three people, absolutely possibly is not the Huo Yuhao match. Let alone his side also has Tang Wutong.

“What do you want to ask?”Suppresses the humiliation of innermost feelings, Jing Hongchen is stretching out the arms, blocks Xiao Hongchen and Meng Hongchen that wanted to manifest suddenly, the sinking sound asks.

Huo Yuhao said: “I must know where the Sun-Moon Empire army, slowly seeks for some to be too troublesome now, happen to passed by Heaven Dou City, asks you. Told my accurate news, we leave immediately.”

Jing Hongchen gets angry: “Can you make me betray your motherland? Cannot achieve!”

Huo Yuhao nodded, no longer said that the right hand in the Xiao Hongchen direction, lifted, immediately, in him behind, the gold sun blue moon ray raises slowly, the unequalled formidable aura erupts instantaneously.

Xu Sanshi said right, when Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong are carrying on Martial Soul Fusion, they have, is the strength of Limit Douluo level!

Jing Hongchen explodes drinks one, whole body red light rises suddenly, front, together disc float, intense red light blooms outward, changes into giant light screen, protects the grandparent and grandchild three people in behind.

Some Huo Yuhao pitying visits him, shook the head.

Without a doubt, Jing Hongchen displays, defensive nine levels of Soul Guidance Device Worldly Desire that he excels. Compares in general nine levels of Soul Engineer, once was Bright Virtue Hall Master he, the strength must be more formidable, in the hand the formidable nine levels of Soul Guidance Device quantities were also more. However, he also eventually was nine levels of Soul Engineer categories.

Ices the blue ray to dodge not to have together, in the air, flashes through a light morning dew.

The pure white scratch appears in the Worldly Desire surface stuffily, Jing Hongchen snort|hum, in that flash, he only thought that own body seemed separated, that feeling, as if the whole person was torn.

The feeling of good terror. Jing Hongchen has a big shock, has not waited for he many responses, Huo Yuhao to appear in Worldly Desire, simultaneously appears, Tang Wutong.

The temperature drops to below 150 degrees below zero instantaneously, the ultra-low temperature is the best domain, Jing Hongchen, is Xiao Hongchen and Meng Hongchen brother and sister, felt instantaneously own blood as if must congeal generally, Soul Power and blood in within the body, even becomes including the aura impeded. They have to stimulate to movement Soul Power fully, maintains own inquiry.

Then they saw, the smile that on the Huo Yuhao face reveals, that smile does not keep aloof, but has the feeling that one type is unable to contend with.

Huo Yuhao shook the head to their grandparent and grandchild three people, the right hand together, the dark golden light blade edge appears, falls another nine levels of Soul Guidance Device rackets that Jing Hongchen releases.

Before Tang Wutong body, the low and deep dragon roar sound gets up, in a Purple gold color Dragon Head mouth emits the innumerable flowing light, suppressed Xiao Hongchen and Meng Hongchen can only go all out to resist.

Teleportation, moreover is double Teleportation, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong simultaneously vanish in same place, presents again time, they arrived in front of Xiao Hongchen.

Just about to changes into the liquid Xiao Hongchen, was locked by the ultra-low temperature instantaneously, the Huo Yuhao void palm arranges in the air, has sealed up around his body all spaces, the body of liquefied freezes completely.

On Tang Wutong bursts out incomparably radiant golden light, in the resonant dragon roar sound, the attack of Jing Hongchen and Meng Hongchen was swallowed by that Purple gold colored light glow completely, a wee bit cannot threaten Huo Yuhao.

The personal appearance retrocedes instantaneously, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong returned to formerly position, before their bodies, were just many Xiao Hongchen, dark golden Xiao Hongchen, already completely frozen Xiao Hongchen.

The palm of Huo Yuhao presses in the Xiao Hongchen top of the head, vision tranquil looks at Jing Hongchen.

The body of Jing Hongchen is shivering, not because of angry, but is the fear.

Too formidable, not wrong, he truly has such strength! Has examined personally, he is clear, why before Huo Yuhao, will say these words, agree said lets off them, before him, the grandparent and grandchild three people is not the match. Before Xiao Hongchen, retaliation that said that but is a joke.

20-year-old Limit Douluo? It seems like that this world must cloud over eventually! Ascended the sky to Sun-Moon Empire so formidable Soul Guidance Device, actually gave has belonged to Douluo Continent three countries such monsters, facing such monster, actually who can contend with him? At least do not have any possibly.

Jing Hongchen pain has closed eyes, nodded to Huo Yuhao, said: “Good, I told you.”

If 20 years ago, or is ten years ago, by the Bright Virtue Hall Master disposition, even if the biological grandson dies in the front shortly, he absolutely will also defend his dignity with the life.

But, now is different, he was old, the person was old, is attached to the family, he only then these two outstanding grandsons and granddaughter. They are he hope completely, even is also the hope of family. Under Jing Hongchen once cloth, friend, almost all died in that large explosion, otherwise, he did how to go so far as to reduce in this? Therefore, he does not have the means that he can only compromise, so long as can save grandson's life.

Huo Yuhao nodded, waves the arms about, Xiao Hongchen returned in front of Jing Hongchen, freezing effect also contacted. Huo Yuhao does not fear Jing Hongchen to renege on a promise, he can catch oneself front one time Xiao Hongchen, can grasp again the second time.

Restores the normal Xiao Hongchen whole body to shiver, he fears actually, but is freezes.

Looks at Huo Yuhao, his look some delay, if before, in angry he also has blood energy, then, present he, remaining only then despaired. Right, is desperate.

What to do? In this case, can actually be able to resist him? He could not find the answer, he even understands that oneself this life was impossible to find the answer again.

Huo Yuhao shook the head to him, said: “I will understand to feel grateful, thank you once to take to my pressure, thank you once with my hostility. Today I do not kill you, you have no need timidly, to take revenge, momentarily waits for you. However, you must refuel.”

The Xiao Hongchen complexion from turned suddenly palely blood red, “”spouts a blood, the body has creakied.

Jing Hongchen angry [say / way]: “Walks, you walk. Sun-Moon Empire army south of being away from Heaven Dou City inside and outside 500, in the basin that hills surround is stationed in the recuperation. You walk! Do not make me see you again.”

Huo Yuhao said again that perhaps he really must forever lose his grandson, he only wants to make them quickly depart now, best is forever no longer sees.

Huo Yuhao nodded to Jing Hongchen, “Hall Master Hongchen, takes care.”Got the answer of wish, he is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, turns around to go.

“wait a moment.”Jing Hongchen called out suddenly.

Huo Yuhao stops the footsteps, turns head to look to Jing Hongchen, “what does Hall Master have to confess?”

After Jing Hongchen has hesitated slightly one next, said: “Huo Yuhao, has a matter I to tell you, at present, War-God Empress is receiving your majesty question. Concrete because any I am not very clear, but should be related with Holy Spirit Cult, it is said is the Soul Engineer mutiny in army, has killed in the armed forces in all Holy Spirit Cult the underlying bed, only then above Titled Douluo cultivates for Evil Soul Master runs away. Therefore, now that side the imperial capital somewhat is also chaotic, is the reason why the army does not have about one step to move. However, heard that War-God Empress is also dispatching Soul Engineer that the home trains newly, supplements various Soul Engineer Corp, in savings strength.”

“?”Huo Yuhao somewhat surprised looks at Jing Hongchen, he has not thought that Jing Hongchen actually will say such words to oneself.

Jing Hongchen said: Soul Engineer that “at present, these train newly, should also on the road. In three days, they should arrive at the military compound. Judges according to me, although this time matter is very troublesome, even if your majesty, is not willing to offend to have two Limit Douluo Holy Spirit Cult, but, starts the strength to be getting more and more formidable with the flight of steps leading to a palace hall, two Limit Douluo cannot get the winning side absolutely. At least War-God Empress should not have matter, your majesty most trusts is empress, moreover he was also counting on empress continues to help him attack a city to seize territory. The present is a good opportunity, how as to do, looked your. All has been said that is to the repayment of graciousness of two not killing, please.”

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, “many thanks Hall Master considers.”Spoke these words, he holds up the hand of Tang Wutong, turns around to go.

Xiao Hongchen and Meng Hongchen surprised sees own grandfather, how regardless of they have not thought that Jing Hongchen actually so secretly will tell Huo Yuhao.

“It is not clear, right? I to am the truth that he said that not having the least bit to cheat, in your opinion, did I betray the country?”Smiling that Jing Hongchen self-ridicules.

Xiao Hongchen sound somewhat hoarse [say / way]: “Grandfather, why do you want such to do?”

Jing Hongchen coldly visits him, “now you know the words that you spoke a moment ago were laughable? I told you, even if the empire unified entire Continent, Shrek Academy will not have the matter. The empire will not aim at Shrek Academy, the simplest reason, because that is Academy, but is not a country. This is also the Shrek Academy wisest place, they always do not yearn for the authority, but enlightens Soul Master, later also has Soul Engineer. Anybody has ruled Continent, hope existence of this highest school. Therefore, Shrek Academy can inherit for ten thousand years. If the empire wants to ruin Shrek Academy, then, even may cause declining of empire. Because Shrek Academy taught too many powerhouses.”

……

Last moon/month, sought the monthly ticket and recommendation vote support sincerely. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-593-part-2





Volume 12

#593 - Bustling Place Family


“For example these present has submitted to the fellow in empire, our Sky Soul Empire, many people come from Shrek Academy. Sky Soul Empire perishes, they can submit. However, if Shrek Academy was perished, do you believe that they will rise immediately spiritedly to revolt. You had studied in Shrek Academy, told me, what was there felt?”

The Xiao Hongchen tooth fastens to nip, agree did not speak, Meng Hongchen said spookily: “That truly is the school that any Soul Master must yearn, although I and elder brother are receive the students to repel there, but, Teacher actually do not repel in us, so long as we inquired, would obtaining the correct reply, there, has the best study and practice atmosphere, student who where walked, that outstanding . Moreover, everyone will have a deep attachment to Academy, if possible, I am even willing to go back to study and pursue advanced studies again. Therefore, why I am specially clear some that many Shrek Academy Inner Court students finally to choose to remain as Academy.”

“Laughable!”Xiao Hongchen roars.

Jing Hongchen shook the head, said: “Child, you were too tenacious. Do you know? Actually, even if I, had yearned for Shrek Academy, has thought must go to there study. Why this is also you can become reason that exchanges fresh, because I hope that you can complete that wish for me! I clearly know that outstanding of Shrek Academy students, arrives at our Sun-Moon Royal Soul Engineering Academy certainly to be potential achievement, but my being able help makes you as before the exchange is born with is so. Not only I, so long as is Soul Master, hopes to go to the Shrek Academy study, anybody is the same. Including your majesty!”

“Your majesty?”Meng Hongchen calls out in alarm one.

Jing Hongchen nodded, said: “Do you believe that if your majesty unified Continent, Crown Prince Your Highness certainly will enter then the Shrek Academy study under the premise of guarantee security in the future, this is ten thousand years of Shrek charm is at! Therefore, Shrek will not have matter, smiles all that said a moment ago, really is just a joke.”

“Why must tell Huo Yuhao these matters as for me, is actually very simple, because I hope him to know that or I do not hope the empire such quickly can unify Continent. The crafty rabbit dies, running dog to boil, bird and good bow conceal completely. If the empire unified Continent smoothly, our these Soul Engineer did not have the opportunity. Only the war is unceasing, in the future, after you will join Worship Hall, will have the budding opportunity. Therefore, at this time, I must such do. Right, I betrayed the country, is, for the family, I have to such do.”

Jing Hongchen pain has closed eyes, “you remember, this life, do not aim at Huo Yuhao again, you did not have any opportunity. Even if Shrek Academy, I never had also heard before, has presented the super talent of such level, he grew completely, even if Holy Spirit Cult that two Limit Douluo, is not necessarily able to want his life. Once that two Limit Douluo life comes to the end, you look, future Continent, will be this young people. If in Douluo Continent historical has a person to be able only compared with him, then, is their Tang Sect first ancestor, Tang San. In the past, Tang San was leading Shrek Seven Devils, established Tang Sect, Continent was vertically and horizontally invincible, finally inherited the position of Gods, defeated stiffly same inherited the God Position Martial Soul Hall palace Lord, thus has disintegrated Martial Soul Hall, making the country controls the Continent strength truly. Afterward, the Tang Sect ancestor Tang San liter into God Realm vanished does not see. Although this is only the legend, but in my opinion, if has God Realm, has Gods, perhaps, this Huo Yuhao, his Tang Wutong, really had such potential. Such match, is not you can contend!”

“Gods?”These two character, in the heart the indignant Xiao Hongchen delay, he never had not thought of these two characters. Does Gods, what mean? On this world, really bright? Nobody knows, but, has in Shrek Academy and Tang Sect legend.

Until now, that once to turn into a god first-generation Shrek Seven Devils statue, in the Shrek Academy front door.

Jing Hongchen earnest nod, “has the possibility, the time will confirm all, will tell our final answers. Perhaps, our generation when are living, may witness Gods to appear.”

The Meng Hongchen look was somewhat crazy, but Xiao Hongchen is the delay, he has not thought that once regarded as the person of biggest match by oneself, really had became the Gods potential.

Leaves the imperial palace, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong has not continued to stay again, they simultaneously jump, flies toward the upper air. All upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device before them, are only a joke.

“Yuhao, you said that Jing Hongchen words are credible?”Tang Wutong asked.

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “Confidence level is very high.”

“Why?”Tang Wutong is somewhat puzzled.

Huo Yuhao said: “Hero is late in life! Couldn't you have looked? This Jing Hongchen was very discontented with entire Sun-Moon Empire. Once he, the power leaned the government and people, controlled Bright Virtue Hall, was eminent characters in nine levels of Soul Engineer. But now? Although became Heaven Dou City City Lord, in surface attractive very much, in fact actually has been far away from the power core, all these are Xu Tianran create without doubt, can he not hate? Can listen a moment ago to two grandson and granddaughter's words from him, he is not willingly. Such being the case, he needs to be two grandsons and granddaughter after rises to make a stage. The peace is never the stage of powerhouse, only then throughout maintains in the war, they have the opportunity. In a nutshell, this Jing Hongchen, anxiouss to stir up trouble radically. He naturally does not hope that Sun-Moon Empire was injured by us, but does not hope that Sun-Moon Empire unifies Continent in a short time, that does not serve the benefit of their family.”

“Has not thought that he unexpectedly is so selfish?”Tang Wutong somewhat disdains.

Huo Yuhao is actually somewhat disappointed, said: “This cannot say, after having hobbling of family, a lot truly cannot only consider itself!”In his mind has remembered Duke White Tiger, initially, he has not paid attention to oneself mother and child, because......

Were one starting to give him to look to give a pretext? In Huo Yuhao heart one startled, but somewhat is also funny.

He also profound remembering, initially just left Duke's Estate now time, once secretly pledged that one day must become now most powerhouse on Douluo Continent, then avenges a grievance for mother.

Regarding most powerhouse pledge, he approached, if can achievement Limit Douluo, he be possible in the future very much becomes most powerhouse on this world. But, the mentality of revenging actually changed, truly after becoming the powerhouse, many hatreds unconscious was desalinated.

Thanks Academy that Huo Yuhao is from the heart, thanked Tang Sect, if did not have the guidance of Academy, perhaps he will take leaning the road, perhaps also became Evil Soul Master. Because Academy changes his idea unceasingly, cared that his growth, trains him becomes present age a powerhouse, because partners drive mutually, he had today.

Huo Yuhao knows to feel grateful very much, he is always so, this benevolence, he will repay with the life.

The light ray from the sky glitters, that is the ray of star, in the curtain of night, today's star light is especially bright, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong concealment in Imitation Soul Ability, flies toward the south.

“We then what to do? Intercepts these Soul Engineer? They also not before the army converges, actually good opportunity.”Tang Wutong said.

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “Is a good opportunity. Ju Zi(orange) once had to propose to me, she said that so long as I can kill Xu Tianran, she complies not to launch the war in ten years, to opportunity that Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire rest and build up strength.”

“Ah? does she want to murder the husband?”Tang Wutong shocking saying.

On the Huo Yuhao face full is the forced smile, “I do not know how evidently she thinks, but I have to acknowledge that her proposition makes me ten divert attention. Therefore, my following goal, likely was Xu Tianran. Xu Tianran is the present age fierce and ambitious, in he controls Sun-Moon Empire, has to unify the Continent ability. But if he died, Sun-Moon Empire will be in the confusion surely. Ju Zi(orange) wants the position of crown prince stabilizes is occupied by oneself son also to need to be good some time, therefore, even if she is perfidious, Sun-Moon Empire similarly was impossible to launch the war in a short time. Therefore, Xu Tianran dies, is my goal.”

Tang Wutong said: “Originally you look for the Sun-Moon Empire army, can discuss this matter with Ju Zi(orange)?”

Huo Yuhao shakes the head saying: “Naturally continues. The lion can only negotiate with the tiger, if we do not show enough strength, how I can force her to observe the commitment? Therefore, we must begin, first weakens the strengths of some of her armies, then negotiated with her. As the matter stands, her situation will be more poverty-stricken. This does not have the matter of means that if possible, I am not willing to become an enemy with her. Ju Zi(orange) was too intelligent, particularly in battlefield, even if I, cannot plan her.”

Tang Wutong nodded, said: “The Ju Zi(orange) only issue, is actually her individual strength, if she can have the formidable individual strength again, she too was then dangerous. Yuhao, if one day, she threatened Academy, you will kill her?”

Asked these words time, Tang Wutong looks is very earnest, Huo Yuhao looks to her eye pupil. In the Tang Wutong eye reveals an ashamed color slightly, lowered the head, said: “Sorry, Yuhao, in my heart some are uncomfortable.”

Huo Yuhao embraces into her the bosom, is controlling the speed of flight. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-593-part-3





Volume 12

#594 - On Mountain Valley Army


“I understand. You could rest assured that Wutong, on this world, besides Dong'er, only then Qiu'er had walked into my heart. But now, Dong'er or Qiu'er, in fact are you, therefore, nobody can affect among us the sentiment. Right, I had liked Ju Zi(orange), but that passed. If before I know you are the female body, she is willing with me in the same place, the present all not to be perhaps different, but she does not have, she chooses the road that oneself must take, at that time we already never possibly. Therefore, although I, when she is a friend, absolutely does not have the sentiment of men and women. If one day, she threatened Academy, I certainly will not show mercy.”

When said the last few words, Tang Wutong clearly saw murderous intention that the Huo Yuhao eyeground deep place flashed through instantaneously.

Academy in his heart, is really most important!

On the Tang Wutong face reveals a smile, said: “If threatens the Academy person is I? I know that this issue is very silly, but, I cannot help asking you.”

Huo Yuhao has gawked staring, his complexion changed serious, “do not crack a joke with this matter. If there is such one day, I same will kill you. Stated differently, after having killed you, I will commit suicide, commits suicide together in the name of love for you. In that case, has helped our love, has protected Academy.”

“Is unfair to Yuhao, I later did not ask such question.”Tang Wutong enclasps him, as if must melt the anxiety in his heart.

Huo Yuhao gently is stroking her long hair, said: “On the day of hope do not have. Ju Zi(orange) should unable. Academy after is not a country, even if Xu Tianran is crazy, he does not have to destroy Academy truly. Regarding any ruler, Academy is one provides the talented person best place. Let alone, Shrek Academy ten thousand years of background, some people want to ruin it, that must think over first oneself whether can withstand, therefore brings Thunder's Rage of scholars.”

Tang Wutong nodded, said: “Yes. If Academy were ruined, we will go all out.”

Huo Yuhao nods the head slightly, on the face reveals a light smile, “was good. Did not say these, we picked up the speed, first observed the situation of Sun-Moon Empire army, how then thinks to begin. We must weaken the Ju Zi(orange) strength, but cannot weaken too. Moreover, I estimated that so long as we take an action, the Sun-Moon Empire army will have the change. Moreover, but also a little very much may appear, that is. Holy Spirit Cult once more will possibly send for arriving in the army. If so, was really has lived it up, we only needed to intercept these Soul Engineer to be good, framed by planting stolen goods on to shift blame this matter to use on Holy Spirit Cult, I was a psychological burden do not have.”

Tang Wutong ill-humored [say / way]: “You now were more and more bad. You said that if Holy Spirit Cult comes the person once more, who can be? Grim Reaper Douluo does Ye Xishui meet after the wedding originally? That Zongli Wu, he had sneak attacked me after on that day, his Martial Soul by your fist heavy wound, now how is not known.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Zongli Wu injured certainly source, although I did not know his injury seriously. But will not be definitely light, was not one month can restore, therefore, if came the person from Sun-Moon Empire Bright Capital City, Holy Spirit Cult can send out to deter the audience, perhaps also had Grim Reaper Douluo also Xishui.. Ye Xishui, is not necessarily able to make the army show respect for somebody's ability. Although Grim Reaper Douluo is formidable, but is relying on linkage Soul Guidance Device, the Sun-Moon Empire army has not feared her. Initially, even if Beast God Di Tian cannot flatter. Does not know whether now Beast God recuperated the injury.”

Tang Wutong white his eyes. Said: “Do you also some moods care about the Beast God injury now? He did not ask you to trouble is good.”

Huo Yuhao he he smiles, said: “Should face must always face, is not because I am avoiding him, does not need to face. I hope, after oneself can be more formidable, goes facing Beast God again. Only then defeats him, I can stand in this world peak truly. Wutong, promises me, if some day I decide to challenge Beast God time, do not prevent me, do not help me, I must defeat him with my strength.”

Tang Wutong has gawked staring, “may we be a body.”

Huo Yuhao sighed, said: “Regarding me, challenges Beast God, not only to prove own strength, in the meantime, is a duty, duty that I must complete.”In his mind, was recalling words that God of Emotion Rong Nianbing spoke.

This time cultivates after the promotion, became Transcendent Douluo, Huo Yuhao can feel obviously that belongs to the God of Emotion strength in own within the body is becoming stronger and stronger, perhaps, that is the Gods strength.

This strength is not him, at least now is also not. But this strength is actually fusing with him.

Initially, mobilized this strength truly time, is Tang Wutong to save him was seriously injured, he erupted Power of Emotion that released suddenly. Integrates in the mood own combat capability completely, will be his development trend important direction.

Beast God Di Tian has stood in this world apex, even if his achievement Limit Douluo, has third Soul Nucleus, is not necessarily able to win Di Tian steadily. To defeat Di Tian, he must fuse Power of Emotion of oneself within the body. Only has so, can break through once more, can integrate God of Emotion Gods truly.

Not only he now, to turn into a god, is lets in within the body six big spirit extrications the roads which must be taken. Moreover, to that time, he could have the Wutong same place, goes to God Realm. In the Huo Yuhao heart thinks that the Wutong strength is so strong, if become God of Emotion, asked Rong Nianbing to help Wutong also look for Gods to inherit, wants to come, he should not reject.

Thinks of here, Huo Yuhao thought one are competitive, what but also there is compared with clearly recognizing the direction the happy matter?

Huo Yuhao relaxes is embracing the bosom of Tang Wutong, is holding her hand. In the free time who they spoke, 500 li (0.5km) distance arrived.

By far, the earth in the Spiritual Detection scanning of Huo Yuhao completely presents during he consciousness, such that just like Jing Hongchen said that a giant basin appears in their field of vision, the area of this basin, compared with initially Huo Yuhao they had gone to Ice and Fire Yin Yang Well big many.

In Ice and Fire Yin Yang Well, although has numerous Heaven and Earth Treasure, two spring water, but the area is not too actually big. But here is different, this basin, big of area, exceeds the general city by far.

By the basin has the start to talk, can enter, the basin, the topography is smooth, can look from inside vegetation, this is a treasure trove!

Around the basin is stone mountain, although is insufficient to be infertile, but does not have the vegetation of cover, such mountain is unattractive, but is very solid, is the natural city wall.

The Sun-Moon Empire army hides in this basin, wanted to find truly is difficult. If not Jing Hongchen discloses secret information, Huo Yuhao a short time, but could also not find this place.

Spiritual Detection covers, a about examination. Really, in basin, everywhere what is stationed is the tent of Sun-Moon Empire army . Moreover, on the summits of basin four directions, arranges the Soul Guidance Array place. Moreover scale relative big of Soul Guidance Array place, seems, unexpectedly is the dispositions of Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp.

My goodness, whose this is must cope with Ah? definitely not to cope with me. Huo Yuhao somewhat moves thought that raises, in addition the beforehand guess, the answer was self-evident.

Own plan has succeeded, the army mutiny, Soul Engineer to get rid of Evil Soul Master, Holy Spirit Cult must definitely get angry. Does not know how Ju Zi(orange) handles this matter, she has not led the army to return to homeland, obviously does not want to admit mistakes, how to process as for Xu Tianran, it can be imagined. Xu Tianran will certainly turn toward Ju Zi(orange). Most great significance that in Sun-Moon Empire, Holy Spirit Cult has, in fact to cope with Shrek Academy, but now Shrek Academy gradually no longer is the Sun-Moon Empire most important match. At least with the Sky Soul Empire destruction, after the huge resources pour into, the Sun-Moon Empire overall strength once more selects for promotion, the function of Holy Spirit Cult became getting smaller, but Ju Zi(orange) was different, she has been promoting in the prestige of military, was representing the Xu Tianran interests. If layer on layer punishes her, does not tally with the Xu Tianran benefit. Therefore, perhaps Xu Tianran must smooth over differences.

It can be imagined, violent anger Grim Reaper Douluo can look for trouble, but when does not know appears, looks at the present appearance, Grim Reaper Douluo should not come, but, she came, can ruin part of Soul Guidance Array places, cannot support existences of these many Soul Engineer! As for Ju Zi(orange) where, perhaps only then she knew. Wanted to find her to be possible not to be easy.

Naturally, Huo Yuhao this is Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui considered that is not he of consideration, he has Spiritual Detection this to kill greatly, let alone was ten thousand armed forces, even if were on army again many several times, so long as gave his enough time, found Ju Zi(orange) not to be difficult.

Has not sought for Ju Zi(orange) directly, Huo Yuhao at present the troop deployment in basin, as well as all Soul Guidance Array positions have inspected carefully, this brings Tang Wutong to fly in a farther direction, this direction, is the road which must be taken that the Sun-Moon Empire supplies army arrives.

Has Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection, wants to bypass him, is almost the impossible matter.

Tang Wutong said: “What kind of? Here troop disposition how?”



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-594-part-1





Volume 12

#594 - Mountain Valley Army


Huo Yuhao said: “Sun-Moon Empire army complete here, Ju Zi(orange) should also be. On summit, Soul Guidance Array places of four Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp arrangement, in valley, eight Soul Guidance Array places, although wants the weak upper stage, but arranges is very covert, on Soul Guidance Array with summit complements one another. Sky over the basin, as well as periphery in hundred li (0.5km) range, in the sky is flying all kinds of upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device, this is one must kill the bureau simply! Even if we, if went in later takes an action to be discovered that wanted to withdraw not to be easy. Ju Zi(orange) suffices ruthlessly! This must aim at Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, as well as Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao rhythm. Quite aggressive, was this must have no consideration for face with them really?”

Tang Wutong pū smiles, said: “Also is not the good deed that you do, if you do not frame by planting stolen goods on to frame, will not turn into this.”

Huo Yuhao has also smiled, “you know that what I currently do have to feel?”

Tang Wutong doubts visits him.

Huo Yuhao hey said with a smile: “My present feeling is, wanting the exhausted silk to reel a cocoon starts from the surrounding generally, disintegrates this impregnable defense line gradually, finally breaks his present bureau thoroughly. This time although will be very long, but why I do not know, at this time specially was confident.”

“If my beforehand plan has not succeeded, without a doubt, Holy Spirit Cult first copes should be I, two Limit Douluo, will also take to us really not the small pressure, but looking back now, Ju Zi(orange) actually bore these pressures for us. From her present layout, has certainly the practical assurance, that Grim Reaper Douluo can look for her trouble, otherwise cannot like this. We sit mountain Guanhu to fight one temporarily first are, making them hit first. When they hit similarly, we moved again. As for intercepting the matter of Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer reinforcements, is the Holy Spirit Cult person does certainly.”

Tang Wutong said with a smile: “You must be how what kind, you is a bastard in any case, I am the woman of bastard.”

“Ha Ha! I am a young thief, you are my clever young married woman.”

“Bah, was coarse, any clever young married woman, others were satisfactory!”

Two forms accelerate suddenly, goes toward the distant place.

valley, commander tent.

Ju Zi(orange) sits in commander tent, this time she, the body military garb went, is only a court lady style of dress, looks like the appearance of time in the imperial palace. Brow micro pressed, back and forth paces in commander tent, does not know that is pondering anything.

Xu Tianran decree after delaying for a long time, finally transmitted, in the decree, Xu Tianran harshly condemned her, but, had not said how must punish her, but said that when she completed the war after Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire, when withdrew troops toward when was to fall the crime in her.

This decree appeared very interesting, everyone could see, Xu Tianran this was in maintaining Ju Zi(orange), some Ju Zi(orange) were only clear, in Xu Tianran this decree, not only there is a maintenance, existences of other things, for example, weakened!

Very obviously, after the Xu Tianran clear this decree issues, will make that side Holy Spirit Cult go crazy, does not certainly fear Holy Spirit Cult in Bright Capital City Xu Tianran, he has Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp as well as the numerous position formidable consecration protection, in addition in Bright Capital City prepare Soul Guidance Array place, these strengths, even if Limit Douluo does not have the means to shake easily.

But has killed the Holy Spirit Cult person, is not Xu Tianran, but is her Soul Engineer in army, she is three services commander. Holy Spirit Cult did not vent these angers on her blames.

Luckily, before oneself initially left imperial palace asks Xu Tianran to probably take care of the crown prince, wants to come the crown prince not to have any danger. Xu Tianran this has suspected to oneself, he was suspects heavily, he thought obviously, after oneself stilled Sky Soul Empire, the strength that in the hand grasped was extremely strong, must therefore weaken to oneself through Holy Spirit Cult.

Naturally, this matter can also in other words, he hope further weakens Holy Spirit Cult with the aid of own strength, but weakens the best means that kills off them, kills off is good.

Sun-Moon Empire has established the absolute superiority the Continent last present, Holy Spirit Cult this ally became dispensable, in this case, the Evil Soul Master cleaning clean obviously was the good choice, at least this was the people and ministers is willing to see. Why not?

Xu Tianran this clearly must sit mountain Guanhu to fight. He is very clear, Ju Zi(orange) is impossible to lose, in the Ju Zi(orange) hand is grasping that huge strength, is that intelligent. Most is the loss will be bigger. As for Holy Spirit Cult that side, Xu Tianran has not thought many. This army mutinies, in fact is also equal to Holy Spirit Cult by Sun-Moon Empire truely excluded, was impossible to restore to the standard of original national religion.

Jing Hongchen that crafty rabbit dies, running dog to boil, bird and good bow conceal completely, uses similarly is also easy-to-use on Holy Spirit Cult.

The Holy Spirit Cult biggest fault is proud, they were proud, thinks Sun-Moon Empire left their at all impossible resistance Shrek Academy.

This point they mediated from the essence belong to the Douluo Continent three countries views are consistent, they underestimated the Soul Guidance Device prestige energy.

Xu Tianran and Sun-Moon Empire have proven with the fact, is relying on the Soul Guidance Device strength, truly can unify entire Continent. After this situation is established, what significance but also wants Holy Spirit Cult to have? The Holy Spirit Cult evil place, had already made the seething discontent among the people. Their to get rid of, is the common people most is happy to see completely. Once stain, must scrub, moreover clean that must scrub.

Xu Tianran must do, is an eternity emperor, unifies the Continent enlightened emperor, but is not Evil Tyrant.

Therefore, Xu Tianran under the careful thinking, has thought of this good means that source of trouble Tungyin.

As for the Ju Zi(orange) life and death, in the face of a future of his eternity emperor, what was also considered as? Naturally, if Ju Zi(orange) died, Xu Tianran is will be sad. At least in his subordinate, Ju Zi(orange) is most loyal, is most intimate. Xu Tianran has even thought that if Ju Zi(orange) died, he announced like the people that in the future will not find a wife again, had the crown prince in any case, wanted the empress not to matter.

Sneering of Ju Zi(orange) corners of the mouth place several points, regarding the Xu Tianran mentality, she as if can see richly now. Even can think that face of Xu Tianran issuing this decree when the expression that on reveals.

The oversuspicious fierce and ambitious, this is she to the Xu Tianran best appraisal. But, she more and more has looked down upon him now.

How Yuhao did not know, on that day Tang Wutong by Zongli Wu heavy wound, after he left, can cure Tang Wutong?

Thought of Huo Yuhao, ice-cold in Ju Zi(orange) heart turns worried, although she was very clear, present Huo Yuhao became will threaten her biggest barrier in the future, but, in her heart actually as before could not bear is worrying about him. If she must lose to a person in the future, she most hopes loses to Huo Yuhao. Loses to oneself deeply are loving man, cannot be regarded disgraced. Perhaps, is a happiness, perhaps to that time, oneself really has extricated.

In mind unceasing appears various thoughts, enough after one double-hour, she turns back to her position place, somewhat exhaustedly sat.

After this time is willing is high-ranking military officers takes punishment for somebody else, she in army the prestige has promoted the unprecedented degree, all military officers feel a heartfelt admiration to her.

Here recuperation naturally to wait for the Xu Tianran decree, but following that the decree issues, besides reprimanding Ju Zi(orange), tells her, to continue to launch the attack, till unifying Continent. The logistics supply will ship continuously. As for Holy Spirit Cult threat that may bring, is a character has not actually raised.

Also does wish make me treat as the tool to help you unify entire Continent? In the Ju Zi(orange) eye full is the chill in the air, Xu Tianran, good Xu Tianran! Your selfish, will ruin all eventually. Your life, most also has three years to four years. At that time, only if I died, otherwise!

Thinks of here, in the Ju Zi(orange) eye the cold brightness twinkle, on the whole person face full is the murderous intention. Luckily, at this time, in commander tent only then she. Nobody saw that the decree in her hand had been rubbed the scrap paper.

“Bang!”Low and deep thundering suddenly resounds, this Ju Zi(orange) that will prepare to rest will be awakening just like the thunderous common bellow. Her subconscious rapid puts on own Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, in big strides walks toward outside.

Goes out, she saw backdrop that has glistened completely. On valley all around summit, four Soul Guidance Array have released the linkage defense guard shield comprehensively, but, was obviously gloomy in the Soul Guidance Protective Cover ray of southeastern direction, that side, many crushed stones drop from the clouds, tumbles to under.

Luckily, is stationed in most surrounding is Soul Engineer, under cleaning up of Soul Guidance Ray, the person who the wound arrives are not many.

High-order Soul Engineer collect nearby commander tent rapidly, all looks toward the upper air that the complexion of everyone ten segregate heavily.

Only then Ju Zi(orange) is calmest, on the face reveals color of the disdaining, “should come, always came. What a pity, she imagines me is stupider, she planned that can shake my defense big hardly?”

“Marshal, cannot be negligent. She after is the empire first powerhouse, careful is on.”

In the upper air, together the form ray twinkle of dark red, behind the form, is huge light shadow, this light shadow reaches as high as hundred meters, presents all over the body is dark red, above the both arms, is surrounding a giant steeple. The steeple peak, red light just stopped.

The southeast corner that side Soul Guidance Array place, the attacked flash, voluntarily released to defend the guard shield. But as before was actually routed, and loses seriously, over one-third Soul Guidance Array places, forever vanishing into thin air. Why this is also this direction linkage defense guard shield effect unsatisfactory reason. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-594-part-2





Volume 12

#594 - Mountain Valley Army


Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, is that float in the front form, the back, is her Blood Soul Devil Puppet. But that steeple, was honored as on this world most approaches ten levels of Soul Guidance Device without doubt, Grim Reaper Tower.

Grim Reaper Tower, once made Huo Yuhao barely escape, but this time, its appearance, must face Ju Zi(orange) impressively.

The Ye Xishui sound spreads by far, “empress, hands over all murderers, the old body turns around to depart. You is a marshal. Otherwise, destroys completely, all Soul Engineer, must die.”

The Ju Zi(orange) sound through amplifying Soul Guidance Device spreads, “I do not know that what you were saying, here, did the three services officers who is utterly loyal for the empire, what come the murderer to say? Grim Reaper Douluo, you consecrate as the empire remote antiquity, Holy Spirit Cult remote antiquity Cult Master, dares to torment my army, strikes to kill my army Zhongliang. This matter, even if on palace surface Monarch, this Commander does not fear you. You think that depending on the strength of your oneself, can contend with my this Soul Guidance Array? Your too Tianzhen.”

“Snort!”Ye Xishui anger snort|hum, instantaneous acoustic shock four wild. Entire valley as if snort|hum in shivered in her anger, Grim Reaper Tower peak, is one group of red light condenses gradually. Although Ye Xishui does not have Huo Yuhao such Spiritual Detection, but her Spiritual Power is also Huo Yuhao that level, seeks for a form not to be difficult through the sound.

In this time, the overbearing Bai Se (White Color) light beam is lifting off suddenly, that light beam almost arrived in front of Ye Xishui instantaneously.

If carefully looked that will discover, this light beam is the light beam combinations by eight small points condenses, imposing manner extremely Xuan. The place visited, space tearing, has outshone the entire nighttime sky.

At this moment, a low and deep dragon roar sound gets up, a huge jet black form kept off in front of Ye Xishui, that unexpectedly was a black big dragon, it opened the big mouth suddenly, jet black such as the spitting breath blowout of black ink, the black spat the breath and Bai Se (White Color) light beam forms the striking contrast.

The instance that both collide, sees that black to spit in the breath, as if there is innumerable space cracks to appear, although by that Bai Se (White Color) light beam oppression backlash of successively, but that Bai Se (White Color) light beam rapidly was also being weakened.

The commander tent front, the Ju Zi(orange) complexion slightly changes, muttered thought aloud: “Dragon Emperor Douluo, Darkness Sacred Dragon Long Xiaoyao, he really also came.”

Right, is Ye Xishui blocks that to strike from the frontage, is Darkness Sacred Dragon, Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao. That black big dragon, without doubt is his Martial Soul avatar.

The terrifying collision from the sky blooms the innumerable halos, completely vanishes until that Bai Se (White Color) light beam.

The first wave of linkage attack, stiffly was blocked by Darkness Sacred Dragon.

Below mobilizes various Commander Soul Engineer Corp who this strikes looks like damn general, they have never thought that by linkage attack that eight Soul Guidance Array send out, can actually be blocked by the Soul Master strength, this has gone beyond their cognition category.

However, the attack then just started, is four light beams, simultaneously shoots toward airborne Ye Xishui, this time, four light beams come from around the summit, four Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp.

Before the linkage attack beam that these Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp start although cannot compare, that together, but each prestige can have the beforehand that Bai Se (White Color) light beam about 1/2 prestige energies, four leave, world discoloration.

The linkage attack and linkage defense, this is the formidable strength that Soul Engineer relies on.

This is also when why Ju Zi(orange) saw when Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui actually wants the frontal attack one's own side armies on the face will reveal disdaining the color reason.

Limit Douluo, facing such army, the frontage fight is not the most correct choice. Basic on display their individual bellipotent merits.

Naturally, this is also various Surveying Soul Guidance Device effects that because she arranges are good, besides Huo Yuhao that special capability, generally Titled Douluo, even is Limit Douluo, does not have to hide in the face of the survey of that level. Therefore had the present aspect.

The dark red light beam erupts suddenly, goal refers, is Ju Zi(orange) in the position.

Four Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp Soul Guidance Array just launched the offensive, hurries to arrange the linkage defense guard shield.

The ability of Ye Xishui capture opportunity truly was too strong, facing the beforehand four attacks, she has not paid attention, but was takes this opportunity to attack Ju Zi(orange).

Darkness Sacred Dragon Long Xiaoyao that huge Black Dragon body from the sky circles, spit the breath to emit, melted that four rays actually. But if carefully looked that will discover, its body surrounding black air current became attenuated obviously.

The blood light is very near, worthily is present age most formidable Assault Soul Guidance Device, four Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp collaborate the linkage defense guard shield under cloth to be broken unexpectedly instantaneously, red light drops down, the goal points to Ju Zi(orange).

At this moment, Ju Zi(orange) only thinks the whole body to feel cold, continually even fends possibly does not have. This was approached ten levels of Soul Guidance Device locking the terrifying effects.

However, the second defense line actually instantaneously raised, arranges eight Soul Guidance Array in valley simultaneously to bloom brilliantly, another linkage defense guard shield kept off in the sky, protected firmly Ju Zi(orange).

The blood red light beam and pure white linkage defense guard shield collides in together, bursts out the radiant brilliance, as if some innumerable blood light explode to disperse, but these blood light in light of this have not actually vanished, but changes into blood red Wraith Soul, crazy was gnawing Soul Guidance Protective Cover, sent out gratingly “ka ka”sound.

Reason that Grim Reaper's Light the terror, lies in each time its release, must burn the innumerable souls, thus forms the most formidable resentment, not only its striking power the Soul Power level, meanwhile has the mind level.

Concentrated almost ten Soul Engineer Corp strengths to start the linkage defense guard shield, this forced to resist it, that blood light in gnawing gradually vanished. But in blood light covers the officers within range, had not been clearly injured, but many people thought one as if want the soul exsomatize to be common, intermittent dizziness.

Does the prestige of Grim Reaper Douluo, actually go so far as in this way?

Ju Zi(orange) is also first time faces Ye Xishui, she was very high to the estimate of this Grim Reaper Douluo before, but now she is clear, own judgment has made a mistake.

Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, not only Limit Douluo, is formidable nine levels of Soul Engineer, her manufacture Soul Guidance Device ability not necessarily strong, but Grim Reaper Tower in hand actually absolutely is now one of the Soul Engineer most peak works. Even is most formidable.

This, is Evil Soul Master of Limit Douluo level! The striking power that her full eruption, can bloom, has surpassed the imagination of all people, she does not defend, cultivates Limit Douluo to pour into to Grim Reaper Tower, the air/Qi of Wraith Soul in addition in Grim Reaper Tower agglomerates, this created has resisted ten Soul Engineer Corp magnificent pictures by strength of the. This is the strength!

But Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao also similarly took to all people shocking, the under attack of Ye Xishui, cannot break through the complete 12 souls to lead the defensive position after all, but, Long Xiaoyao actually relied on strength of the, all blocked for Ye Xishui all attacks of these Soul Guidance Array places. Is this humanity? Can the strength of humanity, actually resist this type to destroy a terrorist attack of city with ease?

Initially, even if Beast God Di Tian, when facing linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device, went to enter by Holy Spirit Cult. Can this Dragon Emperor Douluo strength be stronger than Di Tian?

In very far place, in a common thick patch of grass, is lying down two people. They are closing the double pupil, but both hands actually grasp is very tight.

“Yuhao, you said that this is a good opportunity? If we......”Tang Wutong said in a low voice.

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “They will not give us this opportunity.”

When Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao and Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui just arrived, they have discovered. Then Huo Yuhao brings Tang Wutong to lie down here, observes the battlefield, not only uses the eye, with Spiritual Detection, similarly.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection had already covered the entire battlefield, by the upper air angle of view bird's eye view, is observing the change in battlefield.

His only feeling, is aggressive, was too aggressive.

Worthily is Limit Douluo!

Huo Yuhao also probably judge, because condensed second Soul Nucleus ahead of time, moreover in the Yin-Yang Supplement way, oneself and Tang Wutong the battle efficiency, should also and Limit Douluo is almost the same. However, when his genuine scissors Limit Douluo level powerhouse fights, the feeling is different.

What is Limit Douluo? Reaches the human body limit, is existence of this world most peak, not only this existence is formidable, is prouder.

Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui when just came, never had planned attacks with other ways, is that direct appearance sky over valley, she does not even have to destroy these upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device, started own Grim Reaper Tower, has launched the attack to valley, this is the what kind aggressive side leaks!

How at least Huo Yuhao when calculates aims in this valley to arrange, absolutely does not have such idea. This is impossible to break through!

But Ye Xishui is relying on the formidable strength, stiffly a Soul Guidance Array scrap an corner/horn, even also nearly threatens the Ju Zi(orange) life.

Huo Yuhao even can affirm, when Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao and Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui in the same place, their complete forces can also complement one another.

Although is not Martial Soul Fusion, but they in same place, even if Beast God Di Tian is also not necessarily able how them.

To cultivating of Limit Douluo that level is, did not have the means to carry on Martial Soul Fusion again, because Martial Soul Fusion will surpass this world to Absolute that the strength requested. That is belongs to the domain of god, the domain of god, humanity is unable to touch. Also is very clear like Huo Yuhao, in the future will become with Tang Wutong Limit Douluo, their Martial Soul Fusion techniques will be are not certainly able to use will again be the same.

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-594-part-3





Volume 12

#595 - The Double Limit Fights Luo'S Great Strength


But this Dragon Emperor Douluo and Grim Reaper Douluo coordination, Dragon Emperor Douluo total defense, Grim Reaper Douluo general attack. Facing several Soul Guidance Array places, not only does not draw back, instead the opposite party of suppression cannot move. This is the strength!

Naturally, Huo Yuhao naturally could also see, although two Limit Douluo are formidable, but their offensive also stopped. Their after all humanity, although strength that formidable, but faces is almost now on world the strongest Soul Guidance Device union, in a short time can resist is incomparably astonishing, wants to defeat truly is completely is impossible.

Really, black big dragon quietly appears under the Ye Xishui body, the load bearing lives in her body, next one flickers, led her to soar, breaks the space unexpectedly, vanished in the boundless nighttime sky, command second round linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device fell on the vacancy completely.

Strikes draws back, but actually does not run away, but left splendidly, simply does not have the strength to be able to retain them.

Ju Zi(orange) stands in the commander tent front, she clearly felt a moment ago that she was away from the death to be very near and be very near.

Quick, the battle loss transmits, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp has 67 Soul Engineer, forever passed away. Summit Soul Guidance Device damages seriously, this Soul Guidance Array can only use less than 50% strengths.

Two people, merely are the surprise attacks of two people, made the Sun-Moon Empire army, this originally can able to move unhindered Continent, even was unifies Continent formidable legion to be so damaged, was in own firepower full situation, at this time what kind sorrowful! But this is the strength, humanity achieves the limit later strength.

Ju Zi(orange) suddenly felt that somewhat feared, this is her first time has such feeling, she really understands at this time, after cultivating of humanity to achieve Absolute, stands existence as in this world peak. Such two Limit Douluo, if reckless adopting sneak attack and other tactics, oneself this army can resist?

Even if Titled Douluo has the unspoken rule, cannot injure the average person, but after they own state-of-art strength destroys completely, oneself why fighting entire Continent, no wonder some people have also said that Limit Douluo is on this world the most formidable strategic weapons, truly is so! Nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely and they compare, differs was too far, is too far. In own hand, lacks this Absolute strength eventually!

Ju Zi(orange) returned to commander tent silently, issues the order, patches the Soul Guidance Array place, simultaneously momentarily admonishes. The linkage defense guard shield is at the half-open position, once there is an enemy to appear, immediately does not hesitate all -out attack of price.

Retaliated, then must look how to process is good.

Today the attack of Grim Reaper Douluo, without doubt is exploratory, then, then? What situation is the next attack? Ju Zi(orange) does not know that her first time feels, the destiny did not receive itself to control.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong have lain down in thick patch of grass, finished until the fight completely. When Darkness Sacred Dragon brings Grim Reaper Douluo to be hidden in the space quietly, they have simultaneously opened eyes, each other looks at each other one, saw to the grid in amazement.

“If we, which step can achieve?”Some Tang Wutong doubts asked to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao is smiling bitterly, said: “Can resist an attack. Must in the Goddess of Light condition. Can be able to achieve.”

Tang Wutong nod of gently, with similar that she calculates, they only then in the Goddess of Light condition, may resist an all-out attack of beforehand linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device.

But just Darkness Sacred Dragon, successively has actually resisted five attacks, first strikes strongly, the other four attacks are weak. But Huo Yuhao said that resists to attack together, refers to is also first.

Good Darkness Sacred Dragon!

Huo Yuhao said in a low voice: “Has not thought that the strength of Long Xiaoyao senior so is unexpectedly formidable, if I have not judged wrong, his cultivating is, definitely also above Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui.”Since listened to Teacher to narrate Long Xiaoyao in secret has been helping his matter actually, to this Darkness Sacred Dragon, Huo Yuhao again did not have any resentment to read.

“Such praised me, your did Teacher know?”The low and deep sound suddenly resounds.

Huo Yuhao almost subconscious grips the palm of tight Tang Wutong, they simultaneously Teleportation, the person beyond hundred meters, the powerful Soul Power fluctuation is also instantaneously ascends from them, has achieved the Absolute condition. On two faces reveals color with amazement.

Must know, they before continuously under the condition protection of Imitation Soul Ability!

The black form together is quietly from space, looks like emerges out of thin air, in addition the scarlet form is following closely together.

Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui seemed younger, was only the face whiten fearfulness, Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao aura some are not steady, but a eyes pupil did not have the least bit pale yellow, instead radiant was similar to the space stars is ordinary.

Looks at a Huo Yuhao face vigilant appearance, Long Xiaoyao cannot help laughing, “young fellow, is the progress is very big, no wonder Zongli Wu that boy suffered a loss in your hand. Has not thought that knows how we do discover your?”

Huo Yuhao shaking the head of silently, bows to salute saying: “Younger generation Huo Yuhao has seen under Dragon Huangmian, the god of death crown.”

Long Xiaoyao looks like to his saluting has not seen, selfish saying: “Reason that discovers you, is not because your Spiritual Power insufficient hiding, the polarity, your Spiritual Power looked like already the accomplishment, even if were we, did not have the means to discover your existences through Spiritual Power. Reason that can discover you, is sensation. Our sensations, are you have not been able to imagine at present. Only then truly becomes Limit Douluo, you will have to integrate the feeling of entire world, to that time, you are this world part, in this world presented anything to threaten your ability, even if did not have any discovery, can trace the source through the sensation. Therefore, we had found you.”

Huo Yuhao somewhat awkward smiling, said: “Two seniors were really too the military might were a moment ago aggressive. The younger generation gasps in admiration greatly, can only be two seniors waves the flag and shouts in the distant place, and harmless. If all right, we may first walk.”Saying, Huo Yuhao was drawing Tang Wutong to turn around to walk.

“Halts!”The Ye Xishui somewhat hoarse sound resounds suddenly, immediately, in the air just likes myriad Wraith Soul is weeping bitterly the general, huge oppression strength drops from the clouds, covers comprehensively to Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

In the Huo Yuhao eye the ray dodges, in an instant, his double pupil has simultaneously shone, the eyeground deep place, seems the endless nighttime sky, the stellar scintillation. The Absolute ice-cold aura ascends from him instantaneously, just liked the flood dragon goes to sea general, collision maliciously has approached the Ye Xishui imposing manner.

Silent thundering from the sky reverberates, the collision of imposing manner their this levels were instead more dangerous, even also wants the dangerous compared with the actual fight many.

If traded has cultivated for the low person here, facing the Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui formidable imposing manner, if unable to contend, will be ground into dust directly.

The upper body of Huo Yuhao rocked slightly, the under foot retroceded half step. Ye Xishui is also the upper body slightly rocks, but has not actually retroceded. But in she originally cloudy and cold double pupil, the same fashion has revealed the color of shock.

She has not thought that cultivating of front young people are, arrived to resist her pressure unexpectedly the region. This is the first time, besides Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao, can be few with the powerhouse who she contends with on this world, these must add on several Soul Beast King.

In recent years, only command Ye Xishui suffers a loss, Beast God Di Tian strength that initially met. But that time, her also as before whole body draws back, Huo Yuhao actually received heavy wound.

At this time, faces Huo Yuhao once more, she can feel clearly Huo Yuhao is absolutely not with the aid of the Beast God Di Tian strength, can he actually and I contends by his strength? This is not 98 levels of Titled Douluo can achieve. This time he, in the pure strength, looked like had just achieved Soul Master of Limit Douluo level!

Is this possible? He how old? Did he condense second Soul Nucleus? What Zongli Wu said is real?

Feels being startled of Ye Xishui, Dragon Emperor Douluo is sighing one lightly, lifts the hand to hold down the shoulder of Ye Xishui, “Xishui, leaves this. You will frighten these children.”

Ye Xishui coldly looked at his one eyes, “my matter your disciplinary training of juvenile delinquents. It seems like that what little black said is right, this boy comprehended the second Soul Nucleus deep meaning. Now is depending upon their Martial Soul Fusion, will cultivate to upgrade close Limit Douluo level forcefully, I must have a look but actually, can he be able to resist my Grim Reaper Tower.”

At the same time was saying, behind Ye Xishui, blood red ray Sheng, huge Blood Soul Devil Puppet reappeared greatly, that just appeared the invincible might Grim Reaper Tower to appear above valley once again, but this time, is actually Huo Yuhao that faces.

The Huo Yuhao complexion big change, initially, he with own eyes has witnessed the Grim Reaper Tower terrifying prestige energy, at this time, one-to-one facing Grim Reaper Douluo, must say in his heart not to be anxious, that is absolutely impossible.

“Xishui!”The Long Xiaoyao sound became low and deep several points.

Ye Xishui coldly visits him, “do you want to help him?”

Long Xiaoyao shook the head, said: “Your temperament! These many years, is a change do not have. By us the incomplete condition, wants to kill them at present, is very difficult. Such being the case, might as well chat with these young people, you had used twice the Grim Reaper Tower strength a moment ago successively. Uses again, the vicious tendencies will make you lose once more. You want to turn into that good-for-nothing, only knows the condition of slaughtering?”

Ye Xishui exclaimed lowly: “I said that my matter does not need you to manage, regardless of I turn into any appearance, has nothing to do with you. Long Xiaoyao, you little here spoke the wind discouraging talk. This boy has threatened existence of my Holy Spirit Cult, if were not his heavy wound Little Wu, and struck to kill my book title to consecrate, will go well by that lowly person? Do you know how many years our Holy Spirit Cult did save these strengths to use? Now, Xu Tianran that young bastard actually wants to ruin us while this opportunity, I must make him have a look, anything is the true strength.”

Long Xiaoyao somewhat helpless shaking the head, said: “Good, do not make again. If you in this, I forever left.”

At the same time was saying, he coughs suddenly, although the cough sound is not big, but stands in his Ye Xishui is actually the complexion big change, the beforehand vicious tendencies vanished immediately. Hurries gently is patting the back for him.

“Xiaoyao and Xiaoyao should not be anxious. Are you what kind of? Quickly along comfortable, are you all right?”Ye Xishui kind saying.

Long Xiaoyao sighed one lightly, complexion slightly grayish white several points, “was old, vitality after all no longer exuberant. If there is traded my peak time. That several attacks resisted a moment ago, although will consume is not small, but was also insufficient injured.”

“Were you injured?”Ye Xishui is startled.

Huo Yuhao cannot bear say: “What the Xiaoyao senior faces is Sun-Moon Empire several Soul Engineer Corp linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device, the great strength of that striking power, can resist with the manpower, in my opinion is inconceivable. Let alone Senior Long also has resisted that many times.”

The Ye Xishui look as if became gentle, mind obvious some of this woman were not quite normal.

“Good, Xiaoyao, do not worry, I listen your, my anything listens your, I do not injure these two kids and that's the end.”At the same time was saying, her behind Blood Soul Devil Puppet was received. The swift and fierce imposing manner also vanished.

Long Xiaoyao looks to Huo Yuhao, his double pupil is as before bright, not because of the decline of own aura, but affected, his vision brilliant looks steadily at Huo Yuhao to ask: “Did you practice second Soul Nucleus?”

Huo Yuhao nod of silently.

Long Xiaoyao takes a deep breath, said: “As far as I know, you should be the recent for several thousand years, only before has not attacked Limit Douluo, cultivated second Soul Nucleus Soul Master. Moreover, you so are young. On you, I saw the hope.”

Huo Yuhao actually shook the head, said: “No, the younger generation is not only one. Wutong has also succeeded.”He has not concealed, has not deceived Long Xiaoyao.

Can find them like Long Xiaoyao through the sensation, why does not know, from this Dragon Emperor Douluo, Huo Yuhao felt a special feeling, this feeling made him have the trust to him.

“Her also achievement?”Long Xiaoyao somewhat surprised looks at Tang Wutong.

“Yes! I should think that such as her achievement second Soul Nucleus, you likely didn't continue are maintaining Martial Soul Fusion? Very good, you are very good. Worthily is the Mu En disciple.”The smile of Long Xiaoyao is very genial, temperately, one type such as washes the feeling of spring breeze to the person, but the feeling of Huo Yuhao slightly somewhat is unusual, like initially saw that the Old Mu life moves toward the end the time.

In heart one startled, this Dragon Emperor Douluo also......

4000 character big chapters, asked monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. Since the middle of the month, did everybody has the second monthly ticket? Throws to our Tang Sect! 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-595





Volume 12

#596 - Blends To Practice


Huo Yuhao surprised looks at Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao.

His distinct vitality is powerful, why before can this time appearance look like Teacher to pass away the appearance? Why is this?

Some Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui also delay looks at Long Xiaoyao, “Xiaoyao, are you all right? Is your injury important?”

Long Xiaoyao shook the head, said: “This small wound is not anything. I am all right. Yuhao, you here, can cope with the Sun-Moon Empire army?”

Huo Yuhao nodded, this does not have anything to be good to conceal.

Long Xiaoyao gives a calm smile, turns head to look to Ye Xishui, “Xishui, if you must injure at present these two children, I cannot help you. I have a deficit Mu En to be too many, looks like I have a deficit you to be the same. Therefore, I cannot injure his disciple.”

Hears Mu En this name, the Ye Xishui whole body shakes, in the cloudy and cold look revealed the extremely complex mood.

Her eyes narrows the eyes, looks to Huo Yuhao, “this is the second time. The matter three, next time sees you again, takes your life inevitably. Xiaoyao, we walk.”Saying, her was jumping, escapes to go toward the distant place upper air.

Long Xiaoyao does not have first to follow Ye Xishui to depart, but is the vision temperate looks at Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

“You have created the beginning of humanity, but, was sure to remember that cannot be proud, the road that you must take also has is very long. Although you had certain self-preservation ability now, but on this world, the ruinous strength has many types, these strengths will be you in the future must face. Therefore, has the time many diligently to practice. Yuhao, after you cultivate to reach 98 levels, coming Bright Capital City to look for the old man. I have thing that your Teacher leaves behind to give you.”

At the same time was saying, Long Xiaoyao stands up, fishes out a black crystal stone to hand in the Huo Yuhao hand from the bosom.

“You, so long as is in Bright Capital City, stimulates this crystal stone with Soul Power, I will find the position that you are at to come with you to meet. I walked. Xishui this coming, but to give vent to indignation. By her status, will not continue to attack the Sun-Moon Empire army, after all, Holy Spirit Cult foundation also in Sun-Moon Empire. Will she then do. The old men do not know. You must add carefully, since she said next time when will meet must cope with you, will not take back. Moreover Sun-Moon Empire and Holy Spirit Cult, have set firm resolve to you, except that particularly Yuhao. Your existence, has made the Shrek Academy brilliance extremely powerful. Therefore, no matter, you are discrete and careful.”

“Yes, thanks the senior to care.”Huo Yuhao respectful bows to salute to Long Xiaoyao.

Long Xiaoyao beckoned with the hand, in temperate look revealed several points of filled with grief meaning suddenly. Heaved a deep sigh, the floating body, pursued in the direction that Ye Xishui departed, vanished in a flash does not see.

Looks the back that he leaves, Tang Wutong spits the tongue. Said: “These Limit Douluo, are really formidable! Compared with them, we have not the small disparity. What Senior Long reminder is, since we become Transcendent Douluo, somewhat inflated, has the time, must practice the practice. Come. Now starts.”

Huo Yuhao somewhat helpless [say / way]: “So beautiful scenery on a beautiful day, you actually must practice, a little spoiled the fun?”

Tang Wutong “pū”smiles, said: “Initially just entered Academy time, is who goes all out to train hard, isn't one second willing to waste?. Now do you want to idle? But the responsibility of our shoulder are important, later I shoulder half for you, what surplus is wants you. Comes quickly!”

“Come!”A Huo Yuhao tiger throws, threw toward Tang Wutong.

The Purple gold colored light glow dodges suddenly, gigantic Dragon Head has gone against him. Huo Yuhao called out pitifully. Falls to depart beyond more than ten meters.

“Do you and you do?”Lies down on the ground, pain of being sprawled is appealing to Tang Wutong.

On the Tang Wutong Li's elegant face reveals a cunning meaning certainly, “father's seal has not relieved probably cleanly. Therefore......”

After a half minute, in the shrubbery, two people sit cross-legged to sit, four palms relative, enters the practice condition.

This is they in becoming Transcendent Douluo, after Tang Wutong achievement Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus, their first practice.

Hao Dong Power completed, enabling them to carry on to practice through the Martial Soul Fusion way. Back then, relied on this method, can make them surpass Tongji University.

Their Soul Power exchange and exchanges the feeling in the fight in the practice is completely different, Huo Yuhao whirlpool Soul Power, pours into from the right hand to the left hand of Tang Wutong, but Tang Wutong whirlpool Soul Power pours into the Huo Yuhao right hand from the left hand.

After their each other whirlpool Soul Power enter the opposite party within the body, their bodies simultaneously shake, on them all sent out the intense ray.

gold sun blue moon and gold sun purple moon almost also appears.

Place above gold sun in two head go against approaches slowly, then unexpectedly fused in one, the formidable mind air/Qi shot up to the sky, the light of that powerful gold sun broke the nighttime sky together, looked like has haunched day radiant [gold/metal] Zhu, blue moon and purple moon also similarly were the ray greatly put, the body of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong started becomes insightful.

Even can see, in their insightful bodies, four Soul Nucleus is revolving rapidly. Whirlpool Soul Power unceasing circulation and circulation that has.

blue moon and purple moon drift about to their body center slowly, gold sun keep aloof.

Two rounds bright moonlight fused unexpectedly in one, the moonlight changed into the royal purple, the ray sparkle.

In air, heaven and earth elemental energy just like all rivers run into sea generally crazy comes toward their body to rush forth, after flooding into within the body, immediately by these whirlpool Soul Power smashing, filtration and fusion.

A sidereal revolution gets down, Huo Yuhao and whirlpool Soul Power of Tang Wutong within the body completely changed the appearance. That is brand-new Soul Power. Soul Power itself presents for strange color, in that whirlpool, simultaneously is glittering blue and purple and golden three lusters, three colors glitter and fuse again alternately, produced the strange imaginary color results. But these whirlpool Soul Power after fusion, compared with it formerly, enough formidable several fold.

Each whirlpool has the huge attraction, is attracting joining of heaven and earth elemental energy.

“Travels?”Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong have almost opened simultaneously eyes, the next quarter, two manpower shake hand, is hidden in the nighttime sky rapidly.

Does not run good! Here is so near from the Sun-Moon Empire army, who can think, but cultivates, actually will make such big move. What doesn't travel also waits for? At least must look for a cave, can make a fresh start to practice.

Hao Dong Power is uniting as before, but Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong felt what is somewhat strange, they are fusing Soul Power restored the beforehand appearance, whirlpool Soul Power is very as before strong, is the effect after amplification, but actually vanishes to disappear in the imaginary color that in the practice presents. That suction to air also along with it disappearance.

“What's the matter?”Tang Wutong asked to Huo Yuhao. Their regard is interlinked, the Huo Yuhao nature said that she is asking anything.

“I do not know.”When Huo Yuhao somewhat helpless saying, “our Martial Soul Fusion practice that has Soul Power that produces, gone beyond the limit of this world?”

Tang Wutong shook the head, said: “Cannot. If before, perhaps I also think. After may experience Darkness Sacred Dragon and strength of Dragon Emperor Douluo senior, a moment ago. Can judge our strength is insufficient, Soul Power of that fusion, most also just entered the Limit Douluo boundary, must say that this strength can receive the suppression of world rule, I do not believe.”

Huo Yuhao said: “I not too clear am any situation, the explanation that can think of is only, we are completely peaceful, Martial Soul Fusion will be the perfect degree, presents that imaginary color whirlpool Soul Power. But that imaginary color whirlpool Soul Power cannot be used to fight by us. Only way that but is used to restore. We try, even if cannot fight, can promote the reply speed to be also good!”

Two people fly distant, looked for a mountain of forest cover to worm one's way into, the Tang Wutong aggressive side leaked rumbled directly a cave, they wormed one's way into.

The new discovery makes them very excited, just faced the pressure that two Limit Douluo have created, has formed certain shadow in their hearts eventually. Appeared regarding the hope of strength once again, but this time, is especially intense.

Cave cave entrance was covered with some branches by Huo Yuhao, in order to avoid inside ray leak, opens cutting with Dark Gold Terror Claw again directly, the free time of a while, a small cave mansion took shape.

Huo Yuhao shakes the hand of Tang Wutong to stand in the cavern, “can we try calmly, have a look to stand like this enter that condition.”

“Um.”Tang Wutong nodded.

Four palm readings grasp, within the body Soul Power circulation, calm revolution Soul Power.

gold sun blue moon and gold sun purple moon really once again appeared. Is that imaginary color whirlpool.

What with previous time is different, fast of this fusion . Moreover, after the fusion, is centered on the body of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, one dazzles the color halo to appear around their bodies, ascends to revolve regarding them. They can feel that own Soul Power restores at the astonishing speed, when restores to the peak, started to promote slowly.

This type slow naturally relative, to Transcendent Douluo this level, wanted to promote the strength through the practice, is extremely difficult. But they can actually seem like slow upward climbing up, this means that their strengths can definitely practice in this state . Moreover the practice speed must go far beyond general Transcendent Douluo.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-596-part-1





Volume 12

#596 - Blends In The Practice


Four items of relative, they saw the stimulated color in opposite party look, they know, had found road of the promotion. Although the imaginary color whirlpool cannot use in the battlefield directly, but, regarding fights continually has the enormous advantage, so long as has the time of recuperation slightly, they can resume the beforehand consumption at the maximum speed. Displays Absolute the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus superiority.

They entered practice condition quickly, immerses fuses in four Soul Nucleus mutually, each other blends, each other repels again, collides in the brand-new Soul Power pleasant sensation. Their cultivating are, at an exceptional pace is promoting.

Achievement Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, made them have the potential of high-speed promotion, in addition afterward Tang Wutong also achievement with the help of Huo Yuhao Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, this is unprecedented.

Moreover, in Tang Wutong mind Soul Nucleus, most Spiritual Power came from the support of Huo Yuhao, afterward gradually was absorbed and transformed by her, became own Spiritual Power. May this, Spiritual Power compatible of her Spiritual Power to Huo Yuhao be able be imagined. Then makes their Martial Soul Fusion not have any issue again, finally has produced Hao Dong Power once more.

Naturally, present Hao Dong Power has compared was formidable before were too many and are too many.

Do not look before, they received the threat of Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, in fact, Huo Yuhao has not feared Ye Xishui, what he fears, Long Xiaoyao reckless help Ye Xishui.

Since contacting Long Xiaoyao, he is very curious to this Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo. The strength of this senior is without a doubt, with Teacher is the powerhouse of same time, even can be said as present age the first powerhouse of humanity is not overrated.

But, why is he actually willing is Ye Xishui uses? In the past since he can share the honor with Teacher, that means that he will not be bad in the moral character. The feeling of contacting is also so.

Let alone Teacher also said that he is will be helping in secret his. But sees him and Ye Xishui each time in the same place, Huo Yuhao can discover that the help of this Dragon Emperor Douluo to Grim Reaper Douluo is absolutely selfless, does not become a mere formality absolutely.

Why is this?. Had he gotten down the ban by Ye Xishui? Is impossible! Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao in the past and Dragon God Douluo Mu En became famous, Ye Xishui was also far from becomes formidable. Does she want to control Long Xiaoyao to be easier said than done? If Limit Douluo can be banned by race, that was too laughable.

But if, has not gotten down the ban. Why does he want to listen to Ye Xishui? This question paces back and forth in the Huo Yuhao heart throughout.

Therefore, he does not dare to bet. Grim Reaper Douluo, he and Tang Wutong collaborates extremely, will not suffer a loss, hits can travel. However, if adds on Darkness Sacred Dragon again, that is different. Opportunity that they likely continually run does not have.

Therefore, Huo Yuhao specially has been careful before, even does not have to take immediately own Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife, to at crucial moments break through to use.

Luckily. Long Xiaoyao has not helped a tyrant do evil, Ye Xishui even looked that has not attacked them in the Long Xiaoyao face, departed. This also lets Huo Yuhao big relaxing, finished finally.

However, again appears with this suppression regarding the hope of strength. A beforehand faint trace was complacently nothing left. To resist with these Limit Douluo. Only has itself becomes Limit Douluo is truly good. The urging of Long Xiaoyao without doubt is precious words.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong this practice enters the condition to be express.

Their Soul Power now is about 95 levels, just entered the Transcendent Douluo level. But this is not anything, radically is not the issue. At their present practice speeds. Huo Yuhao has confidence completely in three months on promotion first-level Soul Power. Most two years, they can promote to 98 levels of levels. This is the great benefit that Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus brings.

Long Xiaoyao makes us reach 98 levels to cultivate for the time looks for him, does not know that what matter, Teacher will have what thing to make him give us?

In the Huo Yuhao heart is actually very curious, because beforehand Mu En, when helps him break through Dual Soul Nucleus. Has not mentioned this matter, therefore in his heart many are a little disturbed.

If makes Old Xuan know that Dragon Emperor Douluo, he certainly immediately tells then Huo Yuhao, what Dragon Emperor Douluo said is the lie. The reason is very simple, because. Old Mu died truly, the soul dissipated, if there is any thing to leave Huo Yuhao, at least before the point of death will tell him.

What a pity, Huo Yuhao does not know all these. In his heart is also thinking, after break through, must seek for Dragon Emperor Douluo to find out by secret inquiry an outcome.

Time one minute one second passed, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong Soul Power influencing subtly has been promoting. The practice does not affect the sensation of Huo Yuhao to outside, the formidable Spiritual Power formation Spiritual Power field naturally, outside distant sending out, will connect Sun-Moon Empire and that valley road which must be taken covers.

Sun-Moon Empire army, commander tent.

Two days.

Of that day sneak attacks suddenly from Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui now, passed for two days, that Grim Reaper Douluo has not appeared again. But is appears merely one time, she has left behind the thick haze to all officers hearts.

Too formidable, by the strengths of two people, has resisted the attack of entire Sun-Moon Empire army complete linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device unexpectedly, even nearly breaks through linkage Defensive Soul Guidance Device, this is the what kind strength! Two Limit Douluo put together, unexpectedly is such terror, has exceeded the imagination of all people completely.

The officers quantity of dying in battle did not calculate too, the pressure that but, formed was huge. Under this pressure, all high level Soul Engineer already entire two days not smiling face.

Now they really understand that Holy Spirit Cult formidable to any degree, by the high-end strength, they as before is the empire!

The attacked news also escorted to Bright Capital City, but is actually similar to likes a stone dropped into the sea, through subpoenaing Soul Guidance Device passes on without any news. As if, Xu Tianran gave up them resembling.

“Can give us a lesson?”Thinking aloud that Ju Zi(orange) muttered.

Two days of time, has made her think through a lot sufficiently.

If that Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, or dies continuous, she certainly will not use that way. Even if attaches importance to face, only wants from the frontal attack. She only needs every day while defense weak time Grim Reaper's Light, the army will continue to suffer loss, moreover continually will have the panic. To pursue them nearly not to be also impossible.

But she has not actually done, this means that she has not given up Holy Spirit Cult in the base industry of empire. Temporarily will not have a bigger movement to be right. Does not know that then this Holy Spirit Cult must make anything.

In the Ju Zi(orange) heart, somewhat is throughout restless, she is even willing to face wild Ye Xishui, is not willing to face unknown.

In any event, must ruin Holy Spirit Cult, otherwise, the empire can not be peaceful in the future.

Remembers the strength that beforehand that two Limit Douluo show, in the Ju Zi(orange) heart the raising intermittent chill in the air. In the future, this country is the son, how under the nest to allow other people to snore to rest? Has the threats of these two Limit Douluo to exist, the empire rule will be greatly affected. The son, you could rest assured that regardless of being difficult, the mothers certainly will eradicate these barriers for you.

Thinks that own son, in the Ju Zi(orange) heart fighting intent on flaming burns, beforehand timid completely vanishes does not see. Regarding mother, so long as to protect own child, even if facing the formidable enemy, she will not dread.

“Report”a rapid shout resounds.

Ju Zi(orange) has stabilized the mind, “said.”

“The Empire Subsidiary troops' bitter experience attack outside valley, are annihilated. When we support arrives, stays behind, only then a place corpse, all commodities also completely vanish.”

“What?”Ju Zi(orange) has a big shock, in the look reveals color with amazement, “what has to discover specifically?”

That scout gained ground, after hesitating one next, said: “Has the Undead Creature trail, our upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device indistinct discovery, some are similar to the Bone Dragon general biology flies toward the distant place, but the local area has also left behind the massive Undead Creature aura. Thousand Soul Engineer that this time comes to reenforce, all......”

That is 1000 Soul Engineer! Even if reserve duty Soul Engineer, that also trains after the empire. Has the support of these 1000 Soul Engineer, the loss of her front can supplement prepared. But such silently vanished, how Ju Zi(orange) can not get angry.

However, while angry, in her heart some surprise, because in her opinion, the attack of Ye Xishui had also finished, the deterrent was also enough, why can also attack? Undead Creature, the Holy Spirit Cult possibility is biggest. Only if......

In the Ju Zi(orange) heart moves slightly, she has remembered that mysterious space suddenly.

Was Yuhao, you comes?

Thinks that Huo Yuhao may very much in the, the heart of Ju Zi(orange) somewhat is scalding hot, formerly anger also vanished into thin air.

If Yuhao does, then, all explanation was clear. However, who does, this trough sewage, must sprinkle on Holy Spirit Cult. Was worrying that could not find the opportunity to cope with them. Their this delivered.

“Passes on my military order, calls all assistant regimental commanders Soul Engineer Corp above military order commander tent discussing official business.”

“Yes!”

Ju Zi(orange) eyes narrows the eyes, in the heart mused, since presented such turning point, that do not blame me being cruel and merciless. If this opportunity does not use well, do not match is War-God Empress. Holy Spirit Cult, ahem, you wait to face the Xu Tianran anger.

At the same time is thinking, after she turns back her graceful case rapidly, writes with vigor.

The free time of a while, various Soul Engineer Corp assistant regimental commanders on gathered in commander tent, coming together also has nine levels of Soul Engineer to consecrate.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-596-part-2





Volume 12

#596 - Blends Under The Practice


Saw that Ju Zi(orange) writes the thing there, they stand below peacefully, anybody has not clamored.

Ju Zi(orange) takes the position of marshal to take punishment for somebody else as everybody, Grim Reaper Douluo comes, must attack her, all these, made these military officers be full of the respect to this War-God Empress. Isn't such commander what military officer willing to follow? Even if her young, is the female, is, nearly in being ever-victorious commander, takes on, absolutely is the best object who follows.

Waited for about ten minutes, the letter paper in Ju Zi(orange) hand finished, when she gained ground once more, the double pupil is red, seems suppressing, does not make own tears flow.

“Marshal, what happened? You how?”Nine levels of Soul Engineer somewhat surprised asking.

Other Soul Engineer military officers are also perplexed, Ju Zi(orange) of this condition they are also first time saw that does not understand completely what happened, their this firm did War-God Empress, when become such frail? Actually is what matter, making her actually go so far as in this way?

Ju Zi(orange) has not spoken, but has broken by biting own index finger, according to above letter paper that in oneself that a bloodstain makes an effort had just finished.

Sees this, the numerous military officers had a big shock. Letter written in blood? Marshal this is must do.

Ju Zi(orange) stands up slowly, from leading case walked, her body in slightly is shivering, flowing that in eye pupil, tears not been able to control under.

“General and consecration. I am unfair to everybody.”Tears brook however under. Ju Zi(orange) pain has closed eyes.

Before that start to talk nine levels of Soul Engineer anxious [say / way]: “Marshal, actually what happened? Anything, we will stand certainly you. You told us quickly.”

Ju Zi(orange) takes a deep breath, said with the incomparably sorrowful sound: “Just obtained the news, the empire sends to reenforce our Soul Engineer legion, has been annihilated, not far away outside valley, the empire goes to valley here road which must be taken. Over a thousand Soul Engineer die, the soul not saves. All resources were despoiled.”The soul not saves these four characters, is she adds.

“What?”The screams resound through entire commander tent, suddenly, numerous Soul Engineer military officers unconscious staring in a big way eye. Shock in look slowly toward extremely angry direction transformation.

Closing eyes of Ju Zi(orange) pain, “passes through our upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device to confirm that once saw has Bone Dragon to appear and disappear, moreover quantity incessantly. Simultaneously also many Undead Creature aura preserve.”

Bone Dragon? Was these two characters was enough.

Soon before, outside Shrek City, Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master Zongli Wu, isn't riding Bone Dragon and Huo Yuhao fights one? Finally Bone Dragon also perished in the Huo Yuhao hand.

This Bone Dragon appeared, means any self-evident.

“Bastard!”A Commander Soul Engineer Corp roars, nearly crumb double fist. His Soul Engineer Corp loses is not small, is waiting for the supplement of this soldier.

Suddenly. The public sentiment is roused to action.

Ju Zi(orange) bitter and astringent [say / way]: “This matter, I whole story complete writing down, have submitted immediately to your majesty. Invited your majesty emperor's decision. This way, the morale of troops will certainly greatly be damaged, our front officers. Kills the enemy for the country, may threaten actually came from the back. How this makes us be able for empire to open up territory to develop the earth, performs the non- world meritorious service? Perhaps my this marshal must come to the end, this time, I have turned in resignation to your majesty. In the future, but also asked general to continue to assist your majesty. Shares sorrow for your majesty.”

At the same time was saying, Ju Zi(orange) lifts the hand, has picked the hard helmet of top of the head, before turning around to arrive at commander tent, places above the graceful case.

“Marshal, you cannot give up us!”Assistant regimental commander sad Hu. Immediately on one knee knees down.

“Yes! Marshal, we need your leadership, only then you can lead us to unify Continent.”Had one, has second, atmosphere that in addition at this time shares a common hatred. Suddenly, in the entire big account, the generals have knelt place, these Soul Engineer consecrated also to bend the noble waist, saluted to Ju Zi(orange).

The appearance that looks at the people, Ju Zi(orange) cancels on the face the tears, in the double pupil, the look becomes the woods is gradually cold.

“Thanks general's support, everybody please get up.”

One hear of Ju Zi(orange) sound as if restored normally, these generals stood up, vision all centralized on her.

In the eye pupil of Ju Zi(orange) ice-cold is revealing the intense murderous intention, “Holy Spirit Cult, dares to kill my officers, this Commander and you are absolutely irreconcilable. General, we want to perform the non- world meritorious service, must want the clear royal entourage first, writes off from the empire this mean and shameless and evil vicious Holy Spirit Cult thoroughly. Only has so, can return me ringing the cloudless day. This letter, which general is willing to pass on the letter written in blood with me together to your majesty?”

“I want!”

“I want......”

Generals vitality is always exuberant, on that day came under the attack of Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, originally in many person hearts to Holy Spirit Cult the anger and discontented, frightened was substituted.

But today one hear, over a thousand Soul Engineer had been killed by Holy Spirit Cult, suddenly, in the heart the depressing anger and blood energy erupted immediately.

Blood fingerprint in the breaking by biting hand fingerprint kept in the letter, simultaneously stays behind, their genuine signature. A letter written in blood was truly completes.

Ju Zi(orange) sinking sound track: “Passes on my Shuai Ling, army opens, goes forward to the empire direction, we coordinate your majesty, exterminates Holy Spirit Cult thoroughly. Only then Holy Spirit Cult destroys completely, we have to continue for the empire to open up territory to develop the earth ability.”

“Yes! Venerable the marshal military order sincerely.”

When these military officers and Ju Zi(orange) press the hemorrhaging hand imprint together that moment, their destinies tied up with this War-God Empress in one.

The Sun-Moon Empire army starts to draw in various types of Soul Guidance Array places, from the sky is admonished by Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp one after another, the army sets out, directly soars the Sun-Moon Empire direction to go.

The Ju Zi(orange) correspondence immediately has also delivered, in the meantime, the news sends out, not to Xu Tianran, but gives to remain in Sun-Moon Empire Bright Capital City Worship Hall. They are military true backing.

Looks the Sun-Moon Empire army is winding windingly in the Sun-Moon Empire direction marches forward, stands Huo Yuhao in distant place upper air understands that Ju Zi(orange) should be very good to use this matter.

Now almost can see her. Wipes the light smile, along with it reappearing on the Huo Yuhao face. This good opportunity, he always not to let off.

Huo Yuhao brings Tang Wutong, the personal appearance in airborne to be hidden quietly, Spiritual Detection starts, in the front explores the way, they were rapid approached in the direction of Sun-Moon Empire army.

In the sky, various upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device are almost following army forward running, at least two Soul Engineer Corp flights circle in the sky, are responsible for investigating and guard.

Only then Beast King Level above Soul Engineer Corp is the whole staff has the flying ability, therefore, is responsible for going on patrol naturally is also they.

These Soul Engineer Corp naturally cannot stump Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong., Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection had found the Ju Zi(orange) imperial carriage by far.

Ju Zi(orange) goes out to battle, although is the series armed forces marshal, but similarly is also the empire empress, therefore, rides the mount to be different from the common marshal military officer, she has oneself imperial carriage to ride. Is entraining the imperial carriage, is 16 big tall horses. Be responsible for guarding the imperial carriage, is Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp.

Huo Yuhao is bringing Tang Wutong dexterous falling above the imperial carriage. Tang Wutong actually quietly loosened his hand, “you go, I. Avoid she, because had hostility to affect your plan to me.”

Huo Yuhao he he smiles, said: “You are really the good miss of being with good intention!”

Tang Wutong somewhat cunning visits him, said: “If I am with good intention, should make you also marry her is right?”

“Does not need and not use. Most difficult to enjoy the beautiful woman graciousness, I had your one to be enough. I go.”The range that Imitation Soul Ability can cover is big enough, therefore Huo Yuhao was not worried that the Tang Wutong personal appearance will expose.

Stands up from failure to enter, Huo Yuhao has drilled into the imperial carriage quietly.

The imperial carriage is very big, is actually a very comfortable spacious carriage.

The imperial carriage, has ten square meters fully, the household furniture and bed, many.

At this time, only then traded Ju Zi(orange) of casual attire to sit, was pondering anything silently.

The gentle mind fluctuation ripples, blocks the entire imperial carriage in completely, any sound is unable to pass on.

“Um?”As if felt that anything was not right, Ju Zi(orange) subconscious gaining ground, looked that is empty the space that to the front.

“Was you comes?”Ju Zi(orange) asked in a low voice.

“How you know that is I?”The Huo Yuhao somewhat surprised sound resounds.

That two Titled Douluo discover him, he is not strange, but, why Ju Zi(orange) can also discover him, this disagreement common sense. The Ju Zi(orange) strength is impossible to discover his Imitation Soul Ability hideaway effect!

Ju Zi(orange) shows a faint smile, said: “Intuition, I know that you will come. Therefore I make the maidservants draw back, in car(riage) you. You really came.”

The Huo Yuhao personal appearance appears quietly, sits down on Ju Zi(orange) front backless stool.

“Some days disappear, you fortunately?”Huo Yuhao was asking somewhat does not have the words of nutrition. Although he shields internal sound, but actually all shared to give Tang Wutong through Spiritual Sharing the situation in imperial carriage. For safe, another is to also fear Tang Wutong is jealous oversensitively. Naturally, what is most important is the latter.

Ju Zi(orange) snort|hum, “good? How possibly good getting up. I am not good. You said that I should hate you, is this thank you?”

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, said: “Naturally should thanks me. You are Xu Tianran, actually wants to remove Holy Spirit Cult, not? Had still not found the excuse, this time, I give you excuse, shouldn't you thank me?”

--------------------------------------------------

Three finished asks the monthly ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-596-part-3





Volume 12

#597 - Cooperates


Ju Zi(orange) ill-humored [say / way]: “You destroy my Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, kills my Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp. This time kills my more than thousand Soul Engineer, did I also thank you? You are my empire big enmity are right.”

Huo Yuhao sighed, “I do not want to kill people. But, I do not kill people, on these Soul Engineer, does not know that must contaminate many Star Lou Empire and blood of Dou Ling Empire common people. Said that these are to us meaningless. My this time, is to ask you, can the words that your previous time spoke, keep a promise?”

Ju Zi(orange) has gawked, “which words?”

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth twitched, “kills Xu Tianran.”

Ju Zi(orange) is then suddenly enlighted, shows a faint smile, said: “How kept a promise? How doesn't calculate? I must say that does not keep a promise, do you want to kill me? Feared that you do not give up. Also only then you can sneak in my imperial carriage silently, Limit Douluo cannot achieve.”

Huo Yuhao somewhat helpless shaking the head, on this imperial carriage also has Tang Wutong, this saying, but does not fall fell in the Tang Wutong ear.

Huo Yuhao sighed, said: “Although I should not encourage you to murder the husband, but, Xu Tianran this person, the first fierce and ambitious, his existence, has the huge threat regarding Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries. Even if you have reneged on a promise, perhaps I also will start to him. Moreover, certainly will not show mercy because of you.”

Ju Zi(orange) shows a faint smile, said: “Why do I want to renege on a promise? I happily also without enough time. He and I originally only then the name of husband and wife, does not have the reality of husband and wife. My children are not he one's own.”

Huo Yuhao stayed, subconscious said in a low voice: “Cautious word you!”

The smiling face on Ju Zi(orange) face is very delightful, “what this has, I do not believe that you have not sealed up the sound in this imperial carriage, nobody can hear the words that I spoke radically, what fears?”

Huo Yuhao has patted the forehead, a face surprise looks at Ju Zi(orange). Initially, Ju Zi(orange) and he has said that complex relations between she and Xu Tianran. However, this was first time said that directly the child was not Xu Tianran one's own, that was a crown prince!

The Huo Yuhao complexion sinks the [say / way] that concentrates: “Was he looked for individual to you, then......”

Ju Zi(orange) said: “Yes. Was he looked for individual, then also made me kill that person personally. What a pity, he is wise, plans first, has not actually thought that that person who I find truly, is actually not he assigns. Therefore, he must die, if he does not die, when my child carries on Martial Soul Awakening in six years old. Certainly will expose. At that time, we ended, for my child, I must kill him, now you should understand. Why I said that must kill his words. Regarding a mother, anybody threatens her child, she will turn into the lunatic, will spell by the loathsome appearance. Therefore, you are not necessary to suspect that greatly my sincerity, Xu Tianran, I must kill. In this regard. We have the common language, not?”

Huo Yuhao surprised looks at Ju Zi(orange), looks like first time knew that she resembles, that is Xu Yunhan, actually whose child? Does the Ju Zi(orange) child, live with whom? Suddenly. He is confused.

Looks at his surprised appearance, Ju Zi(orange) said indifferently: “You do not need to suspect anything, this is I biggest secret, now says, is at heart more comfortable. Good. Said, how do you plan to help me massacre Xu Tianran?”

Huo Yuhao takes a deep breath, has stabilized own mind, regardless of Ju Zi(orange) and who had a child, theoretically, gathers him not to have any relations, he should not many inquiries, know many, sometimes is not the good deed.

“This must think you. I need you to provide to my Xu Tianran detailed daily schedule, the deploying troops for defense situation in entire Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace. If I have not guessed wrong, by your Sun-Moon Empire now internal situation. Defense of Xu Tianran in imperial palace, arranges certainly in view of the Limit Douluo level, thus ensures own security, in this case, in addition in Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace arrangement, once we initiate the surprise attack, even if has succeeded, wanting the whole body to draw back will also be very difficult. Therefore, I need the detailed information, only then so, can make us kill him truly.”

When the previous time, goes to Bright Capital City, Huo Yuhao with own eyes looks that Innate Body Douluo Du Busi died there, struck by Du Busi at risk of life, cannot injure Xu Tianran unexpectedly, Xu Tianran protection capability could be imagined.

Huo Yuhao does not think that present were more formidable than initial Du Busi, therefore, he needs to obtain more information from Ju Zi(orange) here.

Ju Zi(orange) nodded, stern [say / way]: “You said right, side Xu Tianran, the defensive power is greatly strengthened. Even something I do not know. I all will tell you who I know. But wants to approach him, I suggested that you should better continuously with me, only then follows side me, has truely approaches his opportunity.”

Huo Yuhao knit the brows: “With you? Your side is Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp feminine Soul Engineer, I how with you?”

Ju Zi(orange) said with a smile: “Can this also be occupied by you rarely? Don't you meet the stealth? By your present strength, you who who can discover?”

Huo Yuhao sinking sound track: “Anything is not absolute. Several days ago, you are attacked, Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao has discovered me and Wutong. However we have not begun, they left. By the intuition, the Limit Douluo level powerhouse, has to discover us possibly. Moreover, in your Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace, should have very formidable Soul Engineer to exist, these stand in this world peak Soul Engineer, not necessarily cannot discover us. Therefore, follows side you, will have very tremendous influence to your safety, you may, if wants.”

Ju Zi(orange) knit the brows, “this actually issue. However, so long as you not with I too nearly should be all right. You hide your aura always to achieve. Although my side is Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp feminine Soul Engineer, but did you put on make-up not to be OK suddenly? You said that Tang Wutong with you in same place, she is all right?”

Huo Yuhao said: “Naturally is all right, Wutong is very good.”

The Ju Zi(orange) eyeground deep place flashes through cold brightness, “that was really is a pity.”

“You think very much I do die?”Tang Wutong outside already some hears, the Ju Zi(orange) intonation and expression, constantly no longer teased Huo Yuhao.

light shadow appears, the Tang Wutong form also reappeared, sits side Huo Yuhao, pulls his arm, seems like taking an oath own sovereignty.

Ju Zi(orange) complexion changed changed, desolate [say / way]: “You refuse stubbornly dead with me have not related, we now are only the cooperation.”

Tang Wutong gives a calm smile, said: “Um, said well, our cooperation. Then, asked you to be self-possessed. Said that you married manner woman, even if your husband cannot have the reality of husband and wife, you should also completely observe the traditional woman ethics, this is a foundation moral bottom line of woman.”

“You!”Ju Zi(orange) usually little gets angry, but by a words stimulation of Tang Wutong, cancould help manifesting suddenly.

“Was good, you little said two.”The Huo Yuhao sinking sound said: “Ju Zi(orange), you said that the imperial palace situation looks. As for the stealth at your Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp internal matter, we discussed again.”

“Um.”Ju Zi(orange) nodded, she does not want to say again that she feared really one cannot bear, a more important secret will say. If is really such, a leeway of swivel did not have.

Looks at appearance between Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, she knows that perhaps she does not have any opportunity. How even if says that secret? Only when can own child will sit the imperial throne in the future be taken the endless risk. Although Huo Yuhao is tenderhearted, but, in the face of the major issue of principle, definitely has the person of resolution. If makes him know......, The consequence is then dreadful.

Thinks of here, Ju Zi(orange) has to suppress the matter that oneself heart of hearts most wants to handle forcefully, starts the situation in Sun-Moon Empire Bright Capital City imperial palace simple was narrating to them.

“......, The situation in imperial palace basically was this, therefore, theoretically, Xu Tianran was almost impossible to be killed. Your opportunities are not very big. But in any event, we must attempt, in this regard, I will find the person and you coordinate.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Now does your commander army want to return to homeland directly? Doesn't the war continue?”

Ju Zi(orange) said: “I in your foundation about one step has been completed have framed by planting stolen goods on to shift blame to Holy Spirit Cult, I will not return to the empire the army direct belt. If so, Xu Tianran will certainly have suspected to me. After the army arrives at the border, I will unload the military authority, brings some Soul Engineer to go to the imperial capital by the filled with grief potential, apologized to Xu Tianran. Your opportunities, at this time.”

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “Truly, the empire army not suitable belt goes back, such did was too obvious, Xu Tianran also can definitely be vigilant. What do you have to plan?”

Ju Zi(orange) said: “The disposition of Xu Tianran that person I understood very much that this time we frame by planting stolen goods on to Holy Spirit Cult, more than 1000 Soul Engineer, that may be the Sun-Moon Empire future mainstay, such died, the Xu Tianran disposition, will again certainly not bear patiently, after he even likely will wait for me to go back, conforms with oneself strength, will initiate then to Holy Spirit Cult encircles fully. Thoroughly eliminates them. At this time, both sides collided to be unavoidable. Also can be the Bright Capital City most chaotic time, your opportunities also at this time.”

Tang Wutong curled the lip, “is really a sinister scheme.”

Ju Zi(orange) snort|hum, “you, if can find out better means that you come!”

Tang Wutong gives a calm smile, said: “I do not need to try to find any solution, the woman, had no need too intelligently. The women were too intelligent, that own lover can also manifest anything. I am silly, but Yuhao was intelligently enough.”

----------------------------------------------

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-597-part-1





Volume 12

#597 - Cooperation


“Enough ruthless!”Darkly said one including the Huo Yuhao heart, the woman and woman are rivals for sexual favor, is really incomparable powerful!

Really, listened to Tang Wutong these words, the Ju Zi(orange) aura somewhat becomes is not obviously uniform, visits her wickedly.

“Was good, after detailed plan we arrived in Bright Capital City, carries on again. Since you must arrange us to Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp, that as soon as possible. We in the, I and you continue to carry on the relation with Spiritual Detection and Sharing. One day later, I will look for you again.”

“Um.”Ju Zi(orange) clever nod, turning hostile unique skill is also reach a high degree of proficiency of utilization.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong vanish in imperial carriage quietly, Ju Zi(orange) sitting angrily in the imperial carriage, long time returns to normal.

Closes the double pupil, is pondering silently.

This time matter, for her, only permits successful and cannot be defeated. What Ju Zi(orange) is very clear to be most defective is anything, most defective is the side does not have the top powerhouse.

The arrival of this Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, has made up for this point without doubt, can defeat the Zongli Wu strength by Huo Yuhao, he really most has the opportunity to strike to kill Xu Tianran. Especially Huo Yuhao is such excelling in the concealment personal appearance. This point, even if Limit Douluo does not compare.

Therefore, this time must strike in any event successfully, misses this time, wants to search the opportunity again, was the countless sufferings and hardships.

Thinks of here, Ju Zi(orange) started own detail planning, she has a series of plans to complete, with meticulous care. Many details, need to improve.

Left the imperial carriage, rose into the upper air that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong were quietly, then has been far away from the Sun-Moon Empire army carefully.

“Snort! Really is not a good thing!”Tang Wutong angry saying.

Looks at her face angry appearance, Huo Yuhao cannot bear persuade: “Do not be angry. She does not support easily, a woman, must bear these many pressures.”

“Do you sympathize with her very much?”Suddenly Tang Wutong smiles looks to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao was silent immediately, enraged Tang Wutong at this time, will not have any good fruit to eat.

The smiling face on Tang Wutong face gradually turns disappointed, jumps into the Huo Yuhao bosom quietly, tight is hugging his waist, “sorry, I know that I should not play the small temper, but, I a little cannot bear. Were other women good, like your being also short? Do not think that I do not know, Ye Guyi and Nan Qiuqiu, they like you actually. Why does not know, I never thought that they pose the threat to me, has Ju Zi(orange) not to be different. I always thought that she to you, somewhat illegibile relations. I to the words of your absolute trust, I really think that her child and you are concerned.”

Huo Yuhao loses says with a smile: “Do not talk nonsense. How possible. I may that and that......”

“That what?”A Tang Wutong face Tianzhen free of evil intention appearance!

Huo Yuhao ill-humored [say / way]: “Does not say. In any case same as you.”

“To be how same? You are the man, I is a woman, are we possibly how same?”On the Tang Wutong elegant face full is the smiling face.

“Do you want to know really?”Huo Yuhao lowered the head, visits her earnestly.

Tang Wutong is intelligent, has not waited for Huo Yuhao to take an action, immediately cherishes to be separated from him, turns around runs, “does not want, I do not want to know!”

“Does not want to know also late.”Huo Yuhao cries out strangely, fast pursued toward Tang Wutong.

They such from the sky pursue to create a disturbance, beforehand did not vanish quickly gradually.

Sun-Moon Empire, Bright Capital City, imperial palace.

“Bang!”A Xu Tianran palm of the hand maliciously in the letter paper hand pats on the table, surrounding in wait on all knees down immediately, bodies are shivering, lest this Thunder's Rage arrives on oneself.

Recently for serveral days, had to be many to wait on under the Xu Tianran anger.

“Bastard! Does Holy Spirit Cult plan to revolt really?”Xu Tianran aura obvious some are not steady.

Soon before, after the Ju Zi(orange) apologizing book he is also the thinking long time, has made the response.

Relations between Holy Spirit Cult and military are not harmonious, this was long before something, but must say that Holy Spirit Cult will sneak attack the military, and robs the military, this is really makes Xu Tianran some not want to believe. At least currently speaking, this does not serve the Holy Spirit Cult benefit.

But, the fact puts at present, two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp lose seriously, but from all sorts of signs, how likely is Holy Spirit Cult Evil Soul Master to do. Then caused the public sentiment to be roused to action.

But Holy Spirit Cult Lord Zongli Wu, in fights after the Huo Yuhao gambling, vanished the trail, does not know where, did not have including the opportunity of explanation. The army has mutinied then, many Holy Spirit Cult underlying bed Soul Master died during that mutiny, only then Evil Soul Master of Titled Douluo above rank ran away the life.

These contradictory will intensify, Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui found Xu Tianran personally.

Xu Tianran expressed that this matter will certainly investigate rigorously, looks up to come to light. But, does this matter look up? Although he is a king, but the entire country is impossible is he decides completely.

In person who this dying, the most important people, that are representing Emperor Dragon Commander Soul Engineer Corp of Imperial Family ancestor and relative benefit.

This person dies, but also lost Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp many years of saving high level installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, moreover is nearly all, how many wealth is this?

The Imperial Family ancestor and relative is the pillar of country, the merit expensive leader. The benefits of these people were really too huge. Even if were the Xu Tianran authoritative date is heavy, does not dare to disregard their demands!

Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp loses seriously, making the Imperial Family ancestors and relatives nearly go crazy, Xu Tianran also bore the huge pressure. On but War-God Empress of apologizing book actually became the object who these Imperial Family ancestors and relatives protect. They heard the front special details through various types of channels more or less. Is pleased to Ju Zi(orange) reckless protection numerous Soul Engineer. Must know that at that time flushed mutiny, strikes to kill the Holy Spirit Cult audiences to be most, is Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer!

Two sides pressures centralized on Xu Tianran, his decision can be imagined. The Holy Spirit Cult use value became more and more low, in this case, he impossible to shake the national basis, say nothing, Ju Zi(orange) was the person who he most trusted, Ju Zi(orange) performed the distinguished service for the empire, Sky Soul Empire integrated in the national domain thoroughly. If rear area does not have to impede, soon, Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire are also same. Regarding this point, Xu Tianran is not worried.

Had the Sky Soul Empire resources, the Sun-Moon Empire development became smoother, but Ju Zi(orange) itself has the intense and deep-seated hatred to Star Lou Empire, must attack Star Lou Empire, she put behind Star Lou Empire, was not because hated pale, but wanted, when were most formidable copes with Star Lou Empire again.

Therefore, Xu Tianran gets down has smoothed over differences the imperial edict finally, the force condemned, said when other Ju Zi(orange) returned to the empire, determines guilt to her again, may in fact, not have any significance in fact. This point, Xu Tianran is some does not respect the Holy Spirit Cult honor obviously.

But this does not have the matter of means that the Holy Spirit Cult that side, if respects are too many, Soul Engineer of nation what to do? Imperial Family ancestor and relative what to do? Merit expensive what to do?

Holy Spirit Cult Evil Soul Master, the book is the object who all people repel. Now at this time, should remove the power core them gradually the good opportunity.

Then Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui walked, Xu Tianran had also considered may present the motion of Holy Spirit Cult retaliation. But for these years, with the support of Sun-Moon Empire, quick of Holy Spirit Cult also development. On some Martial Soul has the slight defect and variation possible Soul Master, was taken back by them, according to method training of Evil Soul Master. But Holy Spirit Cult headquarters in Sun-Moon Empire. Even if Holy Spirit Cult has discontented again, will not care about own base industry.

But, now looks like, oneself evil aura understanding these Evil Soul Master are not enough. More than 1000 Soul Engineer! Died completely certainly . Moreover, the commodity that carries was also despoiled. Besides Holy Spirit Cult these people, but also who can achieve? Bone Dragon? Good Bone Dragon. Zongli Wu, you do not come back to report after carrying out orders, actually kills people by my army. Very good, is really very good!

On the Xu Tianran face is revealing gloomy sneering, he again is the fierce and ambitious, in the heart again heartless, must consider the feeling of officers.

The officers in the front kill the enemy, dies in the enemy hand not many, may die in own person of hand is actually more and more, sees things in others'shoes, if he is a general, this matter is unable to tolerate.

In the hand in the letter written in blood, each blood fingerprint presses very clear, that name, has almost the impression in his mind. This is must be forced what degree so to do! The Ju Zi(orange) fingerprint in the bottommost, thinks, the pressure that since she bore for serveral days is also very big.

If it is not dealt with properly this matter, truly will shake the basis of country. Then, can only want the brave soldier to break the wrist.

Thinks of here, on the Xu Tianran face cold brightness became stronger several points. The murderous intention also appears.

“Report. War-God Empress front news.”

“Assumes.”

This chapter was not the correspondence, the news that but through subpoenaing Soul Guidance Device spread, was recorded by the special transmitting orders officer, delivered to Xu Tianran here.

Read this letter, the Xu Tianran complexion became cloudier. Ju Zi(orange) very explicit told him, now front officers despondency, moreover gnashed one's teeth in hatred to Holy Spirit Cult, must unable to repress, wanted your majesty to give them a view to be good. In order to avoid the sergeant mutinies, now she has to comply with their requests, the commander army to the Sun-Moon Empire original border consideration. The plan is stationed in the army near Bright Struggle Mountain Range, one is to deter Star Lou Empire, another, she also as soon as possible leads the Soul Engineer military officer representatives to return to Bright Capital City, awaits the order of Xu Tianran. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-597-part-2





Volume 12

#597 - Cooperation


Although this pass on message has not written special is clear, but Xu Tianran can also the clear feeling the air/Qi of grief and indignation contains. Very obviously, the front army, is some are unstable. This is also the Xu Tianran most undesired situation, this is the basis of country!

“Shadow.”

“In.”Appearance that a shadow is quietly in Xu Tianran behind, even if under very bright ray, he seems as before is very illusory, cannot see clearly the look.

The person who “lets the shadow strengthens collection related Holy Spirit Cult all news, the secret conduct, must should not be discovered. Let imperial Commander Soul Engineer Corp see me.”

“Yes, your majesty.”The shadow retrocedes quietly, then vanishes to disappear in the gloomy corner.

In the Xu Tianran hand the ray dodged, records the paper of pass on message to change into the powder powder to vanish instantaneously does not see. In this time heart had the resolution, angrily instead became desalinated.

Holy Spirit Cult, good Holy Spirit Cult. Since your this dogs became more and more are not obedient, then, do not blame me being cruel and merciless.

Lets in the Xu Tianran heart only slightly somewhat hesitant was that two Limit Douluo, but, regarding Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao, he also has the detailed investigation. Other did not say, only these two ages, are the major problems.

With the powerhouses of their same time, already died cleanly, they in humanity, are considered as absolutely on are the longevities. Has surpassed 200 years old. Has the possibility life to come to the end anytime, Limit Douluo is not existence that does not die, only if can touch that world threshold.

God Realm, does not know whether exists. But from Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao situation, they was very perhaps difficult to touch. Ju Zi(orange) Ju Zi(orange), if you do not have these problems, so long as waits again some years, when that two old codger dying of all. Begins to Holy Spirit Cult again, a issue did not have.

Shrek City.

“Well, Sanshi. How did you come back?”When Beibei sees Xu Sanshi, surprised said.

“Shouldn't you in Spirit Dou City? Our Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp sent. Will you come back? Moreover did you also come back?”

Beibei surprised looks at front partners.

Xu Sanshi smiles, said: “That whirlpool who wants to stay there for a long time! I quickly was insane. Beibei, you listened to me to say to you understand.”

At that moment, how Xu Sanshi initially and Huo Yuhao and the others entered Spirit Dou City, how afterward to help Spirit Dou City strive stably, became the prince regent, as well as afterward all sorts impeded all narrated.

At the same time listens to his narration, the Beibei complexion also changes is ugly. The Dou Ling Empire internal issue, causes the leeway that Xu Sanshi simply has not displayed, unexpectedly returned the civil strife.

When continuously Xu Sanshi said that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong appear, when they were most critical have saved them, on the Beibei face the look then relaxed several points.

“You also really suffice the waste, five Titled Douluo, you cannot withstand. Sanshi, comes back also well, you turn head to close up to me. Did not attack Titled Douluo not to come out.”Beibei ill-humored saying.

Xu Sanshi snort|hum, said: “You speak irresponsibly and sarcastically, where impact Titled Douluo to be so simple! Well., You are not......”

Beibei smiles, the somewhat favorite [say / way]: “Person meets celebration mind to be happy, why does not know, since Little Ya has cured, my cultivating sped up, it can be said that ten thousand li in a day for the winding speed. Little Ya also broke through, couple days ago just went to the Spirit Transferring Pagoda that side and Blue Silver Emperor fusion, now. Our Tang Sect was also many two Titled Douluo. Therefore, you must refuel. Right. Little Junior Brother and Wutong, since also appears, said. Was Wutong completely good?”

A Xu Sanshi face despondent looks at Beibei, since continuously, their cultivating for similar, now Beibei unexpectedly already achievement Titled Douluo, to he also really not small stimulation.

“Was good, Wutong was not only good, but also she and Little Junior Brother also together broke through. Listened to Little Junior Brother saying that now they are the Transcendent Douluo level powerhouses, you were Titled Douluo, what had to be good to show off? Nannan, we walk, we also break through. This time, does not break through to Titled Douluo I do not come out.”

“You wait / etc..”Beibei holds on Xu Sanshi, asks that side the Spirit Dou City further information again carefully. Determined after Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp arrives, Xue Lingxun helps in that side, this lets off Xu Sanshi. But has not made Xu Sanshi practice, but draws him to directly soar Shrek Academy to go.

The situation that Dou Ling Empire has, must make that side Shrek Academy know is good.

The Sun-Moon Empire army withdraws, Shrek City on relaxed were many, Star Luo and Dou Ling two countries elite also withdraws. Shrek City fully returned to normal. Naturally, this is in the surface. No one knows when the Sun-Moon Empire army will appear again, does not know that their goal meetings are, the Continent aspect so, nobody can true relaxed getting up.

......

“Pū!”A chuckle resounds. Ju Zi(orange) covers up own cherry small mouth, suppresses not to be smiled to make noise by oneself again.

Before her, is standing two people, is lust red Humanoid Soul Guidance Device covers the whole body, only then the hard helmet raises, reveals the true self.

Side is valiant, certainly Li's moving Tang Wutong. The pink-blue color long hair and that flame Humanoid Soul Guidance Device complement each other fresh splendor, increases several points of gorgeous.

But another side was interesting, Huo Yuhao in another Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, he is actually not easy to allow to put on make-up, is appearance originally. But, this belongs to Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp Humanoid Soul Guidance Device completely to defer to the feminine stature to build!

That although Ju Zi(orange) looks to Huo Yuhao, belonged to stature specially big and tall feminine Soul Engineer. But the stature and man of this woman have very big difference eventually.

For example chest armor that sticks out, the flame color, the Huo Yuhao wear, such must strangely strange.

Let alone Ju Zi(orange) will smile to make noise, even if side with Tang Wutong that she does not cope with very much, cannot bear smiles to make noise lowly.

“What smiles to laugh at you, don't I put on good? I used Imitation Soul Ability to transform directly.”Huo Yuhao ill-humored saying, must take off oneself this Soul Guidance Device.

“No! You did not say that you use the Imitation Soul Ability change personal appearance, or is the concealment words, the super powerhouse can discover? Moreover, I do not know that Bright Capital City currently has any new Surveying Soul Guidance Device to appear, therefore, you put on. We do not laugh at you and that's the end, puts on the hard helmet, who knows that inside person is you!”

“But, this is very irritable!”Huo Yuhao angry saying.

“Ha Ha!”Tang Wutong could not bear again, has smiled. Can not be irritable, the man puts on feminine Humanoid Soul Guidance Device. Even if bringing the hard helmet, they also know what inside is Huo Yuhao!

Huo Yuhao stared Tang Wutong one ill-humoredly, reveals one to turn head to tidy up your appearance again.

Fears him to renege on a promise, Ju Zi(orange) hurries to go forward several steps, helped him put on the hard helmet personally, has blocked from the original appearance. Let alone, after covering the look, cannot see the Huo Yuhao appearance, was good to select finally.

Tang Wutong said with a smile: “Good valiant female man. This, good.”At the same time was saying, she also put on the hard helmet.

This Humanoid Soul Guidance Device does not have anything to affect to Tang Wutong, Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp Humanoid Soul Guidance Device is fire attribute amplification, and provides various fire attribute Soul Guidance Device. Although Tang Wutong is not fire attribute Soul Power, but her light attribute can also utilize certain fire attribute characteristics, therefore can also use. It is not big to own amplification, but is also insufficient to weaken.

Huo Yuhao was quite miserable, this Humanoid Soul Guidance Device is not good-fitting, although can also control through Spiritual Power, but his Soul Power is Absolute Ice, in this is flooding in fire element Soul Guidance Device, not to feel how comfortable, only when can be cuts Spirit Eyes Martial Soul, good, but the flexibility of body do not think.

“Um, this. You later follow side me, is part in my own soldier. My own soldier absolutely can trust. So long as you did not speak, nobody will question you absolutely.”Ju Zi(orange) earnest said to Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong. Naturally, the happy expression of her eyeground deep place, cannot conceal as before.

Huo Yuhao no longer spoke simply.

Ju Zi(orange) arrives in front of Huo Yuhao, said with a smile lowly: “You said that my this is seeks an impossibility! We clearly are the enemies, actually must collaborate.”

The approaching speed of Sun-Moon Empire army is quick, coordinates various Soul Guidance Device, the approaching speed of ordinary soldier far ultra belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries. The combat tank that and some actuates with the milk bottle, can load bearing many soldiers.

After these days observation, Huo Yuhao has further understood at present superiority of Sun-Moon Empire in Soul Guidance Technology aspect. Such that just like he expects, now Sun-Moon Empire already more and more utilized Soul Guidance Technology on the average person. Although the milk bottle construction cost is expensive, but also needs Soul Master to supplement unceasingly Soul Power can use. But since had this start, in the future the average person becomes Soul Master no longer vainly hoped.

This is the Sun-Moon Empire true superiority, no wonder Ju Zi(orange) dares saying that kills Xu Tianran, in her ten years do not attack Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire. She really has such assurance! Ten years, the science and technology is impossible to overtake. The raw material cannot follow.

Mining and refinement of rare metal, are the Soul Guidance Device manufacture, Sun-Moon Empire are in the lead too many are too many. Although Shrek Academy is pursuing diligently, but relies on a Academy strength to pursue a country, that is at all the impossible matter!

---

Welcome everybody to join our prestige - platform, has there our, the station, can see our Tang Sect relevant information, serializes, novel to serialize including the cartoon exclusive, third child's picture, but can also leave a message at the forum.

Joins the platform method to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is our families. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-597-part-3





Volume 12

#598 - Sad Orange


The armies were getting more and more near from the Sun-Moon Empire border, but the entire Sun-Moon Empire armies appear spiritless, military officers is not happy, this thing will also infect, the following person mood can good blame.

The armies go on an expedition outside, meritorious military service illustrious, the interior actually had problems, will trade is everybody will have the intense resentment to read. Soul Engineer so, the military officers are also so. The excellent time of performing good deeds, actually experiences this matter, their anger can be imagined, wish one could to put down entire Holy Spirit Cult thoroughly are good.

Ju Zi(orange) appears very calm, sits on the imperial carriage, occasionally raises the curtain screen to have a look outward, look always nonchalant falling on Huo Yuhao of female attire, although her surface seems very tranquil, but Huo Yuhao clearly can catch the happy expression of her eyeground deep place.

This crime Huo Yuhao first withstanding, not only Ju Zi(orange) is smiling! Tang Wutong will smile frequently also to make noise, had been responsible for the discipline Soul Engineer warning several times.

Regarding this, Huo Yuhao very depressed, but Ju Zi(orange) actually very happy.

Huo Yuhao recently looked many troublesome to her, she also is very sometimes angry, but when he follows after her side, this anger gradually dissolved. She even a little hopes that this road has walked, cannot come to the end to be good, is most minimum, this Huo Yuhao side her, has been able to see his feeling every day, unexpectedly such good. Why before, doesn't have this feeling in Sun-Moon Royal Soul Engineering Academy?

Speed that the armies march forward naturally impossible compared with Soul Engineer Corp, but is this, the Sun-Moon Empire rapid march also be much quicker than other countries. Five days later, border between Sun-Moon Empire and original Sky Soul Empire was already in sight.

Ju Zi(orange) has chosen a Sky Soul Empire border strategic place, making the army be stationed, simultaneously issues Shuai Ling, assigns the surroundings city to carry on the commodity supplies to the army, ordering lets the army same place recuperation, the wait command. She brings Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp, was hitting remnantly Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp and Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp as well as Imperial Family Consecrate Hall nine levels of Soul Engineer starts off together, directly soars Sun-Moon Empire capital Bright Capital City to go.

Since this time goes back to lay cards on the table with Holy Spirit Cult, the strength in hand cannot be short. Three Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, although hit remnantly two, but three Soul Engineer Corp added also two strengths, in addition also knew how things stand position nine levels of Soul Engineer, even if encountered the Limit Douluo level Ye Xishui, they also fully had the ability of self-preservation.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong fly in Ju Zi(orange) side not far away, they are personal guard. In not good-fitting Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, Huo Yuhao will always think somewhat worried, although he also knows what this are more is came from in own psychological process, may so, he as before very not be uncomfortable. Has released own Absolute Ice aura to resist or the attribute fluctuation that in Humanoid Soul Guidance Device is transmitting.

“Xiaoyu, you come.”Flies to beckon to Huo Yuhao in airborne Ju Zi(orange). Xiaoyu, is she gives the name that Huo Yuhao gives, or is the code number. All Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer know that recently the marshal liked this fellow who very much called Xiaoyu.

The Soul Engineer Corp internal management is very strict, particularly marshal personal guard, only then Ju Zi(orange) can assign these personal guard, therefore, is not the personal guard internal person, does not know that this Xiaoyu origin, let alone they daily put on Humanoid Soul Guidance Device.

Side flying Ju Zi(orange) of Huo Yuhao heavy line, passes on the tone channel: “Does you?”

Ju Zi(orange) raises surface armor, the short distance shows a charming smile to Huo Yuhao, “I was hungry, later prepares food to me eats, heard that your family inherited grilled fish technology is very good.”

“I cannot!”Saying of Huo Yuhao coldly .

This is not first Ju Zi(orange) gives him to have the difficult problem, since becoming her personal guard, various requests of Ju Zi(orange) emerge one after another incessantly.

Huo Yuhao knows certainly that this is intimate with oneself, may be this, in his heart is also vigilant and repel.

“Roasts to her eats.”The Tang Wutong sound resounds in the Huo Yuhao ear.

Huo Yuhao has gawked, has turned around, looks to the Tang Wutong direction.

Tang Wutong maintains very tranquil posture is flying forward . Moreover, from her sound, as if likely was not angry. When did she become such natural? Is this Tang Wutong that I know? In Huo Yuhao heart some doubts.

“All right, I did not mind, but, you must tell her, I must eat. I also the grilled fish that is good to eat you to make.”Tang Wutong has shown the cloven hoof finally.

This girl, was gluttonous. However, thinks that to the Tang Wutong grilled fish, the Huo Yuhao mood becomes is immediately different. So long as is she wants, this is anything, certainly well satisfies her.

Ju Zi(orange) ill-humored [say / way]: “Such slightly requests you unable to be completed, but also counted on that what great accomplishment achieves? How turns head also to make me coordinate you?”This threat is not the first time, moreover basically effect.

Naturally, when requests to go too far, Huo Yuhao very simple rejection. Therefore, Ju Zi(orange) has not been having the too high hope.

But what made her surprised was, after Huo Yuhao slightly hesitant one next, nodded unexpectedly, said: “Good. But I and Wutong must eat.”He adds on himself specially, to prevent the Ju Zi(orange) rejection.

“Good.”Ju Zi(orange) almost complied without hesitation, from the happy expression in her eyes, this time she, even is wild with joy.

To eat a grilled fish, as for? Is this War-God Empress that able to move unhindered the Continent war invincible, sweeps away all obstacles?

After half double-hour, the place of recuperation turned into by a river, grasps fish matter regarding Soul Engineer is not the matter.

The quick, many fresh fish appear in front of Ju Zi(orange). These military officers good old Soul Engineer to avoid suspicion for the men and women, recuperation time in far place. Naturally cannot some people run over to dine.

Puts on Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, for does not expose status, Huo Yuhao can only reveal to operate the hand. The free time of a while, earlier preparatory work has completed, fresh fish, by the cleanness that he processes.

Grilled fish matter, Huo Yuhao was already ripe flows extremely, does the piredog to be good, the free time of a while, the fragrance of grilled fish passed on.

Ju Zi(orange) has eaten first without a doubt, being greedy that eats is full of praise. Looks at Huo Yuhao time, a big eye like her white and tender flesh, bright and intelligent.

The second article has given Tang Wutong, Tang Wutong sits in the one side, is eats fragrantly.

The capacity for food of woman when facing the good food, absolutely compared with the man. Quick, grilled fish entered the bellies of two misses.

Does not know that because of battle efficiency reason, in the capacity for food, Ju Zi(orange) eventually is also more inferior than Tang Wutong several points. Tang Wutong takes up a grilled fish time, she has eaten really motionless.

Huo Yuhao has also eaten, but to their this cultivating is, in fact ate the thing supplementary energy is not that important, even if were several days several nights does not eat, will not have the too tremendous influence.

By a big tree, Ju Zi(orange) cast aside one to sit in own side not far away Tang Wutong slantingly, said: “Makes him give me the grilled fish to eat, don't you envy?”

Tang Wutong shook the head, eats is very as before happy.

Huo Yuhao walks, does not know where from puts out a clean handkerchief, has scratched the grease stains of corners of the mouth place for her. Tang Wutong looks up to him, on the elegant face reveals a sweet smile.

Although Ju Zi(orange) cannot see at this time Huo Yuhao after surface armor, but can also imagine leaves his gentleness of this time look, greatly for been jealous [say / way]: “Aren't you jealous unexpectedly? That is you do not know to treasure. If he is my man, I will certainly not allow him to give beside me the woman to prepare food!”

Tang Wutong shakes the head, the smile looks at Ju Zi(orange), said: “This is only the minor matter, is not anything . Moreover, he forever with giving others who I do does is different.”

“Different? How to be different?”The Ju Zi(orange) intelligent person, Huo Yuhao in the grilled fish, was very a moment ago careful, the step of each grilled fish she has looked with uses the material to be exactly the same, therefore Tang Wutong said that the grilled fish is different, she does not believe.

Tang Wutong hands in front of grilled fish in the hand Ju Zi(orange), “looked, in you like in his share so much, tastes one to you.”

At the same time was saying, she received the grilled fish, tears down a scrap fish to hand over again from above, a very stingy appearance.

Result that grilled fish of Ju Zi(orange) doubts, the reason told her, was the empire empress, how can eat others remaining things? But the curiosity and emotion of innermost feelings, let squeeze in oneself mouth that grilled fish that she disregarded.

Chewed, Ju Zi(orange) has tarried, her dull sitting there, in the eye the pupil lost the focal distance instantaneously.

That is what kind of flavor! Fresh and tender, juiciness, contains the extremely special one energy to exist. Flavor as if before oneself eats is the same, but, because were many which marvelous feeling, made the grilled fish entire different.

Tang Wutong continues to eat own grilled fish, on the elegant face has several points to blush, in the look completely satisfies.

Ju Zi(orange) was in a daze the long time, has swallowed the grilled fish in mouth, in that flash, the unprecedented feeling of satisfaction floods the whole body instantaneously, as if the whole person put into during a warm bosom, satisfaction that could not say, relaxed, a warmed any complete gable general feeling.

“Actually have you and you in giving her grilled fish put what?”Ju Zi(orange) fierce turning head, looks to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao light [say / way]: “You have been looking, I give you process of grilled fish to be the same.”

“But the flavor is different, why missed that many? I also want that type of grilled fish.”Ju Zi(orange) wicked saying.

Last month! Requested earnestly everybody monthly ticket and recommendation ticket vigorously to support. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-598-part-1





Volume 12

#598 - Sad Orange


Huo Yuhao shakes the head, said: “Sorry, I cannot achieve.”

“Why can't achieve? I want!”Ju Zi(orange) almost roars is saying these words, the Fire Phoenix guards that causes not far away stand up, vision brilliant looks to here.

Ju Zi(orange) beckoned with the hand, hints them to be all right. Her breath is somewhat rapid, has a look at Huo Yuhao, has a look at Tang Wutong again.

“Why and why can't you achieve?”Her sound became somewhat spiritless.

Huo Yuhao sighed one lightly, shook the head, has not actually continued.

Tang Wutong stands up, the last grilled fish will eat, then approaches Ju Zi(orange) saying: “Because the mood is different. Do not feel embarrassed him, he is not desirably. When gives you grilled fish, with giving my grilled fish time, his mood has the difference. Therefore, fish that the similar method, roasts, the flavor is different. Therefore, I did not mind that his grilled fish eats to you. Because, only if I want, otherwise, you are forever impossible eats that type to be called * the flavor.”

She arrives in front of Huo Yuhao, gently has depended on him, “quite delicious. I love you.”

The simple six characters, make the Huo Yuhao whole body shake, Tang Wutong this is first time works as others to say me to love your three characters to him. This to Huo Yuhao, absolutely is a big pleasant surprise. Although he knows that this also has her to be air/Qi the Ju Zi(orange) ingredient. But when she said these three characters, between the lines, was sincere, that cannot install.

“I also love you.”Huo Yuhao grasps her subconsciously, at this time, his heart was dissolved.

Ju Zi(orange) tells fortunes by physiognomy two who supports, tears uncontrolled flowing, she understands finally why Tang Wutong agree let Huo Yuhao to her the grilled fish, was not the good intention, not for gluttonous, more importantly, for must declare the sovereignty to him!

She is not not jealous, but has been jealous. Her is using the most drastic method to attack itself. clear(ly) knows one more should be strong on exceed at this time, flowing that outward but, the tears actually as before could not bear.

How even if won the world to be able, I have lost eventually to her . Moreover, so long as his heart on her, I forever is impossible to win.

The tears made the present line of sight somewhat blurred, Ju Zi(orange) has turned around, the wiping off tears quietly, took own surface armor, arriving nearby silently, this time, she walked was a little far, anything had not said again.

“Am I somewhat cruel?”Tang Wutong walks arm in arm in the Huo Yuhao bosom said in a low voice.

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “Makes her lose heart to her is the good deed. Between I and her, already did not have any other possibilities. I do not hope that she has any idea again. What you do is right. Ju Zi(orange) is also a poor man, in her heart remains to have a charitable disposition, at least when attacks a city to seize territory, does not have excessive slaughtering, otherwise, I worry about the former friendship, already began to her.”

“Former friendship?”Tang Wutong gains ground, in the look revealed immediately has been vigilant the color.

Huo Yuhao lifts the cheek, lowered the head, kisses above her red lip.

Has arrived at the riverside Ju Zi(orange) just to turn around to see this, her bright double pupil gradually flood red, suddenly, her fierce flushed toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, in aura, were many crazy of hysteria.

Huo Yuhao cultivates is, has very strong sensation regarding all of outside, when Ju Zi(orange) is away from he also has certain distance, he immediately feels, lets loose Tang Wutong, turns head to look to Ju Zi(orange), a gentle Soul Power barrier the Ju Zi(orange) isolation outside.

Ju Zi(orange) both eyes red looks at Huo Yuhao, was almost roaring in a low voice the [say / way]: “Huo Yuhao, do you know! I......”

She just spoke of here, suddenly, on the Tang Wutong forehead, the golden trident trace does not have the omen appears suddenly, the golden light electricity shoots together, fell on Ju Zi(orange).

Ju Zi(orange) whole body big change, retroceded subconsciously two steps, as if had discovered any entire world most fearful matter, in the eye pupil full is color with amazement, to the words of mouth, swallowing back of stiffly.

“Wutong, do you do?”Huo Yuhao somewhat surprised looks at Tang Wutong, by him the understanding Tang Wutong, Tang Wutong is jealous, will not injure Ju Zi(orange) to be right.

“Ah? I do not know what's the matter.”Tang Wutong somewhat is similarly startled, goes forward several steps, supports Ju Zi(orange), “you are all right, Ju Zi(orange), why I do not know can like this.”

Huo Yuhao to Tang Wutong is the absolute trust, let alone from her intonation and mood fluctuation, has not lain. But, that golden light what's the matter?

At this time, was Ju Zi(orange) returned to the contrary normal, the red in eye also vanished, shook the head to say to Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong that “I was all right, sorry, my somewhat was a moment ago excited, I was all right, making me rest a while.”Saying, she arrived around big tree to be implicated, all have as if replied normally.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong look at each other one, they somewhat are inexplicable, therefore feeling. But the intimate atmosphere was also destroyed, can only be sits one side, rests.

Sits there, seems like tranquil Ju Zi(orange), at this time in the heart has actually raised the dreadful wave, in a moment ago, when that golden light shines on her together, she only thought own whole body seemed suppressed under a mountain. Incomparably dignified, frightened her soul unable the sound of move half minute to speak a few words to her sufficiently.

Those words, look like trough ice water irrigate suddenly in her head resemble, making her erupt to sober from the mood of hysteria instantaneously, at this moment, in heart except for frightened, again did not have other things.

......

“If you do not want with your child relationship of form and spirit to completely extinguish, to say you together, forever burying in moral nature.”

......

Without implication of army, Soul Engineer Corp full speed marches forward is extremely quick, several Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer all has the flying ability, is relying on the support of milk bottle, each launching can fly of double-hour to need the recuperation continually.

Has only used more than for day points time, area vast Bright Capital City, appeared in the field of vision range.

Ju Zi(orange) flies by Humanoid Soul Guidance Device in the upper air, looks out into the distance Bright Capital City, the surging emotions fluctuate. Her very clear this return means anything to oneself, this motion does not permit the failure, once is defeated, perhaps is beyond redemption. Naturally, she also has confidence to herself leaves behind some rear guards, the failure will not lose is too big. However, if failed, she must first lose, likely is the life of beloved person.

Even if, she somewhat despaired to him now, knows one again impossible and he in the same place, is, in the moral nature deep place, that lets her mind reposing the emotion, is unable to dismiss from mind eventually! Therefore, her very has mixed feelings at this time, but she also understands that starting from this moment, oneself must restrain the mind, going whole-heartedly facing all that is going to have.

The depth of effort inhaled airborne somewhat chilly air, the Ju Zi(orange) mood has stabilized completely, for the child, also for him, this time, only permitted successfully, cannot be defeated.

Unifies Continent, regarding Ju Zi(orange) is not an urgent matter, what is more important controls own destiny. The series armed forces are so long, she knows certainly that superiority of Sun-Moon Empire in Soul Guidance Technology aspect is huge, but these superiority, are not ten years can pursue. Therefore, she is not anxious.

But her son actually could not wait, the son was day by day big, to the age, must carry on the Martial Soul Awakening ceremony, she does not know what own son can inherit was what kind of Martial Soul, but in her heart feared really very much.

Therefore, she was unable to wait again, this time is the best opportunity.

Huo Yuhao is choked up with emotions at this time similarly, he has recorded unclear this is several time comes Bright Capital City, the feeling that every time comes is different.

From initial shock, to the destruction and control feeling in the present heart having, this is changes with the strong and weak change of own ability.

On this world, most can depend upon, only then own strength. After own strength becomes is formidable, confidence naturally will appear, let alone, in the lover who his side can also trust completely. After two Limit Douluo attack, they for serveral days assiduously have been practicing, cultivates is not general Transcendent Douluo can compare for the winding speed definitely, Huo Yuhao even became them in the heart 98 levels of Transcendent Douluo time approaches the premise.

Bright Capital City, Xu Tianran and Holy Spirit Cult, we came. This time, must from internal thorough change situation. Only has so, can give Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries to win the time.

As for the future war, ten years later, Huo Yuhao believes that oneself and Tang Wutong have to attack the Limit Douluo possibility, moreover is unprecedented three Soul Nucleus Limit Douluo. Although the Soul Guidance Device might is powerful, but the battle efficiency of individual is as before terrorist, perhaps to that time, they can control some changes of Continent.

Huo Yuhao also never thinks that ten years can make Soul Guidance Technology pursue, but, he actually believes own strength, after individual strength as formidable as certain extent, not necessarily cannot change outcome of war.

Light ray twinkle, on the Huo Yuhao face reveals a light god light, Xu Tianran, this time I fight one fight with you.

Three Soul Engineer legion when slowly drop from the Bright Capital City also 50 li (0.5km), falls after the ground, has not gone to Bright Capital City immediately, but reorganizes same place.

Sky over Bright Capital City is prohibited absolutely, only if there is written order of king. But their armies of these returns, must accept to reorganize and inspect. Only the military officer can enter a city directly, the army actually must remain. This is the custom, anybody is indestructible.

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-598-part-2





Volume 12

#598 - Sad Orange


The news that they come back first spread to Bright Capital City, quick, Soul Engineer Corp flew from Bright Capital City unexpectedly, they accepted the order obviously, can fly.

This was not Huo Yuhao first time sees Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, but, even if were the second time, shock in his heart has not reduced.

The complete 100 Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp members, on everyone put on sincere Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, the formidable aura is partly visible. Compared with them, Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp looks like the chickling that just hatched is ordinary.

Soul Douluo, everyone is the aura of eight rings Soul Douluo rank, or said accurately that is the aura of eight levels of Soul Engineer levels.

To this degree of cultivating is, but can also become the organization system, this was too fearful. This is in the Xu Tianran hand is controlling the ultimate strength, the defensive system that in addition Bright Capital City constantly strengthens, this city, was called the Continent first city definitely is not the lies.

Huo Yuhao standing silently behind is waiting for in Ju Zi(orange).

100 Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer drop from the clouds, falls after the ground, wears Humanoid Soul Guidance Device Soul Engineer to arrive in front of Ju Zi(orange) in big strides. Bows to salute.

“Opens reports War-God Empress, your majesty has the aim, assigns you to lead personally fellow assistant regimental commander Soul Engineer Corp the above rank high-ranking military officer to enter the city, your majesty receives the bride personally your return before the imperial palace. Three Soul Engineer Corp are stationed to wait to order same place.”

Similarly stands in Ju Zi(orange) behind audiences Soul Engineer Corp high-ranking military officers, on the face reveals not the color of indignation. They quell Sky Soul Empire to be remaining, puts down from Continent Sky Soul Empire thoroughly, integrates in its territory Sun-Moon Empire completely, it may be said that merit in state. But now dispatches one team of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer to come to greet unexpectedly, even it can be said that sends under escort. How this makes them endure.

Feels oneself behind sweeping to move, Ju Zi(orange) lifts the hand, making the people peaceful, then on one knee knees down, sinking sound track: “Feudal official obeys the aim.”

Then, Ju Zi(orange) takes off oneself Humanoid Soul Guidance Device hard helmet, gives Huo Yuhao, is leading a military officer on big strides walks in the Bright Capital City direction.

That Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp military officer hurries saying: “War-God Empress, your majesty specially permits, you can lead to fly into the city heavily.”

Ju Zi(orange) actually shook the head, said: “Does not use. Goes out the armed forces of combat to return, how can fly into the city, that is to your majesty disrespecting, we walk into and that's the end. Troubles, enters a city along with me together, has an audience with your majesty.”

Then, stand forth that her does not return.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong as own soldier, at this time naturally cannot with, Xu Tianran say, only makes their military officers enter a city, even if has not stated clearly, the meaning cannot lead the soldier. They also can only wait for here.

In the Ju Zi(orange) heart is actually very clear, Xu Tianran does not neglect itself, but for security concern. Three Soul Engineer Corp return to Bright Capital City, naturally cannot enter a city directly. If then, had the Holy Spirit Cult powerhouse to sneak attack at this time, Ju Zi(orange) will have the danger. Dispatches 100 Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer, to protect in order to her security.

Naturally, Ju Zi(orange) naturally cannot say guess in own heart, in these here generals heart is angrier is good, to the following plan big advantageous.

Gazes after Ju Zi(orange) to depart, Tang Wutong passes on the tone channel to Huo Yuhao: “We what to do?”

Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, said: “Here waits, Ju Zi(orange) will arrange. Just returned to Bright Capital City time, I felt that her aura fully returned to normal, Ju Zi(orange) under this condition, at least in the military and intelligent aspect, I also grumbled such as. Let her arrange and that's the end.”

Tang Wutong snort|hum, said: “You trust him actually very much.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Not forever enemy. This time she needs us to help her, even if regardless of me with her beforehand friendship, so long as before this duty has not been accomplished, she will not have any disadvantage to us. Let alone, my Spiritual Detection has covered this most wide scope, if she has any bad idea, we also sufficiently immediately responded.”

“Um.”Tang Wutong had not said words that again anything is jealous.

The military officer who keeps ordered, making everybody rest same place.

Soul Engineer Corp is stationed same place, in the normal condition must construct the Soul Guidance Array place, to prepare for that momentarily accepts a challenge. But to Bright Capital City here, naturally has not needed, that will be regarded the certificate of rebellion.

Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace.

Xu Tianran leads the civil and military hundred officers, stands is waiting for outside the imperial palace front door silently.

According to the time, does Ju Zi(orange) this little while should enter a city to be right, how also disappear? Looks at the sky, in the Xu Tianran heart somewhat is puzzled.

In this time, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer was flying from the distant place, falls on not far away, then the half step walked to Xu Tianran, on one knee kneels down.

“Opens reports your majesty, War-God Empress leads Emperor Dragon, Evil Tyrant and Fire Phoenix three Soul Engineer Corp to arrive outside Dacheng, War-God Empress said that to express to your respect, she gives up flying into the city, walks into the city, is coming to the imperial palace direction, but also requires time.”

Listened to these words, on the Xu Tianran face to reappear immediately a smile, Ju Zi(orange), you have not really disappointed me! Not, because own military exploit relies on to favor to be arrogant, this, is very good.

“What direction War-God Empress and will audiences from enter the city?”

That imperial Soul Engineer Corp member hurried to reply.

Xu Tianran nodded, turns around to the civil and military hundred major roads: “The War-God Empress commander army sweeps away all obstacles, opens up territory to develop the earth for the country, the merit in the state, the advantage in the century. Fully realizes the etiquette rarely, is not willing to fly into the city. Goes to greet along with me, to show our military strength.”

“Your majesty, long live, long live and long live.”Shouted " long live " before the emperor to long live. In the civil and military hundred officers, expression varies at this time. But regarding the Xu Tianran words, does not have anybody to question.

The contradiction between empire army and Holy Spirit Cult cannot conceal the truth, including Holy Spirit Cult remote antiquity elder Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui the matter that even attacks the army has fed.

In this regard, will support Holy Spirit Cult without any minister. Regarding this Evil Soul Master clan/sect, the sound of resistance has not reduced.

Military commander say nothing, War-God Empress is a military commander, although she is also an empress, but, under her leadership, the empire armies swept away all obstacles for these years, opens up territory to develop the earth. Sky Soul Empire had been integrated in the domain completely. These many military exploit minutes enjoy, now the overall strength of military has been much more than civil official group. This also makes military commanders the approval to Ju Zi(orange) increase day by day.

Especially this time, obviously is under the Soul Engineer Corp mutiny, killed the Holy Spirit Cult person, War-God Empress has submitted a written statement unexpectedly, a strength undertook. Even must the duty of resignation marshal, can this deeply not move these thoughts originally the pure military commanders? Even if the merit expensive, now has been full of the favorable impression to this War-God Empress.

At this time Xu Tianran said that must receive the bride personally War-God Empress, they will certainly not have any comment.

Said greets, in fact, Xu Tianran leads the speed that the civil and military hundred officers march forward naturally unable to be too quick, welcomes several kilometers. The distant place, lust red Humanoid Soul Guidance Device Ju Zi(orange), appeared in the Xu Tianran field of vision.

The Xu Tianran vision is extremely good, his clear seeing, Ju Zi(orange) has not brought the hard helmet, face wind and frost. On the face is bringing wearily, look is rigid and stable.

In his heart slightly a pain, this is own empress! If can......, She is worth herself treasuring the lifetime woman. For the empire, for own great ambition, she has fought outside, but in oneself innermost feelings as before has actually guarded to her.

Ju Zi(orange) Ju Zi(orange), can I not love dearly you?

At the same time is thinking, Xu Tianran stepped out to move forward to meet somebody.

Ju Zi(orange) similar acceleration, but has not actually used any Soul Guidance Device, but in big strides ran over to Xu Tianran.

When among them gathers also ten meters, Ju Zi(orange) has knelt to bend down in the place.

“Servant see your majesty.”Her sound brings to sob and shiver, when Xu Tianran arrives in front of her, she has wept copiously.

The Xu Tianran artificial leg now was getting more and more easy-to-use, one step goes forward, grasps Ju Zi(orange) that does obeisance.

Ju Zi(orange) tight is hugging him, actually loudly cries.

Civil official military commanders very tactful not many nearness, but grasps Ju Zi(orange) they to see from Xu Tianran, in your majesty heart, is anything to be actually more important.

Military officers who follows the Ju Zi(orange) together return, all knees down, looks at Ju Zi(orange) to be choked with tears, their eyes also red.

Especially Evil Tyrant Commander Soul Engineer Corp Xia Xuanchen, thinks that own fellow soldier die in the Holy Spirit Cult hand, after returning to the army, War-God Empress withstood these many grievance for everybody, the mood at this time erupting can be imagined.

Having tears streaming down the face that Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp say nothing, several assistant regimental commanders have cried. Entire Huanglong Soul Engineer Corp was hit remnantly! The commodity that stockpiles disappears without a trace. Regarding Holy Spirit Cult, has not hated compared with them. Initially mutinied in the armed forces, was Holy Spirit Cult that Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp slaughtered teaches the audiences to be most.

Xu Tianran supple sound track: “Does not cry, Empress, does not cry. Comes back well. All take responsibility for you by me.”

Ju Zi(orange) has cried after the long time, loosens with the hug of Xu Tianran, then retrocedes two steps, has worshipped on bended knees once more, salutes upon meeting.

“Feudal official, the eastern expedition grand marshal, three services manager Ju Zi(orange), to your majesty hands over, appointed.”At the same time was saying, she took her commander's seal, holds in front of Xu Tianran.

Xu Tianran has not actually gone to meet, said: “Likes the minister straightening up after bowing or performing the kowtow, all Jiangqing. You are the heroes in empire. This time opens up territory to develop earth for the empire, establishes the rare achievement, waits a minute innate reward. Cuts returns to the imperial palace along with me.”

Surrounded by civil official military commander, the military officers walk in the imperial palace direction together, Xu Tianran is holding the hand of Ju Zi(orange), walks in the forefront. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-598-part-3





Volume 12

#599 - Xu Tianran Resolution


“Your majesty, Servant has not managed well army, please punish.”Ju Zi(orange) said to Xu Tianran in a low voice.

Xu Tianran actually shook the head, turns head to look to Ju Zi(orange), when with initially left compares, Ju Zi(orange) appeared thin and pale, on the extremely fresh-faced tender face, lost several water diversion Run. It can be imagined, in this war, she bore the tremendous pressure. Especially facing Shrek Academy time, even if Xu Tianran, thinks that Shrek Academy also extremely has a headache.

Afterward must face the military officers and contradiction between Holy Spirit Cult, the innermost feelings suffering and pain could be imagined. This time is to lead the army withdraws troops toward, must turn over the commander's seal.

“Empress, why can turn over commander's seal?”Xu Tianran asked to Ju Zi(orange).

Ju Zi(orange) bitter and astringent lowering the head, “your majesty believes Servant, Servant dies the cruelest death not thinks the report. Wish to fight for your majesty, but Servant after is a woman, woman sometimes frail. Goes out to battle, even if the enemy is formidable, Servant is also fearless, there are the confidence its 11 smashing, but, came from internal pressure, made Servant be unable to withstand the load. Servant must be responsible for the mighty force of my empire. But Servant thought that more and more has not protected their abilities, this responsibility is extremely important, Servant did not shift responsibility onto others, but truly confessed the ability to be insufficient, therefore, but also asked your majesty to elect in addition capable. Servant is only willing to keep side your majesty, helping the husband godchild, good companion my Little Yunhan.”

Mentioned the son, the double pupil of Ju Zi(orange) once more was immediately red, Xu Tianran can feel that her hand was shivering.

Yes! She the ability in military aspect is strong, eventually is a woman, a hope defends in the husband and child's woman. What a pity, that child is not I one's own, otherwise,......

The Xu Tianran heart is also slightly a pain, actually in a low voice comforts saying: “You have done very well, something, truly to be solved. You could rest assured that I take certainly responsibility for you. Side me, you most let the person who I trust absolutely. Also is I most intimate person. This coming back, well recuperation, the army also needs the recuperation and supplies. Consolidates us to Sky Soul Empire that side rule. My prime of life, unifies Continent not anxiously when for a while, will go to battle next time once more, I ensure you do not have any extra worries again. At present the military, nobody compared with you are and duty of three services grand marshal, do not retreat.”

Returns to the imperial palace, Xu Tianran to order immediately, the gratuity three services, will simultaneously divide to enjoy the audiences. To Ju Zi(orange), although is only rewarding with food and drink in spoken language grants, but everyone could see that trust of Xu Tianran War-God Empress has not reduced. But this time minute enjoys, without doubt is also your majesty indicates the manner, Holy Spirit Cult, must be given up eventually.

After gratuity the three services, Ju Zi(orange) has first taken off oneself Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, reckless runs to the harem. There, has her son!

Entire three days, Ju Zi(orange) had not come out in the harem, even has not been the people of military has contacted with the military officer who any she leads. Every day on the companion side the son, is a good mother.

Regarding this, Xu Tianran is very satisfied, Ju Zi(orange) almost achieved in his heart to hope all that she made. Able, loyal, trustworthy, not to have the least bit ambition.

Although the dream returns during at midnight, Xu Tianran is also very painful not to be impossible to have the genuine male offspring, but now this situation looks like, all are very good. Even if for the son is the crown prince, Ju Zi(orange) is impossible the matter that makes anything to rebel against. This is good, this, oneself can also feel relieved gives her to control the army, did not fear that has any problem.

Holy Spirit Cult, headquarters.

“Mother, the Xu Tianran gratuity three services, do not have the half minute to mention the army to our slaughtering. It seems like that he is the decision must give up us.”The Zongli Wu complexion is somewhat pale, in eyes, sends out is infiltrating the brilliance of person.

Sitting that Ye Xishui unemotionally in first place, sinking sound track: “Did our commodities shift?”

“Shifted most probably, all changed to that side Sky Soul Empire. Although Sun-Moon Empire has controlled Sky Soul Empire, but wants to clarify that side Sky Soul Empire all situations also to require not the short time, these days, made us to develop sufficiently.”

Ye Xishui said: “This the Cult vitality damages severely, hundred years have not recuperated, do not want to restore to the prosperous time. Xu Tianran, good Xu Tianran young child, to do this matter of dismantling the bridge after crossing unexpectedly. This matter such will not consider as finished. When our commodity all moves away, is being a traitor time.”

“Yes!”Zongli Wu eyes narrows the eyes, in the look, full is the hatred.

He after Huo Yuhao fights, the wound and Martial Soul, moved the basis. Shortly after comes back, obtained the front sad news. Until now, why even if several Titled Douluo that runs from the front does not talk clearly the military to begin to them suddenly. That so-called Evil Tyrant and Emperor Dragon two Soul Engineer Corp were sneak attacked by Evil Soul Master, simply is nonsensical talk. But, others said with certainty.

At that time Ye Xishui felt that some are not wonderful, she attacked the Sun-Moon Empire army, was only exploratory, probe was mainly the Xu Tianran manner.

Xu Tianran to Ju Zi(orange) many castigations, she has not been the hope can exert through oneself to the Xu Tianran pressure, how comes to see him then to process.

But who knows that Xu Tianran actually does not have any sound, but the Sun-Moon Empire army, that returned.

This appears some are not wonderful. Ye Xishui orders a Holy Spirit Cult people immediately, various commodities that obtains from Sun-Moon Empire their secret lair ships to Sky Soul Empire within the boundaries these years.

Who Xu Tianran is, Ye Xishui is clear. So long as some people have hindered him, anyone, he will not hesitate at all costs its destruction.

Holy Spirit Cult also similarly so, now can only make Xu Tianran dread that perhaps only then and Long Xiaoyao, now and Long Xiaoyao lived was saying fortunately, once and Long Xiaoyao died, Holy Spirit Cult definitely will wipe out by even/including Gen.

Therefore, Ye Xishui has decided that must outmigrate the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters, then rests and builds up strength. Waited for that the opportunity is born once more.

To begin this matter as for Xu Tianran to Holy Spirit Cult, she was actually not worried that in recent years, Holy Spirit Cult is the Sun-Moon Empire national religion, she is not infrequent in the manpower that in Sun-Moon Empire each influence places, has any slightest sign of trouble, they will obtain the news immediately, subpoenaed Soul Guidance Device, not only the Sun-Moon Empire person will use, she similarly will also use.

“Does mother, how your you plan to counter-attack Sun-Moon Empire this time behavior? Ju Zi(orange) that woman very fierce person, if possible, we should kill her immediately. Thus, Xu Tianran does not have the tiger of tooth. Although I do not like that small girl very much, but actually has saying that she is one generation of famous commanders-in-chief, even if compares Star Lou Empire Duke White Tiger, has no time to let.”The Zongli Wu sinking sound said.

Ye Xishui nodded, said: “In valley, I have to strike to kill her plan, but she prepares very abundantly. This Xu Tianran is also orders 100 Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp person guards she, there are these people, I do not have the assurance that one strikes to kill. Sun-Moon Empire these year of development was too quick, the Soul Master strength became more and more unimportant. Individual strength is getting stronger and stronger. No wonder Sky Soul Empire will thoroughly be destroyed by them. Wu'er, you assemble the strengths in our hand. Every seven rings following disciple, all follows the resources. Although Xu Tianran has not dared to move us temporarily, but must provide for a rainy day. My this sees him, I must have a look but actually, how he plans to cope with our Holy Spirit Cult, how having a look at him to face my question.”

At the same time was saying, Ye Xishui stands up, walks toward outside.

Zongli Wu one startled, said: “Can mother, have the danger?”

Ye Xishui said proudly: “On this world, where did not have to have the danger for me truly. Don't forget, your mother stands in the Continent peak. Let alone, your Uncle Long. Sun-Moon Empire wants to cope with us, must think over whether can withstand two Limit Douluo anger.”

“Yes. I handled the following matter first. However, you are all careful, extremely should not be angry. The air/Qi bursts oneself greatly.”Zongli Wu respectful saying.

“Um, you go.”

Zongli Wu. In this ray dim hall, only remaining Ye Xishui people. Her look becomes somewhat is gradually desolate.

“Is worth? Is worth really? You should know that your goal, is forever impossible to be achieved. Even if I helps you whole-heartedly, same is impossible.”The low and deep sound resounds, in the sound is bringing thick disappointed.

“You wholehearted and whole-heartedly has helped me?”Response of Ye Xishui ice-cold.

In the darkness, the big form walked, is Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao.

Long Xiaoyao has arrived at side Ye Xishui, “Xishui, gives up. Holy Spirit Cult this Evil Soul Master clan/sect is impossible long-time, regardless of appears in any place, will be rally togethered to attack. That Xu Tianran ambition is so big, after he has achieved his some goals, will abandon you. Because of Evil Soul Master issue. By the present situation, in the near future, Sun-Moon Empire can certainly unify Continent, at that time you want to find the opportunity more difficult again. Do you believe that after Sun-Moon Empire unifies Continent, the matter that their must first do was the same with the past years, did not hesitate at all costs exterminates all Evil Soul Master, did not remain.”

“You shut up!”Saying of Ye Xishui sudden violent anger.

Long Xiaoyao was silent, the breath of Ye Xishui is somewhat rapid.

“Is worth? Is worth really?”Long Xiaoyao sighed was saying.

The final time will soon arrive! The plot rhythm will start to speed up, I will take back all the things of unfolding as far as possible. The novels of 5 million characters, I am also first writing, I will try hard. But if there is insufficient, asked everybody to excuse me. Support thank you. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-599-part-1





Volume 12

#599 - Xu Tianran Resolution


Ye Xishui has turned around suddenly, coldly looks at Long Xiaoyao, “this issue, Mu En had also asked me in the past. Do you want to answer this issue for me?”

The Long Xiaoyao whole body shakes, in the look reveals the intense painful color.

Ye Xishui looks that his ice-cold look gradually is actually having the change, sighed one lightly, said: “Ok, Xiaoyao. Is I am not right, I should not mention again. In the past even if you did again wrong, you have actually used for more than 100 years accompanies me, this friendship, Mu En or Zhongli that old ghost by far cannot achieve. I know, only then you most love my. For these years, in your heart has been struggling for the pain actually. You know that I have wanted to say to you actually very much, I forgave you, did not hate you. But, I did not say, because I feared, once I said to you, you will go to me, at that time, my side again did not have a trustworthy person.”

The pain in Long Xiaoyao look vanished, displaces, is the light tears.

Ye Xishui gently by him, walked arm in arm by oneself during his bosom, “now, I forgave you. In your heart did not need to constrain because of that matter. These many years pass by, you have paid that many for me, you did not owe me anything. Now, you can feel relieved left, does the matter that you want to handle. Does not use because again my this hobbles to affect you.”

Long Xiaoyao bitter and astringent [say / way]: “You had not the good premonition, right?”

The Ye Xishui body shakes.

Long Xiaoyao sighed, said: “These years, you little again threaten me with that matter, but, I had already been used to it side you. Was already used to it, did you know? These many years, I, although will not help you handle these dishonorable matters, but I have protected side you, these matters that in fact, you handle, naturally has my part. We already were a body. This for more than 100 years, saw each time you slaughter and see you to train these Evil Soul Master, in my heart is very painful and is very painful. Even but if, is painful, I had remained, because, in my heart, has defeated to your love. I am willing to protect you, you have done the wicked matter, I do not have the means to prevent. However, if one day, the retribution approaches, I am willing with you, together to undertake.”

The tears, uncontrolled spew out from the Ye Xishui eye pupil, the thump that she makes an effort is striking the chest of Long Xiaoyao.

“Are you so why silly? So is why silly!”

Long Xiaoyao smile embraces tightly her, “because I love you! So is simple, this, was also enough. Right that a little you said that I can also say very much proudly. On this world, nobody loves you compared with me.”

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong static waited for three days, transmits from Ju Zi(orange) there without any news. But obtained the gratuity three services news.

Three Soul Engineer Corp were allowed to enter city, naturally, must the place that returns to them to be stationed.

Although the Sun-Moon Empire army has conquered Sky Soul Empire, but these time is also the loss is serious. Especially in high-end strength.

Four Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, were hit two, reenforcement 1000 Soul Engineer has been annihilated remnantly. Nine levels of Soul Engineer died four and five. In addition the losses of various types of commodities, the issue in Holy Spirit Cult aspect. It can be said that somewhat shook basis.

Naturally, this vacillation regarding Sun-Moon Empire, not necessarily is not a good opportunity of shuffle. So long as Soul Guidance Technology is in the lead invariably, making up of these losses, what need is only the time.

Bright Virtue Hall has reconstructed, but is not the control in the Jing Hongchen hand. Various research and development invested the massive money.

Various Soul Guidance Technology output to Sky Soul Empire that side, but majority are the civilian aspects, the military aspect does not have any science and technology to flow out, through civilian aspects Soul Guidance Technology, Sun-Moon Empire unknowingly collected the massive wealth from Sky Soul Empire, these wealth are all related with the military.

The development of Humanoid Soul Guidance Device about one step is conducted, Huo Yuhao had inquired Ju Zi(orange), why five and six levels of Soul Engineer can also control Humanoid Soul Guidance Device. Ju Zi(orange) had not said that but Huo Yuhao actually saw a sorrowful color from her eyes pupil at that time.

Under Huo Yuhao ponders over, has thought of a possibility.

To control Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, in the current hi-tech means that is enough formidable Spiritual Power that first needs is good.

But how can Spiritual Power promote? Except that grows with the practice, or is this type inborn has beside the Spiritual System Martial Soul person, the method that can use was exciting. The exciting human brain, to achieve to promote the function of Spiritual Power.

If Sun-Moon Empire had similar achievement in the Soul Guidance Technology research, has the possibility to come to promote Soul Engineer Spiritual Power in this way forcefully, thus achieving makes them use the Humanoid Soul Guidance Device goal.

As the matter stands, these Soul Engineer potentials also pressed out to do, in the future in itself cultivates for on is impossible to have the true promotion.

Xuan Ziwen had said to Huo Yuhao, studies enhances human body Spiritual Power this topic through the stimulation way, already had in Sun-Moon Empire, but, had not applied directly, the reason is the side effect is too big. Also does not know now Sun-Moon Empire, in this aspect can suppress the side effect in any degree. If the side effect is huge, then, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp also not necessarily is impregnable.

The gratuity three services, have eaten and drunk extravagantly two days later. Three Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp leave behind beyond the necessary manpower, had a vacation.

Even if Soul Engineer in army, is the status is aloof, does not have too many limits. After returning to Bright Capital City, is so. This time vacation is ten days.

How to fill up to strength as for three Soul Engineer Corp, Huo Yuhao is not clear. But from the mood fluctuation of above high-ranking military officer, this seems not the too major problem.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection has been covering the entire military compound, for him, compared with a valuable news is, the time that Sun-Moon Empire army time requires to repair and maintain will be quite long.

The military order has issued that side the front, the army was dispatched belongs to the Sky Soul Empire south border, confronts in the border with Star Lou Empire, simultaneously carries on the recuperation. The goods and materials naturally are the original Sky Soul Empire aspect.

Sun-Moon Empire this time should to carry on the recuperation, moreover the time should not be short, even if Ju Zi(orange) their plan fails, most at least within one year, Sun-Moon Empire should not have bigger military action again. This is a rare good news.

However, this news passes on not to have any significance, because this news has no way to confirm. Therefore, Star Luo or Dou Ling, Star Lou Empire, must prepare for meeting head-on particularly as before whole-heartedly.

For these years, Star Lou Empire instead had not borne the pressure of any war, does not know they developed how.

Thinks of Star Lou Empire, latter in Hao unchecked to have thought of that person, when this matter, if can solve Xu Tianran, obtains Ju Zi(orange) within ten years not to encroach upon Star Luo and commitment of Dou Ling two countries. Perhaps, oneself should go back to solve that matter. Also should worship mother.

Thinks of mother, in the Huo Yuhao heart acid. Before that intense hatred vanished, but grieved and pain did not have.

Huo Yuhao can think frequently, if mother is also living, that would be nice! In that case, by own present ability, can certainly help her live the most joyful life.

What a pity, this also can only be thinks. He is very clear, the person dies cannot come back to life. Even if is formidable, was impossible to make mother live.

Therefore, that matter must be solved, oneself will certainly look for him, talks clearly. Must make him rectify names for mother. Also, duchess!

Thinks of the duchess, the hatred in Huo Yuhao heart once more gains ground. Even if can not retaliate others, this duchess he is how regardless of not to let off. If not that duchess, oneself mother will not die.

Dai Huabin was rampant in childhood, but can also be said as, because young innocent, but that duchess? If not her persecution, oneself mother how to go so far as to.

“How Yuhao? What is thinking?”Tang Wutong has gotten hold of the hand of Huo Yuhao.

Had a vacation, she and Huo Yuhao naturally left the military compound, has replaced Huo Yuhao very repugnant that feminine Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, they have changed the ordinary clothes, simple Yi Rong changes the look, this can walk leisurely on the Sun-Moon Empire Bright Capital City avenue.

The feeling that this type window-shops with ease, Tang Wutong likes really very much, but, she was the earliest possible time had discovered the Huo Yuhao mood changed.

Huo Yuhao shaking the head of gently, “not anything, but has remembered mother.”

Tang Wutong holds in the arms his arm, said: “Do not think many. Waited for this matter to end, I worshipped the aunt with you together, was good?”

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, said: “Naturally was good. However, you should not call aunt, should be the same with me, calling mother to be right. What a pity, mother could not see that she really has such a pretty daughter-in-law.”Here, his eye socket somewhat was red.

Tang Wutong elegant face micro red, said: “When do you plan to marry me?”

Huo Yuhao said: “This matter, if smooth, after we went back to worship mother, I married you. Is good?”

Tang Wutong ill-humored [say / way]: “Did your this propose?”

Huo Yuhao said with a smile: “Does not calculate. Waits to turn head officially my sought one time again.”

Tang Wutong “pū”smiles, said: “Does not use. We experienced that many, will I really also care about that situation? Good, I promise you. I will contact with the father and mother as soon as possible, when here matter, I......”

“Your what?”Huo Yuhao moves asking that raises.

Tang Wutong “snort|hum”said: “Did not tell you.”1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-599-part-2





Volume 12

#599 - Xu Tianran Resolution


“Ha Ha!”Huo Yuhao laughs loudly, formerly sad intent in heart completely had relieved, has Tang Wutong in the side, he so is always joyful.

Walks, is walking, they arrived around the Bright Capital City imperial palace. Regarding this imperial palace, Huo Yuhao was also considered as on is quite familiar, after all has gone, not only one time.

He brings Tang Wutong to window-shop outside today, naturally does not have the goal. Three days, the Ju Zi(orange) that side did not have the least bit news, should contact with her, by determining the following motion is.

Huo Yuhao has the self-confidence very much, bringing Tang Wutong to enter the imperial palace to go easily and freely is right.

But, this time, when he arrives at the imperial palace outer wall place, in the heart does not have the production of reason a sense of crisis, this sense of crisis is very sudden, but is very intense.

Had been ready to with him enter Tang Wutong of imperial palace suddenly to discover together that Huo Yuhao stopped.

“We walk.”Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, walks toward a street on, he remembers very clearly, that street still the roast meat shop, the flavor did is very good. The fragrance that the coal burns is very rich, the pulp fresh and tender juiciness, is the rare good food.

This little while or at noon, the person should not be many. Brought Wutong to eat the barbecue to be good.

The Huo Yuhao memory well, accurately had found the roast meat shop very much, two people wanted the barbecued mutton, to roast the beef, baked other cattle spots the good food. Two glasses of ales.

The free time of a while, the barbecue carried, was eating the barbecue, was drinking the ale, was really the feeling that ten shares received.

“How to go in?”On the Tang Wutong face has not revealed why not takes the post to the expression, but actually quietly passes message asks.

Huo Yuhao passes on the tone channel similarly: “Why does not know, I planned a moment ago, suddenly feels an intense sense of crisis. As if has any matter to occur, or has anything to threaten our existence in the imperial palace. It seems like that Sun-Moon Empire in the Surveying Soul Guidance Device aspect, likely also had the huge progress. This is not the good matter!”

Tang Wutong is also one startled, after their achievement Transcendent Douluo, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power cultivated for own sensation became compares was more formidable before, although Spirit Eyes did not have ninth Soul Ring, but added on Three Eyed Golden Lion to take to his destiny sensation, must say the sensation ability, to dangerous foreknowledge, he absolutely not under Limit Douluo.

On that day encountered two Limit Douluo time, before reason that had not felt that was because that time was impossible to have any danger. But this time, felt that including Huo Yuhao danger, the degree of hazard in imperial palace can be imagined.

Good Sun-Moon Empire! Unexpectedly intrepidly to so situation.

The barbecue eats is very crisp, satisfaction of Tang Wutong face, after having eaten the barbecue, they sit in as in same place, wanted two glasses of ales, slowly is drinking.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power flows swiftly just like the mercury is spreading generally outward, has covered the entire imperial palace, but immediately has not actually entered in the imperial palace. But looks like a huge mind guard shield, covers the entire imperial palace, at the angle of view of upper air bird's eye view, observes.

With this way observation, regardless of the imperial palace has any Surveying Soul Guidance Device to arrange, is impossible to discover his existence.

The surface seems, in imperial palace all tranquil, in waits on the imperial palace shuttles back and forth, patrol soldier very orderly passes through in each place. Sky over the imperial palace, upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device and initially Huo Yuhao came time does not have any difference.

Was my sensation makes a mistake? In Huo Yuhao heart slightly some doubts, no, will not be wrong. Moreover, even if has made a mistake, must believe that is careful for on.

These many years discipline, Huo Yuhao already can achieve mind like still water. The risk will only bring the disaster, anything cultivates is, is the same.

Thinks of here, his mentality was also calm, Spiritual Detection directly does not enter the imperial palace as before, but is observing the imperial palace interior sound silently.

He does not worry, in fact, even if the main body does not enter in the imperial palace, some of his also many methods can investigate the imperial palace, but must look whether has the practical significance.

Quick, the second glass of ales also drank up.

“We go back.”Huo Yuhao stands up, must pay up. Suddenly, his complexion changes, sat formerly position, high sound track: “Server, comes two glasses of ales again.”

Changes to him suddenly, Tang Wutong is not surprised, she understands that Huo Yuhao had certainly discovered anything so, as before will do is very stable, waits for the third glass of ales to send.

Spiritual Detection rapid sharing of Huo Yuhao gives Tang Wutong, making her also be able to see one see.

Under the gaze of upper air angle of view, they saw impressively that the form stride walks toward the imperial palace main entrance together, the whole body covers in the red color long gown, that threatening aura, was extremely strong and obvious.

Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, she arrived at the imperial palace at this time unexpectedly, must be potential achievement. Sees here, Huo Yuhao they cannot certainly walk, to Ye Xishui, they absolutely does not have any favorable impression, or is the absolute mortal enemy. Even if previous Ye Xishui looked that has not attacked them in the Long Xiaoyao share is also same.

Did Ye Xishui arrive at the Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace to do at this time? Must know that now just now passes high noon, regarding most Evil Soul Master, had the considerable restriction to their strengths at this time. The oppression that because Evil Soul Master with the soul related ability, received the high noon is strongest, but this Grim Reaper Douluo, chose unexpectedly arrived at this time. Hasn't considered possibility of fight?

The Ye Xishui stride has walked into the imperial palace, the bodyguard before imperial palace gate all bows to salute, anybody has not dared to stop her, whatever she walks toward the imperial palace.

However, because has the upper air angle of view, Huo Yuhao can see the entire Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace change clearly.

In the four corners of imperial palace, four groups of rays shine quietly, these rays are not intense, look like most common light, each area is not big, is about the diameter about ten meters. However, the instance when these four groups of rays shone, Huo Yuhao formerly in the heart had presented the sense of crisis appeared immediately again, moreover compared it formerly to want intensely too many were too many.

Heart one tight, next one flickers, Huo Yuhao understands what immediately these rays represent was anything. Don't forget, he is nine levels of Soul Engineer, simultaneously has is linking Limit Douluo is inferior to his intense sensation.

That is......

I went. That is High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device!

Isn't this gadget only had in the Bright Capital City four angles? When did the imperial palace internal four corners have? It seems, scales and Bright Capital City four corner/horn compares to be smaller, moreover does not have any Soul Power fluctuation to send out outward, is unable to judge its true prestige energy. But wants to come not to be weak.

Initially, that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device gave Huo Yuhao to make the extremely profound impression. Under inspiring of Xu Tianran, is that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, stiffly 100,000 over people will protect, meanwhile protects him. 98 levels of Transcendent Douluo, moreover is existence of close Limit Douluo, burnt own life to send out ultimate strikes cannot destroy.

But that time, Xu Tianran draws support, as if is also only one of the four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, in other words, if that four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device simultaneously start, might all protect entire Bright Capital City very much, that will be the how terrifying energy!

Naturally, Huo Yuhao also knows that such big and fat energy, is requires the massive time to carry on the reserve, but so, was astonishing enough.

Now, the imperial palace four corners also presented four this gadget, is used to attack is used to defend, protects the entire imperial palace to have more than enough to spare absolutely. Moreover, if these four are really High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, then, but also thinks that this matter, that is, Sun-Moon Empire mastered the technology that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device reduces. Soon, it becomes Soul Engineer Corp will possibly construct the Soul Guidance Array time the energy fountainhead! That is truly fearful matter.

Does not know that now this High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device depends upon any strength to carry on the sufficient energy. If depends upon the manpower sufficient energy, as if is not quite realistic, that wants many Soul Master to satisfy its demand Ah?

Sees these, Huo Yuhao cannot certainly walk, he must many observations, High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device relate to their following motions. To assassinate Xu Tianran, moves the possibility that in the imperial palace is biggest, not only when the time comes must assassinate, after assassinating is successful, but also wants the whole body to draw back.

But on Xu Tianran controls certainly is controlling four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device methods, when the time comes, once he inspires these formidable energies, even if Limit Douluo, a short time could not injure him, to waste all previous efforts?

Thinks of here, Huo Yuhao observation was more careful.

After Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui walks into the imperial palace, has not walked several steps, she stops the footsteps, suddenly looked at one toward the sky.

Her looked that frightened Huo Yuhao to jump, good keen sensation! I use the upper air angle of view, can she be able to see unexpectedly? Limit Douluo, is really immeasurably deep, but, believes where she is absolutely impossible to know us.

Huo Yuhao is comforting itself in the heart, a black form walked from outside.

“Roasts together good fillet to me, wants tenderly, seven points of ripeness. Comes one glass of ales again.”

Huo Yuhao has patted own forehead, Tang Wutong was also reveals, but color. Person who because, this walks from outside, is Darkness Sacred Dragon, Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao.

They look at each other one, felt deep shock.

They saw Long Xiaoyao, was towed by internal combustion engine, Long Xiaoyao naturally also saw them. This super powerhouse stride arrives by their table, the pull chair gratefully took a seat. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-599-part-3





Volume 12

#600 - The Story Of Dark Saint Dragon


“Has not thought that we such quickly met.”Long Xiaoyao said with smile on the face.

Huo Yuhao sighed, said: “Senior cultivates is, is really immeasurably deep! Has not thought that we have so been careful, you can find us.”Although Yi Rong puts on make-up, but Huo Yuhao naturally understands that was seen by Long Xiaoyao, their status are impossible to conceal.

Long Xiaoyao laughs, said: “If I told you, I can bump into you here am purely the coincidence, did you believe?”

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth twitched, the words of this challenge intelligence quotient, did not need to reply. Carries own ale to hint to Long Xiaoyao, then has drunk a big mouth. The ale bitter and astringent fragrance floods in the chests and bellies immediately, is very comfortable, but bitter and astringent actually for a very long time does not go.

This time comes Bright Capital City, Ye Xishui is one of goals they must cope with!

In this time, the server has been delivering food that Long Xiaoyao wanted.

“Grandpa Dragon, you for a long time have not come! Quickly tastes, our chefs have chosen a position best good fillet to you.”Servers warm puts down food.

“Good, thanks him for me.”Long Xiaoyao he he smiles, takes up on the good fillet is inserting the knife to start to cut the meat.

The servers are tactful retreated, Tang Wutong cannot bear say: “Your such big age, but also eats these many meat, did not fear that couldn't laugh?”

Long Xiaoyao said with a smile: “Person life, eating is the biggest pleasure, was only from the birth to the death, matter that every day must handle. The old men most like eating the meat his entire life, if could not eat the meat, what meaning lived is also having?”At the same time was saying, he starts a liquor meat made chewing motions greatly quickly.

Huo Yuhao looking pensive looks at Long Xiaoyao, said: “I somewhat believe now that you bumped into us really fortunately.”

Long Xiaoyao smiles, said: “Therefore, we have the fate very much, not? You saw that sharing gives me, I know that you have that ability.”

Huo Yuhao helpless has given Long Xiaoyao own Spiritual Detection and Sharing direct release, will see that passes to this elder completely.

The familiarity of Long Xiaoyao to Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace above Huo Yuhao, he also immediately had discovered absolutely still imperial palace four corners is not right.

“Um? What is that? Four corner/horn place brights places?”Asking of Long Xiaoyao doubts.

Huo Yuhao said: “If I have not guessed that wrong, that should be High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device. Senior Ye is also nine levels of Soul Engineer, you should hear this Soul Guidance Device.”

The Long Xiaoyao discoloration, what “did you say excitedly? Is High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device? No, this is impossible. Sun-Moon Empire only in all directions has this thing outside the city. How can, in the imperial palace have?”

Huo Yuhao said: “I also planned today must enter the imperial palace investigation to turn. But before must go, suddenly thought that some not good omen, ran to come to here to drink. Then observed, Senior Ye just had as if gone.”

The Long Xiaoyao complexion was cloudy immediately, drank big ale, eyes has narrowed the eyes, “Sun-Moon Empire background, stems from our unexpected more and more. Continues to observe.”He because of discovering High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device leaves, to continue to eat his beef as before, is drinking the ale.

He is not anxious, Huo Yuhao naturally does not worry, but stems from the respect to Long Xiaoyao, his Spiritual Detection and Sharing is maintaining throughout, but does not have about one step to search to observe. In his heart of hearts, looks certainly forward to Xu Tianran and Ye Xishui hits, that serves his benefit.

A bulk good fillet, the free time of a while, was eaten by Long Xiaoyao cleanly, the ale wanted one cup.

The appearance that Long Xiaoyao ten shares receive, smiling look Huo Yuhao, has a look at Tang Wutong again.

“Mu En, although went, but there is your such one pair the disciple, perhaps under his dwelling place of the dead must smile to awake! If the old man also has your such disciples, this good.”

Has changed others, heard Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo saying that perhaps immediately reckless acknowledged as teacher. But Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong are Light Sacred Dragon and Dragon God Douluo Mu En disciple, naturally cannot such do.

“You praised.”Huo Yuhao hurries to say.

Long Xiaoyao shook the head, said: “It is not the praise, I am earnest. In any case I and Mu En are at your this ages and compared with you, difference was really too far. Even if these kids in your Tang Sect, there are several not to be inferior in us in the past.”

This saying does not know how should meet, Huo Yuhao can only be the smile by right. In fact, until now, he cannot determine actually completely this Darkness Sacred Dragon is the enemy is a friend.

Although Teacher he is protecting himself in secret, is, in fact, he is also the Holy Spirit Cult remote antiquity elder! Has followed side Ye Xishui, helping a tyrant do evil. If Holy Spirit Cult did not have him, impossible in rapidness that such during these years develop. Can have today's scale, cannot separate with Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo absolutely.

Long Xiaoyao sighed, “Little Huo, you looked down upon the old man very much, thinks that the old man and your Teacher gave a name, was his shame?”

Huo Yuhao one startled, looks at Long Xiaoyao that pair of profound eye pupil, his honest [say / way]: “Once for sometime, the younger generation truly like this thought. But afterward understood are more, I guess that you should have the difficulties of any difficult word.”

Long Xiaoyao has smiled, as if smiles is very happy, “is very good, your this kid at least does not have the string to deceive me, this is a very good moral excellence. Although the white lie is also sometimes good. You said a moment ago the difficulties these characters of difficult word time, clearly somewhat thinks otherwise. You thought that difficulties of what difficult word regardless of there is, I shouldn't help a tyrant do evil?”

Huo Yuhao has drunk ale, conceals own awkwardness, “senior, you are blazing with anger and is perceptive of the finest detail, the boy was disrespectful.”

Long Xiaoyao shook the head, said: “Has nothing to be disrespectful, the ideas of almost all people are the same with you, even if were initially my family member and friend, is so. I do not have means.”

On the face the smiling face stops, displaces, wipes the haze and pain of not being able to cancel.

“I told you, a lot, were not that simple. The old men for these years, this matter have never said to the person. If did not say, perhaps, again did not have any opportunity. Do you want to listen?”

It can be said that doesn't think? Let alone, gratitude and grudges rival in love of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong to this older generation also very much have the curiosity.

They also nod.

Long Xiaoyao sighed, in double pupil was revealing the color of being at a loss, “this must from long before mention. In the past, I, Mu En and Ye Xishui, in friend of outside travelling time understanding. I and Mu En know earliest, we actually at that time did not hit did not finalize. He is Light Sacred Dragon Martial Soul, I am Darkness Sacred Dragon Martial Soul, inborn am Light and dark each other repel one another. Therefore, we when first meeting, is a match. Our cultivating to be similar, age are similar, how can not draw out the heart of viing for supremacy? Within one year, we competed seven successively, almost every victory and loss were different. Finally, I was worse than him. In seven, I have won three, he has won four, seven games of four victories, he won. Especially at the finals of Great Continental Soul Master Academy Fighting Spirit Competition, he wins the team that I have led. Also at that time, first time has met Xishui, Xishui is only one is repairing for on personally can with feminine Soul Master that we contend with reluctantly.”

Here, on the Long Xiaoyao old face revealed a smile, the past grand appearance was dashing, without doubt was in the life best aftertaste.

“Has hit entire one year, we have actually arrived at one because of a minor matter, becomes the good friend. That time, we run into a village to be persecuted by Evil Soul Master, Evil Soul Master is slaughtering, withdraws the soul and corpse of person cultivates. We from the different directions after that village, saw then pitiful condition, immediately could not bear get rid. After we massacre all Evil Soul Master finally completely, this discovered that unexpectedly is each other. Suddenly, laughs mutually three, henceforth became the friend.”

“Mu En is calm and honest, I want bracelet some. To be honest, back then, I really grew be handsomer than your Teacher. Ha Ha!”Long Xiaoyao has smiled, moreover smiles very happily.

This point, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong do not have the means to refute, although Long Xiaoyao was very old, but actually as before tall, tall and straight, the look can also see the appearance of young time faintly. Huo Yuhao thought in any case, Darkness Sacred Dragon certainly of young time gracefully.

Long Xiaoyao then said: “Afterward we together travelled for pleasure Continent, has experienced many matters, we also frequently collaborate to battle, we at that time surprised discovery, we, although the Martial Soul attribute is opposite, if we coordinate, actually complements one another, the effect is extremely good. Even, again unknowingly, we also used the Martial Soul Fusion technique. The darkness and Light, actually can also Martial Soul Fusion, you say that this is very rarely seen?”

Martial Soul Fusion? Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong look at each other one, this may really be secret, in any case Old Mu or Old Xuan, have not said this matter. The darkness and can Light also unexpectedly Martial Soul Fusion?

From the description of Long Xiaoyao, with, originally Old Mu and Long Xiaoyao that initially narration of Old Xuan had distinguished before that great competition know.

“Afterward, I and Mu En have analyzed. We estimated that reason that can Martial Soul Fusion, because of we two Martial Soul relations. Although is the darkness and light attribute opposes, but we are a little common, that is our Martial Soul is in itself the dragon, has the bloodlines of Dragon Clan. Under the mutual attraction of this bloodlines, completes. However, our Martial Soul Fusion degrees are only 50%. When starts the Martial Soul Fusion technique draws support eruption that the darkness and Light collide to have mutually, can burst out extremely formidable destructive power. May actually unable each other to promote to cultivate is, compares in your Martial Soul Fusion, has very big disparity.”1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-600-part-1





Volume 12

#600 - The Story Of Dark Saint Dragon


“Our relations are getting better and better, became the good friends of telling one another everything. Until one day, us has bumped into Ye Xishui.”

“Ye Xishui young time is very beautiful, is not worse than you, small girl.”Here, the Long Xiaoyao such big age, in the look revealed the color of several points of being enchanted by unexpectedly.

“That time she, youth young and lively adorable. Quick our three became good friends, travels together Continent. The Xishui disposition is very good, our two were blood energy side just young people, quick, we liked her. At that time, I and Mu En have discussed this matter in secret. Since we like her, that respectively depending on skill. Looked that she can like anyone. Regarding this, I am very confident, after all, my look compared with your Teacher many, the ability is not worse than him. I have the confidence to obtain the Xishui heart. At that time I also said to Mu En, regardless of Xishui has chosen anyone, in us, another person must face confidently, everybody good friend. Mu En also agreed.”

“For not, because each other is jealous to destroy our sentiments, one day, I and Mu En found Xishui together, told her to her admire us, hopes that she can make a choice. Like this said in public, always received the suffering to be better a lot compared with our innermost feelings. Xishui seemed frightened at that time by us, she hesitant half of the day, finally has made the choice.”

Appears bitterly and astringently.

Shaking the head of gently, Long Xiaoyao resigned-looking [say / way]: “But, what I have not thought that confidently I, finally actually given up object. What Xishui elects is Mu En. Wild with joy color that I also deep remembering at that time on the Mu En face reappeared now. That does not have the means to conceal. His fierce throwing in the past, grasped Xishui, was hugging her, in airborne transferred three.”

“Although before, has reached an agreement, everybody friend. But at that moment, some of my really collapses. Walking that does not return. Waits for Mu En to pursue my time. I fully run away, because he must look after Xishui, has not pursued eventually.”

Huo Yuhao cannot bear say: “Old Long. Your wait a moment. How I heard that at that time Ye Xishui did not have direct selection your one person. But lets you one year later fights a decisive battle, who has won her with whom! Then you have not gone......”

Long Xiaoyao ridicules saying: “Listens Xuan Zi said that he is only the hearsay. Afterward I and Mu En truly have hit, at that time, Xishui actually already with him in the same place. Just, they have been keeping secret.”

Sighed, Long Xiaoyao said: “My innermost feelings, are actually very proud. I have known. That time, is the most serious attack that I come under since birth. My vacant person walks on the street, unconscious left the city, walks into the wilderness, such person silently is walking, I do not know how long at that time walked. My heart good pain good pain, the pain of being lovelorn, making me be in deep sorrow. At that time, in my heart hated Mu En. Even also hates Xishui, I am not clear, why Xishui will choose Mu En. I am confident. Because not only I grow am better than Mu En, from the Xishui usual look, I can see that she is likes my.”

“Perhaps you can laugh at me, but I have this confidence. But, Xishui eventually has actually chosen Mu En! Is because, he came from Shrek Academy? I am not willingly, really very willingly. But. I cannot go back. Initially I had pledged to Mu En, regardless of she chose anyone. Our good friend. I have not been able to strive for anything again. Therefore, I walked. This walks, is entire one year. Over the past year, I in Continent able to move unhindered, wipe out the bullies and help the down-trodden, come across the matter, started before be more ruthless than is spicier. But in fact, I in listening attentively to their news, Light Sacred Dragon Mu En and Ye Xishui this to lover able to move unhindered Continent, becomes the news of Soul Master younger generation eminent character unceasingly drills into my ear.”

“Time has not made the mood in my heart be able to be tranquil. Finally, I decided that looks for them. I must have a look with own eyes, they now actually happy. I know that I want to walk from this sentiment not to be easy, my disposition was too obstinate, is extremely rigid. Therefore I always want to take a look, regardless of will have anything, I must have a look.”

“Said left meets by chance, I saw them. They are very happy in the together appearance. Mu En sees my time, was somewhat awkward, said many comforted my words, being dead drunk of but also with me drinking. But I actually discovered that that time I, extraordinary tranquility. When I see Mu En, I have not blamed him. Your Teacher is a good person, is a very good person, I entirely believe that he in pursuing the Xishui process, has not used any trick. Likes this matter, truly cannot shift by the idea of person, likes liking, does not like not liking. At that time, I suddenly thought that I as if can put down. This makes me very happy, can put down well. At least, will not injure others again, will not continue to injure itself again.”

“Xishui sees my time, appears very tranquil, has been short one year ago that intimacy, that time she, became very gentle, as if she has completed momentarily became the plan of Mu En wife. I blessed them.”

“I in the heart had filled not the air/Qi of putting down at that time, presented the challenge to Mu En, I hope that can through defeating him smooths my innermost feelings the wound. In front of Shrek Academy one group of people, I and Mu En have hit. That time, I lost, suffers a more disastrous defeat and is very miserable. One year, big of Mu En progress, making one be flabbergasted, perhaps because of the love reason, his overall strength has been higher than a bulk compared with me, naturally, possibly was because I was extremely dispirited that year.”

“We drink, I drink heartily, being dead drunk of drinking. Mu En also got drunk. Midnight, I woke, the headache wants to crack. In room, only then I and Mu En. Xishui disappears without a trace.”

“On table has a paper, places side Mu En, is Xishui writes, above writes, became sober has washed goes to the room to rest again. I know that Xishui has the cleanliness, had not changed.”

“I am taking the paper, unexpected happening walked, arrives the room that Xishui lives, the gate is opening, Xishui as if already rested. I walked, smells a fragrant and sweet aura, how at that time I had not cared, is only the arriving bedside silently, I only want to look at Xishui, then leaves. At that time I think that this is I last time sees her. Later did not see her and Mu En, in order to avoid made itself grieved.”

“I arrive at the bedside, the Xishui sound transmit from inside. She said: Such late woke, waits for you for a long time. Today you may unable to escape from my palm. Why to want, when marries in the same place, today I must with you in the same place. Smelled the fragrance? Hee hee, that is under me the toxin, the spring breeze rain and dew is fragrant.”

“Hears the Xishui sound, I do not dare to move, I feared that was recognized by her, intrudes her boudoir rashly, how this lets me from the place! But listened to her words, I have a big shock. Although the spring breeze rain and dew fragrance I do not know am anything, but guesses that can also guess obtains! At that time I only thought a heat flow broke in the brain instantaneously, the reason tells me, I should turn around run, running distant, found the place to detoxify. But, I eventually have not actually given up, at that time, my heartbeat fierce of, also made has made me regret matter lifelong. The hand of Xishui extends secretly from the bed, has drawn me. In the room was very at that time black, her breath was very rapid, my was also. When I move her flesh, since one year the depressing mood has erupted finally. I throw reckless, like animal.”

Listens to Long Xiaoyao talk about here, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong stared in a big way the eye. This......, Really is secret! Let alone Old Xuan does not know, even if Old Mu, is not necessarily clear?

Suddenly, they do not know that should say anything was good, in the Huo Yuhao heart secretly was even rejoicing that at least their this generation, has not encountered this situation.

In a Long Xiaoyao Yin Jin Cup the ale, called out loud: “Comes one cup again.”

Although passed these many years, is very obvious, he cared about the initial matter as before . That pain in his eyeground deep place cannot conceal.

Huo Yuhao said in a low voice: “Senior, the matter crossed was so long, that afterward?”

Long Xiaoyao heaved a deep sigh, “I woke, Xishui also awoke, she sat side me, in the hand was taking a handle short-sword, was puncturing slowly to own chest. I had a big shock at that time, one held the sword blade edge, whatever that sharp sword blade edge shears into my palm, but is unconscious. At that time my heart good pain and good pain. I know that I have cast blunder. But also in this time, outside is transmitting Mu En to summon the Xishui sound.”

Closes eyes slightly, the body of Long Xiaoyao unexpectedly is shivering, hundred years pass by, now recalled that then scene, he was unable to restrain oneself as before, what obviously at that time he faced was the awkward scene.

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth twitched, this matter pain far more than is a Long Xiaoyao person, Teacher is the victim, Ye Xishui is also. Whom can this matter blame?

Long Xiaoyao has made a mistake, he should run at that time. But, he deeply is loving Ye Xishui, this is in love with the mistake?

Ye Xishui? The Teacher manner is upright, at that time she prescribed medicine, for goes a step further with Teacher, is intimate with Teacher. Even is very possible for the thought that to cancel Teacher may be jealous, although her behavior radical a point, but, could say to make a mistake really?

As for Teacher, that was the unexpected misfortune, he in the situation of completely not knowing the circumstances of the matter, oneself most beloved woman and best friend unexpectedly......

Said honestly that I cannot write the unprincipled person, because I believe that the human nature was friendly. Also hopes that is really this. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-600-part-2





Volume 12

#600 - The Story Of Dark Saint Dragon


Huo Yuhao has not been cruel enough to closely examine again, he will substitute, takes any in three people, he is unable to accept then destiny.

The ale came, Long Xiaoyao is one drinks completely, on old face were many a unhealthy good luck.

The servers hurry saying: “Old Long, your slow point drinks, quickly is not good to the body that drinks.”

Long Xiaoyao shaking the head of gently, “cup takes away, does not drink, we sit a while again.”

“Good, all right, how long you and your friend sit to be good.”The servers have the meaningful glance very much took the cup to get down.

Long Xiaoyao opens the double pupil, bitter and astringent looks at Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, the story talks about here, as if had finished.

“I owe Xishui, forever also trades is unclear. That is her first time. I owe Mu En, cannot pay off similarly. Now you understand why I will help a tyrant do evil. clear(ly) knows that Xishui led Holy Spirit Cult loss of life, must protect side her. We once lost the contact a long time, I also think one can forget, but, this is really impossible. Even if dozens years later meets once more, I as before initial all will also remember clearly. Therefore, regardless of Xishui has made anything, I do not have the means to prevent her. Because I do not have that qualifications. After I have made that filling the heavens huge mistake, my life was not itself.”

“Compares in Mu En, the injury that Xishui receives is deeper. Is I, was I have destroyed her life. I love her, I am willing to pay all for her. My life is also her. I can only die in front of her, if one day, she died in front of me, then, I will follow her to go immediately. Therefore, nobody can convince me to leave her. Our lives, had already linked in one.”

The breath of Long Xiaoyao is somewhat rapid, but in the look has actually filled feeling relaxed, these many years, this is his first time says these words.

Although the story has not said that but everyone can guess to obtain, the following process inevitably is the tragedy.

In the Huo Yuhao heart is also five senses mixed Chen, he does not know one are should sympathize with this Darkness Sacred Dragon, is Teacher feels sorrowful. This tragedy, perhaps is really the arrangement of destiny.

Long Xiaoyao stands up, said: “I should walk. Treasures at present the person, young people. Remembers, after you cultivated to be over 98 levels, looked for me. I meet Xishui now.”Then, he in big strides walks toward outside.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong sit in the original position have not moved, the present situation as if became more complex. Listened to Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui story, they no doubt very much sympathize with the Ye Xishui bitter experience, but, the standpoint is impossible to change. Ye Xishui after is the true control of Holy Spirit Cult, under her leadership, Holy Spirit Cult does not know that has massacred many lives, even if Long Xiaoyao, in has the suspicion of helping a tyrant do evil. This is the fact that has no way to ignore.

The hostile standpoint will not change, but were also many a understanding, Huo Yuhao holds on the hand of Tang Wutong, the forced smile said: “Since, I had thought sufficing that our pain receive many, but, compared with Teacher, Senior Long as well as Ye Xishui, we as if are also lucky. At least, we can arrive at the same place finally. I now specially am really satisfied, I even want to lead you to turn around to run, forever is separated from this world, looked for one everyone unable to find our places to go to the life of living in seclusion. Occasionally has a look at the partners, to one's heart's content in the sceneries, that will be the how joyful matter!”

Tang Wutong stands up, arrives at side Huo Yuhao, sits to his leg on, is hugging his neck, own face complete fitting, in he cherishes.

Light soaking transmission, Tang Wutong tender body in slightly is shivering.

A moment ago Long Xiaoyao when narrated that story, she has been constraining her mood, at this time finally completely released.

“Teacher was really too pitiful, I can imagine, initially Teacher when spelled to fight with Innate Body Sect why will go all out. The Teacher strength, will not be certainly easy to receive the wound. Perhaps if to not protect Shrek, Teacher already had chosen the extrication. The distress in the Teacher heart withstanding, be more than and be also more profound Senior Long.”

Tang Wutong was saying in a low voice.

Huo Yuhao nod silently.

Mu En has not said to them and matter between Ye Xishui as well as the Long Xiaoyao. Until the death, he this secret deep burying in his heart of hearts, has not told anybody.

In the mind, was recalling the form of Teacher rickets, was recalling the Teacher old face, the Huo Yuhao also double pupil blushes.

Sun-Moon Empire, imperial palace.

Ye Xishui sits below first place, in hand is carrying tea, silently scented tea.

The Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace has tea very elegantly, selects the high camellia japonica, half fermentation, again by special method secret Zhi. Every year output is few, only then Imperial Family can have.

The light tea lingers fragrant, the Ye Xishui mood as if appears very tranquil, does not have many fluctuations.

On the first place, Xu Tianran sits on seat of honor, side him, Ju Zi(orange) that sits.

“Old Ye. This time matter, perhaps is really only a misunderstanding, but also asked Old Ye to spare and not punish too severely. I am willing expensive to teach some compensations. Expensive teaches to have any need, performs to raise.”Xu Tianran appears very polite, be with smile on the face saying.

Sat in his Ju Zi(orange) clear(ly) yellow court lady style of dress, did not say a word, without any response.

Ye Xishui puts down in the hand tea, the vision looks to Xu Tianran Ju Zi(orange), shows a faint smile, said: “Your majesty, if I with your important person? I want a person. How?”

Xu Tianran facial expression slightly one stiff, although he clearly knows what Ye Xishui said is, but asked something already known: “Whom do you want?”

Ye Xishui smiles cold, “I want the empress's on Holy Spirit Cult with me to walk. Does not know whether?”

Ju Zi(orange) tranquil sitting there, obeys the Xu Tianran instruction as before completely the appearance, expression not any change.

Xu Tianran is actually the complexion slightly changes, said: “Old Ye, this is not perhaps good. My harem is void, only then empress. Our affection is deep, this time matter, confusing. Was inferior that we attended to carry out the affective tone to investigate thoroughly first said again, how?”

Ye Xishui beckoned with the hand, said: “Did not need to investigate, with a wish to incriminate had no lack of a pretext. I have not thought you will investigate clear anything. Moreover, from your majesty all sorts of achievement, actually I was also clear your majesty choice is anything. Other was needless saying that your majesty idea, I understand, understood. Was joked a moment ago. Since your majesty chooses to give up us, that old body no other strove, but hopes that your majesty can also let off our Holy Spirit Cult. The old body is willing to lead Holy Spirit Cult to leave empire, goes to other source. Only strove for safely.”

Xu Tianran surprised looks at Ye Xishui, is this Grim Reaper Douluo that he knows? This really likely is not the words that this Holy Spirit Cult remote antiquity elder can say. Was this? So will say why?

Ye Xishui carries the tea, has drunk one, sighed, “old body was tired. This whole life, has accomplished nothing, only wants in the final days, static pass. Your majesty, in recent years, although Holy Spirit Cult has brought many troubles to you, but you have to acknowledge, we to some of your country merits. We hope that these merits can make your majesty teach means of livelihood to me. The old body satisfied.”

Xu Tianran laughs, said: “Old Ye, where words you are. Expensive teaches what course to follow, naturally is decided by you. Whatever, Holy Spirit Cult is our partners. The name of this national religion, perhaps......”

Ye Xishui said with a smile: “Some unwarranted reputations, do not want. Your majesty takes back freely is. I today, but to indicate the manner to your majesty. We will not retaliate anything again, but hopes that can obtain safely. All has been said that your majesty takes care, old body this left.”

Ye Xishui stands up, gradually walks toward outside, her step even somewhat limps, seems an old appearance.

Xu Tianran stands up, makes a hand signal of seeing off, but the under foot has not actually moved the slightest, but gazes after this Grim Reaper Douluo to go out of the main hall slowly, goes to outside.

Ju Zi(orange) doubts looks to Xu Tianran, said in a low voice: “Your majesty, what she said is real?”

Xu Tianran beckoned with the hand, on the face reveals one to sneer, “might tiger be a vegetarian? She more shows weakness, explained that the issue is bigger. Her knowledge must lull us, our plans not only need carry on, but must as soon as possible.”

In the Ju Zi(orange) eye the ray dodges, “that present......”

Xu Tianran has selected, the right hand makes an effort to wield downward.

Ju Zi(orange) stands up suddenly, turns around to bringing up the rear walks.

Ye Xishui goes out of the main hall front door, on the old face is revealing color of the feeling relaxed, should say that said finally. One should leave. No matter that Xu Tianran whether believes that oneself said that truly is the heart-to-heart talks.

These many years, cross are good tired and quite to be really tired. Teacher, that dies expensively, whatever, I did right by you. The following day, I only want to leave itself, with him!

Ye Xishui once more starting to walk step time, the dragon clock senile already vanished, displaces, is a liveliness, after gave up all, lively.

On her face is having a smile, originally pale were even many a ruddiness. Finally can put down all.

I always thought that any person, will have good side, everyone, has own story, has own pain and sadness, joyfully with being in love. On this world, who can say, oneself definitely are right? 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-600-part-3










Volume 13

#601 - Encircles Kills The Limit To Fight Luo'S Trap


At this time is in the afternoon, the sun started in the west, but the sunlight is as before intense, the choice enters the palace this time, for must express own sincerity, but in fact, regarding this cultivated for Evil Soul Master, although high noon will affect, but affects absolutely is not big.

“DDD drop!”The grating alarm sound, does not have omen suddenly has made a sound. Spreads over the entire imperial palace.

The Ye Xishui lively footsteps have stopped suddenly, the double pupil that she felt relaxed becomes piece of ice-cold, she knows that what she is then going to face is anything.

Xu Tianran, is not willing to let off him eventually. One have given him such good opportunity, even may be the final opportunity, he has made the choice. Xu Tianran, good, good! I must have a look but actually, why you leave behind the old body.

Gives a calm smile, the Ye Xishui right hand refers to the day, stands is freezing, the back, blood red light shadow reappeared quietly, is her Martial Soul, Blood Soul Devil Puppet.

An incomparably formidable mind pressure is centered on the body of Ye Xishui, blooms suddenly outward, in the surrounding hundred meters, all constructions change into the powder powder in the face of the oppression strength of this terror unexpectedly, eliminates a stretch of open area rapidly.

Since has gotten angry, Ye Xishui does not have the plan that any must show mercy.

In this time, four glares are shooting up to the sky, break in the midair, these four rays are very powerful, actually presents seven color gloss, after the ray ascends to heaven, to the central condensation, then changes into a huge illumination rapidly, covers the entire imperial palace completely. Suddenly, the imperial palace has covered enchanting seven color gloss, light arrives just like the god general.

This feeling without doubt is very wonderful, but Ye Xishui actually excitedly discoloration.

Is nine levels of Soul Engineer, although she for manufacturing Soul Guidance Device is famous, but the attainments in Soul Guidance Device aspect is also extremely profound. Let alone, this ray makes her be familiar, High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device didn't she possibly know? Because knew that she is also clearer this High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device the might to be fearful. That is can protect the strength of entire city!

A strength of person is strong, eventually humanity. To Ye Xishui this level, she had even guessed correctly, even if Gods that in that legend has, the strength also has the limit, just has surmounted the level of person.

But this High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device is actually nearly can increase infinitely, naturally, if increases to the certain extent, when including the earth is unable to withstand its prestige to be able, perhaps, it can the entire world destruction.

Increases infinitely, exists theoretically, in the reality is not necessarily able to appear, but, copes with a limit to bring to light, was enough.

Forms from imperial palace float, jet black Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, threatening oppression strength, intense Soul Power fluctuation.

Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp! The thumb in Sun-Moon Empire Hand of the National Protector, the strength of genuine ruler.

Moreover, besides them, surrounding some, has the massive Soul Engineer lift-offs similarly, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp and Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp, all arrived. At this time in this imperial palace, gathered over 2000 high level Soul Engineer unexpectedly. But most inner loop, an old man float in midair, vision brilliant is looking steadily at Ye Xishui.

“Hole! virtue! Bright!”Ye Xishui saying speak unhurriedly and clearly.

Kong Deming vision cold visits her, “Old Ye, I have known that one day we will resort to arms, but has not thought that on this day can come is so quick.”

Ye Xishui has smiled, her laughter is very incisive, listens not to be interesting to listen to anybody ear, “! Actually the old body also already thinks that will have appeared on this day, but has not thought that the Xu Tianran young child actually does not worry about the former friendship. Hey and hey.”

“It is not I do not worry about former friendship, because, we did not have the former friendship to discuss. These years, how many civilians your has Holy Spirit Cult massacred our country? This time, you kill my army, is cold my officers' heart. May accomplish the whole task at one stroke, because actually your sneak attacks have to withdraw troops toward, Old Ye, you may know that your Holy Spirit Cult has caused the how massive loss to the country? Don't I worry about the former friendship? Then, I ask you, Sun-Moon Empire that initially, that Innate Body Sect sect master Du Busi came killed my time, you and your teaching audiences where? At that time, thinks that you are also hoping I was killed, empire one chaotic, was favorable for you, did I have to speak incorrectly?”

Xu Tianran puts on bright yellow Humanoid Soul Guidance Device float in the midair, the whole person by that golden yellow Humanoid Soul Guidance Device gable, side him, at least ten nine levels of Soul Engineer was being revolved completely, Ju Zi(orange) in him behind, falls behind half position.

On the face the smiling face does not reduce, Ye Xishui said with a smile: “With a wish to incriminate has no lack of a pretext, let alone, by my Holy Spirit Cult reputation, even if throws these filthy water on us, we could not explain. War-God Empress, is really good to plan! Does not know when our Holy Spirit Cult did offend you?”She has not gone to look at Xu Tianran, actually fell the vision on Ju Zi(orange).

Ju Zi(orange) said indifferently: “Your Holy Spirit Cult has not offended me, what offends is our army and my people, the state of our country. The evil strength cannot exist in the universal empires. Any reason, our army of your Holy Spirit Cult attack, now is whether or not unimportant. More importantly, Holy Spirit Cult must forever vanishes from this world, can never exist again.”

On the Ye Xishui face reveals color suddenly, “original, your majesty must perish my Holy Spirit Cult, the old body understood. Really big weaponry! Father of Kong Deming Soul Engineer, these many acquaintances, these many Soul Engineer, to deal with an old body person, it seems like, your majesty attach great importance to the old body, the old body is very grateful. Does not know that your many people, do keep under the old body today? If I walked today, in the future, I every month, will destroy one to belong to the city of empire, making many Wraith Soul encourage my strength, turns into the ghost legendary creature till Sun-Moon Empire completely.”

Her smiling said these words, but, nobody thought that she was the lies, this was the most fearful place. A powerhouse of hysteria is not fearful, what is fearful, what her hysteria is that sane.

Xu Tianran complexion big change, if Ye Xishui now Tianzhen ran, then, really can be the disaster of empire, in his heart, raises a regret. After is Limit Douluo! Even if cannot use for oneself, should not become her enemy, this consequence, is extremely really hard to withstand.

However, things have gotten to this point, has not regretted after the fact may eat, whatever, must work. Let alone, Xu Tianran does not believe completely that under this aspect, this Grim Reaper Douluo also has the possibility of going on living at present. In order to arrange this trap, Sun-Moon Empire has paid the enormous price.

Then by safety masks of four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device arrangement, not only to guard against Ye Xishui runs away, to guard against Darkness Sacred Dragon Long Xiaoyao comes to rescue.

They even calculated including the Long Xiaoyao mentality, Long Xiaoyao must not be Evil Soul Master, he had his bottom line, in any event, by his status, is will not get rid to the general publics absolutely. After killing Ye Xishui, how Darkness Sacred Dragon will retaliate, that was a different matter. In news that in Ju Zi(orange) has, Darkness Sacred Dragon when the previous attack, was injured, and should be heavy. Therefore, this time, it can be said that once in a thousand years opportunity.

Kong Deming sighed, said: “Ye Xishui, clashes your words, you have to take the [say / way]. Today, the old man must enforce justice on behalf of Heaven, extinguishes your Blood Soul Devil Puppet.”At the same time was saying, Kong Deming lifts the hand toward Ye Xishui, golden light projects from his hand together suddenly.

Ye Xishui coldly snorted, lifts the hand similarly, toward Kong Deming direction one finger, immediately, the blood light, shoots to go toward the Kong Deming electricity together.

Terrifying Soul Power fluctuation from addendum circle unceasing braving, that is Soul Engineer in the savings strength, starts the omen of linkage attack. Facing Grim Reaper Douluo, must whole-heartedly. The strength that all can use, must use.

The blood light arrives at beyond the Kong Deming body first five meters, had been blocked by golden light, the innumerable Wraith Soul whinning sounds resound through the sky, but is actually not able to enter that golden light half minute.

But that Kong Deming sends out said golden light, actually in suddenly split from the Ye Xishui also five meters places, changes into golden Halo, on the wrap toward Ye Xishui went.

The body of Ye Xishui suddenly became illusory, but dodged, has been separated from that golden Halo range, golden Halo fell in the ground, vanished does not see. Even has not left any trace on the ground.

The Ye Xishui incisive laughter resounds through the imperial palace, both hands lifts upwardly, back Blood Soul Devil Puppet the blood puts immediately brilliantly, intense blood light burst out suddenly, from the sky changes into bunch of huge Wraith Soul, toward flushes away in all directions. Each group of Wraith Soul have the head size, altogether is 12 groups. Their, in the entire imperial palace has the feeling of reactionary reign of terror.

Blood Soul **! This is Ye Xishui becoming famous secret art, each Blood Soul ** Blood Soul that refines, is undergoes her over a hundred years of practice, 10,000 Wraith Soul swallow under the secret technique function mutually, finally the surplus most powerhouses, can achievement Blood Soul. But this Blood Soul also needs long-term feeding Wraith Soul, can become more formidable.

Blood Soul just took shape time, be only the fingernail size, can raise the head size, this must swallow many Wraith Soul to achieve Ah? not only, moreover must swallow Wraith Soul, but must swallow Wraith Soul of powerhouse, Wraith Soul is more formidable, Blood Soul grows is also quicker.

Today's third! Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-601-part-1





Volume 13

#601 - Encircles Kills The Limit To Fight Luo'S Trap


This Blood Soul delays to do, the formidable resentment direct soul will fall into enemy hands, cultivates for insufficient, even the soul will be attracted directly in its severe Xiaosheng, was swallowed. Extremely overbearing, vicious.

The fight from the beginning, Ye Xishui will press the bottom the thing to display, obviously she was prepares to go all out.

Sees that bunch of Blood Soul, the Kong Deming complexion also becomes serious, " person, has blocked, cannot make them run out outward. " Was saying at the same time, his both hands lift, sends out together golden light respectively, simultaneously surrounds two groups of Blood Soul.

Ten nine levels of Soul Engineer side Xu Tianran separate rapidly, is one person controls one group similarly, displayed itself to press the bottom the unique skill.

Ye Xishui sneers, in double pupil, blood brilliant Sheng, in an instant, her long hair turned into the scarlet unexpectedly completely, back Blood Soul Devil Puppet floods into her within the body suddenly, dissolves with her as one.

Immediately, the Ye Xishui body rises suddenly one time, the glittering and translucent carving scarlet makes her seem like, terrifying blood energy that the ruby congeals becomes turns wells up, seethes with excitement just like the wave generally outward, blooms.

" Bloodshed is boundless! " Ye Xishui screamed one.

The surrounding construction, moves bloodshed, instantaneously on smiling face. But this bloodshed, blots out the sky general, toward distant place airborne spread in the past.

Worthily is Limit Douluo, worthily is Holy Spirit Cult most formidable Evil Soul Master, under the so disadvantageous aspect, she likely will actually want to present all Soul Engineer by strength of the to catch the whole lot in a dragnet! Is this what kind self-confidence?

Xu Tianran anger snort|hum, in hand were many a handle exquisite scepter, the scepter length only then the ruler, above has seven colored gems of fist size. The scepter holds up, toward Ye Xishui direction one finger. Immediately, in the sky, seven color light beams, directly soar the Ye Xishui bombardment to go together loudly.

That is the High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device strength, initially. He relies on Bright Capital City four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device defends, protects the common people. But this time, he actually uses these small High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device to attack.

Ye Xishui has not dodged, in fact she did not fend. Both hands make a movement of lifting, immediately, that bloodshed upward to rush forth, changes into at the same time the giant shield, keeps off to seven color glares that drops from the clouds.

" Bang! " Fierce thunders crack, the powerful shock-wave erupts suddenly. Encircles to release Soul Guidance Protective Cover in surrounding 11 nine levels of Soul Engineer fully, in addition airborne Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer collaborate to release the guard shield, completely prevents this shock-wave, does not let its outward diffusion.

The terrifying explosion then just started, a series of thundering resound unceasingly. The bloodshed turns wells up, has withstood the bombardment of that seven color rays unexpectedly stiffly. However, the discerning person can actually be able to see that bloodshed is reducing, under the bombardment of High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device. Is changing is small.

Sneers to reappear on the face of Xu Tianran, even if Limit Douluo, contends with High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device absolutely not to have the opportunity with individual strength.

Today he biggest relying on, in fact is High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, but Soul Engineer, more important protects him, as well as entire imperial palace. This kills the bureau. Is the first experiment, stares the merit, in the future, the development of High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device will invest a huger money.

Ye Xishui does not know absolutely that in the High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device research, Sun-Moon Empire invested has surpassed any time in the past fund. Is headed by Kong Deming, seven nine levels of Soul Engineer are the core component members of research, the material of consumption, money, is immeasurable.

This is the Soul Guidance Technology strength.

The Ye Xishui form suddenly appeared in the midair, as before was the blood red. The body of Kong Deming is almost flickers to move is keeping off before her.

They collided suddenly.

Kong Deming flying upside down, the whole body is actually golden light four shoots. But Ye Xishui is returns airborne.

Surroundings, several rays simultaneously toward her body bombardment, but, the linkage attack arrived finally.

The linkage attacks of surrounding three Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp are good, that is three glares, what is most fearful is most inner loop, by 300 the linkage attack that is worn Humanoid Soul Guidance Device Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer to launch, that is together jet black such as the beam of black ink, like the water jar, the place visited, in the air has left behind a deep crack thickly directly, moreover is unable to close unexpectedly.

Even if by the Ye Xishui strength, when feeling the prestige of that black beam can, the complexion changes. This strength, already completely not under that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device in the attack that sent out. Does the Sun-Moon Royal Family soul lead the group to be unexpectedly formidable to so the situation? No wonder Xu Tianran dares to begin to oneself.

Has the idea is a matter, how to deal is a different matter.

The red light twinkle, three groups of Blood Soul shake off the fetter suddenly, has blocked a linkage attack of Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp respectively, three groups of Blood Soul have sent out the sad and shrill pitiful yell, but that three attacks actually stiffly was blocked. But Ye Xishui, actually directly suffered that to come from the attack of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp.

Hit! The Xu Tianran great happiness, is formidable regarding the linkage attack of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, he is clear. That is not the manpower can contend, even if Limit Douluo is not good.

Described with the appraisal of Kong Deming is, even if had ten levels of Soul Engineer to exist, was also impossible to block such attack. Limit Douluo is not good, perhaps, only then the strength of gods, living that may resist.

Did Ye Xishui die?

The blood light is defeated and dispersed! From the sky disperses, vanishes. Has not left any trace, even Ye Xishui has not sent out a pitiful yell.

But, did she die really?

" Be careful, she has not died. " Kong Deming gives a loud shout suddenly.

[!] Blood Soul is exploded suddenly by nine levels of Soul Engineer are limiting, changes into the blood rain to scatter in all directions, the body of Ye Xishui in that group of blood light leaves the womb, but 0.1 palms light according to airborne.

Sees only on that nine levels of Soul Engineer to shine several rays one after another, defense guard shield class ability that all was stimulated, but under flickers, his chest place presented blood red being in charge, the whole person chest caves, the mouth spurts blood flying upside down, is in airborne, one group of Blood Soul separate from Ye Xishui within the body, the hate and soul when swallows he died presents stiffly.

Suddenly, Ye Xishui whole body blood brilliant Sheng, toward that nine levels of Soul Engineer inspiration, intense blood energy was swallowed into within the body by her immediately, but that nine levels of Soul Engineer actually turned into a piece of flying ash, from the sky dissipates, terrifying pressure also in instantaneous ascension. Intense blood light from the sky glitters, reverberation.

Nine levels of Soul Engineer such died. Moreover, his strength has also encouraged the Ye Xishui strength.

This is the Limit Douluo Evil Soul Master terrifying ability, even if that formidable linkage attack, cannot kill her, instead while mounting to have killed nine levels of Soul Engineer by her.

However, Kong Deming notes, formerly 12 groups of Blood Soul, turned into 11 groups now, obviously, attack of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp is by no means useless.

The terrifying attack flickers the arrival below, a glare arrives, seven color halos reverberate in the sky, High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device second time launched the attack.

Some face muscle distortions of Xu Tianran, like Ye Xishui have not thought strength that he controls already so formidable, he has not thought that this Limit Douluo displays really fully, so will be unexpectedly terrorist, under the hopeless situation, already can easy striking kill own nine levels of Soul Engineer.

Ye Xishui coldly snorted, the body turned into the blood red instantaneously. Flash when that seven color rays drop, her whole body exploded the blood fog to vanish.

Also is one group of Blood Soul explodes, with formerly was almost exactly the same, her palm struck in nine levels of Soul Engineer fronts, looked like crushed bean curd, killed that nine levels of Soul Engineer, swallows its blood energy and soul. Although Blood Soul because of this, but has been short of one, but Ye Xishui imposing manner was actually more powerful.

What secret technique is this? Unexpectedly is so terrorist? The reduction of Blood Soul, actually likely is she in the savings strength! This was really too fearful, where because nobody can see her limit.

" Compels Blood Soul, all compels into. Attacks Blood Soul! " Kong Deming is directing loudly.

Nobody knows where the Ye Xishui weakness, can only attempt, from the beginning, he does not think that can easy striking kill Limit Douluo. Otherwise did not need to make so fully prepares. Now they must do, but carries on the protracted war. In the protracted war, drags gradually this Limit Douluo.

Ye Xishui coldly snorted, the body changes into myriad blood shades suddenly, to plunders in all directions.

Just prepared to launch the linkage attack imperial Soul Engineer Corp to lose the goal of locking immediately, wanted to lock Limit Douluo, sometimes, was impossible.

However, several linkage defense guard shields are effective, has blocked the corrosion of these blood light stiffly. Guard shield nine levels of Soul Engineer also while this opportunity, in abundance withdraw to the guard shield edge.

The blood light dissipates, Ye Xishui reappears the flash, the guard shield compresses suddenly inward, this is other nine levels of Soul Engineer under Kong Deming the consistent movement that leads to make.

Formidable oppression strength extrudes inward, the terrifying prestige can promote 0.9 levels of Soul Engineer to move to shape changing positions instantaneously instantaneously, while linkage defense that outer layer imperial family Soul Engineer Corp rapidly remove, has fallen back on the addendum circle.

The plan must annihilate it at one fell swoop, since now could not achieve, uses the overall strength to tow her. This is the second plan.

In this second plan, most important must to remove.

Nine levels of Soul Engineer died they, such casualties speed is Sun-Moon Empire cannot withstand absolutely. On the Xu Tianran forehead is blue vein suddenly Tiao. If were not worried that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device is overheated, he wishes one could to continue to launch attacks .752



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-601-part-2





Volume 13

#601 - Encircles Kills The Limit To Fight Luo'S Trap


Ye Xishui float in midair, on face is revealing the color of disdaining, around the body, ten groups of Blood Soul are circling regarding her.

“Two nine levels of Soul Engineer Wraith Soul, are really the good things! However, Soul Engineer is Soul Engineer, in the soul intensity, was far with the true Titled Douluo difference. Really somewhat was a pity.”At the same time was saying, she was also sighing shaking the head, on audiences Soul Engineer foreheads that looked at blue vein suddenly Tiao.

Ye Xishui coldly looks at the Xu Tianran direction, “wants to kill me, that continues to attack, actually having a look at you to consume many strengths. What a pity, you as before are actually not necessarily able successfully.”At the same time was saying, the body of Ye Xishui falls suddenly to the ground.

A palm pressed in ground.

Intense blood light bursts out in the ground, the grating bellow underground resounds in the entire imperial palace, reverberation.

Xu Tianran and Kong Deming are the complexion change. They understand certainly that Ye Xishui must do. The airborne defense, she cannot break, wants to is impossible. However, even if High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device cannot protect the earth. Although the imperial palace underground has the extremely powerful defense, but this defensive power is insufficient. At least is not enough to defend Limit Douluo.

The earth is shivering, Huo Yuhao and ground of Tang Wutong under foot similarly is also shivering.

They in the roast meat shop, have not stood on the street, is the same with many people, looks at airborne is sparkling seven color light barrier.

The people do not certainly know that what happened, in their opinion, in Sun-Moon Empire has this unusual scene to be normal. Soul Guidance Technology strikes root in the hearts of the people here.

Huo Yuhao brow tight wrinkle, from the angle of view of upper air, he can see the lots, the guard shield that but, that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device forms, his Spiritual Power cannot go, can only sees inside some situations.

The earth shivers, he guessed correctly indistinctly Ye Xishui is doing. Yes, the earth perhaps is the way that she can escape only. Xu Tianran in this aspect really not any preparation? But Soul Guidance Protective Cover wants to release under the ground, is not impossible, but actually extremely costs the time . Moreover the intensity is also hard-to-control. Can be able to block Limit Douluo?

Tang Wutong turns head to look to Huo Yuhao, said: “You hope that who they do win?”

Huo Yuhao is almost [say / way] without hesitation: “Xu Tianran.”

Tang Wutong surprised [say / way]: “You listened to the Long Xiaoyao senior to narrate among them a moment ago the story, to Ye Xishui senior not any sympathy?”

Huo Yuhao said: “I sympathize with their bitter experiences very much, but, if I, I as before will also kill Ye Xishui. This matter has not resulted in discussed. Can you imagine? Once violent anger Limit Douluo level Evil Soul Master escapes the prisoner's cage, what happened? Although I to a Sun-Moon Empire not favorable impression, but does not hope that saw the innocent common people were slaughtered, the loss of life picture crazily. Therefore, Ye Xishui must die. If she clashes, then, we must not hesitate at all costs strikes to kill her. Even if facing the Old Long anger, refuses to balk.”

Categorical that Huo Yuhao these words said that without any hesitant.

Tang Wutong nod of silently, said: “Fight started a while, why does Holy Spirit Cult nobody aid Ye Xishui? Did they fear death this degree?”

Huo Yuhao shakes the head saying: “No. This definitely is the Ye Xishui arrangement, she is easier to withdraw, but if Holy Spirit Cult comes the person, can resist that four Soul Engineer Corp? Only can bring death in vain, Holy Spirit Cult these times are the loss were serious recently, Ye Xishui makes certainly them leave first, oneself enter the imperial palace. Really was a pity, until now, where we do not know the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters. The words that otherwise goes to now, will certainly find many opportunities to start.”

In this time, suddenly, is falling in front of Huo Yuhao together black light. Huo Yuhao lifts the hand, black light will catch.

That is a black paper, above wrote with the Bai Se (White Color) pigment, looks at the above character, in the Huo Yuhao eye has flashed through surprised, is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, turns around to walk.

In the imperial palace, the ground after was shivering fiercely for ten several seconds, is peaceful, a depth of ten zhang (3.33 m) endocrater, that appears in the ground.

Under the imperial palace unexpectedly is the midheaven, this palm, has laid out a burrow directly.

Ye Xishui without hesitation fell, for this reason, she resurfaces the price that two Blood Soul have exploded.

Although in the mausoleum chamber also possibly has institution, but, most minimum that inside terrain is complex, only then uses these complex, she has the possibility of escaping. Therefore, even if Xu Tianran in underground has any arrangement, she must go to face.

Ye Xishui falls underground. Xu Tianran sighed, shaking the head of gently. Then the corners of the mouth place reveals to wipe the smile that the crafty plot prevails. Waves, the airborne seven color rays disperse suddenly, but he is the earliest possible time brings Ju Zi(orange) to fly to the upper air. Not only he. Kong Deming, nine levels of Soul Engineer as well as four Soul Engineer Corp, all soars, flies toward the upper air.

The black form suddenly appears in sky together, is almost without hesitation leaps up toward the imperial palace. Low and deep dragon roar sound along with it resounding.

Xu Tianran clearly saw that black form, but has not actually issued any order to prevent him to enter, on the face instead reveals more smiling faces.

Seven color rays shine, four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device simultaneously burst out compared with formerly a more intense ray. This time, below the ground in imperial palace, as if turned into one piece seven colored.

“Bang”thunders in the mausoleum chamber resounds. The blood light shines together.

Seven color ray balls that Ye Xishui suddenly appeared fly outrageously, cannot clash eventually.

Xu Tianran has smiled, “Ye Xishui, you have not certainly thought that I will plan you with an imperial palace for the price. I am very clear, want to kill you to be going to pay the how huge price. Consumption, but forces you to take risk. Otherwise, consumes, what special ability if you do have again what to do? Therefore, here, is your tomb. Perhaps you cannot think that the true function of my four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, is becomes your coffin, protects Bright Capital City, does not make withering away of imperial palace affect Bright Capital City all. Has not thought that Darkness Sacred Dragon is such cordiality is unexpectedly grave to you, this is really good cannot the good result, bye, Grim Reaper Douluo, look your god of death. Dragon God Douluo is buried along with the dead, is really good.”

At the same time was saying, Xu Tianran presses to start suddenly under a scepter button.

The entire Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace first is slight shivered, under the imperial palace ground, erupted a red-orange brilliance suddenly, this red-orange, just started was very weak, but emitted from the cracks of imperial palace ground outward. But quick, these cracks start to increase, has many rays to raise from inside. Intense red-orange rays and four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device seven color rays complement each other fresh splendor.

Slight trembling sound resounds unceasingly, must know that this is under the protection of High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, shake that passes on as before, this must how terrifying shake strength have so the scene!

Huo Yuhao just and Tang Wutong did not go out far, did not have the Bright Capital City range, they have almost turned also round, see, was huge red-orange bright sphere, but position that bright sphere was, was the Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace!

The Huo Yuhao complexion immediately becomes a paleness, “good ruthless and good ruthless Xu Tianran, he takes an imperial palace as the price unexpectedly, copes Grim Reaper Douluo. Old Long, how Old Long did not know, we went back.”Huo Yuhao without hesitation draws Tang Wutong to run on the round trip. Long Xiaoyao does not know any situation, Ye Xishui definitely was the downcast in the imperial palace. This is Xu Tianran must kill strikes, he very much has certainly confidence.

At this moment, the mentality in Huo Yuhao mind was completely clear, he understands finally Xu Tianran planned Ye Xishui with what kind of plan.

The imperial palace, is a complete trap, in that imperial palace, arranged certainly nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, actually as to have arranged several, he does not know, but wanted to get rid of Limit Douluo, absolutely was not one and two can achieve.

High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device from beginning to end is a fraud, lets the line of sight of Ye Xishui continuously on this Soul Guidance Device.

High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device is truly strong, but, is used to defend, it nearly is invincible existence, is used to attack time looks like or has disadvantage to exist. Xu Tianran resists nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball large explosion with it surely! Meanwhile, explodes is compressed in certain space, the destructive power can only be the unceasing enhancement, strengthens to an extremely terrifying degree. Grim Reaper Douluo, ended!

No wonder, no wonder when close imperial palace will have that intense sense of crisis. If at this time, oneself and Wutong stealth in the imperial palace, that definitely will also suffer as an innocent bystander! Even if runs promptly, definitely will be discovered by these Sun-Moon Empire powerhouses, the bitter experience besieges. Facts showed that own sensation is correct, has not entered in the imperial palace, has rescued itself and Wutong life.

The red-orange ray is still unexpectedly strengthened, day after day the ray of airborne sunlight had been inferior by it, if from the upper air bird's eye view, will certainly see at this time that Bright Capital City Core Area territory were many a Sun, is glittering intensely according to red ray Sun, this Sun that magnificent, but, in that the range of Sun, was flooding the death magnificently.

Xu Tianran flown high, although defers to the thorough computation, High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device can resist this large explosion, but he flies high, by far. The gentlemen are not built on under the danger wall, this point he does is very proper.

----

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-601-part-3





Volume 13

#602 - Does The Limit Fight Perishing Of Luo?


Ju Zi(orange) follows in Xu Tianran behind, this plan is she and Xu Tianran designs together. Naturally, the plan had, she helped Xu Tianran improve. Make the entire plan more flawless. Also because had this plan, makes Xu Tianran set firm resolve in the final moment.

The plan shows perfectly, falls into including Darkness Sacred Dragon, Holy Spirit Cult two big Limit Douluo falls into a trap completely, Holy Spirit Cult ended, the remaining strength ran away, did not look in the Xu Tianran eye. Without two Limit Douluo, the threat of Holy Spirit Cult is not anything, exterminates these surplus Evil Soul Master, is not the extremely difficult matter.

Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp keeps side Xu Tianran to protect him, other three Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp disperse in the imperial palace upper air, various Surveying Soul Guidance Device all lock in this region, once Darkness Sacred Dragon and Grim Reaper Douluo can find a way out, then, can encounter to their ruinous attacks. They are the last step of this dead end.

Large quantities of armies from have welled up toward the imperial palace around at this time in all directions, the people were scattered, are centered on the imperial palace, surroundings dozens li (0.5km) declare martial law completely.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong naturally in this row, under the protection of Imitation Soul Ability, they easily did not enter in this range.

That red-orange glare is continuing unexpectedly as before, obviously internal explosion is fearful, Huo Yuhao is not willing to attempt, that inside superhigh temperature, likely will reach as high as several thousand degrees, that will not be the human body can withstand. Even if he is Absolute Ice Transcendent Douluo is not good.

Too ruthless, was really too ruthless!

Ju Zi(orange), is this your plan or Xu Tianran?

In the sky, Ju Zi(orange) also in all that in the bird's eye view tread has, the corners of the mouth place also similarly reveals a smile, with sneering of Xu Tianran and self-satisfied different, her smiling face is very warm.

In the imperial palace, all important people early shifted, includes her son, stays behind is used to confuse Grim Reaper Douluo in waits on, Grim Reaper Douluo must die, must have some people to bury, not?

They must die, if they do not die, in the near future, Yuhao must face them. Grim Reaper Douluo will not let off his, he will not let off Grim Reaper Douluo, the only solution, the side died. Yuhao, I helped your to get rid of two formidable enemies, you are safer.

Thinks the man in own heart is safe, Ju Zi(orange) smiles is very happy, but, during is happy, a bitterness and astringency. Because this man will never be him. May work for him, she as before will be very happy. Although she knows that he does not hope one such do.

Ju Zi(orange) always likes solving the problem with the simplest way, the Holy Spirit Cult issue, should to solve. Somewhat only what is a pity, the Xu Tianran strength had not been weakened too. Side him, the massive masters exist. Naturally, another plan also started.

Takes the imperial palace as the price, this plan was really good. Without the imperial palace, did not have High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, as for using Bright Capital City High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, that is not the easy matter, wasn't that four energy, prompted by own, reassigned in imperial palace these four? Otherwise can guarantee that the explosion power doesn't leak?

The so-called open intrigue, with must handle the matter that and must complete own plan. Open and aboveboard, actually did not fear that others were not swindled. Is promoting the open intrigue, is Power of Destiny.

Thinks of here, Ju Zi(orange) smiles was happier. Even if that man forever is not himself, eventually also the man is own, that is, my son.

He called Yuhao, the rain to clouds, Hao to vast, therefore, my son, called Yunhan.

Xu Tianran does not certainly know that is having such thought in own wife heart unexpectedly, this time he, completely is in the stimulated mood. Can strike to kill Limit Douluo, moreover is two, this in Sun-Moon Empire absolutely is the first time. Even if previous time kills Innate Body Douluo Du Busi time, he so is not excited, Du Busi is the suicide . Moreover, Du Busi is not Limit Douluo!

This time forcing out, will certainly keep the annals. This is my merit.

“Ha Ha!”The Xu Tianran supine Tianchang smiles, the laughter was deafening, frightens nearby Ju Zi(orange) to jump.

“Holy Spirit Cult withers away in light of this, then, our goals are Dou Ling and Star Luo. Ju Zi(orange), I give you one year of recuperation army, fills up to strength, supplements Soul Engineer. One year later, I will assign you to subjugate the world grand marshal once more, you replace me, series Continent. I must make entire Douluo Continent tread to shiver in my Sun-Moon Empire oppression of the people. Let them the fear in the Soul Guidance Device ray. When the last country was also destroyed, this piece of Continent no longer called Douluo, but called Sun-Moon!”

“I will not ruin Shrek Academy, although it has been doing with me right, is, in my heart, that is the Soul Master supreme palace, I am also Soul Master. When we unified Continent that day, Shrek must submit to us, to that time, I have worn the Shrek Academy school uniform, attended a lecture in the Academy best classroom, interpreting a dream childhood strongest wish. I will bestow Shrek Academy am Sun-Moon Royal Family Academy, making it forever my Sun-Moon Empire part. Assists the inheritance of my Sun-Moon Empire century ten thousand years.”

“Your majesty long live, long live and long live.”Imperial Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer shouted " long live " before the emperor to long live under the leadership of Ju Zi(orange).

In the Xu Tianran eye, full is the frantic color, stimulated being unable to restrain oneself, he as if saw that entire Douluo Continent shivers the picture that in own under foot and submits.

Kong Deming silently float in Xu Tianran behind, in the eye is glittering the light ray, similarly has the excitement in that ray, yes! So long as is the Sun-Moon Empire person, who meets is not Xu Tianran is stimulated?

Red-orange ray after continuing enough quarter, finally started to weaken. The speed of weaken is very slow, seven color guard shields that is formed by four High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, became the ray is unexpectedly dim, filament thin can only see indistinctly seven color rays were glittering.

Too fearful, inside large explosion was really too fearful, even if were Soul Guidance Protective Cover that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device formed, nearly must unable to resist its prestige energy unexpectedly.

“Ju Zi(orange), you are right, luckily our High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device energy transfer outer city most, although enabled the outer city sufficiently to need for a long time, but has completed finally, resisted. If lets inside terrifying energy leak, perhaps one-third Bright Capital City must vanish since then. You make the great merit, how making me enjoy you!”

Ju Zi(orange) shows a faint smile, respectful [say / way]: “Can follow side your majesty, witnesses your majesty becomes an eternity emperor who unifies Continent, is to the highest reward of Ju Zi(orange).”

“Ha Ha, said well, said really well!”Xu Tianran laughs once more loudly, he for a long time so willfully to one's heart's content has not crossed very much. Even if initially ascended the throne does not have.

Because now and was initially different, initial he, was unable to control this stretch of earth completely, but now, he is truly the supreme king, has controlled domestic all, the official military commander admires all. Integrates in Sky Soul Empire the empire territory thoroughly. Now feels uneasy general Holy Spirit Cult two big Limit Douluo also to destroy continually. Can he not be excited?

He cannot suppress his mood again, because, on this world, anything cannot question that his sound, an eternity emperor, a good eternity emperor, I to be a that eternity emperor!

In the Xu Tianran heart was full of the frantic mood, both hands has made a fist, if because of the issue of both legs, he does not hope one can the royal cart draft, witnessed the Sun-Moon Empire army to trample flat the entire Douluo Continent magnificent feat with own eyes!

The red-orange brilliance weakens continually, can see the High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device light barrier internal situation gradually.

light barrier appears very clean, after a point does not have the large explosion, should appear in confusion. The ground is clean, because, the ground did not have, has a giant gulf. In the surroundings of this gulf, completely is the scarlet red, looked like the rock magma just had flowed, bottom of the gulf, the flame liquid flowed, but also in unceasing undercutting. Internal ray completely is a piece of distortion, because the high temperature is the result.

Imperial palace originally, can see only, is most surrounding four corner, then High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device outside High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device guard shield. Only has them, but also is well-preserved, but above, started to brave the intermittent black smoke, obviously did not lose the heavy load, must damage shortly thoroughly.

Can several next two Limit Douluo, such loss Sun-Moon Empire be able to withstand. Xu Tianran regarding this, did not mind.

Really good terror large explosion! Ten, the entire ten nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely. Being used is two Limit Douluo buries, they were also proud.

These ten install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely is same attribute, the high energy, rupturing and high temperature, this is their functions.

Any, can ruin a medium-sized city easily, but now, ten might compress in together, compresses in this narrow and small space, that terror high temperature and explosive force, even if Gods, is not necessarily able to survive.

Xu Tianran smiles is very happy, then must do, but cleans up the aftermath.

“Bang”in low and deep dull thumping sound sound, High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device was unable to withstand the load finally, explodes. Thick black smoke lift-off, airborne seven color light barrier one empty, the chain-reaction appears, around the imperial palace High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device of other three corners explode successively, raising intermittent thick smoke.

Damaged eventually, but their functions have also realized, the price that this time, Sun-Moon Empire pays is nothing less than big, in two nine levels of Soul Engineer deaths, in the imperial palace were massive wait on to be buried along with the dead, four latest High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device and ten nine levels installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely. If these things weigh with money, constructed a big city sufficiently.

But Xu Tianran is very as before happy, because, if makes two Limit Douluo act independently, destructiveness that they can bring, but is far from a city can compare!

Did not have the protections of seven color guard shields, the high fever to spew out instantaneously, diverged to the surroundings, in a short time, the entire Bright Capital City temperature has promoted, particularly from imperial palace near place, was becomes a high temperature.

Matter that this does not have the means that Xu Tianran already had prepared luckily, the water dragon team started to spout water columns in the surroundings rapidly, the pouring to the giant gulf in imperial palace.

The thick mist fills the air immediately, changes into the giant fog group to be splendid sight.

Float Xu Tianran in upper air, be with smile on the face said to Ju Zi(orange): “Our imperial palace reconstruction time, the mausoleum chamber has not needed to open cutting, has compared was deeper . Moreover the surroundings had been baked by the high temperature, inevitably becomes more solid.”

“DDD!”The grating alarm sound suddenly resounds, towering that the warning comes, airborne some Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp of relaxation are almost the earliest possible time had released the linkage defense guard shield, protected Xu Tianran and Ju Zi(orange) and the others, the king safety at this time without doubt was most important.

“What's the matter?”Xu Tianran shouted to clear the way fierce.

“Opens reports your majesty, under has the Soul Power fluctuation and mind fluctuation appears. The scale is very big, covers the imperial palace.”Immediately some people reply, various Surveying Soul Guidance Device of Sun-Moon Empire most high-end here, any slightest sign of trouble will be discovered.

The Xu Tianran complexion instantaneously becomes gloomy, “attack, to imperial palace position all-out attack.”He does not dare to imagine, if that two Limit Douluo are also living, what happened.

The mist turned into the snow dance, the snowflake of big piece dances in the air above the imperial palace, the woods cold aura is scattering scalding hot, is cut off all Surveying Soul Guidance Device and lines of sight.

Fierce thundering resounds unceasingly, gulf that imperial palace explodes in fierce thundering unceasing becomes must be deeper, various rays stir the snowflake crush, the terrifying explosive force made entire Bright Capital City shiver.

Gripping of Ju Zi(orange) unconsciousness tightened the double fist, she recognizes certainly that snowflake the origin, the fool! Did you here do at this time? Do you want to rescue that Grim Reaper Douluo? Why?

Huo Yuhao not to her answer, because, when that ten thousand artillery fire, he with the Tang Wutong same place, leading another two people quietly to escape, runs away toward the distant place. Under Imitation Soul Ability and function of Spiritual Disturbance domain, the martial law of army is only the joke.

Long Xiaoyao clothes have disappeared completely, displace, was one is fired dark red black dragon scales.

The Ye Xishui whole body sends out unexpectedly is filling with the Light aura, sacred just likes the holy angel. Her body unexpectedly becomes somewhat transparent. The Blood Soul Devil Puppet aura vanished to disappear completely.

Beyond Douluo Continent hardbound belt brand- the new second volume, already in our Taobao Shops: Dazzles world Tang Sect to go on the market! Welcome everybody to purchase.

Yesterday I went to the screenplay symposium, at present the script detailed program has handled, then improves the detail, started the visual effect team to construct. The original progress is invariable. Can disclose ahead of time to everybody's good news is, our Douluo, will use the Hollywood Team to photograph, the screenwriter and visual effect team and director, establish provisionally at present all uses the Hollywood secondary roles. The total investment will create the home. Certainly diligently makes the Douluo series profound imaginary big piece to give to everybody continuously! 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-602





Volume 13

#603 - Double Gear-Driven


Long Xiaoyao is shouldering Ye Xishui, on the face of Ye Xishui is actually glittering the strange gloss, looks at Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, the look actually extraordinary tranquility.

“First left here to say again!”This is Long Xiaoyao saw after Huo Yuhao, first few words that spoke.

But before, in instant, Huo Yuhao that High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device guard shield vanished received passes message of Long Xiaoyao, he only said three characters, shielded me.

In that flash, Huo Yuhao actually hesitant, although he only hears the Long Xiaoyao sound, but his some premonitions, Ye Xishui has not died, at least now has not died. Has rescued Long Xiaoyao, was equal to rescuing Ye Xishui.

But in a moment later, him set firm resolve. The graciousness is the graciousness, the enmity is enmity, has the graciousness to repay a debt of gratitude, having a grudge naturally revenges. At present this situation, he can only choose repays a debt of gratitude first said again, but, even if after is, Long Xiaoyao must detain, he will not let off Ye Xishui. Once this kind of Evil Soul Master Limit Douluo outside putting, is the widely-noted catastrophe.

The crazy bang exploded randomly continues the time of entire quarter to end, Xu Tianran or Ju Zi(orange), the complexion was a paleness, particularly Xu Tianran, this time he, on the skin presented goose flesh obviously.

If, if Dragon Emperor Douluo and Grim Reaper Douluo have not died, this price, no one can withstand. Two Limit Douluo anger, even may let entire Sun-Moon Empire loss of life, that was really too fearful.

“Ju Zi(orange), you said that they did die?”Xu Tianran has turned head, looks to Ju Zi(orange).

“Died, was certain!”Ju Zi(orange) is almost without hesitation said firmly. Her first time saw spiritlessly from the Xu Tianran face, he is afraid, yes, he in fear!

“Right, they died. They certain died.”Xu Tianran said loudly.

Outside the Bright Capital City city, any ordinary soldier even is the blockade of Soul Engineer, does not have the significance regarding Huo Yuhao. Imitation Soul Ability opens to the maximum degree, at all some impossible people able to investigate his existence. He is leading person.

Hundred li (0.5km) are away from, regarding Transcendent Douluo above the powerhouse of level, the moment may. To woods, Huo Yuhao stops the footsteps.

He must stop, his expression and mood are very stern. He soon must face, is a big difficult problem. But is actually he must face.

Huo Yuhao stops, Tang Wutong naturally also stopped, with him hand in hand. They have turned around, face are shouldering Ye Xishui to come here Long Xiaoyao.

At this time Huo Yuhao sees, Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao scale, unexpectedly is dark red, his old face is also ruddy, seems red light over the face. But in the Huo Yuhao eye, he sees, is actually the death air/Qi of lingering.

Yes! In that and other under the terrorist attacks of intensity, even if Limit Douluo, does not have the possible whole body to draw back absolutely. Let alone, these two in front of oneself, is over 200-year- old person. Their body functions already were not the peak can compare.

Long Xiaoyao cautiously places in Ye Xishui ground, wants to hold her to sit down, Ye Xishui actually lifts a hand, tight holds the shoulder of Long Xiaoyao, must stand side him actually.

Those who made Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong surprised was, this time Ye Xishui, seemed becoming young.

Long Xiaoyao said right, Ye Xishui of young time is very beautiful, has is not inferior in the Tang Wutong outstandingly beautiful appearance. Made anybody be moved sufficiently.

Her sends out is filling with the Light aura gently the golden halo, sacred not local products. Looked like Huo Yuhao initially first time saw to display the Angel Martial Soul time Ye Xishui. Her skin is fair and transparent, on the face is having the light smile. Even also feels relaxed. All these look in Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong eye, is actually the strangeness that could not say.

They are not clear, actually at present these two Limit Douluo are what kind of conditions, but thought that present they strangely are very very strange.

From Ye Xishui, Huo Yuhao can feel, is but purely Soul Power fluctuation of Boundless, moreover does not have the least bit Evil Soul Master aura, but, actually could not feel that the least bit vitality fluctuates.

On Long Xiaoyao the vitality fluctuation is actually very powerful, but unceasingly is actually dropping, and is unstable.

“Senior Long.”Huo Yuhao somewhat difficult looks to Long Xiaoyao.

Long Xiaoyao sighed, said: “I know that you are in any event impossible to let off Xishui today. I understand your difficulties. You should also be able to look, we will arrive at the life the end. My wish originally does not know that can also complete, was thinking, when you 98 levels of times comes to look for me, now looks like, perhaps I could not wait!”

In the Huo Yuhao heart low-spirited, he is listens to Long Xiaoyao to narrate between him and Ye Xishui personally the story, that pain in very clear Long Xiaoyao heart of hearts.

“Yuhao, can I request your matter?”Long Xiaoyao said.

Huo Yuhao was silent, “if not put Senior Ye to leave, other matters, I can promise you.”

Now Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao of this condition, possibly are not the matches who he and Tang Wutong collaborates.

Long Xiaoyao shook the head, said: “If I died, I naturally cannot protect her again, I hope that you promise me, before I die, do not injure her, after I died, you begin again, Ok?”

The Huo Yuhao whole body shakes, in the heart was more uncomfortable, Limit Douluo arrives at this degree, is really why bother to come!

Slightly after hesitant one next, he said: “So long as Senior Ye does not leave, I promise you.”

Long Xiaoyao nodded, said: “You could rest assured that you will not comply with my this matter in vain, I will put in the reward to you.”At the same time was saying, he changes Ye Xishui slowly, his look also became even more gentle.

“Xishui, you are really beautiful, you are that beautiful, I was old.”His sound is very gentle, moreover said is very slow, seems like pouring out.

In the Ye Xishui outstandingly beautiful facial features is revealing the light smile, “was not we are old. Has not thought that I can with you in the same place, arrive at the life finally eventually together the end, this feeling, is very good, should not be sad, this is the best result that I can obtain.”

The Long Xiaoyao sound becomes somewhat shivers suddenly, “Xishui, are you willing to forgive me really? Is willing to forgive me initially to all that you make?”

Ye Xishui has smiled, she smiles is very happy and is very happy.

“Fool, Xiaoyao, you are really a fool, not only you, Mu En is also. You are the fools, since, you have played with by me with the stock palm above! But you actually do not know. You are really a bloody fool!”

Although she is smiling, but tears uncontrolled have actually flowed.

“Why said?”Some Long Xiaoyao delay visits her.

Ye Xishui sighed one lightly, “this whole life, you for too many were too many, we who I did arrived at the final time, made me also handle a matter for you. I can do for you, is makes you be able to lay down the burdens in all hearts, happy leaves this world. Has a lot, now also finally can tell you.”

Long Xiaoyao has gawked, Tang Wutong and Huo Yuhao somewhat are also in a daze, at this time can say from the Ye Xishui mouth, surely is secret in secret!

Long Xiaoyao surprised [say / way]: “What do you want to tell me?”

Ye Xishui gives a calm smile, said: “That matter, in that your heart has been full of the guilty matter, actually, does not exist, or you do not need to be guilty for that matter, because, that is I arranges, the person who I must wait for is you, but is not Mu En. I am willing to give you body, although, that is a plot.”

“What did you say?”Long Xiaoyao has a big shock, looks at Ye Xishui, in eye has been full of the fear, “let alone, Xishui, I asked you let alone, do not destroy you image in my heart. At least, at that time, you were initially perfect in my heart.”

Ye Xishui shook the head, said: “No, I must say, if did not say the heart of hearts, I have not hated dead. Actually, you do not need to be worried about anything. For these years, although you have been protecting, has followed side me, even becomes by me causes, visits me to do many misdemeanors. May in fact, you not owe, because, you are defending, is a depth has been loving your woman. Do you know?”

Long Xiaoyao inconceivable looks at Ye Xishui, perhaps because of the feebleness of body, Limit Douluo cultivates for he somewhat cannot control own mood unexpectedly.

Ye Xishui spooky [say / way]: “In the past, I and you also had Mu En, first time participated in Great Continental Soul Master Academy Fighting Spirit Competition time, in fact, I had the goal, at that time, I am a Holy Spirit Cult member. I went to participate at that time, is examines the outstanding people in our that generation of young people. Therefore, I run into you and Mu En.”

“You that outstanding, that formidable, wins in me, at least in the surface is this. We are the young people, very easy walked in one, let alone I had the goal must approach you. Therefore, you in unknowingly liked me, but I actually, in the heart also liked your one of them.”

“You think, I have liked is Mu En, is this also one of you pain roots? Now I can tell you. The fools, your this bloody fool, from the beginning, I like is you, I have not liked Mu En.”

Sorry that today renews was late, the beginning system had problems. Our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire cartoon first volume already in our shop: Dazzles world Tang Sect, got online. Each has the signature, I have signed in any case 100 books, first come, first served. Later I will sign again. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-603





Volume 13

Double gear-driven ( Part 2 )


“You are active, the look is handsome, always likes buddingly, has the unprecedented aggression, these are I like. Mu En is very good, but, he was extremely simple-hearted, is not the type that I like. Therefore, from the beginning, I like is you!”

“But, I cannot choose you, because Sly Old Zhongli will not allow me to choose you absolutely. Because you are not the Shrek Academy person, this point, you see very clearly. Right, because of the Shrek Academy reason, I under forcing of Sly Old Zhongli, has to choose Mu En.”

Long Xiaoyao hears here, the whole person the delay, he has not thought that since the heart of hearts biggest pain, could be this type unexpectedly.

Xishui is smiling as before, tears also as in class.

“Afterward, we met once more. That time, Sly Old Zhongli told me, said that you are now the younger generation most outstanding outstanding people. If you are the good friends, then, in the future likely will become our Holy Spirit Cult nightmare, therefore, must make you separate, making you foe, this can let your mutual diversion, will not affect the development that I will teach.”

“Therefore, I proposed that plan, I with my body am the bait, has tempted you, own first time has given you. Has made that making our three people fill the painful contradiction. May in fact, painful only then you, I have known I have been making anything. I am the Holy Spirit Cult saintess! Ha Ha, ha ha ha ha!”

“You and you...”Long Xiaoyao points at Xishui, the blood is emitting from the mouth.

Xishui vision gentle visits him, “Xiaoyao, should not be angry, such will make you die is too quick. Listened to me saying that? Perhaps, hears behind, you will again not be angry.”

“After that time. I walked, but, I did not regret. Because I give the person who my body I most loved completely. I know, after that time, you and Mu En must fall into extreme painful it, this does not have the means. Do you know? If my plan has not succeeded, Sly Old Zhongli will not hesitate at all costs kills you. I am not willing to notice that you die! You are my lover, but Mu En, in my heart is the honourable big brother! Can he to my good, I not know? In my heart. Actually you that important, that important. Therefore, I must do, only by doing so, can make you not be injured by Holy Spirit Cult, can make you go on living.”

“I am successful, because, your future, achievement Limit Douluo. Although you are painful. May be most minimum, we are living. Not?”

“My this walks, is dozens years, dozens years later. Before Sly Old Zhongli knows must be dying, he forces me, lived the stature to him, only by doing so. He can feel relieved passes to me the Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master position, and helps me become Limit Douluo. At that time, I have stood in the Shrek Academy opposite completely. I am the Holy Spirit Cult saintess, this status will make me never possibly genuine with you in the same place.”

“You may know, our afterward that reunions, after Sly Old Zhongli died, I am how want that with you in the same place! But, I cannot, I be Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master, I am the king of Evil Soul Master, if I true with you in the same place, your this reputation destroyed. Even if afterward you have followed side me, has been protecting me, at least in others opinion, you is also forced. You as before are Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo, but is not Holy Spirit Cult one.”

“More than 100 years, you afterward unexpectedly with me, have protected my more than 100 years. Although I am Evil Soul Master, my innermost feelings fill ferociously, but, I am also a person, can't you look to my affection me? But, I do not dare with you in the same place, I unable to ruin your reputation as before. My innermost feelings that is in love is more impossible to tell you.”

“Now, I finally can say. Xiaoyao, I love is you, is you. Although you followed my hundred years, painful hundred years. However, I must also probably tell you am, my Xishui, does right by absolutely you. Because, after initially our that time, I lived a child to you, is a boy. Do you know?”

“What did you and you say?”Long Xiaoyao dumbfounded looks at Xishui not on own initiative, the body of whole person shivers. The children, Xishui gave back to itself to live a child unexpectedly, but, passed for more than 100 years! Even if cultivates for extremely high Soul Master, more than 100 years, perhaps also already.

“Has not thought that I know after you listened, will be very surprised. However, let alone is you, even if I, more than 100 years had not seen him, I do not know that he is living. I cannot see him, because, I will never make him know that he has a mother, is Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master, is Evil Soul Master. I hope that he can healthily live, was an average person to be enough, I am not even willing to make him Soul Master. He followed me to join the Holy Spirit Cult beforehand surname, was surnamed the word.”

“The good fortune makes person. The posterity of our child, are relying on their talent unexpectedly, had been admitted to Shrek Academy, moreover paid a return visit unexpectedly in the Mu En hanger-on, if were not his Martial Soul is my second Martial Soul Radiant Phoenix, I do not know really that originally after Mu En received me and your, disciple unexpectedly, and cultivated him fully, making him Martial Soul Faculty Dean.”

“What?”Hears here, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong cannot endure patiently shock of innermost feelings finally, simultaneously calls out in alarm makes noise, if not today's Xishui says this matter, who can want to obtain, Shrek Academy Martial Soul Faculty Dean can Yan Shaozhe, be unexpectedly and unexpectedly Grim Reaper Douluo Xishui and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao son? Who can want to obtain?

“You talked nonsense, you were instigating our Academy internal relations.”Tang Wutong angry saying.

Xishui shows a faint smile, looked at a complete delay Long Xiaoyao, said: “To this time, what I needed to instigate again? Let alone, my Xishui is one generation of Limit Douluo, by my status, does not need to instigate anything. I am I, I wanted to say anything, naturally can tell the facts. Shaozhe calculates according to the age that should be I and Xiaoyao grandson or is the heavy grandchildren, but, I never have to try to prove, I quietly have examined his blood relationship, confirmed he is my descendant.”

Huo Yuhao held on also wants saying that anything's Tang Wutong, shook the head to her. The Tang Wutong eye shocks completely.

Long Xiaoyao is almost somewhat difficult asked to Xishui: “This real? This unexpectedly real? Why? Why didn't you tell me earlier?”

Xishui said indifferently: “Because, I am the Holy Spirit Cult saintess! I am Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master! I am the Holy Spirit Cult remote antiquity elder! What can I tell you? I have handled that many dishonorable matters, in life that in my hand died, thousands, I do not count clearly. I told you these, making you love me, with me in the same place? Also turns into Evil Soul Master? I told our descendant these, making them also be dragged into Holy Spirit Cult it? No, I cannot say that yes, I cannot say, I no one can tell, I can only all these, deep burying in my heart, the dream return to at midnight, was recalling that happiness, can make me not move toward the destruction truly, true crazy.”

“Has a look!”The Xishui both arms lift, the gentle golden flame ascends on her, “this is I biggest card in a hand, who can think that has Blood Soul Devil Puppet terror Martial Soul Evil Soul Master, Limit Douluo, actually also has second Martial Soul. This Martial Soul, does not know Sly Old Zhongli, I have hidden is very deep and is very deep. Once because my this Martial Soul reveals, making the Holy Spirit Cult person know that I said fall into the beyond redemption boundary. Therefore, my this second Martial Soul, I have concealed for 200 years. Has not thought that played the role today eventually, uses the strength of Phoenix Nirvana, simultaneously has saved our life.”

Long Xiaoyao bitter and astringent [say / way]: “I should not go . If only you, you only need to protect you, perhaps, you can also go on living, are insufficient the source to be lit.”

Xishui shook the head, said: “No, if you do not have, I really died, my heart can die. I hope that you go. I clearly know that trap also walks, because, on this world I already live was too tired, I need to look for one to belong to my home to return. This all, is I calculates. What thing the Xu Tianran young child is, depends on him, wants to plan my Grim Reaper Douluo Xishui? If not I wants, his trap can be successful? I examine with this final opportunity, examine you hundred years later, like initially was loving whether also me. Facts showed that I have succeeded, Xiaoyao, you have not disappointed me thank you, I am very happy and am very happy.”

The breath of Long Xiaoyao somewhat is obviously rapid, he looks at Xishui, long time could not speak.

Xishui lifts the hand, gently is touching his face.

“How? How to speak?”

“You and you deceive my good pain!”Long Xiaoyao face upwards to heave a deep sigh, suddenly, tears. Regardless of how he cannot think, thing that oneself these years insists, unexpectedly is empty destroyed, the mistake that does not have, oneself have undertaken the lifetime pain for him unexpectedly.

This time he, had not felt that feels relaxed or is happy, instead thought that the whole person was found time, that feeling, even be more painful than before.( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-603-part-2





Volume 13

Double gear-driven ( Part 3 )


Ye Xishui supple sound track: “Xiaoyao, the present was our final times, our vitalities cut off, starting from this moment, I was your wife, you were my husband. You do not need to listen my, now, regardless of you make me make anything, I listen your. Gets married to obey the husband?”

Long Xiaoyao looks at Ye Xishui, in the look is glittering the extremely complex ray, “since, I have thought understanding that most is unfair to you, now I am clear, the person who we most are unfair to is Mu En. Feels sorry for him, for these years, is withstanding even compared with I more intense pain, until dying time, does not know the truth of matter, you really quite cruel-hearted!”

Ye Xishui sighed, said: “Sometimes, does not know that is not necessarily painful. Does not know well . The time can dilute the lots, reason that I afterward no longer have seen him, for does not hope to bring back his innermost feelings that distress. He got married finally, had his descendant, in addition Shrek Academy that many hobbled, even if were the pain, the pain was also only part in his life, on the other hand, has defended in my side you, was most painful that.”

Long Xiaoyao has turned around, in the Shrek Academy direction, “Mu brother, has not thought really that in recent years, we have made unexpectedly a mistake, fell into this kind of plot unexpectedly. Holy Spirit Cult, is really good Holy Spirit Cult! Xishui, you said right, before me at the point of death, making me clarify all, finally, I was not a silly ghost. Also good, to be also good! Mu the brother, this whole life owes you, I did not have the means to give back to you, can only also on your disciple.”

Spoke these words, he transfers, earnest looks at Ye Xishui, said: “Xishui, your what listens really my?”

Ye Xishui nod of silently.

“Good! All that although you make, regardless of again makes anything not to be impossible to make up now. But since we have arrived this step, gives on Continent to leave behind something again. Also is repays for several points we to have a deficit Mu the brother. How?”

Ye Xishui gentle smiles, “how you want me to do, how I do.”

Long Xiaoyao changes Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, said: “Yuhao, I planned, when your 98 levels cultivate for time looks for me. Xuan Zi once the confidential letter told me, you have built Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus, right?”

“Yin-Yang Supplement? Was he unexpectedly successful?”Ye Xishui surprised saying, “no wonder, no wonder he can defeat my Holy Spirit Cult that many powerhouses by strength of the. Originally has built this unexpectedly, only then Beast God Di Tian cultivates the method of successful Yin-Yang Supplement, does the boy, how your body bear such intensity impact?”

Huo Yuhao has not answered the Ye Xishui issue, but nodded to Long Xiaoyao.

“Ahead of time achievement second Soul Nucleus, means that if you want into Limit Douluo, wants achievement third Soul Nucleus. That will be very difficult, I think you 98 levels of times helps your old, the old man already gradually. The vitality is declining unceasingly, this Soul Power remains is also being useless, donates you, if can help you complete the fusion of third Soul Nucleus. That will have made the history. Now perhaps was without enough time, your cultivating to be away from 98 levels also had the distance, but our lives soon came to the end. Only then in my Soul Power passes to you while the purest thing of present, realizes from experience also one and passes to you, is I repays a Mu En sentiment.”

“Old Long. This and this how?”Huo Yuhao beckons with the hand hastily, being startled of face, he has not thought that Long Xiaoyao looked for him by oneself, must do this matter unexpectedly.

The Long Xiaoyao smile shakes the head, said: “Do not reject, this is my final wish, otherwise, I die with injustice unredressed. Moreover, my this cultivates to inherit, must compared with such dissipate in the world is much better. You do not need to be worried about anything, I do not pass to you all Soul Power, only in my Soul Power the thing of most source, as well as the purest energy will pour into your within the body, letting you gradually its absorption. Meanwhile, will construct third Soul Nucleus for you in the future, first prepares an embryonic form. As the matter stands, can build some foundations to you finally.”

Here, Long Xiaoyao changed Tang Wutong, “was only, what making me not think, your unexpectedly also achievement second Soul Nucleus, was Yin-Yang Supplement?”

After Tang Wutong looked at Huo Yuhao one, nodded, said: “Yes, completes with the help of Yuhao.”

“Good, is really good! Xishui, you pass to this miss your Soul Power. This is I finally requests to you. All keeps our strengths.”

Ye Xishui has gawked, then has selected, looks to Tang Wutong.

Tang Wutong is actually the complexion changes, effort swung, “I do not want the Evil Soul Master strength.”

Ye Xishui bitter and astringent [say / way]: “Evil Soul Master strength? On me belongs to the Evil Soul Master strength, including Grim Reaper Tower, all perished in Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace there, my Martial Soul Blood Soul Devil Puppet and my body thoroughly had written off. You cannot see, I now radically am not the main body, energy body that but condenses through the Phoenix Nirvana rebirth, because I cultivate to enough formidable, in addition the itself soul is stable, this can maintain the soul body is not dissipating, I to protect Xiaoyao am coming out. Has not thought that before Xiaoyao, was seriously injured, he who this time I cannot protect eventually was complete, making him injure on adds the wound, the vitality has also come to the end. You could rest assured that my this Radiant Phoenix Martial Soul, has never contaminated anybody's blood, is strength of the purest Light, is in my innermost feelings good that side. Present I, am not Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui. I am only the Long Xiaoyao wife, Ye Xishui, already died.”

The Tang Wutong brow wrinkles, that checkpoint in her innermost feelings somewhat cannot pass.

In this time, an extremely familiar sound is resounding in her mind.

“She said right, she is not that Grim Reaper Douluo, all her the things of burial wither away along with body withering away of Ye Xishui, complete their final wishes.”

“Father!”Tang Wutong blurted out called out.

Huo Yuhao, Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui are startled. Must know that they can say is now Soul Master topest existed, if periphery also has others, how possibly unable to discover!

Tang Wutong somewhat awkward [say / way]: “To, sorry, I have thought suddenly some words that the father spoke. Good, I comply. However, I will not thank you.”

Ye Xishui has smiled, “I handle the matter, when needed the person to thank? I complete my husband's wish. Xiaoyao said right, this whole life, I have a deficit most people am Mu En, in this final time, can do something for his disciple, makes up for on several points finally.”

Huo Yuhao looks to Long Xiaoyao, sees, is the Long Xiaoyao clear vision. Destiny aura not any change in Three Eyed Golden Lion Destiny Skull, does not have any dangerous advance notification. He knows that this inside does not have any plot.

“Didn't Old Long, have means to save you really?”Huo Yuhao somewhat difficult saying.

Long Xiaoyao moves sideways, arrived at behind him, “I said that I must die in front of Xishui. Sits down.”At the same time was saying, his hand pressed on the shoulder of Huo Yuhao. Although already deeply by heavy wound, but this Darkness Sacred Dragon and Dragon Emperor Douluo strength as before is incomparably formidable, immediately Huo Yuhao was pressed by him sat.

Tang Wutong also sits down in front of Huo Yuhao, their four items of relative, saw each other in the eye that shock also has moved.

Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui separately sit down behind Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, simultaneously lifts the double palm, according to them each other behind.

“Aren't you Martial Soul Fusion? Starts to practice, then receives our Soul Power gradually.”The Long Xiaoyao sinking sound said.

“Yes!”Huo Yuhao lifts the double palm, balances with the Tang Wutong four palms. Immediately, their Hao Dong Power start each other to flow, stable whirlpools start to linger in their each other within the body.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection covers in four people, although the sensation will tell him not to have any danger, but he on the alert Ye Xishui, that after all will be most powerhouse in Holy Spirit Cult! Once Ye Xishui has a sound, he will immediately change the position with Black Tortoise Replacement and Tang Wutong, oneself will withstand the attack of Ye Xishui. To the Ye Xishui condition, want to strike to kill him at present, the possibility is not big.

Facts showed that the sensation is reliable.

Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui Soul Power, all pours into the gentle way to two human bodies.

Acclaimed from the Long Xiaoyao mouth resounds, “good Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus! Really miracle. Good pure and vigorous Soul Power, the degree of integration is such high, two Soul Nucleus complement one another and mutually depends on each other mutually opposes. This is the most formidable practice way.”

Ye Xishui nodded, said: “Yes! Although I am Twin Martial Souls, may not dare to practice Radiant Phoenix, only is since able to hide it. Otherwise, perhaps I have opportunity to touch this Yin-Yang Supplement second Soul Nucleus. If they can achievement Limit Douluo, perhaps, be possible to challenge Beast God by the body of humanity in the future.”

Long Xiaoyao shows a faint smile, said: “That makes us create this miracle.”

Sincere Soul Power starts to increase the input, Long Xiaoyao or Ye Xishui, spread to Huo Yuhao and Soul Power of Tang Wutong within the body do not have any attribute, purest Soul Power. After pouring into their bodies, immediately is being revolved Hao Dong Power to dissolve with them as one, radically not the process that needs anything to transform.

Worthily is Limit Douluo, how they are very clear use own Soul Power to help other people.

Is having Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, has the far ultra ordinary Soul Master carrying capacity. Four Soul Nucleus in two human body, nearly absorb greedily generally is coming from two Limit Douluo pure Soul Power, oneself cultivates to also at an exceptional pace promote.( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-603-part-3





Volume 13

98 levels! ( Part 1 )


After the quarter, suddenly gains a thorough understanding. Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong Soul Power, all promoted 96 levels.

Also half double-hour, 97 levels.

A double-hour, 98 levels!

Short less than the free time of two double-hour, their cultivating are with the help of two Limit Douluo, to promote stiffly 98 levels of intensities. After this intensity, the palm that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong stuck to actually suddenly separated.

Like such that initially they judged, after cultivating to be the certain extent, their Hao Dong Power cannot maintain again. Because, at this time, their Hao Dong Power amplification already extremely formidable, formidable to the situation that their bodies have not been able to withstand.

Only then separates, Soul Power that their own within the body run will weaken, has more place load bearings to come from Limit Douluo Boundless Soul Power.

Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui pass to them, although already after Soul Power of depuration, but receives truly, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong are clear, Limit Douluo Soul Power is vigorous, that completely is a limitless feeling.

Huo Yuhao is very clear, if under premise that in both sides do not run away, takes him and Tang Wutong beforehand cultivating as, even if faces Limit Douluo alone, not necessarily has the absolute odds of success, even the opportunity of defeat is bigger.

These practice surpass 200 years of super powerhouse, deep of background, is makes one shock really!

Within the body Soul Power is getting stronger and stronger, two Soul Nucleus high-speed operations from the beginning, gradually became slow, Huo Yuhao only thought that own body has been full of the full feeling, as if might explode anytime.

“I must open third Soul Nucleus to build the foundation for you. Your present foundation is very good, first Soul Nucleus in the between the eyebrows hole hole, second Soul Nucleus in the chest, left most the dantian position that was easy to practice to give third Soul Nucleus. Third Soul Nucleus that then you must form can only be Space Attribute . Moreover, you in forming in the process, should, counter- and way. Forms three Soul Nucleus interactive processes . Moreover, finally, three Soul Nucleus should each other be connected, the mutual interdependence, can achieve the true three Soul Nucleus effects. I do not have the means to help you complete circulation, but, I can help you open a Soul Nucleus foundation in the dantian first alone, in the future, you must do is. This Soul Nucleus with your original two Soul Nucleus links, only has so, you can achievement Limit Douluo. Was formidable as for that time you, the old man does not know that in another world, the old man can with the Mu En same place, pray for you.”

The Long Xiaoyao sound appears in the Huo Yuhao spiritual sea deep place directly, Huo Yuhao feels. Long Xiaoyao pours into Soul Power of oneself within the body, emerges in the dantian suddenly, meanwhile branches out part, isolates the chest above completely.

This cultivated is. Is really voluminous! Too formidable.

A small Soul Nucleus embryonic form was constructed quickly, because Huo Yuhao own another two Soul Nucleus were isolated outside, actually did not feel.

In the dantian around Soul Nucleus the Soul Power hand of rotation with Soul Nucleus of between the eyebrows place is the same.

How to make three Soul Nucleus each other operate alternately, this issue Huo Yuhao never has also considered. However, from now on, this actually became the issue that he then must ponder carefully.

Although Long Xiaoyao had not said. But Huo Yuhao is very clear, if did not speak this issue ponder to be clear, in the near future, three Soul Nucleus definitely will take to his huge trouble.

That side Tang Wutong, within the body Soul Power similarly was also saturated, but her situation is more troublesome, because of her second Soul Nucleus, although in between the eyebrows, is, first Soul Nucleus actually already in dantian. Only the chest position, can hold third Soul Nucleus. But this chest position, is the roads which must be taken of two Soul Nucleus Soul Power exchanges, whirlpool Soul Power produces in that place. How does this construct the third Soul Nucleus embryonic form?

Ye Xishui in the ponder a moment later, told Long Xiaoyao own idea.

Long Xiaoyao, has helped Huo Yuhao construct third Soul Nucleus, hearing this sets out immediately, before arriving at the Tang Wutong body, sits cross-legged to sit before her, lifts the double palm to balance with her, with Ye Xishui one after the other, clamps Tang Wutong in the center.

Long Xiaoyao sinking sound track: “Her situation, wants to construct third Soul Nucleus is impossible. We can only make her also turn with Yuhao exactly the same situation, this has the possibility of completion. Therefore, we can only be help her Soul Nucleus shift.”

Ye Xishui is listening to the Long Xiaoyao words, said with a smile: “Great idea. Has not thought that we also really have one day that collaborates to do good, this feeling is also very good! That starts. I lift, you protect, by our strengths, if was unable to succeed, on this world nobody can succeed. Even if inadequate, will not have the danger.”

Yeah? Even if Beast God Di Tian, can only wins their one of them steadily, if two big Limit Douluo simultaneously with him to the war, Di Tian is also not necessarily able to win.

Soul Nucleus in Tang Wutong dantian was lifted slowly, gradually shifts to the chest position.

Long Xiaoyao scale gradually turned into the blood red, but the body of Ye Xishui started becomes illusory.

Huo Yuhao sits cross-legged to sit there, silently is realizing from experience the change in within the body.

Original two Soul Nucleus, Soul Power has been full Absolute, but third Soul Nucleus has formed, was actually isolated outside, isolation strength quite therefore Long Xiaoyao in the seal that his within the body plants, so long as this seal does not relieve, has isolated. However, once this seal breaks, he must start to try the mutual fusions of three Soul Nucleus. Otherwise, once within the body so huge energy disorder, he can be said as must die without doubt.

Long Xiaoyao pours into Soul Power of his within the body, although directly was attracted by him receives Soul Power, but, part was he now could not have absorbed.

Long Xiaoyao is Limit Douluo, within the body Soul Power is the essence, he just filtered the attribute, gave Huo Yuhao Soul Power not to be short of many. Therefore, that some Soul Power that Huo Yuhao could not absorb, after was over his 98 levels, his body now was unable to withstand. Even if he that tenacious body is not good. Because 98 levels, were close to the limit, but 99 levels, are the human body limits!

Truly to this level, can realize this level formidable and various issues. The Huo Yuhao sensation is strengthened continually, but each subtle change in within the body Soul Power, some soul-stirring feelings, as if want a control not to be good, will explode immediately the body to perish.

These unnecessary Soul Power, by the Long Xiaoyao compression in his dantian, this are the positions that he third Soul Nucleus will be in the future, that inside present actually many Soul Power, Huo Yuhao does not know that he does not dare to carry on to search to observe with his Spiritual Power.

Must wait till him to adapt to own 98 levels of Soul Power to cultivate first is, then controls gradually, after suddenly gaining a thorough understanding, can attempt, otherwise, is not good, if has inspired wars between own two Soul Nucleus and this third Soul Nucleus, bitter only then he.

Long Xiaoyao or Ye Xishui, truly have not faced three Soul Nucleus this situations, everyone is feels the stone to cross river, but this laboratory cannot be defeated, because of laboratory in Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong within the body! Once is defeated, they are the relationship of form and spirit to completely extinguish results.

The situation in Tang Wutong within the body has stabilized gradually, feels including Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao somewhat strangely, meridians of Tang Wutong unobstructed does not make sense, in the process of entire Soul Nucleus lifting, has not met anything to trouble unexpectedly, moreover Tang Wutong control is also extremely good, appears without any dangerous situation.

As the matter stands, following continued to pour into becomes is much easier.

Long Xiaoyao returns Huo Yuhao behind, to continue to pour into surplus Soul Power. In the Huo Yuhao dantian, third Soul Nucleus forms gradually, whirlpool unceasing increasing, then compresses to the interior, quick, Huo Yuhao saw that a pure white crystal appeared.

Reason that is Bai Se (White Color), because these energies simply do not have the attribute, in the future they will be any attributes, needing Huo Yuhao give is good.

This simply was too fearful, Huo Yuhao at least like this think that what to do if were defeated! He knows certainly, after having absorbed Long Xiaoyao Soul Power, he can in attack Limit Douluo most in a short time, Soul Power that but, without a doubt, these external energy impacts, practice his oneself attacks is more dangerous.

Naturally, any matter relative, if depends upon him to practice, forms third Soul Nucleus time, certainly after will face Soul Power, strength bad situation. But currently had a Limit Douluo Soul Power scratch coat, naturally did not fear that met these to trouble.

Since like this, that only could be such walks, this once in a thousand years chance, regarding Huo Yuhao, has not felt excitedly, instead is careful that doubles.

Time one minute one second passed, Huo Yuhao unceasingly is feeling the change in within the body Soul Power throughout, all are very luckily smooth, Long Xiaoyao in that barrier that under his chest arranges very steady. Without any vacillation.

Soul Power that pours into started changes small, then gradually weak. Finally, after last Soul Power also pours into, Huo Yuhao behind becomes a peace.

Opens the double pupil, Huo Yuhao first behind looks to oneself. Sees, is be with smile on the face Long Xiaoyao.

This time he, already old like the appearance, the folding peak on top of peak on face, in Tang Wutong behind Ye Xishui is actually not another appearance, she only remaining light light shadow, even did not see clearly including the look.

-------------------------------------------------

Sorry, this morning completely was giving a thought to symbol, forgot the upload, the book friend told me to discover. Right, today starting from, four. Consecutively for three days, to end of the month. Finally three days, asking the monthly ticket to support.( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-604-part-1





Volume 13

98 levels! ( Part 2 )


“Old Long, are you what kind of?”Huo Yuhao hurries to support Long Xiaoyao.

Long Xiaoyao shows a faint smile, said: “I am all right, I now good cannot be good. In transfer cultivation gives in your process, my anything is clear, my this life, does not have any regret, Xishui said right, I can not bring to walk finally regrettably, only has a deficit is your Teacher, now, I also cultivate one to pass to you, was makes up slightly to his had a deficit. To make anything, you do, Holy Spirit Cult truly should not exist in this in society, do not have any worry, that address recorded clearly.”

“You must start calmly to cultivate as soon as possible, control these Soul Power of oneself within the body, after you adjust completely, can start to attack third Soul Nucleus. Remember, do not worry, the road that you must take, has the space, only then grasped the space deep meaning, has to complete the third Soul Nucleus possibility. You complement one another, cultivates together, the mutual protection, has the successful possibility. We hope that my soul in heaven can see, your achievement our humanity unprecedented three Soul Nucleus. Also such, did not waste me and Mu En to your guidances.”

“Yes, senior.”Huo Yuhao respectful is complying.

Regarding Long Xiaoyao, he has the sympathy, there is admiring. However, actually completely does not approve Long Xiaoyao some procedures. How regardless to say that he in the relations in Holy Spirit Cult this aspect causes Holy Spirit Cult to do in a big way because of the one's own selfish interests with Ye Xishui as well as. However, the person will die its word to be also friendly, moreover Long Xiaoyao truly has many help to him.

“Old Long, what wish do you have?”Huo Yuhao asked in a low voice.

Long Xiaoyao shook the head, “did not have, finally must leave this world, I also finally extricated. If there is a next life, I and Xishui, if only a pair of average person, that should good! Xishui.”

Hears his summon, Ye Xishui that became very illusory light shadow flew slowly. Falls on him, light light shadow, looked like integrates the body of Long Xiaoyao to be ordinary.

Cool breeze has blown.

The body of Long Xiaoyao, flutters unexpectedly, as if changes into the innumerable butterflies, changes into the powder powder gradually, dissipates in the air. Only the luminous spots of innumerable glistening shoot up to the sky.

Has the black, golden color, they each other pester, coils around mutually. Increases to go toward a higher sky.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong gaze after these luminous spots to lift off, two people both deep bent the waist, regardless of before them, has made anything, they have achieved the peak super powerhouse on this world after all! They are worth this respect, let alone, they also the final strength will have passed to themselves and Tang Wutong.

In the future, oneself and Wutong make a good with this strength every time, even if forgives for them a point.

“Two Limit Douluo! Such. Really makes people be hard to imagine. Now on Continent, in our humanity. Perhaps also had Old Xuan is Limit Douluo.”Tang Wutong said disappointed.

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, said: “Do not worry, soon, we also certainly can become Limit Douluo. Although the process will be very simple. So long as there are you side me, I am confident.”

“Um.”Tang Wutong sweet smiles to him, her within the body present condition and Huo Yuhao are exactly the same, even be better than Huo Yuhao.

Ye Xishui has not lain. Her all with the Evil Soul Master related ability, was all melted in that large explosion, Radiant Phoenix Soul Power similarly is light attribute. Agrees with Tang Wutong, this makes the process of entire fusion exceptionally smooth.

The Tang Wutong third Soul Nucleus frame had also been constructed, to let it accepts Space Attribute, Ye Xishui kept some light attribute, to be advantageous the control of Tang Wutong.

“We later, perhaps cannot release Hao Dong Power.”Tang Wutong digs the small mouth, somewhat is very discontented.

Huo Yuhao said with a smile: “That is because we have reached this world close peak! However, our Martial Soul Fusion techniques should also be able to use. Does not believe that I lead you to find the person to try.”

Tang Wutong doubts visits him, said: “Whom looks for? Xu Tianran?”

Huo Yuhao said: “Now Bright Capital City is frightened by the slightest sound, has not moved Xu Tianran time. You also saw, strength that now Bright Capital City controls strong. We were not suitable to go to there at this time. Also in Bright Capital City, Old Long has given me a simple map, finally where I knew the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters. Before Old Long at the point of death, final words, tell me, can cope with Holy Spirit Cult independently.”

“Holy Spirit Cult headquarters? Where?”Tang Wutong surprised asking.

Now Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao died, in Holy Spirit Cult, most formidable is Zongli Wu, initially Huo Yuhao also has not become Transcendent Douluo time, has defeated him, now naturally was not anything. Ruins Holy Spirit Cult, truly is most important.

“What do we also wait for? Walks.”Tang Wutong somewhat stimulated saying.

98 levels! She now and Huo Yuhao is 98 levels of Transcendent Douluo, what but also there is more suitable than to try the enemy of hand Holy Spirit Cult?

They simultaneously jump, is the hand shakes hand as before, but, currently in having Hao Dong Power flows. They rise into the upper air straightly, accelerates again suddenly.

It is not needing any Soul Guidance Device, in within the body Soul Nucleus extreme twist, the air directly became the object who they control. In the sky simultaneously resounds two sonic bangs, they already disappearing trace.

...

Sun-Moon Empire, Bright Capital City.

“Without any discovery?”The Xu Tianran sinking sound asked.

Ju Zi(orange) nodded, said: “Started all manpower, had not found any clues as before. The Holy Spirit Cult headquarters are very mystical in the position, we also only know general position, before Ye Xishui said that now Holy Spirit Cult should move, the situation of also not knowing the relocation how. I have dispatched the army now, has traced in that direction, hopes that can find them.”

“Um.”Xu Tianran nodded, the complexion is very as before ugly, until now, in his heart cannot determine that Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao whether died . The life and death of these two people, were really too important. Once they are also living, even if in the future be only very short time can retaliate, is not Sun-Moon Empire can withstand.

“Has not thought really that Limit Douluo was unexpectedly formidable to this degree. Really also has the possibility of not having died. It seems like that I underestimated Soul Master. No wonder Shrek Academy can stand erect Continent for ten thousand years, this is Soul Master background! What a pity, we not such talent and opportunity. Back then, if I have not been injured, perhaps also possibility, but now, is a wee bit possibly does not have. This time, Grim Reaper Douluo and Dragon Emperor Douluo, if died, had Shrek Academy that Sea God Pavilion Master Old Xuan or Limit Douluo. When does not know, our Sun-Moon Empire can also have own Limit Douluo. To that time, we are the true great strength.”

Ju Zi(orange) shows a faint smile, arrives at Xu Tianran behind, is pinching the forehead for him gently.

“On this day will certainly not come is too late. When your majesty unified Continent, by the entire Douluo Continent resources, but also feared that can't train Limit Douluo?”

The Xu Tianran complexion relaxed several points finally, has patted the hand of Ju Zi(orange) gently, said: “Said well. Turns head, you can start to get ready. I give you six months the entire armed forces, assembles various resources. When gets rid once more, must destroy Dou Ling and Star Luo both countries surely thoroughly. Does your big personal enemy also in Star Lou Empire, when you plan to cope with him?”

In Ju Zi(orange) eye ray one cold, said: “I will remain to cope with him finally again, I must make him look helplessly his country was trampled by the oppression of the people of our Sun-Moon Empire army, I must make him be in deep sorrow, finally dies.”

“Ha Ha, good, said well, makes him be in deep sorrow, finally dies!”Xu Tianran laughs.

...

The high-speed flight and controls itself air-operated to fly, that also completely is two concepts. Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong at this time are this feeling.

To 98 levels of this levels, has not needed to consume Soul Power to fly again, is the air is promoting their bodies according to their thoughts completely. So long as their bodies can unable to withstand, speed as if in infinitely increasing.

Actually Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong do not know own speed quickly, actually greatly somewhat instant thousand li(500 km) general feeling.

The under foot scenery passes rapidly, when they pass through from the fog, the fog voluntarily will dissipate, looks like reigns they to allow to pass through.

, Huo Yuhao looks below peak on top of peak from afar the mountain range, surprised [say / way]: “Such quickly arrived here? Forward is not again far, must reach our destinations. Perhaps Wutong, our strengths, currently had the Limit Douluo level.”

“Um? How do you know?”Tang Wutong curious looks to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao said: “Do not forget, we are Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus. This, I earnestly have been realizing us the control a moment ago to the air. Before we are 95 levels of Transcendent Douluo, but feels and present is entirely different. This means that not only we Soul Power cultivate for promotion, is a sublimation! What can make us sublimate to another boundary? That has Limit Douluo. In other words, although we cannot break through 99 levels, but the strength, perhaps really has been the Limit Douluo level now. Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus Limit Douluo.”

----------------------------------------------

The beforehand chapter name has made a mistake, I asked the editor to help to change. Starting today, I frequently in our prestige - in platform, read some us to update no content to everybody. For example: Beyond Douluo Continent, future new book content advance notification and so on. Everybody is interested to our platform to listen.

Today read one: 100,000 years of Soft Bones Rabbit, has joined the book friend in platform to listen. Because this sound has no way to make triggering, the book friend who therefore, wants to hear quickly joins, will miss will leave out.

Joins our prestige - the method of platform is very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - searches Tang three few, has v authentication, is our families.( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-604-part-2





Volume 13

98 levels! ( Part 3 )


Tang Wutong sighed one lightly, said: “If before meeting Old Long and Ye Xishui, perhaps I believe that but I did not think so now. Limit Douluo has own trump card, they have own experience to this world, our cultivating to have perhaps been that level, before but we have that experience, we absolutely are also not Limit Douluo. Therefore, we must continue to try hard, the effort of going all out, we can certainly achieve that boundary, to that time, we looked at entire world, will be certainly more different.”

“Said well, no matter, I side you, accompany certainly you, impact that level, goes forward to that world together.”Saying that Huo Yuhao laughs.

How regardless to say that cultivated to arrive at the Limit Douluo level! Can he not be excited? Since this has been he continuously pursue.

“Almost arrived, I look.”Huo Yuhao draws Tang Wutong to control speed, in airborne was slow gradually.

This place he truly has come, at present the big forest of cover presents for from dark green to the jet black color. On entire Continent, only then this forest has such characteristics. Because here is, Evil Spirit Forest!

Yes, Holy Spirit Cult headquarters, in Evil Spirit Forest, if not obtain the news from Long Xiaoyao there, anybody cannot imagine.

Evil Spirit Forest in the Sun-Moon Empire status, like Star Dou Forest the status on Douluo Continent. Is living Sun-Moon Empire most formidable Soul Beast, the rank world Ten Great Ferocious Beasts second Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler lives now here.

Huo Yuhao Spirit Eyes seventh Soul Ring, obtains from here, at that time he struck to kill one 100,000 years have repaired for Evil Eye Tyrant, afterward was discovered by Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, it can be said that barely escapes!

Arrives once more, with past years already completely different, this time, Huo Yuhao not necessarily feared these Evil Eye. Just. What his some are not clear, why will Holy Spirit Cult place this momentarily high-risk place own headquarters? What issue did not have regarding these formidable evil soul cities, is, these small and weak Evil Soul Master? They encounter formidable Soul Beast time, but has the danger of perishing anytime.

So long as no matter how, can find Evil Soul Master to be good here, did not have the asylum of Grim Reaper Douluo, now here nobody can prevent itself.

Bleaching and dyeing whereabouts at the same time, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection bloomed outward, just likes a big net. Has covered toward Evil Spirit Forest.

Long Xiaoyao gives in his information, only then Evil Spirit Forest this name, where concrete Holy Spirit Cult had not said.

Huo Yuhao when explores, is careful, after all, here also lives this, cultivates in Soul Beast world to be next to existence of Beast God Di Tian. Can not provoke it, good that do not provoke, in order to avoid brings the unnecessary trouble.

Huo Yuhao had once pledged. So long as is not Soul Beast attacks itself on own initiative, again does not kill Soul Beast, therefore he will not provoke to Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler. Even if he does not fear is also same.

The mind fluctuation spreads continually, quick. Huo Yuhao had found oneself this line of goals.

In the process that Huo Yuhao in searching to observe has the discretion very much, the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters, since Evil Spirit Forest, they also needs the commodity. After all Bright Capital City is the entire Sun-Moon Empire core. Therefore, Holy Spirit Cult in Evil Spirit Forest, is certainly approaching the Bright Capital City direction.

But Evil Spirit Forest has been full of the danger. Wants the avoidance danger as far as possible, is naturally impossible to approach the Core Area territory. Therefore, he mainly searches to observe, is approaches the Bright Capital City direction the Evil Spirit Forest surrounding.

Really, after some time searching observes, person who Huo Yuhao has happen to discovered bustle about.

These people were too obvious, they the massive material handling, will be piling up in a stretch of open area, then by special person these thing income space Storage Soul Guidance Device.

Also does not know that these people have many Storage Soul Guidance Device, after the thing in open area piles up with, starts fast drawing, then some people continue the opposite party.

Holy Spirit Cult headquarters in underground, this is the first judgment of Huo Yuhao, because all commodities from underground transport.

The Spiritual Detection downward spread, by his present Spiritual Power, carried on the subsurface exploration is not anything, was continually thorough, Huo Yuhao held breath cold air.

This is what kind of project! Below the ground in this Evil Spirit Forest surrounding, nearly can the construction that described with the palace there.

This building area exceeds thousand mu, inside with the solid granite construction, various arrangement, to the utmost is all magnificent.

The person who bustled about has, rapid calculation, over a thousand people, the majority cultivates to be weak, in three rings to six rings, but also has one and 200 people of cultivating to be strong for the strength. Is directing these to cultivate for the weak person is carrying on the transporting.

Does not need to verify, Huo Yuhao knows one looked to the place, except for Holy Spirit Cult, but also who so rich. These commodities that looking from transports at present, Gold Soul Coin that the rare metal, piles up, various precious materials, the value is unquantifiable, although did not say the rich enemy, but is not worse than Shrek Academy! This is Evil Soul Master usually plunders. Good, was really good.

If there is not been able to be completely definite from the wealth merely, then, when Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection found Zongli Wu and Feng Ling in the crowd, again confirmed without doubt.

Nangong Wan also impressively in crowd, numerous familiar Evil Soul Master faces.

Was here!

Zongli Wu submits in person the water looks is bustling about the teaching audiences, the sinking sound asked to Nangong Wan: “That side remote antiquity Cult Master didn't have news to pass on?”

“Did not have. Remote antiquity Cult Master leaves in the morning, did not have the news to the present.”Nangong Wan was replying respectfully.

Zongli Wu brow tight wrinkle, said: “On a number of commodities all moved away, our people also came back, so long as transports again these commodities, here can abandon temporarily first, blocks the entrance. When we will have the opportunity to come back in the future again. This is the the Cult base industry, one day, we will come back.”

Nangong Wan nodded, said: “Certainly will come back. Cult Master, when do we walk?”

Zongli Wu [say / way] without hesitation: “After packing the thing, immediately walks.”

Nangong Wan somewhat surprised [say / way]: “Didn't wait for the remote antiquity elder and Old Long they?”

Zongli Wu shook the head, said: “Does not wait. The remote antiquity elder does not let us and others she, does not know how she thinks. Since Sun-Moon Empire must have no consideration for face with us, why doesn't make us retaliate? By her strength, if for it, where can stop deliberately? I not for her safety worry. Packs the thing we to walk immediately, the talented person is the foundation, so long as we leave here, saves the strength slightly, stages a comeback is not the issue.”

“Yes.”Nangong Wan respectful is complying. Here, Zongli Wu controls, share that he only then obeys the order.

In this time, suddenly, Zongli Wu and Feng Ling are almost gaining also ground, toward airborne looks. Their complexion slightly changes.

Nangong Wan as well as an audiences Evil Soul Master elders' response slightly slow a point, all gained ground.

Is above Titled Douluo cultivates for powerhouse, they have strong sensation ability. In the sky transmits the huge oppression strength suddenly, can't they possibly feel?

The terrifying pressure made one be flustered, but the source of this pressure actually unknown, every so often, unknown was most fearful.

Zongli Wu issues an order, a light barrier instantaneous ascension, covers all Evil Soul Master completely.

The linkage defense guard shield, this gadget may, not only the Sun-Moon Empire official has. Holy Spirit Cult becomes the national religion for a long time, the methods of some of their also many maintaining life, particularly, here is the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters!

The sky gradually became dim, the clouds of big piece collected from the distant place, the weather also as if started becomes cold.

“I have a look.”The Feng Ling sinking sound said.

Zongli Wu actually holds on Feng Ling, shook the head to her, “is not the Sun-Moon Empire person, this pressure is not Soul Engineer can take to us, takes our cultivating as, can make us produce so the person of pressure, on entire Continent few. Sends Distress Signal.”

“Requests reinforcements? To it?”Feng Ling surprised looks at Zongli Wu.

Zongli Wu nodded.

Next flickers, bunch of bright golden color fireworks ascended, after blasts out, is golden light shoots to go toward a higher airborne electricity together, similarly blasts out, changes into the golden gamp, for a very long time is not loose.

Also at this time, a white light dropped from the clouds, the ray not was extremely intense, flash when but it presented that the following Evil Soul Master complexion actually somewhat changed, the pressure that because, was blocked by the linkage defense guard shield appeared once again, moreover compared with formerly also wanted intense many.

“Pū!”The linkage defense guard shield almost cannot prevent that white light moment, the guard shield had been passed through, the white light falls instantaneously.

Zongli Wu first moves sideways to retrocede, runs away toward the distant place.

Holy Spirit Cult and Shrek Academy maximum difference lies, encounters the danger time, each of them first thinks is own safety, but is not other people.

Fierce thundering flickers to resound below, as if entire earth was lifted, the terrifying large explosion, made the world for it discoloration.

Tang Sect is in sole possession of nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, Highest Flatterer!

In the past, Huo Yuhao once relied on this type to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to puncture including the guard shield of Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace surely, let alone is the Holy Spirit Cult linkage defense guard shield.

After the guard shield was pierced, does not have first completely to collapse, but the following large explosion, suddenly erupts in this guard shield range.

Nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, even if Titled Douluo must for it frightened existence! Now on world most expensive weapon.

Reason that Soul Engineer can dominate important relying on gradually above Soul Master.( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-604-part-3





Volume 13

98 levels! Next


Tang Wutong sighed one lightly, said: “If before meeting Old Long and Ye Xishui, perhaps I believe that but I did not think so now. Limit Douluo has own trump card, they have own experience to this world, our cultivating to have perhaps been that level, before but we have that experience, we absolutely are also not Limit Douluo. Therefore, we must continue to try hard, the effort of going all out, we can certainly achieve that boundary, to that time, we looked at entire world, will be certainly more different.”

“Said well, no matter, I side you, accompany certainly you, impact that level, goes forward to that world together.”Saying that Huo Yuhao laughs.

How regardless to say that cultivated to arrive at the Limit Douluo level! Can he not be excited? Since this has been he continuously pursue.

“Almost arrived, I look.”Huo Yuhao draws Tang Wutong to control speed, in airborne was slow gradually.

This place he truly has come, at present the big forest of cover presents for from dark green to the jet black color. On entire Continent, only then this forest has such characteristics. Because here is, Evil Spirit Forest!

Yes, Holy Spirit Cult headquarters, in Evil Spirit Forest, if not obtain the news from Long Xiaoyao there, anybody cannot imagine.

Evil Spirit Forest in the Sun-Moon Empire status, like Star Dou Forest the status on Douluo Continent. Is living Sun-Moon Empire most formidable Soul Beast, the rank world Ten Great Ferocious Beasts second Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler lives now here.

Huo Yuhao Spirit Eyes seventh Soul Ring, obtains from here, at that time he struck to kill one 100,000 years have repaired for Evil Eye Tyrant, afterward was discovered by Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, it can be said that barely escapes!

Arrives once more, with past years already completely different, this time, Huo Yuhao not necessarily feared these Evil Eye. Just, what his some are not clear is. Why will Holy Spirit Cult place this momentarily high-risk place own headquarters? What issue did not have regarding these formidable evil soul cities, is, these small and weak Evil Soul Master? They encounter formidable Soul Beast time, but has the danger of perishing anytime.

No matter how. So long as can find Evil Soul Master to be good here, did not have the asylum of Grim Reaper Douluo, now here nobody can prevent itself.

Bleaching and dyeing whereabouts at the same time, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection bloomed outward, just likes a big net, has covered toward Evil Spirit Forest.

Long Xiaoyao gives in his information, only then Evil Spirit Forest this name, where concrete Holy Spirit Cult had not said.

Huo Yuhao when explores, is careful, after all. Here also lives this, cultivates in Soul Beast world to be next to existence of Beast God Di Tian. Can not provoke it, good that do not provoke, in order to avoid brings the unnecessary trouble.

Huo Yuhao had once pledged, so long as is not Soul Beast attacks itself on own initiative. Again does not kill Soul Beast, therefore he will not provoke to Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler. Even if he does not fear is also same.

The mind fluctuation spreads continually, quick, Huo Yuhao had found oneself this line of goals.

In the process that Huo Yuhao in searching to observe has the discretion very much, the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters, since Evil Spirit Forest, they also needs the commodity. After all Bright Capital City is the entire Sun-Moon Empire core. Therefore, Holy Spirit Cult in Evil Spirit Forest, is certainly approaching the Bright Capital City direction.

But Evil Spirit Forest has been full of the danger, wants the avoidance danger as far as possible, is naturally impossible to approach the Core Area territory. Therefore, he mainly searches to observe. Is approaches the Bright Capital City direction the Evil Spirit Forest surrounding.

Really, after some time searching observes, person who Huo Yuhao has happen to discovered bustle about.

These people were too obvious, they the massive material handling, will be piling up in a stretch of open area. Then by special person these thing income space Storage Soul Guidance Device.

Also does not know that these people have many Storage Soul Guidance Device, after the thing in open area piles up with, starts fast drawing, then some people continue the opposite party.

Holy Spirit Cult headquarters in underground, this is the first judgment of Huo Yuhao, because all commodities from underground transport.

The Spiritual Detection downward spread, by his present Spiritual Power, carried on the subsurface exploration is not anything, was continually thorough, Huo Yuhao held breath cold air.

This is what kind of project! Below the ground in this Evil Spirit Forest surrounding, nearly can the construction that described with the palace there.

This building area exceeds thousand mu, inside with the solid granite construction, various arrangement, to the utmost is all magnificent.

The person who bustled about has, rapid calculation, over a thousand people, the majority cultivates to be weak, in three rings to six rings, but also has one and 200 people of cultivating to be strong for the strength. Is directing these to cultivate for the weak person is carrying on the transporting.

Does not need to verify, Huo Yuhao knows one looked to the place, except for Holy Spirit Cult, but also who so rich. These commodities that looking from transports at present, Gold Soul Coin that the rare metal, piles up, various precious materials, the value is unquantifiable, although did not say the rich enemy, but is not worse than Shrek Academy! This is Evil Soul Master usually plunders. Good, was really good.

If there is not been able to be completely definite from the wealth merely, then, when Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection found Zongli Wu and Feng Ling in the crowd, again confirmed without doubt.

Nangong Wan also impressively in crowd, numerous familiar Evil Soul Master faces.

Was here!

Zongli Wu submits in person the water looks is bustling about the teaching audiences, the sinking sound asked to Nangong Wan: “That side remote antiquity Cult Master didn't have news to pass on?”

“Did not have. Remote antiquity Cult Master leaves in the morning, did not have the news to the present.”Nangong Wan was replying respectfully.

Zongli Wu brow tight wrinkle, said: “On a number of commodities all moved away, our people also came back, so long as transports again these commodities, here can abandon temporarily first, blocks the entrance. When we will have the opportunity to come back in the future again. This is the the Cult base industry, one day, we will come back.”

Nangong Wan nodded, said: “Certainly will come back. Cult Master, when do we walk?”

Zongli Wu [say / way] without hesitation: “After packing the thing, immediately walks.”

Nangong Wan somewhat surprised [say / way]: “Didn't wait for the remote antiquity elder and Old Long they?”

Zongli Wu shook the head, said: “Does not wait. The remote antiquity elder does not let us and others she, does not know how she thinks. Since Sun-Moon Empire must have no consideration for face with us, why doesn't make us retaliate? By her strength, if for it, where can stop deliberately? I not for her safety worry. Packs the thing we to walk immediately, the talented person is the foundation, so long as we leave here, saves the strength slightly, stages a comeback is not the issue.”

“Yes.”Nangong Wan respectful is complying. Here, Zongli Wu controls, share that he only then obeys the order.

In this time, suddenly, Zongli Wu and Feng Ling are almost gaining also ground, toward airborne looks. Their complexion slightly changes.

Nangong Wan as well as an audiences Evil Soul Master elders' response slightly slow a point, all gained ground.

Is above Titled Douluo cultivates for powerhouse, they have strong sensation ability. In the sky transmits the huge oppression strength suddenly, can't they possibly feel?

The terrifying pressure made one be flustered, but the source of this pressure actually unknown, every so often, unknown was most fearful.

Zongli Wu issues an order, a light barrier instantaneous ascension, covers all Evil Soul Master completely.

The linkage defense guard shield, this gadget may, not only the Sun-Moon Empire official has. Holy Spirit Cult becomes the national religion for a long time, the methods of some of their also many maintaining life, particularly, here is the Holy Spirit Cult headquarters!

The sky gradually became dim, the clouds of big piece collected from the distant place, the weather also as if started becomes cold.

“I have a look.”The Feng Ling sinking sound said.

Zongli Wu actually holds on Feng Ling, shook the head to her, “is not the Sun-Moon Empire person, this pressure is not Soul Engineer can take to us, takes our cultivating as, can make us produce so the person of pressure, on entire Continent few. Sends Distress Signal.”

“Requests reinforcements? To it?”Feng Ling surprised looks at Zongli Wu.

Zongli Wu nodded.

Next flickers, bunch of bright golden color fireworks ascended, after blasts out, is golden light shoots to go toward a higher airborne electricity together, similarly blasts out, changes into the golden gamp, for a very long time is not loose.

Also at this time, a white light dropped from the clouds, the ray not was extremely intense, flash when but it presented that the following Evil Soul Master complexion actually somewhat changed, the pressure that because, was blocked by the linkage defense guard shield appeared once again, moreover compared with formerly also wanted intense many.

“Pū!”The linkage defense guard shield almost cannot prevent that white light moment, the guard shield had been passed through, the white light falls instantaneously.

Zongli Wu first moves sideways to retrocede, runs away toward the distant place.

Holy Spirit Cult and Shrek Academy maximum difference lies, encounters the danger time, each of them first thinks is own safety, but is not other people.

Fierce thundering flickers to resound below, as if entire earth was lifted, the terrifying large explosion, made the world for it discoloration.

Tang Sect is in sole possession of nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, Highest Flatterer!

In the past, Huo Yuhao once relied on this type to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to puncture including the guard shield of Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace surely, let alone is the Holy Spirit Cult linkage defense guard shield.

After the guard shield was pierced, does not have first completely to collapse, but the following large explosion, suddenly erupts in this guard shield range.

Nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, even if Titled Douluo must for it frightened existence! Now on world most expensive weapon.

Reason that Soul Engineer can dominate important relying on gradually above Soul Master.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-604-part-4





Volume 13

The Holy Ghost extinguishes ( Part 1 )


The explosion has continued for more than ten seconds, gradually weakens. When Zongli Wu crawls from the ground, what sees is an explosion area in confusion.

The rare metal liquefied, more resources were vaporized, disappearance does not see the signs, most makes his grieved what is unable to breathe, massive medium low-order Evil Soul Master lost the trail. Under this degree of attack, simply does not have other possibilities.

Is who? Is who can so found here, and has used one nine levels surely the attack that installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to be outspoken?

Sun-Moon Empire, certainly is Xu Tianran!

The Zongli Wu complexion turned into the iron green completely, he quite hates, why is good to hate itself not to listen to mother, making preliminary Soul Engineer first walk, but to save the time, making them all come back to transport the commodity.

This large explosion, absolutely does not have the seven rings following person to live, even if above seven rings, has drawn support from some Titled Douluo level Evil Soul Master help accidentally, can live on dishonorably in Shi.

The defense of Holy Spirit Cult was insufficient so laxly, but, the commodity must shift, many fortification have demolished. Who can think that some people of cards will launch the attack in this time? Didn't mother go to Bright Capital City? Why Sun-Moon Empire can also start at this time . Moreover, how do they know our headquarters in the position?

The high temperature is continuing, Soul Guidance Protective Cover actually completely damaged, in bombing range, scorched earth.

More than thousand Evil Soul Master, can live in this large explosion, less than hundred people.

Soul Guidance Device, this is the Soul Guidance Device prestige energy. What is more terrifying, this large explosion, has wiped out the Holy Spirit Cult future thoroughly!

Zongli Wu clenches the teeth, eyes is red. But, he felt that high temperature originally is vanishing, displaces. Extremely cold.

Has snowed, in the sky starts to have the snowflake to fall gently downward. These snowflake gentle dancing in the breeze, each piece looks like the feather of swan to be ordinary.

The clouds of haze, have snowflake to drift about unceasingly under. Quick, the earth turned into gonorrhea snow white, before burned black, was buried.

The residual heat in ground, as if not affect to these snowflakes, is unable to make them have the melting of least bit unexpectedly.

The Huo Yuhao baseless conjecture in the midair, the whole person seems like carefully examining oneself world king to be ordinary. The hand of Tang Wutong, Spiritual Detection and Sharing has been covering the surrounding big piece space.

Reason that uses Highest Flatterer, is not because he thinks that he could not cope with these Evil Soul Master, but for did not leave behind any fish slip through.

If any Evil Soul Master runs away, may bring the disaster, the behavior eliminates evil thoroughly, cannot show mercy at this time absolutely.

Zongli Wu looked like feels anything, when he crawled after the ground. First to airborne looks. On the old face is revealing the panic-stricken color, at this moment, he were bared all unexpectedly presents feeling outside.

The snowflake dances in the air, the temperature in air reduces suddenly. Can live in this large explosion, less than hundred people, moreover many were also injured. This is nine levels surely installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball the prestige energy! Was sneak attacked by it without any preparation, that is fatal. Initially Dou Ling Empire imperial palace so. This time Holy Spirit Cult teaches the audiences also similarly so.

The extremely cold aura arrives at the earth, some Evil Soul Master moved these snowflakes, discovery that they can shock. These seem like the delicate snowflakes, hard is similar to the jade is unexpectedly ordinary, but moves slightly, will immediately feel that the unequalled chill in the air attacks the whole body instantaneously.

That spreads to coldness in bone, as if in that flash, must be frozen including the marrow.

The Soul Master cold resistant ability be much stronger than average person, but, if the temperature lowers to 150 degrees below zero, even if Titled Douluo is impossible to survive under such ultra-low temperature for a long time.

When that snowflake descends, Zongli Wu knows that is who came, those who made his heart sink to the valley was, strength that this person bloomed, be some time ago more terrorist than that wartime. Why? Why he grows so will be rapid, he so will be why fearful, why can he find here?

“Dispersion, runs!”Zongli Wu bellows, the personal appearance accelerates suddenly, throws toward the Evil Spirit Forest deep place. Feng Ling follows, follows side him.

In this time, pure white Halo is dropping from the clouds, covers all Evil Soul Master completely, leakproof.

“Can get away?”

The gentle snowflake, turned into the terror sharp weapon suddenly, dances in the air rapidly, changes into a handle handle sharp knife blade. Easily pierces the Evil Soul Master bodies of these heavy wound.

light shadow drop from the clouds, has in the snow the fairy maiden, has in the ice deep green, the great bear arrives. Slaughters is almost is erupting instantaneously.

Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain, this is truly perfect edition Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain, even if Snow Emperor displayed in the past personally, cannot be this degree.

Because Huo Yuhao Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain fused Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor domain ability, has both the two superiority.

Under this ultra-low temperature, only then has the Absolute Ice powerhouse to be like a fish in water, Snow Emperor, Ice Emperor and Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White), three big powerhouses drop from the clouds.

With completion of Huo Yuhao second Soul Nucleus, this time they, can borrow the Huo Yuhao strength large scale, once the strength of complete condition arrived by nearly.

Not having Evil Soul Master can resist their attacks, does not have, all Evil Soul Master before them, look like child irresistibly is ordinary, changes into the ice sculpture unceasingly or is the powder powder.

Dropping from the clouds Bai Se (White Color) Halo is Group Weakening. A fearfulness of Limit Douluo Spiritual System Soul Ability, could not find second on Continent now.

Whirlpool Soul Power that Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus produces, making in any sole Soul Ability have two characteristics, mind and ice.

Therefore, when Group Weakening arrives, not Evil Soul Master, not only felt weakly, during that was weak drills into oneself spiritual sea ice to be cold, as if the consciousness was frozen.

Holy Spirit Cult two big Limit Douluo no longer, Transcendent Douluo had been killed by Huo Yuhao, can preserve, simply not too many powerhouses.

They only want to go all out to escape now, flee this terrifying snow and ice hell.

The melodious singing sound resounds, Mermaid Princess from the sky sang, ice blue halos from the sky proliferated, that was coming from amplification of Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass to Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain.

Five big spirits, are equal to at least the powerhouses of two Limit Douluo levels add on three Transcendent Douluo. Although they cannot endless with the aid of the Huo Yuhao strength, but coped with these Evil Soul Master to be enough.

Only then first reacts and whole-heartedly outward impact Zongli Wu and Feng Ling, ran out of the Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain category. They have not run away toward the distant place, but is crazy dashes about wildly toward Evil Spirit Forest.

Evil Spirit Forest has massive Soul Beast, only then breaks, has the possibility of finding a way out.

Zongli Wu had not considered must contend with Huo Yuhao, heavy wound that his previous receive did not have to heal and recover completely, the Bone Dragon king also to sacrifice, present he, is not the most flourishing condition. But aura that in the Huo Yuhao domain spreads, making him have a very frightened guess.

Limit Douluo, that clearly is the Limit Douluo pressure!

The pressure of this level, he is familiar, on oneself mother has, on Long Xiaoyao also has. But, he cannot think, Huo Yuhao actually can also in such a short time achievement Limit Douluo.

He now even including guessing the plan of reason does not have, because he does not have that time, now he only wants to run, running distant, first kept the life to say again.

The Zongli Wu age was not small, but, he treasures his statement as before, lives for a long time, does not hate dead on exceed!

“Stops.”The light sound from the sky resounds, regarding Zongli Wu, is ordinary just like the thunderclap.

Feng Ling lowers roars, body flame Sheng, the Dark Phoenix instantaneous ascension, the formidable flame lights the surrounding forest suddenly greatly completely, braves a large amount of thick smokes.

Two forms dropped from the clouds at this moment, light the flame of forest almost to extinguish instantaneously, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong shakes hand to arrive in front of Feng Ling and Zongli Wu.

Sees them, a Zongli Wu final fantasy was also disillusioned, is Limit Douluo, they divided Bright Capital City to have the Limit Douluo aura, was not a person, but was two people!

Facing two Limit Douluo, their which opportunities of also a little life? Only if hurried back in this time Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao.

Huo Yuhao light [say / way]: “Stemming from respecting Senior Long and Senior Ye, can keep your entire corpse.”

Zongli Wu cloudy and cold looks at Huo Yuhao, “you think that you did win? You extinguish kill my Holy Spirit Cult these many people, if I can live today departure, certainly will exhaust all means that making Shrek City turn into the ghost legendary creature.”

Huo Yuhao ridicule smiles, “first, you are impossible to have that opportunity. Next, if your Holy Spirit Cult has skill to do, Shrek City already did not exist. You could not achieve before, later cannot achieve similarly. Can Shrek can it be that you blaspheme?”

Tang Wutong loosens Huo Yuhao to hold her hand, the starting to walk step, walks toward Zongli Wu and Feng Ling.

Huo Yuhao must control another side Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain, Soul Power must be borrowed by five big spirits, but she is actually complete condition.

Feng Ling has gotten rid, this completely oppressed atmosphere keeps her from enduring, the dark flame erupts suddenly, this time has not proliferated, but changes into together the firing line, directly soars Tang Wutong to go.

Tang Wutong smiles cold, shone a round dazzling sunlight suddenly, the sunlight was the Purple gold color, changed into the giant corona becomes her background. The firing line that Feng Ling releases has not arrived in front of her, to shatter naturally.

-------------------------------------------------

Four finished, asking the monthly ticket to support! At the end of the month, exploded plants! The monthly ticket pounds quickly. Tomorrow, the day after tomorrow is also four!( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-605-part-1





Volume 13

The Holy Ghost extinguishes ( Part 2 )


The Tang Wutong right hand lifts, a handle jet black such as black ink has the hammer of golden trace to appear in her left hand, the wrist|skill shakes, the Clear Sky Hammer thump strikes in the air.

Low and deep sonic bang thunders to resound, in a diameter hundred meters range, all plants vanishes in puff of smoke instantaneously. The earth instantaneously is undercutting several rice.

Feng Ling stuffy snort|hum, in mouth the blood spurts crazily. In the eye full is color with amazement.

Wields that flash of hammer in Tang Wutong, she only thought that the air condensed completely, then changes into a handle diameter hundred meters great hammer, shells directly on her.

The Dark Phoenix flame scatters in all directions to flutter about, her both legs fall into the soil.

Under the absolute strength suppression, she is the least bit revolt cannot achieve unexpectedly.

Zongli Wu Staff appeared in his hands, Wraith Soul raise around his body, how regardless to say that he is 98 levels of Titled Douluo, he is impossible to resign oneself to extinction. The dragging, this is he must do.

The Grim Reaper Devil Puppet shadow appears behind him, after bunch of Wraith Soul appear, is burns unexpectedly instantaneously in sad and shrill neighing, changes into bunch of jack-o '- lanterns, then unceasing was swallowed by that Grim Reaper Devil Puppet.

On the face of Zongli Wu is a fierceness. Feng Ling is face upwards a long and loud cry, changes into black Fire Phoenix instantaneously, in the neighing sound is having the intense soul shake, Martial Soul avatar!

Behind Tang Wutong, dragon wings launches, right hand in void one move, Golden Dragon Spear appears in the right hand, points at Zongli Wu, left hand Clear Sky Hammer is actually unceasingly from the sky wields.

Dark Phoenix in sky every time wants to approach, immediately instantaneously will be raised by the invisible airing flies, each hammer, her brilliance will be weakened several points. This completely is the disparity of absolute strength.

The Tang Wutong behind Sun ray was more powerful, the Zongli Wu whole body that the formidable Light aura shines ascends the faint trace smog, but he as before is actually suppressing, back Grim Reaper Devil Puppet in Wraith Soul flame under pours into unceasingly, becomes more and more congealing reality.

Zongli Wu own strength came from these Wraith Soul. At this time actually the Wraith Soul combustion, obviously he stakes everything on a single throw of the dice. This was must go all out.

Huo Yuhao stands in Tang Wutong behind not far away, is actually a relaxedness of face, to Tang Wutong view enemy.

Suddenly, airborne Dark Phoenix erupts the intense flame aura, after having shouldered a Tang Wutong hammer hardly, that hovering in midair.

The Feng Ling main body appears gradually, her complexion paleness, blood spurt crazily, spurts thinly above front dark flame. Her body also starts to burn unexpectedly. Combustion, not only Soul Power, is the strength of her soul.

“Wutong, be careful.”The Huo Yuhao sinking sound shouted to clear the way.

Although Feng Ling in name is Holy Spirit Cult vice- Cult Master, in fact she also has been controlled by Zongli Wu, for Zongli Wu, she burns unexpectedly oneself soul and Martial Soul, perhaps is she is not necessarily voluntary.

“Raises!”Feng Ling face upwards to call out pitifully, body changes into a black red great fire group suddenly, then integrates in own phoenix flame instantaneously. Immediately, jet black such as Fire Phoenix of black ink turned into the black completely, instigation that a pair of wing makes an effort, this time. Flies the Tang Wutong Clear Sky Hammer hammer vigor fan unexpectedly. Then falls from the sky from the sky suddenly, not to the Tang Wutong direction, but flies to shoot to go toward Zongli Wu.

Wipes to sneer to appear on the Huo Yuhao face, without a doubt. Feng Ling and Zongli Wu are displaying, inevitably is Holy Spirit Cult secret technique. As for the effect is anything, Huo Yuhao is not clear. But took burning Feng Ling and Zongli Wu massive Wraith Soul as the price, the effect will not be certainly bad, can perhaps make them have temporarily the attack of Limit Douluo level also perhaps. The Evil Soul Master ability, is always surreptitious.

But, controls in front of Huo Yuhao of audience in according to Spiritual Detection, he how in oneself will occupy completely in the superior situation to give Zongli Wu such opportunity.

The personal appearance dodges quietly, Huo Yuhao arrived at Tang Wutong behind, stretches out the arms, grasped her tender body from behind.

On the Tang Wutong elegant face reveals a smile, pair of dragon wings turns over to behind, the gable lived in Huo Yuhao. Two people bloomed the intense ray.

The appearance that glitters strange ray vertical eye to be quietly, the golden color, aquamarine, Zhen blue color and deep purple, many rays unceasing glitters and is fluctuating in this only vertical eye.

Next flickers, this is mixing the innumerable strange brilliance rays, the electricity from that huge vertical eye shoots.

The assurance of Huo Yuhao to opportunity is impossible to have the problem, when he grasps Tang Wutong that flash, is Feng Ling and Zongli Wu fusion at the same time. At this time, Zongli Wu was impossible to move the personal appearance.

Strange multi- color ray instantaneous electricity shoots, the magnificent brilliance made the surrounding large room cover a magnificent singularly varied color.

Zongli Wu obtains integration of Feng Ling, the whole person turned into piece of dark red, back Grim Reaper Devil Puppet is integrating with his main body, his own aura at an exceptional pace is also selecting for promotion.

But also at this time, that [say / way] magnificent multi- color ray arrived in front of him. Zongli Wu only thought that the whole body shakes, he felt that entire world becomes is different, that magnificent feeling, making him have relaxation of not being able to say. This relaxation is from the heart, that comfortable.

But, he actually again could not feel own formidable Soul Power, integrated own Grim Reaper Devil Puppet almost to be eliminated instantaneously. His whole person also turned into a golden sculpture, great power, is similar to the snow and ice melting is ordinary, is vanishing quietly.

Fading in Radiance, Golden Road.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong formidable Martial Soul Fusion technique.

The Martial Soul Fusion technique that takes two close Limit Douluo to cultivate for the powerhouse shows, in this flash, its prestige can in fact go beyond the limit of this world, has been half god level.

Zongli Wu and Feng Ling are strong by the ability of secret technique fusion, in approached in front of the strength of gods, what was also considered as?

The Feng Ling strength vanished with her soul together, has not left any trace. Zongli Wu Grim Reaper Devil Puppet was also eliminated, Soul Power, most. When he pants for breath is forcing works loose from that golden color, the whole person seemed to be old dozens years old.

With Huo Yuhao and qualitative change of Tang Wutong strength, Golden Road also similar qualitative change. On the wane no longer is Martial Soul and Soul Ability, in the meantime, the vitalities of some people.

Zongli Wu was very old, steps onto this in Golden Road, his vitality drops instantaneously, the whole person completely is a last years of life old person's appearance.

“Impossible, this not to be impossible. This does not belong to the strength of humanity. Even if my mother or is Old Long, does not have such strength. Why and why can you actually display?”Zongli Wu absent-minded was roaring. The last resort cannot even display, thoroughly was destroyed by the opposite party. This attack, for him is really too many heavy, because pays, will be the life price.

Rays fly to shoot to come from the distant place, stops to Huo Yuhao in front. Then changes into bunch of rays, integrates his within the body separately.

Sees the advancements of these rays, Zongli Wu is the surface like the dying embers. The spirit came back, means that all Holy Spirit Cult powerhouses had all caught the whole lot in a dragnet, does not have any living witness again. Holy Spirit Cult, unravelled.

“Huo Yuhao! You destroy my Holy Spirit Cult, the old man becomes the ghost, will not let off your.”Zongli Wu looks that in the Huo Yuhao look has been full of the hatred.

Huo Yuhao sighed one lightly, said: “Was a pity that you become the opportunity of ghost will not have. Your this life, does not know that has injured the souls of many people. Even if you become the ghost or Wraith Soul, during is dark, you will also suffer the scourge. However, stemming from senior to Old Long and respect of Ye Xishui, I will not give you opportunity. You believe that before me, you also has into the possibility of ghost?”

At the same time was saying, the double pupil of Huo Yuhao turned into the golden color, walked toward Zongli Wu step by step, formidable Spiritual Power, changes into huge light barrier, covers them, the mind fluctuation of that terror, makes the Zongli Wu any mind level strength collapse sufficiently.

In this time, suddenly, entire space as if fiercely was shaking, drops from the clouds just like mountain general terror Spiritual Power.

Low and deep, dignified and cloudy and cold sound from the sky reverberates.

“Who is? Is who dares to destroy the main body deep sleep, is, dares to slaughter in my Evil Spirit Forest?”Appears with that low and deep sound, the sky starts to twist unexpectedly, then becomes a darkness.

Jet black such as Wu Yun (black clouds) of black ink splits to the both sides slowly, was the entire day has torn unexpectedly likely, a giant eye, that appeared in the midair, the vision referred, position that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong as well as Zongli Wu were.

“Controls the Sir, you came finally, please punish these to dare to destroy the Evil Spirit Forest tranquil person.”The reinforcements that the call of Zongli Wu hysteria, he must wait for came finally.

Yes, this is Holy Spirit Cult final depending on. If did not obtain the agreement of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, Holy Spirit Cult possibly does set up the headquarters in Evil Spirit Forest underground? Although in the Evil Spirit Forest edge, but also obviously relations between they and Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler.

Has Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao two big Limit Douluo exists, they have the qualifications and Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler discuss the condition.

But this time, if were not soon moves toward the death that Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao self inductance vitality declined, Holy Spirit Cult was also not necessarily able to move.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is not the good generation, once Holy Spirit Cult not enough and it stands existence in same level, it does not mind the Holy Spirit Cult destruction absolutely. Even if Holy Spirit Cult has not been short for these years to it consecrates is also same. Evil Spirit Forest is its domain, is its place of control, naturally is not willing to have humanity continuously here.

-----------------------------------------------------

Continues four! First two, in the evening two. Does obeisance to ask the monthly ticket to support.( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-605-part-2





Volume 13

The Holy Ghost extinguishes ( Part 3 )


The Purple gold color glare has glittered together suddenly, in Zongli Wu whole body big change of hysteria call, the look becomes in the next flash dim, gradually vanished the brilliance.

What regardless of comes is, is impossible to change Huo Yuhao to strike to kill his determination, is Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master he, must die. This possibly does not have any other.

Holy Spirit Cult, starting from this moment, finally from Continent thorough cancelled, this does not know that has cruelly harmed Evil Soul Master clan/sect of many lives, forever withers away!

“Humanity. Affronts the main body dignity, must pay the price.”The sound of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler powerful resounds, the diameter surpasses the hundred zhang (333m) the dark red glare to drop from the clouds together suddenly, covers Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong completely.

Back then, Huo Yuhao had withstood an attack of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, that time, he was relying on Spiritual Immunity, barely escaped. Fled Evil Spirit Forest.

But this time, he is not initially that talent just becomes Soul Saint Huo Yuhao.

In the dark red ray that drops from the clouds, Huo Yuhao vision brilliant, huge vertical eye shines suddenly, glitters the golden-rose color brilliance to glisten together instantaneously.

Martial Soul avatar, Eye of Asura!

Compared with the dark red ray that drops from the clouds, the golden-rose color ray that Huo Yuhao sends out obviously many that others are smaller and weaker . But when, two pupil light from the sky collide instant.

In the sky, the Wu Yun (black clouds) fierce change, that huge dark red light beam was blocked unexpectedly. Moreover, its color also has the transformation, unexpectedly many light ice blue color, moreover is spreading toward its source.

Eye of Asura and Soul Assault! Huo Yuhao Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus mixes Soul Power in dripping Absolute that this moment displays.

“Well?”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler surprised snort|hum, the dark red ray has collected suddenly inward. Originally the diameter of hundred zhang (333m) almost in ray dodges, collected, only then diameter about one zhang (3.33 m). The terrifying mind storm erupts in the midair.

The sky turned into the red instantaneously, looks like a piece of bloodshed is ordinary. Fierce mind fluctuation. Let all Soul Beast in entire Evil Spirit Forest all crawl in the place, does not dare to have moves slightly. They felt to come from the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler anger. But here, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is all control.

Tang Wutong arrives at side Huo Yuhao, saw the dignity of Huo Yuhao look, a time spells, the Huo Yuhao mouth and nose place seeps out the blood unexpectedly.

Is dares to challenge Di Tian worthily, and existence that can the whole body draw back!

When flash of both sides Spiritual Power collision, Huo Yuhao felt what is a constriction beyond description. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler unexpectedly fused formidable Spiritual Power and Space Power completely, what in Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power fuses is Absolute Ice, but in Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Spiritual Power has actually filled the space storm. That terror space thought. Has nearly torn to pieces Huo Yuhao Spiritual Source.

“We come up.”Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, selects for promotion, changes into two light shadow, arrived in the upper air instantaneously.

He had pledged that does not strike to kill Soul Beast easily, in this Evil Spirit Forest is living massive Soul Beast. By them and Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler strength, if spells to fight in the ground, certainly will create loss of life. Therefore, he must place in the sky the battlefield.

In sky originally huge pressure under the terror mind storm wreaks havoc is nothing left. When Huo Yuhao is bringing Tang Wutong after that storms. Finally saw has placed Continent Ten Great Ferocious Beasts second, was next to the Beast God Di Tian terror exists.

The body of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler was too huge, that is over 300 meters in diameter giant eye pupil. Around the terrifying great eye body has 9981 tentacles, each length over 500 meters. From the sky brandishes.

Behind its huge body, completely is piece of dark red, that is its Soul Power sea, therefore had formerly that it, as soon as appears. Just like world end general feeling.

“Evil Tyrant hello, below Huo Yuhao, enters Evil Spirit Forest with my wife. It is not to disturb your deep sleep. That Holy Spirit Cult made my humanity loss of life, must extinguish it kills, but also asked Evil Tyrant to forgive.”Huo Yuhao vision gentle said to Evil Eye Tyrant.

He does not plan and this Evil Eye Tyrant mutual hatred, after all, this is also on Continent the illustrious powerhouse, is controlling Evil Spirit Forest, and what is more, even entire Sun-Moon Continent Soul Beast is headed by it.

The spirit system won initial success along with the development of time, in the future wants to promote, on need more powerhouse's support, if can convince Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, carries on the spirit dissemination in Sun-Moon Continent, regarding the relations between human and Soul Beast relaxes will have big impetus, therefore Huo Yuhao so will be polite.

The Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler giant eye pupil looks at Huo Yuhao, the low and deep sound is reverberating in the entire space, “humanity, you are very formidable. You in I have seen humanity, is only one can the frontage and my Spiritual Power contends. However, you killed had the humanity of cooperation agreement with me, this matter, cannot such consider as finished. You must pay the corresponding price to be good.”

Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “Evil Tyrant, you, although is formidable, but actually do not think that our humanity is very small and weak. I do not hope and you to become an enemy, but, actually does not mean that we fear you. We will not accept your any condition, but does not hope with you for the enemy. If you must with our mutual hatred, that also as you like. You can try greatly, whether can profit on us.”

“Hey!”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler laughs suddenly. 81 tentacles from the sky are brandishing unceasingly, the sky turned into a piece of distortion, formidable Spiritual Power from the sky reverberates, the pressure of that blotting out the sky appears again.

Huo Yuhao also secretly admires to this Evil Tyrant, can own spiritual sea projection in outside the body, and creates so formidable mind fluctuation, he self-examines could not have achieved. Perhaps, in the future after achievement third Soul Nucleus, is a little this level the opportunity.

However, such that just like he said that he did not fear Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, self-confident, stemmed from the strength.

“Humanity, very long nobody has dared to speak with me like this. Very good, then, I must try today but actually, your this arrogant humanity has many abilities. So long as you can run away from main body hand today, this time matter, otherwise, you have stayed behind to my this Evil Spirit Forest make the manure.”

At the same time was saying, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler that 81 tentacles turned into the scarlet red instantaneously, from all directions pulls out toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong strikes, but.

Really valiant! Initially it dared to leave oneself territory to challenge Beast God Di Tian, this Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler temperament could be imagined. It is impossible unable to feel that Tang Wutong also has close Limit Douluo strength, even if is this, it has also chosen the fight.

Although Huo Yuhao pledged that does not kill Soul Beast on own initiative, but if is Soul Beast dares to attack itself, he will not show mercy. Moreover, in all Soul Ring of his present, but also lacks one, lacks Spirit Eyes ninth Soul Ring. Perhaps on this world, does not have anybody compared with Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler appropriately.

Huo Yuhao is Twin Martial Souls, if general Soul Master, even if has killed the powerhouse of Evil Tyrant this level, also impossible absorption Soul Ring that it has produced, because the energy of that implication was really too huge.

But Huo Yuhao is different! He cultivated for on close Limit Douluo level, had Dual Soul Nucleus, absorbed Evil Tyrant Soul Ring also really to have the possibility.

Pulls out the tentacle that strikes to come facing these, the Huo Yuhao surface sinks like the water, he does not have to display his domain ability directly. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler was too formidable.

Although this is first time fights with it directly, but Huo Yuhao has faced the experience of Beast God Di Tian. He is very clear, to Evil Tyrant and powerhouse of Beast God this level, they have stood in the world peak, truly is not general Limit Douluo can contend.

Control of Evil Tyrant to Space Power, absolutely not meeting in Beast God. Therefore, wants to defeat it, only then defeats the enemy by a surprise attack, and cannot with it to consuming. This cultivated had about 700,000 years powerhouses fully, can project including spiritual sea in outside the body, own Soul Power must vigorously to what kind degree Ah?

The light mist raises from Huo Yuhao, Morning Dew Knife appeared during he grasps. In Tang Wutong both hands is Zuo Chuiyou the spear|gun, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection and Sharing already and she completely is as before connected.

Facing the powerhouse of Evil Tyrant this level, in their hearts does not have the least bit to fear, some are excited. Their strengths were just increased, the foundation is not steady, since breaking through 95 levels, they do not have to precipitate well. But wants better experience oneself to cultivate is, was completely grasped the strength that these select for promotion suddenly by oneself, the best means are, fight!

Like initially Huo Yuhao outrageously proposed that selects ten, after is that time, established him became the Transcendent Douluo foundation.

Although Evil Tyrant is formidable, but Huo Yuhao has the absolute confidence to be able the whole body to draw back, even if cannot hit, runs or inescapable. Such being the case, then on full war, enhances own actual combat experience.

Treadonned Ghost Shadow Perplexing Track, Huo Yuhao brings Tang Wutong to glitter instantaneously, under the function of Spiritual Detection and Sharing, they simultaneously used Teleportation to look like general that a person used.

Shifts hundred meters instantaneously. Huo Yuhao appears in a completing the order form tentacle front, in the hand Morning Dew Knife cuts instantaneously.

In the sky, ices blue light shadow to dodge to pass together.

The tentacle and flash of ice blue color light shadow contact, it looks like a dark red whip, what is more fearful, is also containing Can's silver brilliance, the ray twinkle, must icing the blue light blade edge pulls out.

----------------------------------------------

In the evening also has, remembers to come to see!( To be continued..)



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-605-part-3





Volume 13

#605 - The Holy Ghost Extinguishes


The Purple gold color glare has glittered together suddenly, in Zongli Wu whole body big change of hysteria call, the look becomes in the next flash dim, gradually vanished the brilliance.

What regardless of comes is, is impossible to change Huo Yuhao to strike to kill his determination, is Holy Spirit Cult Cult Master he, must die. This possibly does not have any other.

Holy Spirit Cult, starting from this moment, finally from Continent thorough cancelled, this does not know that has cruelly harmed Evil Soul Master clan/sect of many lives, forever withers away!

“Humanity. Affronts the main body dignity, must pay the price.”The sound of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler powerful resounds, the diameter surpasses the hundred zhang (333m) the dark red glare to drop from the clouds together suddenly, covers Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong completely.

Back then, Huo Yuhao had withstood an attack of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, that time, he was relying on Spiritual Immunity, barely escaped. Fled Evil Spirit Forest.

But this time, he is not initially that talent just becomes Soul Saint Huo Yuhao.

In the dark red ray that drops from the clouds, Huo Yuhao vision brilliant, huge vertical eye shines suddenly, glitters the golden-rose color brilliance to glisten together instantaneously.

Martial Soul avatar, Eye of Asura!

Compared with the dark red ray that drops from the clouds, the golden-rose color ray that Huo Yuhao sends out obviously many that others are smaller and weaker . But when, two pupil light from the sky collide instant.

In the sky, the Wu Yun (black clouds) fierce change, that huge dark red light beam was blocked unexpectedly. Moreover, its color also has the transformation, unexpectedly many light ice blue color, moreover is spreading toward its source.

Eye of Asura and Soul Assault! Huo Yuhao Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus mixes Soul Power in dripping Absolute that this moment displays.

“Well?”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler surprised snort|hum, the dark red ray has collected suddenly inward. Originally the diameter of hundred zhang (333m) almost in ray dodges, collected, only then diameter about one zhang (3.33 m). The terrifying mind storm erupts in the midair.

The sky turned into the red instantaneously, looks like a piece of bloodshed is ordinary. The fierce mind fluctuation, making all Soul Beast in entire Evil Spirit Forest all crawl in the place. Does not dare to have moves slightly. They felt to come from the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler anger. But here, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is all control.

Tang Wutong arrives at side Huo Yuhao, saw the dignity of Huo Yuhao look, a time spells. The Huo Yuhao mouth and nose place seeps out the blood unexpectedly.

Is dares to challenge Di Tian worthily, and existence that can the whole body draw back!

When flash of both sides Spiritual Power collision, Huo Yuhao felt what is a constriction beyond description. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler unexpectedly fused formidable Spiritual Power and Space Power completely, what in Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power fuses is Absolute Ice, but in Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Spiritual Power has actually filled the space storm. The space thought of that terror, has nearly torn to pieces Huo Yuhao Spiritual Source.

“We come up.”Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, selects for promotion, changes into two light shadow, arrived in the upper air instantaneously.

He had pledged that does not strike to kill Soul Beast easily. In this Evil Spirit Forest is living massive Soul Beast. By them and Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler strength, if spells to fight in the ground, certainly will create loss of life. Therefore, he must place in the sky the battlefield.

In sky originally huge pressure under the terror mind storm wreaks havoc is nothing left. When Huo Yuhao is bringing Tang Wutong after that storms, finally saw has placed Continent Ten Great Ferocious Beasts second. Is next to the Beast God Di Tian terror exists.

The body of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler was too huge, that is over 300 meters in diameter giant eye pupil. Around the terrifying great eye body 9981 tentacles, each length over 500 meters, from the sky brandish.

Behind its huge body, completely is piece of dark red, that is its Soul Power sea, therefore had formerly that it, as soon as appears. Just like world end general feeling.

“Evil Tyrant hello, below Huo Yuhao, enters Evil Spirit Forest with my wife, is not to disturb your deep sleep. That Holy Spirit Cult made my humanity loss of life, must extinguish it kills. Also asked Evil Tyrant to forgive.”Huo Yuhao vision gentle said to Evil Eye Tyrant.

He does not plan and this Evil Eye Tyrant mutual hatred, after all, this is also on Continent the illustrious powerhouse, is controlling Evil Spirit Forest, and what is more. Even entire Sun-Moon Continent Soul Beast is headed by it.

The spirit system won initial success along with the development of time, in the future wants to promote, on need more powerhouse's support, if can convince Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, carries on the spirit dissemination in Sun-Moon Continent, regarding the relations between human and Soul Beast relaxes will have big impetus, therefore Huo Yuhao so will be polite.

The Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler giant eye pupil looks at Huo Yuhao, the low and deep sound is reverberating in the entire space, “humanity, you are very formidable. You in I have seen humanity, is only one can the frontage and my Spiritual Power contends. However, you killed had the humanity of cooperation agreement with me, this matter, cannot such consider as finished. You must pay the corresponding price to be good.”

Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “Evil Tyrant, you, although is formidable, but actually do not think that our humanity is very small and weak. I do not hope and you to become an enemy, but, actually does not mean that we fear you. We will not accept your any condition, but does not hope with you for the enemy. If you must with our mutual hatred, that also as you like. You can try greatly, whether can profit on us.”

“Hey!”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler laughs suddenly. 81 tentacles from the sky are brandishing unceasingly, the sky turned into a piece of distortion, formidable Spiritual Power from the sky reverberates, the pressure of that blotting out the sky appears again.

Huo Yuhao also secretly admires to this Evil Tyrant, can own spiritual sea projection in outside the body, and creates so formidable mind fluctuation, he self-examines could not have achieved. Perhaps, in the future after achievement third Soul Nucleus, is a little this level the opportunity.

However, such that just like he said that he did not fear Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, self-confident, stemmed from the strength.

“Humanity, very long nobody has dared to speak with me like this. Very good, then, I must try today but actually, your this arrogant humanity has many abilities. So long as you can run away from main body hand today, this time matter, otherwise, you have stayed behind to my this Evil Spirit Forest make the manure.”

At the same time was saying, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler that 81 tentacles turned into the scarlet red instantaneously, from all directions pulls out toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong strikes, but.

Really valiant! Initially it dared to leave oneself territory to challenge Beast God Di Tian, this Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler temperament could be imagined. It is impossible unable to feel that Tang Wutong also has close Limit Douluo strength, even if is this, it has also chosen the fight.

Although Huo Yuhao pledged that does not kill Soul Beast on own initiative, but if is Soul Beast dares to attack itself, he will not show mercy. Moreover, in all Soul Ring of his present, but also lacks one, lacks Spirit Eyes ninth Soul Ring. Perhaps on this world, does not have anybody compared with Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler appropriately.

Huo Yuhao is Twin Martial Souls, if general Soul Master, even if has killed the powerhouse of Evil Tyrant this level, also impossible absorption Soul Ring that it has produced, because the energy of that implication was really too huge.

But Huo Yuhao is different! He cultivated for on close Limit Douluo level, had Dual Soul Nucleus, absorbed Evil Tyrant Soul Ring also really to have the possibility.

Pulls out the tentacle that strikes to come facing these, the Huo Yuhao surface sinks like the water, he does not have to display his domain ability directly. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler was too formidable.

Although this is first time fights with it directly, but Huo Yuhao has faced the experience of Beast God Di Tian. He is very clear, to Evil Tyrant and powerhouse of Beast God this level, they have stood in the world peak, truly is not general Limit Douluo can contend.

Control of Evil Tyrant to Space Power, absolutely not meeting in Beast God. Therefore, wants to defeat it, only then defeats the enemy by a surprise attack, and cannot with it to consuming. This cultivated had about 700,000 years powerhouses fully, can project including spiritual sea in outside the body, own Soul Power must vigorously to what kind degree Ah?

The light mist raises from Huo Yuhao, Morning Dew Knife appeared during he grasps. In Tang Wutong both hands is Zuo Chuiyou the spear|gun, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection and Sharing already and she completely is as before connected.

Facing the powerhouse of Evil Tyrant this level, in their hearts does not have the least bit to fear, some are excited. Their strengths were just increased, the foundation is not steady, since breaking through 95 levels, they do not have to precipitate well. But wants better experience oneself to cultivate is, was completely grasped the strength that these select for promotion suddenly by oneself, the best means are, fight!

Like initially Huo Yuhao outrageously proposed that selects ten, after is that time, established him became the Transcendent Douluo foundation.

Although Evil Tyrant is formidable, but Huo Yuhao has the absolute confidence to be able the whole body to draw back, even if cannot hit, runs or inescapable. Such being the case, then on full war, enhances own actual combat experience.

Treadonned Ghost Shadow Perplexing Track, Huo Yuhao brings Tang Wutong to glitter instantaneously, under the function of Spiritual Detection and Sharing, they simultaneously used Teleportation to look like general that a person used.

Shifts hundred meters instantaneously. Huo Yuhao appears in a completing the order form tentacle front, in the hand Morning Dew Knife cuts instantaneously.

In the sky, ices blue light shadow to dodge to pass together.

The tentacle and flash of ice blue color light shadow contact, it looks like a dark red whip, what is more fearful, is also containing Can's silver brilliance, the ray twinkle, must icing the blue light blade edge pulls out.

----------------------------------------------

In the evening also has, remembers to come to see!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-605-part-4





Volume 13

#606 - Evil Monarch Perishes


However, above that ice blue color light blade edge, instantaneous ray greatly Sheng, the silver and golden color hands over to glitter. The temperature in air reduces instantaneously, that blade edge has only wiped the tentacle.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler called out pitifully, a tentacle such had cut off one section by Huo Yuhao unexpectedly. Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong personal appearance glitters and accelerates once more. Suddenly under the acceleration, the aura of his whole person became somewhat rapid, but actually actually drilled from the slits of other tentacles.

Shakes by the huge energy frontage hardly, might as well wrestle in the skill. Evil Tyrant does not know that Huo Yuhao has Morning Dew Knife this type of Divine Weapon sharp weapon, unexpectedly comes up to suffer a loss.

But at the same time, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler one was also enraged, sees only his giant eye pupil center suddenly becomes profound, a dark red thorn corona appears in the addendum circle.

“Buzz”sky as if fiercely shook, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong simultaneously felt that is similar myriad sharp thorns to dig in own spiritual sea, then entrains own spiritual sea to detach.

What ability is this? Huo Yuhao is surprised. He is also first time faces Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, did not exaggerate said that although Evil Tyrant was inferior in the overall strength in Beast God Di Tian, but in the mind level, actually absolutely can become now the Continent's Number One Expert title.

Traded has cultivated for slightly weakly, perhaps spiritual sea will directly be stripped outside the body, not having spiritual sea, the person to turn into the idiot, but can also revolt?

Luckily, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong have mind Soul Nucleus, feels that formidable force of traction, Huo Yuhao and mind Soul Nucleus in Tang Wutong mind immediately the fierce fluctuation, strong Spiritual Power resists with the thorn that these prick fiercely, has withstood that powerful attack stiffly. However, even if so, their personal appearance slightly sluggish. The massive tentacles of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler have twined.

Also at this moment, an ice blue color halo also suddenly outward bursts out from Huo Yuhao, a glittering and translucent carving grass appears in his shoulder, is Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass.

Does not need Huo Yuhao to control, his spirit launched the attack for him.

Octagonal Ten Thousands Directional Thorns!

The innumerable giant ice spears are centered on the body of Huo Yuhao bursts out outward, gets rid to pull out strikes on the ice lance, the shaved ice scatters in all directions the splash, but went against eventually by these ice spears, has not fallen on Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

The dark blue sword glow sweeps away together, Snow Emperor animated standing side Huo Yuhao, Snow Emperor Three Ultimate, Peerless Extreme Ice.

More than ten tentacles were cut by this sword, although Peerless Extreme Ice is inferior to Morning Dew Knife sharply, cannot cut off these tentacles directly, but also makes these several get rid under Absolute Ice to freeze.

Ice Emperor appears side Snow Emperor, in the beautiful pupil green jade light puts greatly, a tender body revolution, has appeared Ice Emperor avatar, the giant tail hook flings, the aquamarine ray, directly soars Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler of distant place to shoot together.

This Soul Ability, even if Huo Yuhao does not have, after was Ice Emperor gradually restored the original strength, can use again. But her present condition, has displayed Martial Soul avatar in Huo Yuhao.

“Well!”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is once more surprised, in eye pupil projects together black light, collides in the aquamarine ray together, airborne splashes immediately the innumerable halos. But also at this time, before a Ice Emperor pair, the chela makes an effort closed up, immediately, got rid to have a series of explosions by several that Peerless Extreme Ice froze before.

She has never thought her attack can injure to formidable Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler directly, but must attract his attention, does not make him have the freeze that the time disposal gets rid, immediately has inspired then Ice Explosion Technique.

The tentacle of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is truly formidable, even if the function of Ice Explosion Technique, cannot destroy them, is only the purple blood splashes.

“Roar! You enraged me really!”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler roars, all tentacles also raise up. At this time has withstood its mind attack Huo Yuhao to come soberly, sees surprised, before tentacle that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler each raising up, with its own exactly the same eye, but wants small many. At this time, on each eye is sending out the strange brilliance.

81 tentacles, besides by that Huo Yuhao cuts off, the surplus 80 tentacles are all sending out the spooky ray.

“Yuhao, was careful.”The Snow Emperor sinking sound shouted to clear the way. Meanwhile, her tender body revolution, vanished baseless, changes into the big piece the snowflake to diverge toward the surroundings, is the frontage moved forward to meet somebody in the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler direction unexpectedly.

This is Snow Emperor, ranks Ten Great Ferocious Beasts third Snow Emperor.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler roars, 80 tentacles release 80 beams instantaneously, these beam any rays, have not been the pure black, when they simultaneously appear, greatly somewhat the feeling of world discoloration.

Snow Emperor flies to shoot, but snowflake dances lightly, in these beams able to move unhindered, is fending its attack alternately, but these black beams itself do not aim at her. But directly soars Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao clearly can feel that through Spiritual Detection their path, does not have the means to fend, in the resistance of mind level, he also has the disparity with Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler eventually.

Tang Wutong goes forward suddenly one step, before arriving at the Huo Yuhao body, in the hand Clear Sky Hammer rumbles void, this time, in her behind, reappeared a shadow of great hammer, the great hammer appeared, rose suddenly against the wind, is almost in a flash, rises suddenly has been hundred meters, great hammer across the sky, numerous bombardments in air.

Clear Sky Hammer avatar, even if Huo Yuhao, is first time sees Tang Wutong to display this ability.

Fierce thundering resounds suddenly, the entire sky as if instantaneously ruptured generally, the sky caves, the huge suction, made Huo Yuhao and Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler shakes, was attracted several points forward.

These Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler project black light in airborne is defeated and dispersed immediately.

However, is defeated and dispersed is actually only the flash, next one flickers, these are defeated and dispersed black light vanished unexpectedly. Waits for Tang Wutong to discover the time, these 80 black light arrived in front of them unexpectedly.

Space Power, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler unexpectedly Space Power and own Spiritual Power union such good.

Tang Wutong as before has not actually retroceded, the great hammer keeps off before the body, a terrifying thought bursts out from her.

On Clear Sky Hammer avatar, a golden trace blooms outward. Is centered on Clear Sky Hammer, the surroundings space all turned into the silver, then in abundance to shatter. This time, that 80 black rays really completely to shatter fell.

Similarly is Space Power, Space Power that but, Tang Wutong displays, is actually and Clear Sky Hammer Absolute Strength to the fusion.

to shatter black light from the sky blasts out, the complementary waves actually as before arrived on Tang Wutong. Her body trembles slightly, Clear Sky Hammer avatar vanished immediately. A thought also transmitted to Huo Yuhao.

“mind paralysis.”

Said these four characters, on Tang Wutong is golden light greatly puts, this is she takes oneself to cultivate for is resisting the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler sign.

In this time, the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler main body of distant place, is bursting out a wild thought suddenly, its diameter achieved 300 meters giant eye pupil to turn suddenly completely bright red, a giant bright red light beam, suddenly suddenly to launch.

That the diameter achieves 300 meters terrifying red light beam together! Almost covers the snowflakes of Snow Emperor all incarnations completely. Moreover shells to come toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

This is the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler most formidable attack.

Huo Yuhao only thought that own spiritual sea one has seethed with excitement, that is a total destruction arrives at the general feeling. After several probing attacks, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler finally started to use it most formidable weapon successively.

Snow Emperor reappears suddenly before his body, fuses with Ice Emperor together. Next flickers, ices the white and deep green union together, instantaneously blooms.

Compared with terrorist attack that the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler aggressive side leaks, this Ice and Snow Two Emperor's Pride be only the diameter about ten meters, the volume is much smaller. However, actually also Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong protecting firmly in behind.

“Bang”fierce thundering in the airborne explosive, the entire sky seemed held big hole. Terrifying mind thought that Absolute Ice powerful aura, dispersing of innumerable Soul Power fluctuation.

The sky finds at everywhere various to shatter gaps, even cannot close for a very long time. The wild thought that making the entire sky shiver. This is fighting of limit level, absolutely is existence of destroying the heaven and extinguishing the earth.

Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor after all are only the spirits, was not once main body, otherwise their two collaborated, has not necessarily feared Evil Tyrant. At this time they actually can only reply on the Huo Yuhao strength. Huo Yuhao present cultivating also has the disparity for and Snow Emperor of heyday.

The collision ended, the Huo Yuhao complexion is somewhat pale, within the body Soul Power one turns intermittently wells up. Then was suppressed in the dantian, belongs to Long Xiaoyao Soul Power he unable to use now completely, at this time own Soul Power reduces at the same time, Soul Power in within the body compression started some trends of being ready to make trouble.

Good strength big Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler! However also finally can withstand its attack directly.

The next round attack of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler has not arrived immediately, its gloomy sound resounds through the sky, “good, is very good, you can actually make Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor your strength, this stemmed from this King to be unexpected actually. However, relies on such strength also to dare to this King to provoke, today, must ask you dead without the burial ground surely.”

81 tentacles raise up once more, 80 black glow put greatly, is the mind beam lacking in vigilance. 1152

The quickest renewal, non- ball window reading invited.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-606-part-1





Volume 13

#606 - Evil Monarch Perishes


This mind paralysis beam also has the Space Power effect, wants to destroy extremely difficultly, under locking of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, fends is almost the impossible matter. To resist, is it may be said that difficult.

Tang Wutong works loose with great difficulty from the beforehand mind paralysis. Her personal appearance dodges, fended behind Huo Yuhao.

To Huo Yuhao behind she, the body started a vitality Purple gold color halo, the buddhist image is dignified, the body surrounding light fog is dense.

Huo Yuhao blue light twinkle, Extreme Ice Battle God Armor covers the whole body rapidly. Morning Dew Knife holds up, cuts in void.

A strange thought bursts out from him suddenly, that is an excited thought that even if Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler of distant place is affected, thought one happy got up.

These locked the mind paralysis beam of enemy to deflect unexpectedly suddenly, shoots toward the position of Huo Yuhao body side, place that his blade chops.

A blade space crack opens suddenly, swallows 80 mind paralysis beams completely.

“Well? What ability are you?”Evil Tyrant felt curiously, because after Huo Yuhao that blade cut, its surprised discovery, oneself unexpectedly lost to the beam the control.

Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, said: “Spiritual Power! Except for you, didn't allow others to excel at the mind ability?”

He uses, is Power of Emotion.

After these days polishes and practice, he had some own comprehensions to Power of Emotion finally, these comprehensions are not profound, but is very useful regarding him.

He a moment ago displayed, is in the mood, pleasant.

That blade cuts, seems like ordinary, is actually his self-created Soul Ability.

The eye pupil sudden contraction of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, “the mind level, was very good, boy, today in any event. The main body must keep here you. If makes you continue to grow again, perhaps in the near future really can threaten the main body.”

Huo Yuhao sighed, said: “Planned to live in peace together, how you to compel with hardship. Such being the case, that today in any event, I must cut to kill you, making you my mind level ninth Soul Ring. Is you must injure first our, do not blame our heavy hand being heartless.”

The voice falls, the body of Huo Yuhao suddenly started to have the change, radiant golden light erupted from him together instantaneously, at the same time, Ice Emperor, Snow Emperor or Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass, in integrated in his body instantaneously.

That golden light from out of the blue. Rises into the upper air suddenly, the dark red sky had been ripped open a crack unexpectedly directly, golden light drops from the clouds together, returns nurturing to parents on Huo Yuhao. Thick Bing Wu (ice mist), is centered on his body outward diffusion.

Huge dragon wings opens behind him. Huo Yuhao behind Tang Wutong vanished, but his personal appearance in Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, cannot see any change from outside.

Void, one step steps forward, the silver light appears in the front together, in an instant, the space passes through.

“Um?”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is startled. When that golden light arrives on Huo Yuhao, he feels impressively that this young people completely changed, the beforehand aura had the earth-shaking change, as if the whole person turned into light part.

Giant pupil contraction and expansion, this time. Turned into dark green completely, the air/Qi of terrifying withering is centered on its huge body outward diffusion. The sky also similarly turned into dark green, only then descends that [say / way] vertical golden color light beam on Huo Yuhao is unable to be closed by its space oppression.

The silver light dodges again, when Huo Yuhao appears again, appeared in a Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler dead ahead hundred meters place unexpectedly.

81 tentacle crazy sweeping across of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler on. To block him.

The right hand of Huo Yuhao lifts, in the hand Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife is cuts to strike as in void, this time thought is sad, under that thick sad intent affects, the tentacle was towed again side.

“Light of Destruction!”The Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler sound is flooding a strange tonality, each character said that the air will twist strangely, as if condensed the solid the terror to Absolute Spiritual Power, next one flickered, together the diameter only then about hundred meters dark green ray suddenly to launch, shone on Huo Yuhao directly.

Huo Yuhao does not know, the pupil light diameter that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler releases is bigger, the might is smaller, but the diameter is smaller, then the might is bigger, this together Light of Destruction, even if Beast God Di Tian wants to resist here, must pay not the small price to be good.

However, those who made the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler incomparable shock was, float there Huo Yuhao, after withstanding this has struck, the whole person as if became the nihility generally, unexpectedly has not had any change.

If must say that has the change, was he behind were then many attractive merpeople light shadow, interesting to listen to merpeople singing sound along with it resounding.

On Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife, bloomed the unequalled radiant brilliance, the Absolute chill in the air promotes the unprecedented degree instantaneously. 260 degrees below zero ultra-low temperatures, making the tentacle that these wanted to pester once more in airborne become stagnate.

How possible? My Light of Destruction, has he been able a matter? This is impossible, this is absolutely impossible.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler panic-stricken, in this flash, it felt the giant crisis finally.

Also in this flickers, on Huo Yuhao bursts out a glare suddenly, a handle golden color great hammer raises from him, arrived in front of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler instantaneously.

Both sides were away from were too tight, oppression strength that presented instantaneously, even let the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler giant eye pupil central downward hollow. A powerful mind guard shield erupts from his eye pupil instantaneously, hits with that golden great hammer together.

The mind guard shield congeals instantaneously the ice, to shatter, golden light four shoot piece by piece.

Extremely frozen blaze, Celestial Emperor Hammer.

The body of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler shivered fiercely, but it also showed to place the super strength of second powerhouse in this moment as Ten Great Ferocious Beasts.

While just bore the attack, his eye pupil deep place, turned into dark blue, together only then diameter one zhang (3.33 m) dark blue ray suddenly suddenly to launch.

When this dark blue ray appears, the time as if static, has been holding up Morning Dew Knife Huo Yuhao, in this flickers is imprisoned unexpectedly completely in the midair. Surrounding all spaces, at an exceptional pace in compressing, the dark blue ray seems like very slow is moving, in process that but, moves in it, the sky turned into the dark blue, the earth turned into the dark blue, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler all turned into the dark blue.

Space-Time Ray!

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler ultimate deep meaning. Initially, it was relying on this formidable ability, can escape from the Di Tian hand ascends to heaven.

Is relying on to the sensibility of mind and space, he comprehended this time spatial strength, came from in Spiritual Source Power of Space-Time. Power of Space-Time can eliminate all living thing Spiritual Source, making its Spiritual Source weaken instantaneously.

Initially, Beast God Di Tian, although heavy wound it, but Di Tian itself, because also this Space-Time Ray, recuperated the millenniums to restore in peak condition, obviously this Space-Time Ray was formidable.

Dark blue Space-Time Ray stable falling on Huo Yuhao, making on him was releasing outward the incorruptible aura all turn into the dark blue. The whole person is also so.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler relaxed finally, after he can display Space-Time Ray this formidable deep meaning, after was only hit, does not die, is Beast God Di Tian, in addition, did not have any living thing to be able in front of Space-Time Ray to escape by luck.

But displays this Space-Time Ray, in fact regarding Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, must pay the enormous price, he must consume his vitality, can use.

Must know, shortly afterward, he must again faced with Great Tribulation difficult approached, consumed the vitality at this time, for him was nearly fatal. But, in a moment ago, Huo Yuhao took to his sense of crisis is really too intense. To the powerhouse of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler this level, regarding own sensation has believed that extremely, some least bits will not suspect, therefore, it without hesitation has used Space-Time Ray.

“Pū”

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler huge body slight shivered, an extremely huge thought erupts suddenly outward.

This thought is, no! But! Think! Discuss!

Yes, inconceivable! Because, a handle is glittering the thick Bing Wu (ice mist) sharp knife blade, inserted in its pupil most core position. The form, is grasping that handle sharp knife blade together, even on him, but also has the dark blue ray of beforehand contamination.

The giant vertical pupil nearly sticks to its Evil Eye to appear. The vertical pupil presents is the ice blue color, right, is the ice blue color, but is not golden-rose color.

Ices the blue ray to stick to the pupil of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler to rumble together instantaneously outrageously into its within the body, with resounding of merpeople singing sound, ices the blue ray bang to enter together outrageously.

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife, vanished thoroughly, was rumbled completely into that terror great eye.

“Roar”sad and shrill roaring made entire Evil Spirit Forest shiver, the trees, changed into the powder powder instantaneously.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler huge body instantaneous flying upside down, tentacle pulling out maliciously struck is just changing on human form Huo Yuhao. In that eye pupil, is dark blue Space-Time Ray projects together, coagulates Huo Yuhao in the midair.

But, that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler huge body, actually in fierce is shivering. Terrifying ice blue color capillaries, are centered on its pupil sends out outward, not having the blood to flow out, only then endless incorruptible spreads on that 300 meters in diameter giant pupil.

Even if until at this moment, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler completely is not clear, why will lose, why will suffer Huo Yuhao fatal strikes.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-606-part-2





Volume 13

#606 - Evil Monarch Perishes


Why is this? Why Ah?

Huo Yuhao in airborne was stagnated was less than two seconds, returned to normal, but he again has not actually continued to attack, but turns around runs. In that flash, he ran out of the sonic bang sound directly, escapes instantaneously hundred li (0.5km).

The left hand gathers grasps, Ice Explosion Technique inspiring.

The distant place, the terrifying bellow, is common just like great Thunder Kuanghong sky over Evil Spirit Forest, for a very long time unceasingly.

Lifts the mask, reveals is actually not the Huo Yuhao appearance, but has a Tang Wutong appearance of big wave long hair, no, said accurately that should be: Ice Frost Solo Dance, Raiment of Light.

Yes, from launching fatal attack that flickers to start, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong melted for a body, Ice Frost Solo Dance, Raiment of Light, makes them have the qualification that and Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler contended with directly.

From the front exploratory fight, Huo Yuhao on deep understanding, oneself adds on Tang Wutong, possibly is not the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler match, this is the absolute strength disparity. But, he as before has actually chosen the challenge.

Dark, has the divine intervention.

Even if has put on Extreme Ice Battle God Armor, Huo Yuhao adds on Tang Wutong to display Raiment of Light again, most is also in a short time can contend with Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler directly, but faces the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler terror the explosive force, that formidable mind ability, their final results should reluctantly run away.

But, they successful striking has actually killed Evil Tyrant, why?

Having Huo Yuhao can reply that unwillingness of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler. Depends on is, three mind attack immunities.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler most formidable three mind attack, was melted by Huo Yuhao three Spiritual Immunity thoroughly, this is also most important reason that he can live.

But he who has not withstood the attack, after can use Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler erupts the empty space calmly, using the most intrepid strength to attack.

Celestial Emperor Hammer. Has driven out the Evil Tyrant mind barrier.

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath adds on by two Eye of Asura Soul Assault that merpeople second level plays to erupt, has given Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler most fatal heavy wound.

During the Absolute Ice nearly Absolute Zero terrifying low temperature integrates mind to attack completely, that is Raiment of Light. Goddess of Light strength. In light of Huo Yuhao and absolute Soul Power of Tang Wutong two people, had that ultimate strikes.

Body separation. Tang Wutong dull float side Huo Yuhao, until at this moment, them also likes general the feeling in the dream.

“We and our really success?”Tang Wutong asked to Huo Yuhao in a low voice, “that was next to Beast God Di Tian strong Great Ferocious Beasts! The terror that Ten Great Ferocious Beasts is listed second exists.”

Huo Yuhao looks to Tang Wutong, fierce grasps her, “has succeeded, our really success. We struck to kill Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, our really success!”

This war. It may be said that thrillingly extremely, this time Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, Soul Power insufficient originally one-fifth. If not by Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui their cultivating to promote to 98 levels, they are an opportunity do not have.

Spiritual Immunity no doubt can help the mind attack of Huo Yuhao immunity Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, but that must consume continually. If not their Martial Soul Fusion techniques makes Goddess of Light Soul Power nearly inexhaustible, he also at all impossible to live under Space-Time Ray.

Two Space-Time Ray! Huo Yuhao does not dare to imagine, if without Spiritual Immunity, withstands Space-Time Ray to let the effect that mind declines directly, how that can be the scene. Perhaps do not die must turn into the idiot.

But now, they were finally successful. Then formidable Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, stiffly was killed by their striking unexpectedly.

“Walks, we go back.”Tang Wutong is drawing Huo Yuhao. They simultaneously launch the personal appearance, flies in the Evil Spirit Forest direction.

In the sky, as before was dark blue, the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler strength is really too formidable, until at this moment, its aura has not diverged completely.

In the ground, everywhere is the blood of dark red, as well as bulk bulk Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler corpse. The brightest several things, one attracted Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong attention.

First is Morning Dew Knife. Is glittering Bing Wu (ice mist) ray Morning Dew Knife float not any change in the midair, in addition. Is dark red Halo, has seven gold mark dark red Halo!

In that Halo center. Unexpectedly also the dark blue eye pupil of Xiao Xiao, seems, only then palm of the hand size, but is actually glittering the monster different brilliance.

“Is this? Soul Bone?”Huo Yuhao surprised looks at that Soul Ring central existence.

Soul Beast of over 100,000 years level besides will present 100,000 years of Soul Ring, will also present simultaneously formidable 100,000 years of Soul Bone. But, Soul Bone of this eye pupil style, Huo Yuhao actually first time sees, even if in Shrek Academy during ten thousand years of record, as if no this type of Soul Bone to exist.

“This is any Soul Bone Ah?”Tang Wutong curious asking.

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “I do not know, seems, should be External Soul Bone, moreover should be the eye pupil class. Does not know how should use.”

Tang Wutong excited [say / way]: “Naturally has absorbed directly, your Martial Soul is Spirit Eyes, absorbs this kind of Soul Bone to be appropriate, has not thought really that the eye can also be Soul Bone! Too was really mysterious.”

Huo Yuhao brought Tang Wutong to fly, first took back Morning Dew Knife, then used own Spiritual Power has towed the past to that Soul Ring and Soul Bone.

His Spiritual Power just fell above that Soul Ring, immediately felt an intense incomparable repelling force bursts out from Soul Ring.

Clearly, that belongs to the thought of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler.

However, this regarding Huo Yuhao, makes the inadequate too big puzzle obviously. If Evil Tyrant is also living, Huo Yuhao naturally is not his match, now it died, entire Continent, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power cultivates for is existence of most top, wants to tow its Soul Ring and Soul Bone does not have the issue.

Increases the Spiritual Power output, Huo Yuhao guides its Soul Ring and Soul Bone to fall to the ground.

Seven golden traces 100,000 years of Soul Ring! In Huo Yuhao all Soul Ring, only then Daydream Ice Silkworm 1 million years of Soul Ring can dominate above, but Daydream Ice Silkworm itself must compared with Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, actually the difference was too is really far. In the past was its 1 million years cultivated for the time, facing Evil Tyrant, only then by destiny of demanding everything.

Now, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler changed into Soul Ring unexpectedly, this regarding Huo Yuhao, was unable to describe with the pleasant surprise.

Tang Wutong jumps for joy saying: “Quickly absorbs, I give you protector. Our Dual Soul Nucleus Soul Power restore quickly, in this piece of Evil Spirit Forest, besides this Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, did not have anything to threaten our existence. You have quickly absorbed, can perhaps touch the third Soul Nucleus edge.”

“Good.”Huo Yuhao complies with one, sits cross-legged to sit down directly.

While he plans to start to absorb Soul Nucleus time, suddenly, the white light dodges, Snow Emperor drilled from his within the body.

“Yuhao, you first wait a moment.”Snow Emperor complexion dignified said to Huo Yuhao.

“How Snow Emperor?”Asking of Huo Yuhao doubts.

Snow Emperor brow micro wrinkle, said: “You on absorption Evil Tyrant Soul Ring, can perhaps now some issues.”

“?”Huo Yuhao knows that Snow Emperor will certainly not be aimless, Soul Ring of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler this level he has not absorbed, hurries to stop, is waiting for the Snow Emperor explanation.

Snow Emperor said: “If before, does not have that human Limit Douluo to pass to you Soul Power, should not have the issue. Has absorbed Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Soul Ring, will only make you cultivate to increase. But now is different, Soul Power of your within the body were too many, although just has consumed, but these quickly can restore. But you now are impossible to have third Soul Nucleus immediately, once has absorbed this Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Soul Ring, may probably face within the body energy very much to be huge, is unable to divulge the aspect that is unable to absorb, even might let you faced with the danger.”

“This truly is an issue. But, on me has not brought to be used to seal Soul Ring Soul Guidance Device.”Huo Yuhao brow tight wrinkle. Today can strike to kill Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, absolutely is the luck excellent, in addition restraint of Spiritual Immunity. Such fully has 700,000 years cultivate for Soul Ring not to absorb shortly, after a while it may voluntarily dissipate!

Tang Wutong also wrinkles the delicate eyebrows, a war, she was knows a moment ago was thrilling, in fact, after Huo Yuhao and her incarnation were Goddess of Light, has left leeway the ample force, prepared to escape at any time. On Huo Yuhao, three nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, even if that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is strong, was used to bring up the rear was also enough.

Now strikes to kill this formidable Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler with great difficulty, if such gives up his Soul Ring really not giving up! Soul Bone said fortunately that can retard absorption. But Soul Ring what to do?

However, cannot make Huo Yuhao take risk to absorb, no one knows these 700,000 years cultivate for in Soul Ring, will contain the huge energy, this can let the huge energy that the Transcendent Douluo level powerhouses are promoted absolutely! If had problems, is fatal.

“All right, you have me!”Has several points of badly bad happy expression sound to resound, golden light dodges, side Huo Yuhao were many a person, for a long time has not come out Daydream Ice Silkworm.

Daydream Ice Silkworm at this time is a face complacent appearance, double hand back after behind, greatly somewhat self-satisfied flavor.

“Brother Daydream, do you have the means?”Huo Yuhao pleasantly surprised looks at Daydream Ice Silkworm.

-------------------------------------------------

Four finished, does obeisance to seek monthly ticket and recommendation vote support! ( to be continued ) 580

The quickest renewal, non- ball window reading invited.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-606-part-3





Volume 13

#607 - Rain Hao To


Daydream Ice Silkworm favorite [say / way]: “Fight, I am not good. However, must say that this holds energy, the brother very much has one. Don't forget, I may once be 1 million years of Soul Beast, initially, my Spiritual Power gradually has given you, but my ability also. Brother has practiced for 1 million years, majors is Spiritual Power, this Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler also similarly is the mind ability. You felt relieved that absorbed its this Soul Ring to be good, unnecessary Spiritual Power, the brother helped you save first, when you had the time calmed the mind to practice the time, the brother integrated your body this strength again, didn't have the issue? When storage pot is easy.”

Huo Yuhao immediately eye one bright, Tang Wutong also reveals the happy expression, yes! Daydream Ice Silkworm is 1 million years cultivate for Spiritual System Soul Beast, no matter how first his source combat capability, must say that this to the carrying capacity of energy, he actually should be extremely powerful is right. His Spiritual Source originally has given Huo Yuhao, the ability that now empties, load bearing Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler 700,000 years cultivates for should the issue not be big. Let alone, this is only Soul Ring, is not Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler huge Spiritual Power.

Snow Emperor knit the brows, said: “Daydream, do you have confidence really? Evil Tyrant Spiritual Power with your initial is different, comparison Spiritual Power is overbearing. You may probably handle affairs carefully, otherwise, not good......”

Daydream Ice Silkworm showed the whites of the eyes, said: “You do not have the confidence to me! This is only Soul Ring, relax, the brother has confidence. Come, but also hesitant anything, Yuhao, quickly fused this Evil Tyrant Soul Ring. If can make its any Space-Time Ray Soul Ability, you were developed and ensure can let you understanding upper formation building to the space ability, even can also touch to the time domain mystery.”

Trust of Huo Yuhao Daydream Ice Silkworm is long-standing, in the past must not have the fusion of Brother Daydream, does not have her today.

At that moment, he sits cross-legged to sit down without hesitation, by the Spiritual Power hauling, starts to fuse Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Soul Ring. Similar to eye general Soul Bone as for that was received by Tang Wutong first. Now does not fuse its good opportunity, waits later to attack third Soul Nucleus the time, said again.

dark red Soul Ring enters the body. Huo Yuhao the whole body shivered immediately fiercely, he only thought that is extremely powerful and overbearing, filled unwillingly broke in own spiritual sea with the ruinous terror mind thought instantaneously, the crazy impact, wanted to tear into shreds his spiritual sea completely.

Huo Yuhao is not the generation of being easy, mind Soul Nucleus instantaneous revolves high-speed, this is supplementing Spiritual Power of certain Absolute Ice special effect instantaneously the mind thought freezes of these terrors, then gradually destroys, energy will depute, with own fusion.

The Daydream Ice Silkworm strength appeared in next second. Like such that he said that just like swallowing up general, was deputed later Spiritual Power to inhale oneself within the body to carry on the seal these.

Had his help, the absorption of Huo Yuhao becomes does not hinder, has to say. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Spiritual Power is extremely huge and overbearing, is 700,000 years cultivate for exists worthily, but in Soul Ring is containing the essence energy, makes Huo Yuhao spiritual sea be instantaneous.

At the beginning, but also filtered with enough time, after certain extent, he did not have the means to filter completely. Without the time. Each second, has the massive mind energies to release from that Soul Ring, fuses with his spiritual sea.

Daydream Ice Silkworm is truly powerful, at this time, being outspoken is absorbing these Spiritual Power fully, even if heterogeneous does not let off.

It appears the Daydream Ice Silkworm main body in Huo Yuhao spiritual sea. Already vanished the golden mark, one after another is only restoring, but, in this golden color is also mixing with some scarlet, this was Spiritual Power purely does not display.

But so. Also helped Huo Yuhao be busy.

Mermaid Princess Li Ya also similarly appears sky over spiritual sea, although she does not have the means to swallow up like Daydream Ice Silkworm, but also through own effort, helping Huo Yuhao filter part of Spiritual Power, melts these cruel aura.

As the matter stands, the Spiritual Power fusion of Huo Yuhao became well much.

Now on Continent, only then Spiritual Power of this level, dares to fuse six spirits . Moreover, each spirit is also dead set on to him.

Now among the spirits already did not have any contradiction, will not have any interference to Huo Yuhao, besides them the trust Huo Yuhao, a more important point, because they saw the hope, yes, hopes.

Huo Yuhao and God of Emotion met, obtained the approval of God of Emotion, this regarding the stimulation of six big spirits was really too big.

Although originally they in the heart have that goal, may in fact, regarding illusory God Realm, they not hold the too high hope, after has felt the aura of god truly, their in sad in disdaining of God Realm to Soul Beast simultaneously, rejoices in own choice. Is following Huo Yuhao, may leave this world, may arrive at that world to obtain freshman really! What does this have to be good to complain? They definitely will not hesitate at all costs helps Huo Yuhao, to obtain in that world freshman opportunity.

Enough three days three nights, the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Soul Ring halo truly fuses Huo Yuhao within the body. The fusion does not calculate specially thoroughly, because to finally, Daydream Ice Silkworm on ten golden light marks unexpectedly already full load. Therefore, Huo Yuhao withstood part of not small wild Spiritual Power.

These Spiritual Power made his spiritual sea very not tranquil, had to raise the dreadful wave anytime the possibility.

Present Huo Yuhao, in cultivates for on, absolutely is the powerhouse of Limit Douluo level, moreover Twin Martial Souls Limit Douluo.

But present he, likely is a giant rubber ball, has filled the air/Qi, can only control itself reluctantly, should not be supported to explode. It is not good, has the possibility of having problems.

“Yuhao, the best means that find a place now, you and Wutong calm the mind to practice, has absorbed within the body these huge energies completely, perhaps a time association president point, but is safest, moreover you have to attack the Limit Douluo possibility.”Snow Emperor has given critical suggestion.

Although the Huo Yuhao present condition is formidable, but is also very dangerous, if the bitter experience powerful enemy, own ability overuse, causes unable to control these not to be digested the energy of absorption, he has to explode the danger that the body perishes.

Reason that these energies could not absorb, was because his present body is also not enough to withstand, wish can withstand, needs through the unceasing practice, to become by oneself formidable is better.

But, can Huo Yuhao really find a place to practice now? Answer obviously negative. That side Bright Capital City, the important matter processes.

Huo Yuhao calculated to know slightly that he wanted to absorb completely the energy in within the body, attacked Limit Douluo with Tang Wutong, at least also took three years had the possibility.

They after becoming Transcendent Douluo, strength promotion was really too quick, this caused the foundation the extreme not to be steady, in this case, was impossible in a short time again to make the breakthrough, that will have the danger of overstation.

The change that but, three years, can have was really too big, at least now, they have not been able to close up. First must solve the Bright Capital City problem. Only then has killed Xu Tianran, obtains ten years of commitment from Ju Zi(orange) there, he can steadfast cultivates, attacks.

“Walks, we return to Bright Capital City.”After listening to the opinion of Snow Emperor, Huo Yuhao hesitant moment, said to Tang Wutong.

Tang Wutong and his regard are interlinked, naturally understands that he is worried about anything, nod of without hesitation, at this time, she must support own man. Moreover, that side Sun-Moon Empire, is in must solve may not the situation.

Without the restriction of Holy Spirit Cult, by the Sun-Moon Empire present national strength, one year, can save enough strength to start the eastern expedition absolutely. This time, the goal inevitably is unification entire Continent.

In this case, the most effective matter that they can handle, completes among the commitment with Ju Zi(orange), only has so, can make Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries have the respite time.

Although Huo Yuhao is very clear, by own strength, can prevent for a while, actually unable forever to prevent. After all, after he attacks Limit Douluo that level, must challenge Beast God Di Tian, accepts the inheritance of God of Emotion, what change later will have, he does not know, future destiny unknown. But the Continent aspect was very difficult to change, the progress of Soul Guidance Technology, making entire Continent be controlled by Soul Guidance Technology gradually, this is almost irreversible.

After Sky Soul Empire was invaded, just started various rebellion are many, but along with the unceasing seepage of Soul Guidance Technology, the rebellion were getting fewer and fewer.

Common people's request is actually very simple, so long as can enjoy a good and prosperous life, eats to the full to put on warmly, was enough. Let alone Soul Guidance Technology gave back to their life to bring that many convenient, the time grew, they naturally also adapted, integrated, even before having forgotten.

In environment such situation, Sun-Moon Empire unifies Continent is very as if difficult to reverse, but in any event, as a Star Lou Empire person, he must for own country, for Shrek Academy as far as possible will retard this time.

Looks from the distant place upper air, Bright Capital City is similar to a giant monster, is stopped up above the plain, only then the imperial palace position of core place, some unharmonious appearance.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-607-part-1





Volume 13

#607 - Rain Hao To Medium


Several days pass by, the imperial palace that side seems is declaring martial law as before, but without a doubt, soon, the martial law will turn into the construction. By the Sun-Moon Empire national strength, most two years, a brand-new imperial palace can rise straight from the ground, moreover was absolutely grander than before, defended is also stricter. This is the strength of science and technology.

Nobody can prevent the advance in technology, the sustained progress of science and technology, has caused various issues on present society, has caused fluctuation of Continent situation.

Distant looks at the direction of Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace, Huo Yuhao disappointed light sighs one.

Tang Wutong is holding his hand, “? Our present abilities, should affect the entire Continent aspect sufficiently. So long as you suppress under the heart, after we Xu Tianran has killed, Ju Zi(orange) also kills. Sun-Moon Empire, inevitable chaos. To that time, the step that they invaded will be definitely slow. In the near future, any person inherited the throne, we homicide, making Sun-Moon Empire always be in the disorder the situation, one day, Star Luo and Dou Ling will catch up. So long as we have been protecting Continent, will not let Sun-Moon Empire the Continent unification.”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “If all think you think is so simple, that was too good. What a pity, this world cannot so. Such will not change according to our imagination. We killed Xu Tianran, the Sun-Moon Empire interior have met the civil strife, but also had Ju Zi(orange), by the Ju Zi(orange) ability and in military the influence, soon, she can by oneself be the status of queen mother, was leading the young emperor, controlled the overall situation. Sun-Moon Empire is insufficient to have the chaos. However, if we have also killed Ju Zi(orange), entire Sun-Moon Empire really will be then chaotic. The Sun-Moon Empire strength was too strong, these Soul Engineer Corp, let out any, facing Star Luo and Dou Ling, almost approaches in invincible existence. Once these strengths no longer were restrained. Becoming unscrupulous, then, on entire Continent, Sun-Moon Empire. Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire, can beacon rise from all directions, the innumerable lives will submit to and destroy in front of unscrupulous Soul Engineer.”

“Reason that I have tolerated Ju Zi(orange), a very big reason, is her not bloodthirsty, good that very only if beside the necessary war, she has restrained to her subordinate, each war solves at the minimum price. If in the future Continent really because of Soul Guidance Technology by unified words, that. Ju Zi(orange) is actually the best candidate.”

“The world situation, being divided the long time must gather and must divide about the long time. Once Heaven Dou Empire and Star Lou Empire, have ruled the Continent several thousand years, two big empires have also opposed for several thousand years. After they destroy Martial Soul Hall, many people think. Continent will enter the peace time. Also, how many years has used? Did Heaven Dou Empire split Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire? The dispute has not reduced throughout. This is national numerous reasons. A unified big empire, perhaps to future Douluo Continent is a good deed, at least in a short time is the good deed.”

Tang Wutong surprised looks at Huo Yuhao, said: “Do you support Sun-Moon Empire to unify Continent?”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “Naturally, I did not say. To tell you, I do not hope saw flame of war are flying, chaotic incomparable Continent. Our strengths were very strong, but absolutely is actually not able to affect the change of entire Continent. We cannot, because own temporary pleased, but makes entire Continent fall into the flames of war. Let alone, Sun-Moon Empire coped with Ye Xishui and Old Long process you also sees. Along with the development of Soul Guidance Technology. Limit Douluo also no longer is invincible existence. In the future, Sun-Moon Empire, has not necessarily coped with our methods!”

“Therefore, we can affect Continent by our strength, but must know when to stop. On the other hand. Existence of Limit Douluo, more significances are the deterrents.”

“Um.”Tang Wutong sighed one lightly, said: “Actually, I hope now that can be far away from these disputes to be good with you. In recent years, we have undergone the tribulation were too many, I am quite tired! After this and Ju Zi(orange) completes for ten years approximately, we close up, anything does not manage, first attacked Limit Douluo to say again. Has completed making of these ten years, we done were many enough.”

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, holds in the arms her slender waist, during making her integrate itself to embrace. Since something are irreversible, that can only complies with the development of time, performs the human affairs to listen to the destiny. What in the future Continent will turn into, who also said well? 10,000 years ago, Martial Soul Hall controls Continent time, who can think that once dominated Continent Soul Master, to 10,000 years later today, will have been substituted by Soul Engineer unexpectedly gradually, does existence of Soul Guidance Device, let the function of Soul Master is weakened to so the degree unexpectedly? Soul Master legion facing Soul Engineer legion, actually does not have many including the revolt ability. This is how inconceivable!

The speech did not affect Huo Yuhao to seek for Ju Zi(orange), the Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace is destroyed, but Sun-Moon Empire Imperial Family as before still in Bright Capital City, completely was actually encircled from the imperial palace recent several buildings, was guarded with large army, Huo Yuhao has discovered directly several Soul Engineer Corp traces through Spiritual Detection, moreover there is an unusual complete Soul Guidance Array place of construction, various Surveying Soul Guidance Device were even more crowded than before, perhaps during these surveys, Xu Tianran was wants to go to bathroom, can be monitored. These monitoring almost make all people not have to hide, during anything constructs.

These constructions are not big, establish the construction around imperial palace, does not permit big, this is certain. But the imperial palace itself will not construct special is big, this is because the big construction is easiest to be attacked by Soul Guidance Device, naturally, by the Bright Capital City surrounding defense, if were not initially Huo Yuhao once led three Soul Engineer Corp surprise attacks to be successful, perhaps this imperial palace newly-built really can construct was bigger.

Ju Zi(orange) in a building three room, Xu Tianran not with her in the same place, but in another building, that side defense is stricter.

Slightly makes the judgment, Huo Yuhao understands that now here defense so will be why close. Xu Tianran has not grasped to that two Limit Douluo life and death obviously, will therefore have such situation.

This also no wonder, Limit Douluo was really too fearful, has not achieved that level cultivated for the person, is actually unable to go to true judgment that level to be able formidable to any degree.

But the retaliation of Limit Douluo, is not anybody can withstand, wants to come these days, Xu Tianran certainly to live in constant anxiety.

“What is most intelligent is Ju Zi(orange)!”Huo Yuhao sighed to sigh one, feeling so far here change, he even already Ju Zi(orange) thoughts guess almost.

Listened to his such saying, Tang Wutong was also the thoughts moves slightly, said: “You said that here defends so strictly, is Ju Zi(orange) intentionally for it? She such does, what advantage has to her? The defense was strict, was disadvantageous to our beginning!”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “If I have not guessed that wrong, Ju Zi(orange) has certainly the subsequent party, we are not her only depending on. You think that we and Sun-Moon Empire are hostile, moreover we are impossible to be controlled by Ju Zi(orange), in this case, if you are she, you will do? Has changed me, I definitely approximately will not regard the reality the gambling. But Ju Zi(orange) must cope with the Xu Tianran thoughts to be grave, does not begin is impossible. Therefore, she also has certainly other means that but this means that should appear in Sun-Moon Empire. Perhaps she has bribed some people.”

“However the atmosphere that now she creates, for must cover their ears and eyes, once Xu Tianran died, then, she can shift blame the Xu Tianran death on two Limit Douluo greatly, this is possibly does not have to verify, at that time, whole nation with sad, in addition she in the influence of military, wanted to control the entire empire on the other hand on easy many. These Imperial Family, but also unqualified resists with her.”

Listened to the analysis of Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong to hold breath cold air, but was quick she to smile, moreover smiled happily.

“What do you smile?”Huo Yuhao said in consternation.

Tang Wutong said with a smile: “I am smiling, hasn't her intelligent person, lost to me? This showed that I am more intelligent than her. Dominant country, even rules Continent to have anything to be good, where has our Xiaoyao to be comfortable, what is more important, you are my! All is my, does not give her.”

Felt the Tang Wutong small thoughts, Huo Yuhao has also been smiling, although regarding the Ju Zi(orange) ambition and deep plans, in his heart some were uncomfortable, but finally in his acceptance range, after all, in that environment, if were not ruthless, then, likely becomes the sacrificial victim of political struggle.

“Walks, we help her.”Huo Yuhao brings Tang Wutong to integrate quietly in the nihility, this time, directly is Space Power that draws support from.

When they appear again, already in the Bright Capital City city, in a gloomy corner.

Similarly has not appeared the personal appearance, Imitation Soul Ability and space control perfect union, has produced such results, in addition the adjustment and control to the mind fluctuation of temperature, making oneself integrate in the air completely. At least by the present technical standard, wants to discover them, is almost impossible.

The space breaks once more, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong personal appearance dodges, entered that to discover during the construction of Ju Zi(orange).

This is a hotel, luxurious, only then three, the area is extremely broad, does not need to ask that is the industry of Sun-Moon Empire Imperial Family.

Ju Zi(orange) in three biggest rooms. In the room has several maidservants, this time she, is actually accompanying the child.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-607-part-2





Volume 13

#607 - Rain Hao To Below


Xu Yunhan is not initially that always needs to hug the kid, he has grown up much, everywhere was running, the robust appearance, particularly annoys the person to love.

Ju Zi(orange) sits on a luxurious high back chair, looks that the child runs and jumps for joy in the room, on the fair elegant face full is the color of affection.

She under this condition, who can with that able to move unhindered invincible female war-god link?

“Yunhan, ran slowly, has perspired, drank a water.”Ju Zi(orange) smiles is waving to the son.

Little Yunhan runs up to side her, the sparkling big eye sees mother, on the face has piled up with the smiling face, “mother and mother, I must nurse.”

Ju Zi(orange) embarrassed [say / way]: “Brat, was big, mother already did not have the milk.”

Little Yunhan has almost all child common identities, to nurturing own mother has unequalled being intimate with, grabs the clothes, climbed up the body of Ju Zi(orange), hee hee is rubbing in mother front with a smile.

Ju Zi(orange) embraces tightly Little Yunhan, in this moment, this young person is all in her heart, when is hugging the son, she has that substantial feeling. At this time, her anything does not think that completely immerses in the happiness of son.

“Ju Zi(orange).”The slight sound appeared at this time in her ear.

The Ju Zi(orange) whole body trembles, Little Yunhan in bosom felt immediately mother's change, has looked up to her, “mother, you how?”

Ju Zi(orange) has gawked, eye socket was instantaneously was red, at the same time, most important man of two in her life simultaneously appeared unexpectedly, this feeling, is not really able to describe in the spoken language.

She wants to tell the kid in bosom, that once came by the person who he was called the father, she more wants to lead this kid to put into during the arms of that fellow together!

So long as thinks of here, her heart, is similar to by the boiling hot boiling water hot is consoled generally, not being able to say is the pain or the comfort.

Because as if never will arrive on that day, when at this time. These two men all in front of her, in her heart long.

The god several seconds, that sound again had not appeared, Ju Zi(orange) has kissed one on the son face. Said: “Yunhan, mother a little matter must process, you go out to play with the aunt first.”At the same time was saying, she beckons, naturally had the maidservant to come, has picked Little Yunhan. Ju Zi(orange) waved, the maidservants all got down.

Before she arrives at her desk sits down, returns to normal the mood that reluctantly are surging, thinking aloud main road that muttered: “Do not come, here strengthened the security. Once you appear, will immediately be discovered.”

She wants to have a look at his appearance! But at this time obviously is not good opportunity. Gradually calms down her, in heart also cannot help but raises several points of surprised mood.

She thinks that to here defense, Huo Yuhao they not be at present impossible to have the opportunity to look for itself again. Because during these constructions of entire Imperial Family housing, all searches to observe the level to aim in Limit Douluo now! Ju Zi(orange) cannot sleep every day, can only restore wearily through meditate.

How long such time must insist, she does not know that Xu Tianran has issued the order in any case, was waiting for that momentarily the retaliation that may present. Meanwhile, now the empire industry is increasing the effort search. Before had not found that two Limit Douluo corpse, Xu Tianran will not relax easily.

He is also thinking must unify entire Continent, at this time, nobody feared death compared with him.

The Huo Yuhao sound resounds once more, “we will not appear, here situation I also search the clarity that observes with Spiritual Detection. You have anything to plan. How we must cope with Xu Tianran, did you think?”

On the Ju Zi(orange) face reveals a forced smile, said: “Thinks you could not come, all plans must carry on. Now the defense of temporary temporary palace was really too stern, could not find any loophole to exist. Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp surrounds and protects completely side him. Simultaneously also has the massive powerhouses, wants in this case to strike to kill him, only if the storm. But, the storm is almost is impossible to complete! Therefore, we can do now, only then waited for that waits for him to expose weaknesses, how long can you wait for?”

“We and others.”Huo Yuhao saying without hesitation, is not he does not have the patience, but is these energies of his within the body does not have the patience!

Present he, constantly no longer withstands is coming from the Spiritual Power oppression as well as the fluctuation of Long Xiaoyao of huge Soul Power Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler. At the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus intensity, somewhat accepted unexpectedly, he continues the time now, cultivates, all fuses these strengths. Therefore, here matter must be solved as soon as possible is good.

But after he cannot wait till practice to complete, comes back again, Huo Yuhao has the premonition, oneself this closing up, certainly is historical longest one time that practice, perhaps is the year, even may be ten years. This no one can reach an agreement, perhaps at that time, Continent already had the great change. Therefore, before closing up, he must handle to be good here matter.

The Ju Zi(orange) brow wrinkles, “can't wait? That I could not think of means temporarily. Xu Tianran suspects now seriously, actually obtains him to trust very much, has Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp. His side these hide the powerhouse in hidden place. He is during the protections of these powerhouses every day. But around the temporary palace, had already arranged the Soul Guidance Array place of maximum intensity, once the slightest sign of trouble appears, Soul Guidance Array will immediately start. Although the intensity and High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device compares also has the disparity, but defends the attack of Limit Douluo very much to have confidence. You said that in this case, how making us begin to him?”

Looks at the helplessness on Ju Zi(orange) face, Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “Ju Zi(orange), in front of the honorable person did not tell the lie. If I have not guessed wrong, now this aspect, there is your certain building ingredient. You do this, for must frame by planting stolen goods on to that two Limit Douluo on, I said right? Such being the case, you definitely have subsequent party. Side Xu Tianran should have your person. I have not talked circuitously with you, creates an opportunity to us, I create a miracle for you. How you must control Sun-Moon Empire in the future I, no matter, so long as you cash to talk too much, within ten years do not attack, were OK.”

On the Ju Zi(orange) face has not revealed any surprised, sighed, said: “Why you must such understand me. Do you know that this is not very good. This will make me have the fantasy to your heart in as before.”

“That also can only be fantasy.”The Tang Wutong coldly sound resounds.

Ju Zi(orange) complexion changed changed, said: “The present opportunity is not very good, I can create an opportunity of getting rid to you, but, after getting rid, is very difficult to guarantee that your securities, I do not think that you die here. Therefore, I hope that you wait. When a more appropriate opportunity begins again.”

Huo Yuhao firm [say / way]: “It is not good, we and others. Must begin immediately, as for our safety, you do not need to manage, we have the means to withdraw. You created an opportunity of getting rid to be enough to us.”

Ju Zi(orange) surprised [say / way]: “Do you such have confidence?”

Huo Yuhao light [say / way]: “I can tell you several news. First, Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui truly died, is we aids them, then they died in our front. As for Holy Spirit Cult, you do not need to be worried, the Holy Spirit Cult almost complete high level had been killed by us, is forever impossible to pose the threat to you again. The Holy Spirit Cult headquarters in Evil Spirit Forest, their commodities were also used nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to ruin by me surely, at that time had alarmed Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler.”

“Ah?”Ju Zi(orange) surprised has stood, her these time was startled, opens wide the eyes. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, that is what kind of existence Ah?

Belongs to that side the Douluo Continent three countries, actually too had not understood. But is the Sun-Moon Empire person, listens to the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler legend was too many, are too really many. Sun-Moon Empire even names own imperial Soul Engineer Corp with Evil Tyrant, in some sense, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler regarding Sun-Moon Empire, looks like the totem is ordinary.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong encountered Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler unexpectedly, moreover now can also live coming back, it can be imagined their strengths strong.

“Are you all right? Has injured?”Ju Zi(orange) asked anxiously, her mouth asked that although was your character, may in fact she ask that who was very obvious.

Huo Yuhao said: “Evil Tyrant died, was killed by us. Now you should understand, our confidence where. Zongli Wu and Feng Ling also died. This is we give your gift. Now you did not have extra worries, the urgent matter, has killed Xu Tianran. How later you, are those words, the Sun-Moon Empire domestic matter I do not manage. I only want to complete this commitment with you, then I must find the place to practice some time with Wutong with concentration.”

Ju Zi(orange) was silent, she lowers the head slightly, does not let Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong sees her eye pupil. Huo Yuhao can feel that the Ju Zi(orange) this time mind fluctuation is very fierce, obviously is pondering anything high-speed.

He had not urged, but is waiting for silently, at this time, must give the time that she ponders.

Long time!

Ju Zi(orange) gains ground, look became very firm, did not have formerly tender feelings honey intent again, that murdered resolute War-God Empress to come back.

“You wait a bit here, I exit, urges to go faster. Begins, tonight.”Left behind these words, the Ju Zi(orange) half step left the room, went toward outside.

Huo Yuhao is actually very curious, in the situation of this strict monitoring, how she to stimulate to movement this matter? To dispatch these her person, perhaps is not easy! Because in the temporary palace range the motions of all people in various Surveying Soul Guidance Device covering scopes, she are War-God Empress, at this time, one of the certainly monitored main targets.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-607-part-3





Volume 13

#608 - The Feast Kills


Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection has been covering the entire temporary palace, is following the Ju Zi(orange) form.

He discovered with amazement that Ju Zi(orange) is looks for Xu Tianran unexpectedly, but, the speed that she walks is not all the way quick, does not seem any exceptionally.

However, Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection, in the observation capability must absolutely above these Surveying Soul Guidance Device.

At least, these Surveying Soul Guidance Device are impossible to investigate the Ju Zi(orange) heartbeat, pulse and mind to fluctuate these slight places, but Huo Yuhao cultivated by present own mind to has actually been able to achieve.

In this case, he has been feeling the overall change of Ju Zi(orange), has discovered some clue gradually.

First, the Ju Zi(orange) petty action were too many, walks, often being coquettish, makes a time petty action every time time, her heartbeat has the trend of obvious acceleration. Although the acceleration is not big, moreover does not have any stop, but changes has, the mind fluctuation will also stiffen.

This does not act itself to cause absolutely, can only be because her thinking and acts the significance that itself has.

It seems like that she already had been really ready! Even if through Spiritual Detection, Huo Yuhao is also uncertainty, actually Ju Zi(orange) has made anything.

Enough after 20 minutes, Ju Zi(orange) found Xu Tianran, with him in the same place, does not know that was saying anything. Also about half double-hour, occasionally will have some people after Ju Zi(orange) formerly once the place of process. These person common characteristics, that is the heartbeat acceleration and mind fluctuation is fierce.

Such person are not many, about seven and eight appearances, but person who former Ju Zi(orange) after place walked, had several hundreds fully, in several hundred people, these seven and eight people was very not conspicuous. Nobody will discover radically they have anything not to be right, this is any Surveying Soul Guidance Device is impossible to make to judge.

Huo Yuhao eyes narrows the eyes, said to Tang Wutong: “Ju Zi(orange) should use a secret contact way, as for the way is anything. I do not know, but the effect should be very good.”

Tang Wutong asked to Huo Yuhao in a low voice: “Do we such wait? You said that she can threaten us? A moment ago she when listened to you saying that struck to kill Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, the mood had the fierce fluctuation obviously. Moreover is indistinct has fear mood to appear. In an individual heart presents fear, will possibly take some not sane action. Although she has the friendship to you, but clearly, in her heart, her son is most important. Right, son. Her son? You have a look, her son where?”

A Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection revolution, the attention will seek for Little Yunhan.

Quick, he discovered that Xu Yunhan in being away from another room of Ju Zi(orange) this room not far away. Had not been shifted. This discovery, let Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong relaxed.

Such that just like Tang Wutong said that in the Ju Zi(orange) heart, is her son who first level wants, therefore. In this case, she kept the son, but is not shifts, very much obviously was does not have the evil intention to Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong. Otherwise, will she make the beloved son place oneself in the strategic place?

Ju Zi(orange) comes back, after is two double-hour, outside weather gradually faded out. In the evening will soon approach.

Opened the door, Ju Zi(orange) dispatches to draw back the maidservant immediately, a person walked into the room.

Her breath until this time, started becomes is somewhat rapid, after all, this time matter was really too big. Those who aim is now the monarchs in Continent first empire! Once is defeated, that is beyond redemption. Not only she must be finished, son's the position of crown prince can also end. Ju Zi(orange) too understood Xu Tianran. Therefore, when handles these matters especially to be careful.

After Ju Zi(orange) turns back own table, muttered thought aloud: “After a double-hour. The weather will get dark completely. Upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device completely from exploding. Various Surveying Soul Guidance Device of ground will lose the effect temporarily. At least in half double-hour, anybody does not have the means to restore these survey effects. Therefore, opportunity that you begin, in these Surveying Soul Guidance Device before exploding. Then while runs away randomly.”

“Passes half double-hour again, is his supper time, today, his supper invited six nine levels of Soul Engineer to dine together, this is his custom. I will ask Old Kong to protect my son. Other matter, I do not know. In that six nine levels of Soul Engineer, without my person. But besides them, other nine levels of Soul Engineer, will not begin temporarily. Linkage defense guard shield, only meets in all upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device after exploding, will release. Is worth being worried that truly, is the Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp person, they have protected in the temporary palace surrounding, most approaches Xu Tianran, once that side Xu Tianran had problems. These Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer, will overtake immediately.”

“Xu Tianran oneself, 11 nine levels of Defensive Soul Guidance Device, all are triggering, various effects have, can defend various attacks. Spiritual System, the physical attack, has. After Consecrate Hall provides these nine levels of Soul Guidance Device consecrate evaluates, even if Limit Douluo, in half double-hour, is impossible to break through on him completely all defenses. This present is the biggest problem that you must face.”

“I suggested that if you attack, carries on a way, or physical attack, either mind attack. This can not make all Defensive Soul Guidance Device have an effect. On the other hand, the mind attack is much better, Yuhao most excels at these, but what now Xu Tianran main guard is that two Limit Douluo, is primarily the physics to defend. Therefore, I estimate on him nine levels of Soul Guidance Device defense classes, total quantity not over four. Yuhao, as the matter stands, do you have confidence? Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp the gate pulse will come in he suffers attack for a while. Even if in the temporary palace the topography is narrow, cannot make them display comprehensively, but they, so long as clashes is Xu Tianran resists the attack, is enough to the time that he runs away.”

Huo Yuhao continuously in silently listens to Ju Zi(orange) to narrate, Ju Zi(orange) spoke of here time, elegant face already slightly some blood flushes.

“Don't you plan to use your person?”Huo Yuhao light asking.

The Ju Zi(orange) respite slightly is rapid, “if you have definitely grasp, I......”

Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “This matter, who dares to say one have the absolute assurance, since you grasped Consecrate Hall, must make them also go into action.”

The Ju Zi(orange) pupil contracts suddenly, fierce has stood from own position, “what did you and you say?”

Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, said: “Did I speak incorrectly? Can transfer that to have Old Kong of father of titles nine levels of Soul Engineer, haven't you controlled entire Consecrate Hall?”

The breath of Ju Zi(orange) somewhat is obviously rapid, looks at Huo Yuhao, the look cloudy clear uncertain twinkle. After long time, on the face reveals a forced smile, “you were really too intelligent, you can actually through a little clues see that I grasped Sun-Moon Empire imperial family Consecrate Hall, this made me very surprised.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Actually I have not been able completely to affirm, but I can actually affirm now. Actually, the clues are unimportant, more importantly your confidence was too full. Why you can think one can after Xu Tianran was struck kills controls the Sun-Moon Empire aspect rapidly? If not the back has the powerful support, this is impossible to achieve. You now were very big in the fame of military, but this is insufficient, now is at least insufficient. The support of military, but also being insufficient makes you be able to suppress Imperial Family, preserves your son's throne. When you said Old Kong will help you protect the crown prince, if I am not clear, that was too silly. Although I do not know that you used any price to convince Old Kong, but there is his support, all your motions will be much easier. Even if no us, you should have not the small chance of success, after all you are the Xu Tianran empress. The Soul Guidance Device defense capability is strong, is impossible not to have the flaw. Therefore, even if we do not come, it is estimated that you also meet after some time, waits for Xu Tianran to be lax the time begins.”

Ju Zi(orange) has smiled suddenly, the chuckle shaking the head, was saying: “I believe that your talent all in the practice, by the brains, eventually compared with me must almost, now look like, I made a mistake. However, I am very happy, but why cannot tell you. You said right, I have the complete plan, even if no you to coordinate, I have many assurances. Old Kong to my only request is, cannot use any Consecrate Hall person to complete this matter. Regardless of successfully with the failure, and Consecrate Hall has nothing to do, but Consecrate Hall will only support the emperor. Therefore, I do not have the means to help you through the manpower really directly. The plan of motion has two, one is you, another, is I.”

At the same time was saying, Ju Zi(orange) lifts the hand slowly, reveals the unusual beautiful nail that oneself repair, on the nail is putting on the pearl cuticle cream, seems very beautiful.

“In my nail has the opium pill, Xu Tianran each dish, has the special person to taste first, in these people, was bribed by me. I at our evening banquet, under the toxin in a dish, only will occupy a dish scrap region, another side that person in tasting, will taste, gives Xu Tianran time, is one side of this that I intoxicate. Because after is on the table, will intoxicate, therefore, I will have very big assurance to succeed.”

“disadvantage that but such makes lies, after some people know that Xu Tianran is the poison, but perishing, will certainly have many disturbances. But now, if strikes to kill him through the surprise attack, is actually the best opportunity, because all people think that can be the retaliation of that two Limit Douluo.”

----------------------------------------------------

Four finished, at the end of the month final time, does obeisance to ask the monthly ticket to support!



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-608-part-1





Volume 13

#608 - The Feast Kills


Huo Yuhao silent, “hopes that you will keep your promise.”

Ju Zi(orange) cannot see Huo Yuhao, her vision in this flickers, suddenly becomes profound, then said with the sound that sinking to congeal: “My meeting.”

Huo Yuhao said: “Said it and meant it.”

Xu Tianran has been very anxious for serveral days, since thinks on that day after is the flawless motion made the careless mistake unexpectedly, his was not happy.

Almost all Bright Capital City high-end strengths all are used to defend this temporary temporary palace now, the authority of person is bigger, more regards as important to own life, why after this was also the line of kings old, very easy wants to track down the immortal to be the same.

Xu Tianran fears death very much, he wants to be a eternity emperor in Douluo Continent history, he must unify entire Continent, he cannot certainly die.

Although numerous nine levels of Soul Engineer including Old Kong has analyzed for him, that two Limit Douluo live possibly approaches in zero infinitely, even if lives, received irreversible heavy wound inevitably, soon will die. But, in the Xu Tianran heart, actually as before filled worried. He can think, if that two Limit Douluo, only then the strength of final striking? Then, their without a doubt this attack function on oneself! Therefore, he does not hesitate at all costs defends, to guard against this situation that may have. Wants into an eternity emperor, lives is most important.

The body is carrying 11 nine levels of Soul Guidance Device, including wear Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, even if not take off in sleeping, can appear to appear in the Xu Tianran mentality.

Every day at any time, his side at least over over six nine levels of Soul Engineer will be protecting . Moreover, for serveral days, he had never left temporary palace one step, whole person anxious is stronger and stronger.

Because he does not know how long own such condition must maintain, outside simply does not have any news about that two Limit Douluo to pass on, is this. Anxiety in his heart is serious.

“Your majesty, you should eat a meal. Sir who you invited arrived.”In waits on respectful saying.

“Um.”Xu Tianran nodded, raises head mask. Went out of the room, arrives hall that dines.

Even if around this dining room. Has small Soul Guidance Protective Cover to arrange, prepares strain at any time.

Six nine levels of Soul Engineer came a while, their duties besides accompanying Xu Tianran eat meal, a more vital duty naturally is to protect him, naturally, looks like in these six nine levels of Soul Engineer, more important is actually makes Xu Tianran relieved.

After the attack of that degree, that two Limit Douluo how possibly live getting down! But no one went back to say Xu Tianran to have groundless fears, recently this anxious king, had struck to kill in several to wait on successively.

“Is the people on one's own side. Everybody should not be polite, dines.”The Xu Tianran complexion is somewhat wooden, supper was very sumptuous, has chocked up a table, but for him. Even if delicacy delicacy, now is the taste is also ordinary with the nobility wax.

Six nine levels of Soul Engineer also appear very silent, is impolite, the respective food and drink, eats meal with an anxious king, is not any happy matter, after they also only want to finish eating the food. Sooner leaves. The life of nine levels of Soul Engineer are very busy, manufactures Soul Guidance Device, to experiment Soul Guidance Device, to design Soul Guidance Device, other matters that they govern, need them to control.

Drank several glasses of liquor, the Xu Tianran serious expression relaxed several points finally. Possibly because of the growth of age, in addition controls increase of power and influence. He now more and more in hobby cup thing. Especially recently, every night, must always depend upon the anaesthesia of alcohol to rest to be good to think.

In waited on is Xu Tianran but actually one glass of liquor, Xu Tianran has carried the wine class, on the face reveals a smile. Said: “Come, everybody consecrates, making us hobnob one cup, wishing my Sun-Moon army soon to quell Star Luo and Dou Ling both countries, series Continent.”

“Cheers!”Six nine levels of Soul Engineer hurry to carry the wine class to say with one voice.

Listens sound that they are acknowledging boisterously, how many minutes Xu Tianran was happier, six so formidable nine levels of aren't Soul Engineer, same must obey their order? This grasps the world advantage!

Before the wine class delivers to the lip, simultaneously raises glass to hobnob with other six nine levels of Soul Engineer. During this banqueted the normal situation, but, what nobody noted was, in they sent in the flash before oneself lip the quilt. In the wine class of everyone, quietly were many a common small vortex, this small vortex is the dark blue, today's meal liquor is the grape ferments, in that dark red liquor fluid, cannot see clue.

The grape ferments sour and sweet, the flavor is mellow, when six consecrate with Xu Tianran hobnobs this cup, the liquor fluid enters the throat, some of they actually strange feelings, this cup of grapes ferment, as if especially cool, drinks not in part of ones duty to gladden the heart, the comfort of not being able to say.

“Um? Does not know that is because your majesty offers wine, this glass of liquor drink the taste are really good!”Old nine levels of Soul Engineer said with a smile.

Xu Tianran actually in suddenly the complexion big change, suddenly turns head to look that waits on to nearby.

The same pot liquor, how possible previous cup and do the latter cup of flavors differ from? He remembers clearly, has not changed the wine pot very much. In time that this is frightened by the slightest sound, Xu Tianran regarding all slightest signs of trouble is particularly sensitive.

Those who made him quite relieved was, in that waited on has not had anything to change because of his gaze, instead was somewhat vacant, lowered the head, respectful [say / way]: “Your majesty, but can come one cup again?”

In time that Xu Tianran relaxes slightly, next one flickers, he and six nine levels of Soul Engineer complexions present actually simultaneously changed.

The cool liquor fluid, becomes ice-cold got up suddenly, after that enters the abdomen, should approach the body temperature the liquor fluid, actually likely suddenly starts to freeze general, the woods cold aura sends out to the whole body instantaneously, made each of them's body is one cold.

“It is not good!”Nine levels of Soul Engineer give a loud shout, the whole body ascended immediately mist, his response was nothing less than quick, the goal was also very simple, that by oneself powerful Soul Power, forced from within the body the beforehand liquor fluid.

However, this revolution Soul Power, had discovered is not right, although within the body Soul Power is as before powerful, is, that liquor fluid place visited, the bloodlines or Soul Power, as if must freeze, when his Soul Power moves with the ice-cold liquor fluid of that terror in the same place, will be being been freezing unexpectedly immediately, must be frozen including the energy, this is the fearful strength!

Xu Tianran in handling same matter, but after his Soul Power and that ice-cold move feels the incorrect time, the complexion immediately changed, becomes exceptionally ugly. This situation his first meeting, violently poisonous? This is he first thinks that besides the violent poisonousness, absolutely does not have other possibilities. The liquor that but, oneself drink, before on table, has tasted by the special person, and examines carefully, confirmed does not have the issue, might place to oneself in front, how to be possible? This is how possible!

Side arriving Xu Tianran that four black forms are quietly, before one of them a hand has caught, the neck that but actually in the liquor waits on, has raised him, in another three people, a person is observing all around vigilantly, on Humanoid Soul Guidance Device has been glittering the intense ray, the other two are arrive both hands behind Xu Tianran, stimulates to movement vigorous Soul Power, pours into to Xu Tianran within the body.

“Quick, passes on me to order, the blockade......”Xu Tianran shouted to clear the way in a low voice. He discovered that oneself this time spoke became difficult, because the throat as if must be frozen, in the speech, the mouth will even spout the white fog.

This is overbearing violently poisonous! Actually can be so the degree. Did the retaliation of Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui, come finally?

Although Xu Tianran is panic-stricken, but finally is calm, after all, in this room, him, 11 Titled Douluo rank powerhouses, outside also has formidable Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp in addition fully, some these many powerhouses, even if that two Limit Douluo begins, will not have will immediately possibly strike to kill. But that violently poisonous, regardless of being strong, takes own cultivating as, in a short time will not have the matter, thinks the means disintoxicating again slowly and that's the end.

“Useless, your order is impossible to have a character to pass on, including here all.”

That idle black form just the body exited, the strength rebound that does not have to resist is returned by one, on Humanoid Soul Guidance Device of whole body, has covered incorruptible.

In the entire dining room, has all covered a light distortion ray, all of outside, is unable to appear in the sensation of numerous position Titled Douluo rank powerhouse again.

This and this are what kind of strength Ah?

Although that six nine levels of Soul Engineer are feeling blood more and more ice-cold in within the body, but will not resign oneself to extinction, immediately has opened own Soul Guidance Protective Cover, protects itself, then revolves around Xu Tianran all round, vigilant looks to all around.

Two forms, appear slowly from illusory, tranquil appearance in Xu Tianran as well as in front of numerous Sun-Moon Empire powerhouse.

When Xu Tianran sees clearly the person, slightly stares, at present this person, he is far familiar, but absolutely has actually seen.

“You and you are Shrek Academy......”Xu Tianran surprised looks at front person.

“Yes, I am Shrek Academy Huo Yuhao, this, is my girlfriend, Tang Wutong. Very accidental? Your majesty.”Huo Yuhao be with smile on the face saying.

Xu Tianran coldly [say / way]: “Huo Yuhao, is you to select ten, has defeated my Sun-Moon Empire powerhouse?”

Huo Yuhao nodded, “good, is I.”

-------------------------------------------------

The new month, the plea guarantees a minimum the monthly ticket, this is our last month, it is expected that peerless Tang Sect within 20 th will finish in half a month. Last month, did not ask position, but hopes that we can have a glorious memory, thank you.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-608-part-2





Volume 13

#608 - The Feast Kills


Xu Tianran coldly snorted, “good, I must acknowledge that perhaps in the younger generation, nobody can compare favorably with you, but, you dare so to pull rank, merely two people, dare to come to my Sun-Moon Empire imperial palace, but also dares to sneak attack me, you believe that today you also do have to live the possibility of departure?”

Huo Yuhao he he smiles, said: “Your majesty, you thought many, should consider that this issue, was not I, but was you are right.”

Together light shadow, appearance of being quietly behind Huo Yuhao.

Numerous position Soul Engineer on the scene already are the heartstrings tied tight, feels Huo Yuhao here change, almost first launched the attack to him.

Glares discussed instantaneously that the powerful Soul Power fluctuation, making the entire hall shiver.

Several Soul Engineer startle, the attack has not faced Huo Yuhao, but to nearby hall bombardment in the past, their goals was very simple, makes the sound, alarms outside Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, so long as this goal has been achieved, then did not need to worry. At present the strengths of these two young people are strong, the impossible and entire Sun-Moon Empire high-end strength contends.

However, what making all people dumbfounded was, after their launches on attack, which direction facing, the ultimate objective, unexpectedly all was Huo Yuhao, but surrounding all rays, all twisted.

Before Huo Yuhao body, a strange whirlpool is revolving baseless, the whirlpool presents is the ice blue color, after these light beams enter in the ice blue color whirlpool, has not sent out the sound unexpectedly, disappeared in that vortex completely. But the form that Huo Yuhao behind presents completely has also appeared.

That is a beautiful female, has the human feminine upper body, but also has the strange attractive fish tail, the big eye, is having the light happy expression. The clear and wonderful singing sound, lingers in the entire main hall instantaneously.

On Huo Yuhao, Soul Ring rays shine. Present he, early has not needed to conceal his mixing to trade the color.

First Soul Ring, no longer is pure white like the jade, but presents for the brilliant bright golden color, then, most common Soul Ring is also the black, but more is actually, the red, the conspicuous red, is having the golden trace red.

The Huo Yuhao low and deep sound spreads presents in everyone ear, is frightening their mind, “spirit! Soul! Shake! Explodes!”

In entire hall, air slight fluctuation, but presents all people, including Xu Tianran, the body actually burst out the intense ray, they were used to defend the mind attack Defensive Soul Guidance Device, all immediately burst out the extremely intense ray. In the entire hall, turned into piece of honored world immediately.

If merely is this, that was also not anything, achieved the apex in that brilliance the flash, a series of to shatter sounds also along with it resounding. Including Xu Tianran, presents on each Soul Engineer, at least to shatter mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device.

Reason that said is at least, because on two people does not have mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device to shatter. Because, on them has not carried this type Defensive Soul Guidance Device.

mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device, in various Defensive Soul Guidance Device, in nine levels of this levels, is particularly most difficult to manufacture. Therefore initially Ju Zi(orange) to Zongli Wu proposed condition time, Zongli Wu also can only be hold one's noses to recognize.

In nine levels of Soul Engineer, is not each will provide this Defensive Soul Guidance Device, after all, excels at mind attack Soul Master or is Soul Beast eventually is minority.

However, today, at this time, Soul Engineer that these two have not provided, is actually doomed only to become the tragedy.

Although they promote the limit their Spiritual Power immediately, spiritual sea in brain has even seethed with excitement, but, could they actually possibly resist one just to obtain the Limit Douluo mind attack of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler formidable mind Soul Ring?

In the stuffy pshaw, these two nine levels of Soul Engineer simultaneously the seven orifices hemorrhage, the body is swaying, can only not make itself get down reluctantly but actually.

Looks color with amazement in them, but also wants to counterattack, suddenly, in the air shook once more, once again approached with formerly the terrorist attack of similar intensity, this time, although does not have first time to be so fierce, but also similar terror.

“Bang and Bang.”Two, formerly that two did not have mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device Soul Engineer, almost explodes to perish immediately, immediately the blood and brain fluid, splash everywhere is.

However, at this time, other people could not take care of oneself similarly, did not have the time to care about them.

Mermaid Double Chant, enabling the Spiritual System attack of Huo Yuhao to start continuously twice, this is divine skill general existence! In Huo Yuhao all auxiliary abilities, Mermaid Double Chant Spiritual System, can be among the best absolutely, is next to Three Eyed Golden Lion takes to Huo Yuhao that several destiny Soul Ability.

Second round Soul Shaking Burst erupts time, presents almost all Soul Engineer to be simultaneously stuffy snort|hum makes noise, bodies fall to draw back, going all out wants to resist with own mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device. But, their mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device already to shatter.

Only then Xu Tianran the body, his body has 11 nine levels of Defensive Soul Guidance Device immediately, defends the mind attack has four. Moreover, his Defensive Soul Guidance Device, by the quality, absolutely is now existence of Sun-Moon Empire most top, therefore, although he seems very distressed, but, two rounds Soul Shaking Burst, made him ruin Defensive Soul Guidance Device.

Body Yang Dao, the front jumps backward projects a glare, promoting the body of Xu Tianran to fly upside down suddenly.

In any place of this temporary palace, Xu Tianran gave itself to prepare the escape route. He can feel that at present and subordinates were fell certainly into front in the formidable domain class ability of this person, in this case, wanted to find a way out, can only look for the opportunity by own memory, in him behind not the far ground, the tunnel, inside also had the transport unit, so long as can rush to there, he had the opportunity to be separated, but once the tunnel opened, outside naturally also knows that he received to attack here. Again does not have anything to be fearful.

Since what a pity, Huo Yuhao arrived here, has calculated own combat capability.

Two rounds Soul Shaking Burst start at the same time, other attacks of Huo Yuhao also opened.

“Bang, bang, bang and bang......”low and deep bellow, in the Soul Shaking Burst remaining prestige still, follows to erupt, but this time, the attack is actually not comes by outside, but from inside to outside.

ice-cold in within the body, sudden burst. The bloodlines of freeze, have had the fierce explosion unexpectedly. This is explodes in within the body!

Including Xu Tianran, the people on the scene, seven people have drunk the beforehand ice liquor.

In that liquor naturally is not the violent poisonousness, but came from Huo Yuhao Absolute Ice Soul Power.

If changes individual, is absolutely impossible to send in match within the body own Soul Power for instance, on the scene is the Titled Douluo level powerhouses, the sensation of everyone is extremely high, feels the Soul Power fluctuation and mind to fluctuate, or a wee bit evil intentions, they will have a vigilance. Reason that anything had not discovered that is not because their sensations were weaken, but is Huo Yuhao conceals was really good.

Relies on own formidable strength, Huo Yuhao is hiding own aura, including the Soul Power fluctuation, the side that all conceals is good. Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus produces, but whirlpool Soul Power, has the completely reserved special effect, in addition he desirably controls. Before these people drink the flash, Huo Yuhao selects seven fingers void, seven rolls own Absolute Ice Soul Power, integration of being quietly to their liquor fluids, lets they drink wine at the same time, has drunk this Soul Power.

Reserved of Absolute Ice, erupts to their within the body, therefore they will feel that is not right. But these Absolute Ice Soul Power itself also contain this Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power, this makes him be able to maintain the control to these strengths.

The bloodlines freeze, that is ice, but Huo Yuhao another divine skill, is Ice Explosion Technique!

Ice Explosion Technique that erupts in within the body, even if the Titled Douluo rank powerhouse cannot withstand. On Xu Tianran puts on many Defensive Soul Guidance Device, is impossible to defend in own body.

Therefore, in situation that at this time Ice Explosion Technique assumes an awe-inspiring pose suddenly, besides formerly two already by Soul Engineer that Soul Shaking Burst was killed by shock, another five people, sent out a sad and shrill pitiful yell all, within the body thunder, immediately made them lose the revolt ability instantaneously.

The body of Titled Douluo without doubt is extremely tenacious, Huo Yuhao will not have the means too many Soul Power to integrate their within the body, making them drink. Therefore, the explosive force limits to a certain extent, but also is not enough to be fatal to them, but that fierce pain, is actually not casual can endure.

Huo Yuhao starts at the same time, Tang Wutong also moved.

Teleportation, making her flicker below presents behind Xu Tianran that two Men in Black behind. The radiant Purple gold colored light glow glistens suddenly, simply does not have any gaudiness, the double fist is uneven.

These Xu Tianran shadow bodyguards have the greatly strengthened strength, but, what this strength must look to face is. When their matches are Limit Douluo, what means can they have?

Dazzling golden light sticks out suddenly. Two wear on the Humanoid Soul Guidance Device shadow guard to burst out a series of glares, but, these glares all in that is sending out in front of the powerful fist of dragon roar one by one to shatter. When the fist of Tang Wutong falls in their Humanoid Soul Guidance Device surface finally, their results have been doomed.

Tang Wutong double fist bang flies two people, the tender body jumped, from the sky collides with happen to Huo Yuhao that moves sideways to come together.

This time they, look like two groups of energies are common, in the instance of collision, each other fuses unexpectedly, and burst out the unequalled formidable aura. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-608-part-3





Volume 13

#609 - The Rulers Fall


This time, even if were the Spiritual Disturbance domain that Huo Yuhao formerly arranged does not have the means to cover their aura, the terrifying mind fluctuation, erupted instantaneously outward, letting everyone in temporary palace the clear feeling.

Huge vertical eye emerges out of thin air, this only vertical eye is in itself the strange golden color, around the golden color, is actually sending out the noble Purple gold colored light mark. The terrifying halo in the next quarter expansion, a handle handle strange small hammer, shortly will flood in the entire hall.

Mantra Amidst the Void, Spiritual Tempest! Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong one of the four big Martial Soul Fusion techniques.

This is also in their Martial Soul Fusion techniques, the most formidable mind attack method, in order to achieves completes this line of tasks in a short time the goal, they any had not kept the hand.

At this time, even if Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui ressurection, in the face of the attacks of their this level, can only take shelter from wind temporarily auspicious, does not dare to touch with them directly hardly. Only if that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler has not died, can contend in the mind level reluctantly.

Naturally, perhaps these two characters most times do not have any practical significance.

Entire dining room, instantaneously ripped smashing, that clearly is the attack of mind level, has actually achieved the destructive power of entity degree. That several received heavy wound in Ice Explosion Technique, after formerly nine levels of Soul Engineer of Soul Shaking Burst baptism, body bunch of rays unceasingly blasted out, finally blasts out, naturally is their heads.

Incessantly is they, that several shadow guards so, under the mind level attack of so high intensity, on them absolutely do not have the strength that any can contend with directly similarly.

This mind storm comes was really too fearful, on defense capability strongest Xu Tianran, has blasted out two mind nine levels of Defensive Soul Guidance Device one after another, reluctantly resisted the Spiritual Tempest prestige energy.

However, this time Xu Tianran, the moral nature deep place was actually angry a despair. Within the body severe pain, making him support to run away now becomes extremely difficult.

In the Tang Wutong hand has gripped Golden Dragon Spear, but in the Huo Yuhao hand is grasping a handle short blade edge.

The short blade edge sweeps away, ices the blue ray to appear together, around the Xu Tianran body, the space within diameter ten meters range was frozen completely. That drops to the close Absolute Zero terrifying ultra-low temperature instantaneously, making him support Defensive Soul Guidance Device Soul Power to drop. What about fearing, Huo Yuhao such does, to let him unexpectedly is unable to move temporarily.

The dining room by the Spiritual Tempest scrap, everywhere dust flew upwards, when Xu Tianran can see clearly the surrounding all, two people who he sees changed.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong vanished, reappears, only then that familiar old face.

Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui, Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao.

“You and you......”Xu Tianran even could not clarify now, in oneself front outcome is Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao, was Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

If makes him choose, he rather believes is the former, because the former two people after all are Limit Douluo! But Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong actually that young.

Even if this time can survive by luck, if comes to attack these two to have the person of Limit Douluo strength, unexpectedly is the Shrek Academy powerhouses, how he also rules the Continent Ah? Limit Douluo terror, he already looks on Dragon Emperor Douluo and Grim Reaper Douluo was clear. So long as is slightly intelligent, does not fall into a trap, Limit Douluo on this world, as before is invincible existence.

Thought that what a pity, he wants to fortunately survive how long cannot maintain eventually, because he saw vertical eye, appears in “Long Xiaoyao”vertical eye on forehead.

In vertical eye, the ray glitters, the Purple gold color ray hit together instantaneously in his head.

Last nine levels of mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device finally to shatter. Xu Tianran plants immediately ** bare presents in all person front feelings.

Ended, he knows that he ended!

Xu Tianran pain has closed eyes, he understands that since oneself tople days fear is right, before the genuine powerhouse, his strength was too tiny. The strength of Limit Douluo level, can let on this world eventually any authority death.

If can come one time again, he does not hesitate at all costs, must obtain the understanding of Ye Xishui, which Grim Reaper Douluo if there is, at present these two people possibly kill oneself?

To finally, him has become completely clearly aware, at present these two, possibly are not Ye Xishui and Long Xiaoyao, that Absolute Ice ability, the ability of concealment, is that two Limit Douluo did not have. Therefore, they can only be Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, although does not know why they become so formidable, but, he can affirm. Naturally, all these present becomes is unimportant.

Merpeople second level plays, appeared in this crucial time. The second Purple gold colored light glow almost flickers below, fell on Xu Tianran.

“Pū”gigantic head of Xu Tianran, instantaneous to shatter. The brain fluid scatters, one generation of kings, left this world eventually, even even/including Quanshi have not stayed behind.

Finally to get rid of Xu Tianran, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong relaxed.

Although a moment ago entire process all during their grasps, moreover suppressed completely has presented all people, but, they have done actually also utmost.

Before beginning, they have determined the tactic, is primarily mind to attack. Therefore, the number of times that Tang Wutong begins are few, takes Huo Yuhao as the main attack.

Facts showed that their procedures are absolutely correct. Xu Tianran dies eventually, in Huo Yuhao merpeople second level has played under Soul Assault.

In the sky, rays glitter, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp responded that the soul leads to defend the guard shield to open, under all will cover completely.

In the Huo Yuhao mouth sends out a long and loud cry, huge Black Dragon, soars suddenly, changes into light shadow, has attacked toward above light barrier. But Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong personal appearance dodges, was hidden in the air.

The time that they present although is very short, but Huo Yuhao believes that by Sun-Moon Empire the Surveying Soul Guidance Device ability, certain saw clearly their appearance now, this was enough. They have created enough opportunity to Ju Zi(orange).

Linkage defense guard shield, regarding, even if the top powerhouse, is very troublesome issues. Especially is displayed by Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, is so.

What a pity, this time, what they face is two Limit Douluo.

Initially, Xu Tianran wanted to surround Ye Xishui time, use, but High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, was because he knows, general linkage defense guard shield, even if were Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp displays, was impossible to resist the destruction of Limit Douluo.

Now is also so.

Butter of Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife in Huo Yuhao hand just like cutting into is ordinary, has cut open a slit front linkage defense guard shield, the Tang Wutong double fist is uneven, is big slit bang, their personal appearance dodges, under the stealth condition that in Imitation Soul Ability maintains escapes instantaneously.

Ju Zi(orange) has been waiting for in own room anxiously, that when Spiritual Tempest has thunders fiercely resounds, her whole body cannot help but shivered, in that fierce shivering simultaneously, in her heart also had two entirely different mood.

One type is stimulated, if Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong have succeeded, all issues that then, she faces can be easily solved.

Another type is frightened, her present very has mixed feelings. She despaired to Huo Yuhao now, she knows, oneself in any event impossible and he in together, without any opportunity. But Huo Yuhao currently has becomes more and more formidable, is not she can control completely, even might threaten her rule to the empire in the future very much. Even but if is this, when she thinks of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong when is defeated the aspect that must face, in her heart as before subconscious production intense fear. This fear from the innermost soul, is a mother suddenly thought when own child's father may have an accident that feeling, this is not in the reason can control.

“Ju Zi(orange)!”In this time, a sudden sound, is awakening from these two clearly opposite mood Ju Zi(orange). She almost does not have any concealing, completely subconscious calls out in alarm makes noise, “Yuhao.”

Must know, at this time in her room, but also has existences of numerous maidservant.

The maidservants had a scare by the Ju Zi(orange) this sudden shout, Ju Zi(orange) look one cold, must begin to eliminate a potential informant.

In the ear actually once more broadcasts the Huo Yuhao sound, “Ju Zi(orange) that I know, is always not a person of bloodthirsty.”

Ju Zi(orange) takes a deep breath, returns to normal the mood that reluctantly are surging, at this time, truly was not the good opportunity of silencing a witness of crime. His sinking sound shouted to clear the way: “Exits to me, if who dares to speak at a venture outside, after do not blame this, heavy hand being heartless.”

“Yes, empress empress.”The maidservants keep silent has drawn back. Ju Zi(orange) is almost somewhat impatient summoned in a low voice: “Yuhao? You and are you all right?”

In this time, outside is thundering intermittently resounds suddenly, just started, but also is similar to the bolt from the blue, but is quick, that intermittent thunderous changed into the big piece thunderstorm, resounds through sky over entire Sun-Moon Empire Bright Capital City.

Ju Zi(orange) said that the upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device chain explosion, finally started. That looks like the comprehensive survey that the eye of God has generally, finally temporarily lost the effect.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong personal appearance has also appeared in the next quarter, did not have existences of these Surveying Soul Guidance Device, they no longer need to worry that was discovered.

Sees Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong is well, Ju Zi(orange) as if relaxed, but also somewhat has mixed feelings.

“You......”Ju Zi(orange) subconscious saying, want to ask that also somewhat asked does not export.

Huo Yuhao has selected, said: “We have succeeded, Xu Tianran died, the forehead was been broken by my Soul Assault direct bang, with him in together ten powerhouses, all died. Now, we can retire after meritorious service, with your commitment, we have achieved, then, looked your.”

In the Ju Zi(orange) eye flashes through to wipe the wild with joy, tender body even shivers, “died, did he die really?”Although she is not willing to acknowledge that may in fact, Xu Tianran truly constrain in her heart mountain!

Huo Yuhao looks at Ju Zi(orange), in look were also many several points of other things.

“Ju Zi(orange), after this distinction, if you can keep the promise, perhaps, we later will not meet. You, take care.”Huo Yuhao sighed one to say lightly.

How regardless to say that at present this woman is also the female who first opens oneself heart, not long, in oneself heart had also fantasized she will change the mind. But, is predestined friends eventually unqualified.

The regret of Ju Zi(orange), won't Huo Yuhao be able to feel? However, he was impossible to turn head again, sometimes, opportunity, once has missed, is impossible to come. He had Tang Wutong, in heart could not accommodate other people again. Let alone, in his heart also understands that Ju Zi(orange) is impossible to give up having all now, not only for her, for the authority in her son and hand, even also has the hatred.

Ten years, this is can be the final time that Douluo Continent wins, ten years later will be what kind, Huo Yuhao is not clear.

Such that just like he said that this very possible is he and Ju Zi(orange) last time meets, because, then he must attack Limit Douluo, then, another world, is his goal. If his success, then, the matter on Douluo Continent, is not he can meddle really again. Let alone, his in this body and mind also has filled now confusedly, because he is not clear, actually another world is any appearance.

Ju Zi(orange) listened to his words, the complexion instantaneously becomes a paleness, “why? What do you want to make?”

Huo Yuhao sighed, said: “I had told you before, I and Wutong must find the place to close up, our strength promotion are too quick, now the body had not the small problem, how long this time closes up meets, finally how, we do not know, but at least several years will not appear again. Ju Zi(orange), keeps your commitment, otherwise, I did not mind that ruins you personally. We walked.”

Spoke these words, Huo Yuhao once more deep looked at her one eyes, is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, turns around to go, simultaneously is hidden in the air.

The tears, uncontrolled flow instantaneously, Ju Zi(orange) stands there, the whole person whole body shivers unusual fierce.

He walked, he such walked, a moment ago that flash, she feels really that perhaps she forever lost him, like such that he said that perhaps, this was last time meets. Real? Really is this?

“Ju Zi(orange), why? Why initially did you want such choice? If you had initially chosen him, puts aside the hatred, perhaps, will be more joyful than the present many. Is the hatred, so really important? Authority, really important? Ha Ha, ha ha ha ha!”

Laughing of Ju Zi(orange) hysteria makes noise, outside maidservants body shivering that cannot help but listens, also at this time, one group of people from distant place running over of hurriedly.

“Report! Seeks an interview War-God Empress.”

......

It is reported that everybody two good news, our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire tour to have the big movement.

The apple escape edition has gotten online officially, if the player has the machine of escape, can hurry first downloading to play, ices the fire the legal copy also to submit the apple to verify, believes that will be also quick and everybody meets \;

At my strong request, for the back coupling book friends, will be preparing a mysterious big activity with the gizmondo in the near future, any content keeps secret specifically temporarily, soon will get recently also online, this is one has never engaged in the big activity. And, has is the presents that under line can attain, total value over 1 million! Concrete is anything, pays attention continually our ** the platform, will inform everybody, is, must enter us to play to practice the level, the rank can be closely linked with the prize.

The downloading way joins our prestige as before first - platform, then clicks on the right bottom hand tour to download, downloads according to the operation explanation.

Joins the prestigious platform method to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication was our families. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-609





Volume 13

#610 - Seizes The Shed


Huo Yuhao is holding the hand of Tang Wutong, flies in the midair, in them behind not far away, entire Bright Capital City at this time is a confusion.

Not only because of the Xu Tianran death, because explosion of massive upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device.

The Xu Tianran death, limits in the small range at present knows that but in the sky that many upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device explode, is actually in entire Bright Capital City all people can see that this cannot cover.

Bright Capital City was chaotic, this chaotic, does not know how long wants to stabilize. But Huo Yuhao is very confident to Ju Zi(orange), Ju Zi(orange) had the wrist|skill, almost most situations, during her control, she, since prepared for must cope with Xu Tianran, certainly had early has prepared the good foreshadowing, the present is 11 takes.

Such leaves, even anything did not confess, has not gotten the Ju Zi(orange) affirmative answer, Huo Yuhao brought to be somewhat anxious, he who Tang Wutong was walking also knows. He wants to remain actually very much, looks at Ju Zi(orange) the Sun-Moon Empire internal integration, then keeps the promise. Within ten years not to Douluo Continent that side Star Luo and Dou Ling Empire resort to violence. This is the best choice. So long as there is him and Tang Wutong deterrent, he believes that in any event, Ju Zi(orange) does not dare to act rashly.

But, he actually has to walk, if not walk, he is Tang Wutong, might forever unable to get away very much.

That war, they Xu Tianran were not fake by Myriad Great Thunder method to get rid of a moment ago, but, their bodies, erupted the huge issue.

Long Xiaoyao and Ye Xishui kept the barrier of their within the body to present the obvious fissure, had the possibility of collapse anytime. Once this barrier collapsed, then, they the danger that may face overstates.

Especially Huo Yuhao, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler that Spiritual Power in his spiritual sea at crazy rebellion. Daydream Ice Silkworm must unable to suppress shortly, at this time, he Tang Wutong was even feeding in the Shrek Academy time not to have the news, they must find the place to dive to cultivate immediately, otherwise, faced was life and death Great Tribulation!

Therefore, he in a hurry had confessed several, brought Tang Wutong to leave Bright Capital City rapidly, flew in the Sky Soul Empire direction.

“Yuhao, are you what kind of?”Tang Wutong can feel clearly that this time Huo Yuhao, a palm icy coldness, but within the body Soul Power fluctuation is actually incomparable fierce, the body even is not sends out the strange brilliance, that is within the body Soul Power approached the performance of out-of-control!

Huo Yuhao complexion ugly: “Perhaps I must support do not live, we must find the place to practice immediately, otherwise troubled.”

Tang Wutong nodded, said: “Here, cannot wait again.”Under is piece of valley, because they the body have very major problem, leaves Bright Capital City time, even cannot attend to taking one's bearings, does not know where this is. Now anything could not attend, they approach the whereabouts to go immediately.

A Tang Wutong fist opened cutting a cavern to come out on the mountain wall directly, holds Huo Yuhao to worm one's way into. At this time, they even continually concealed without enough time do.

“You feel relieved the practice, we give you protector.”Snow Emperor and Ice Emperor simultaneously come out from Huo Yuhao within the body. Their complexions are very intense. Huo Yuhao at this time Soul Power and Spiritual Power in within the body were really too huge, at their experiences and eyesight, never has seen so huge fluctuation of energy, this as if has gone beyond the limit of this world, might occur from anytime exploding. If is really such, the beforehand all efforts wasted all previous efforts!

Huo Yuhao could not say including thanks words, can support is flying here, is his formidable automatic control ability is maintaining.

Sits falls to the ground, he with rapt attention, completely immerses Spiritual Power in immediately to his Soul Power control during.

Tang Wutong holds him to sit cross-legged to sit, oneself sit in him opposite. At this time they have not been able to carry on to practice through Hao Dong Power again . Moreover, they now Soul Power of respective within the body is extremely huge, now she cannot help Huo Yuhao. One face the issue is very big, in observing Huo Yuhao a while, had determined after he does not have the danger temporarily, Tang Wutong then also enters the meditate condition. She must first do, first maintains that barrier of oneself within the body, then said other.

But the barrier of Huo Yuhao within the body, actually irreversible little to shatter, has been similar to ocean waves general Soul Power, surges the reciprocation in his within the body.

mind Soul Nucleus, already came from Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler formidable Spiritual Power to fill, but Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus, came from the Long Xiaoyao Soul Power puffiness similarly, his body looks like a big balloon, has gasified the limit, actually as in unceasing increase effort.

The Huo Yuhao body surface even therefore started somewhat to inflate, the blue vein revealed completely, the whole body was sending out the unhealthy red, gold sun blue moon, behind unceasingly was glittering in him, each twinkle, air slight distortion several points.

Luckily, sits Tang Wutong in his opposite, behind Tang Wutong, the gold sun purple moon similar ray twinkle, echoes with the aura that on Huo Yuhao lends mutually, during this echoes, perhaps Yin-Yang Supplement has produced certain results, reluctantly lets the huge energy burst of Huo Yuhao within the body will not be fierce.

Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor protection in cavern entrance, looks at Snow Emperor that a Ice Emperor face worries saying: “His situation now is not very good, can he insist?”

Snow Emperor sinking sound track: “Certain energy, in recent years, regardless of goes through what kind of difficulty, we together didn't walk? This is final is in front of the goal a foot, succeeds, he can reach the sky in a single bound, our dreams really must be realized, if were defeated......”

Here, Snow Emperor smiled, “what failed also had? If not he, perhaps we also already died, if he were defeated, we together accompany him.”

Ice Emperor one startled, “Snow Emperor, have you thought?”

Snow Emperor shows a faint smile, said: “Did you also ask me? Hadn't you already thought? agree did not say. Although you daily to the Daydream hasty words and stern countenance, but I actually could see that you looked his look became more and more gentle, it seems like, my small Bing'er had found the object of liking. In your heart had already decided that must fused the source and Yuhao, is right? Is because Daydream he already to help Yuhao, has completed the fusion. But we miss, was only this final Spiritual Consciousness source, this was also we finally can help the Yuhao strength, but after such fusion, we again also made no distinctions with him, even if were his success arrived at that world, we impossible and he has separated, that was true suffering if either one suffers, a Rong Jurong. I do not give up with you similarly separate! Why can't I think?”

Ice Emperor holds on the hand of Snow Emperor, the elegant face blushes saying: “Xue'er, I and I not with that fellow......”

Snow Emperor “pū”smiles, said: “We knew that several hundred thousand years, your thoughts, I hadn't known? Do not think that I have not moved raise your meaning. I am the sincerity is happy for you! Now this, is not good?”

“Um. We in any event, must help Yuhao go through this time difficulty. Xue'er, I first. The Yuhao present situation is not very wonderful, must stabilize to be good first.”

“Good. You go first, here has me.”Snow Emperor earnest looks at Ice Emperor, hugged her gently, then looks the smile loosens her.

Ice Emperor gathers in front of Snow Emperor, has kissed one on her cheek, was tender runs with a smile.

The Huo Yuhao present situation is is not very truly good, even can say that is he in history not best condition.

The energy in within the body was really too huge, the matter that he most wants to handle now, divulged within the body these huge energies. But, he cannot achieve.

Spiritual Power could not control Soul Power, because Spiritual Power was in itself chaotic. Although Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Spiritual Power underwent the filtration, but itself as before that manic, seems like containing formidable Wraith Soul, unceasing is wreaking havoc, wants to wrest away Huo Yuhao spiritual sea.

Has practiced over 700,000 years of formidable Soul Beast worthily! In the situation of even if in itself died, must initiate as before counter-attacks at the point of death. No wonder, after he dies, oneself had not felt that has the soul to fluctuate to appear, he hid the strength of soul in Soul Ring unexpectedly directly, and also compressed the massive Spiritual Power belts to come.

Clearly, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler before has calculated at the point of death, oneself are must absorbs his Soul Nucleus, but his present goal, must seize the shed! Seizes own body.

If no Long Xiaoyao to pour into these Soul Power of Huo Yuhao within the body, Huo Yuhao has not feared Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, he has Daydream Ice Silkworm and Mermaid Princess help, itself Spiritual Power is also formidable. In addition the control of Power of Emotion, only remaining Soul Source Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler radically not with the qualifications that he competes.

But, the present issue is very big, within the body Soul Power also at rebellion! Let him not have the means to focus on coping with Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, this is most troublesome.

The spiritual sea snafu, Mermaid Princess and Daydream Ice Silkworm could not withstand, he is also so, in brain already somewhat ignorant. Luckily, the great strength of mind Soul Nucleus, making the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler soul not have the means to complete to seize the shed.

But, this way, the result as before will not actually change.

Starting today, our peerless Tang Sect cartoon in our prestige - platform starts to continue to serialize, every day two, everybody can find in the platform micro station.

Joins our platform to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is the brother! 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-610-part-1





Volume 13

#610 - Seizes In The Shed


Evil Tyrant is very intelligent, he feels the condition that Huo Yuhao has now faced very much clearly, otherwise he will not start at this time, he needs to do now, waits for the opportunity, waited for that a Huo Yuhao body have the problem the opportunity.

Once Soul Power in his body not to have cannot control, wreaks havoc completely lets loose, his Soul Nucleus is not stabilizing then, at that time, seizes the best opportunity in shed.

Can seize a body of shed humanity Limit Douluo, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is very satisfied. He was struck by Huo Yuhao kills, had the opportunity the soul to flee, even chooses a descendant body rebirth, has him of that formidable soul level, wants to kill thoroughly is not an easy matter.

But it does not have yo does, the reason is, he had a liking for the body of Huo Yuhao.

If comes ressurection with oneself descendant's body, will have the tremendous influence to his strength, needs for a long time to restore very much in peak condition. If before, this is not good, nothing but time for a long time, but at least insures.

However, now this time actually cannot like this, because, he will face the arrival of next Great Tribulation quickly, Great Tribulation may, no matter he has received heavy wound, seizes the shed rebirth. Will only recognize its soul. Even if were complete condition Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler has not grasped passed this Great Tribulation, he may not have the Beast God Di Tian that huge vitality, say nothing of experiences personally him after heavy wound. Once Great Tribulation approaches, he may really be doomed.

Therefore, he after short thinking decided that risks danger wrestles. Seizes the goal of shed, fell on Huo Yuhao.

Such that just like Huo Yuhao judges now, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler concluded that he is impossible to give up that formidable Soul Ring, if he gave up, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler seizes own descendants not to be late again.

But once after Huo Yuhao has absorbed his Soul Ring, the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler goal must find an opportunity to seize to abandon his body.

The body of Soul Beast could not cover his aura, but the body of humanity can actually cover most! Let alone, Huo Yuhao oneself cultivates for so is strong with Spiritual Power, once seizes the shed to be successful, completes third Soul Nucleus, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler had the absolute confidence to pass this Great Tribulation, even used this human body to attack the level of god. Under the intense greedy trend, he chooses to risk danger wrestles, now looks like, the opportunity arrived, succeeds as if at present.

Therefore, Evil Tyrant does not worry now, he is waiting for Huo Yuhao to have problems. Then fully strikes. He does not hope to ruin this body, what significance otherwise does he seize the shed also to have? He wants, when Huo Yuhao is on the verge of the brink of collapse, wins the body domination, then fused formidable Spiritual Power after Huo Yuhao to control these storms to walk Soul Power by oneself, suppressed it, slowly absorption.

exceed thinks that Evil Tyrant to the present condition is satisfied, during all imagine the situation to be better than him. The perfect body and perfect attribute, can the load bearing his Spiritual Power formidable spiritual sea, these not have absorption but actually extremely pure Soul Power, in addition the third Soul Nucleus embryonic form, this is the heaven grants itself simply the best gift!

not to have

[ hundred degree celsius peerless Tang Sect writing first round] at this time, the aquamarine form light emergence in Huo Yuhao behind, she was not extremely beautiful, but that ice-cold but the noble makings, the perfect moving stature, that emerald aquamarine tender body, gave people all a special aesthetic sense.

Sits is good in the Huo Yuhao opposite Tang Wutong situation, gold sun purple moon ray is glittering intermittently, although is unstable, but fluctuates not is extremely fierce.

But Huo Yuhao the situation was very bad, in gold sun blue moon, gold sun is extremely powerful, the blue moon not in part of ones duty gloomy, rich mist unceasingly the transpiration from Huo Yuhao, his clothes already had actually soaked, the beads of sweat of big drop and big drop, fall from his forehead unceasingly.

Ice Emperor takes a deep breath, immediately, her body looks like her scorpion tail is common, shone the radiant deep green ray, that was not vital deep green, but was as cold as deep green of Absolute, the mist that immediately, Huo Yuhao ascended, will shortly change into the innumerable ice powders to fall gently, in rock cave also for a it Qing.

In the Ice Emperor eye, the none remaining glitters, as if two groups of ice flame ignitions are ordinary. She sits cross-legged behind Huo Yuhao sits down, a hand according to the Huo Yuhao vest place, the body draws close, another hand presses above the Huo Yuhao dantian. The strong aquamarine brilliance starts to burn not to have to burn the ascension from her double pupil place, shone upon the aquamarine the entire rock cave.

Did not have least bit ice-cold to bloom again outward, burns not to have to burn Spiritual Consciousness Ice Emperor to close the double pupil slowly, on the elegant face revealed a light smile. In the heart is recalling own sound.

Daydream, your this fool, my bad words, I will not say anything, all that but, these years you do for me, I clear remembering. Although I am cold, but you actually melt me, this is I can do, to you best being in love. Burnt not to have to burn Spiritual Consciousness, we will not separate.

The cold air current wells up not to have to enter in body not to have, in the Huo Yuhao dantian suddenly Maodong Soul Power almost flickered below peacefully, was not they stops revolving, but was they are frozen by that strange cold current.

Comes from is no doubt formidable Long Xiaoyao Soul Power, but Ice Emperor burns Spiritual Consciousness that not to have burns, is absolutely is not inferior in the spirit Soul Power quantity of Limit Douluo level! That is strength of the purest freezing, Spiritual Power or Soul Power, can be frozen immediately.

Soul Power in dantian was frozen, the expression on Huo Yuhao face was calm immediately, slowly takes a deep breath, the aura was dignified, with this breath, in the air had the sound of dragon roar tiger's roar faintly.

Before Ice Emperor burns the Spiritual Consciousness source not to have burns, Huo Yuhao is in the most painful condition, he knows certainly one were swindled. The result of this being swindled, without doubt was because was extremely eager for quick success and immediate gain. However, recalls that in then that situation, if not make such choice is also impossible. The guarantees of some Brother Daydream, in addition that 700,000 years of Soul Ring great not to have greatly tempts the not to have being puzzled strength, keeping him from resisting.

But also luckily has Daydream Ice Silkworm, Daydream Ice Silkworm itself has absorbed in Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Soul Ring most Spiritual Power, has a small part by Huo Yuhao own spiritual sea absorption. Present Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler wants to cope with Huo Yuhao, can only transfer his own part of Spiritual Power, attempts to swallow Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power to expand itself. After expanding to the certain extent, has the possibility to swallow that side Daydream Ice Silkworm again in turn.

In other words, existence of Daydream Ice Silkworm, however Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler this seized the process of shed becomes difficult and complex.

May so, because in body not to have Soul Power suddenly Maodong extremely fierce, is too big to Huo Yuhao own impact, keeping him from resisting swallowing of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler. That fierce pain, was in the degree that was unable to resist.

The Ice Emperor Spiritual Consciousness burning not to have fever, was no different at this time gives opportune help, in body not to have Soul Power stabilized instantaneously, Huo Yuhao big relaxing, with this deep breath, was also relying on own formidable mind controlling force, he disorder Soul Power in body not to have inducted the stock rail immediately, the Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus again stable revolution, massive whirlpool Soul Power restored to produce. In scattered in disorder Soul Power and Spiritual Power the meridians collect respectively.

The great not to have sweeping change of Huo Yuhao, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler naturally immediately felt, had a big shock. It has exposed himself, naturally understands, if made Huo Yuhao restore the superiority, greeted his is the total destruction!

It did not have the main body after all, although has taken to bring in own soul and essence, but with has achieved Limit Douluo to cultivate is, and is compared with Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus Huo Yuhao, has not the small disparity eventually. If Huo Yuhao can the total involvement copes with him, he will not have an opportunity.

This not to have time, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler did not have any escape route, the time of radically pondering does not have, it started immediately.

Cannot make Huo Yuhao get strength back, the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler ambush erupts in the Huo Yuhao spiritual sea energy suddenly. Round powerful evil light has shone sky over spiritual sea suddenly.

Sits cross-legged behind Huo Yuhao that sits, blood red Evil Eye appears, the evil glittering, red that the entire cavern shines.

This time Tang Wutong entered the sitting in meditation condition, although her situation is much better than Huo Yuhao, but wants to absorb huge Soul Power that Ye Xishui keeps completely, definitely wants the total involvement to invest, enters the depth meditate condition to achieve. Therefore, she does not know that on Huo Yuhao had such big problem unexpectedly.

The Huo Yuhao whole body shakes suddenly, on forehead, vertical eye opens slowly, but this time, the vertical eye surroundings appear actually no longer is golden-rose color sun mark, but is the dark red strange traces, these traces look like the dark red small snakes are ordinary, crawls outward from his vertical eye place, then spreads toward his entire forehead, as if must swallow his entire head.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, started motionless, is whole-heartedly. Stands in Huo Yuhao behind Ice Emperor, in the eye reveals a panic-stricken color obviously, she has not thought that the strength of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler ambush in Huo Yuhao body not to have so will be unexpectedly formidable, formidable to letting Huo Yuhao nearly degree irresistibly.

However, has the help of Ice Emperor, Huo Yuhao lived in Soul Power in oneself body not to have finally stably, the fierce pain as if must tear his spiritual sea completely general. The sea water in spiritual sea coagulated completely, and started to present slits, the dark red rock magma common liquid, braved from these slits, fast spread in entire spiritual sea, the goal was very simple, must swallow this entire spiritual sea!

-----------------------------------------------

Sorry that renewed a moment ago has made a mistake the content, now changed, everybody can look.



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-610-part-2





Volume 13

#610 - Seizes The Shed


Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler that float Evil Eye in Huo Yuhao spiritual sea started becomes more and more clear, because it while is starting fully, must swallow Huo Yuhao spiritual sea, once completes swallowing of spiritual sea, it will start to swallow Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus, to that time, he can grasp the whole body of Huo Yuhao close. As for the control of Soul Power, has it of 700,000 years of practice experience, thinks that is not difficult.

Huo Yuhao this time situation was too passive, simply does not have the ability of least bit revolt, the spiritual sea big piece region, was being swallowed by Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler unceasingly, his own Soul Power stabilizes, is mixing Soul Power and Spiritual Power whirlpool energy unceasing attacks to the spiritual sea aspect, is always actually blocked by Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler formidable Soul Source, does not make him play the role of rescue.

The Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler goal is extremely clear, must not hesitate at all costs first invaded Huo Yuhao spiritual sea to say again. When the time comes, surrounds Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus, making his controlling force reduce Absolute, is easier to do.

Huo Yuhao after attempting to have attacked by the hindrance several times, suddenly stopped, but is adjusting Soul Power in within the body silently, controls two big Soul Nucleus to revolve, seems, temporarily gave up own spiritual sea unexpectedly likely, this lets Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is also extremely surprised. Didn't this boy want spiritual sea?

In spiritual sea, big piece and big piece region unceasing was covered by that dark red, on the Huo Yuhao face, that dark red trace also occupied more and more places, looks from the semblance, exceptionally fierce.

Stood behind the Ice Emperor form gradually became in him more and more illusory, the Spiritual Consciousness combustion produced froze the ability formidable, at least can guarantee Soul Power in Huo Yuhao dantian not to give the Huo Yuhao start trouble in a short time.

The entire process is very slow, outside, daytime and dark night unceasing taking turn, but in this cavern, Huo Yuhao at all times is actually facing the threat of birth and death.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is getting more and more stimulated, he can feel clearly that the resistance strength in Huo Yuhao spiritual sea became getting smaller, soon, he can control entire spiritual sea, to that time, Huo Yuhao again did not have the possibility of least bit make a comeback.

But regarding this, Huo Yuhao actually likely completely does not know, but is revolving silently own Soul Power, these days, he has collected within the body these scattered in disorder Soul Power completely, integrates in his Dual Soul Nucleus whirlpool Soul Power, even also absorbed to melt part from that some Soul Power of Ice Emperor freeze, integrated own Soul Nucleus. Meanwhile using the practice, making Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus Soul Power unceasing moistens oneself, strengthens the body. To the feeling of person, looks like to attack Limit Douluo third Soul Nucleus prepares, but has neglected Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler completely exists.

Regarding this, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is also somewhat disturbed, unknown is most fearful. Any biology, willingly will not always give up the domination of oneself body, Huo Yuhao does not interfere itself to the control of his spiritual sea, these have certainly the issue. But he cannot ask Huo Yuhao! Asked Huo Yuhao is impossible to reply him. Therefore, he in occupying the Huo Yuhao spiritual sea process, becomes exceptionally careful, but this careful, made the speed that it occupied reduce speed.

......

Sun-Moon Empire, Bright Capital City.

The martial law untied finally.

Entire one month! Bright Capital City has declared martial law for one month, over 200,000 armies, guard in the Bright Capital City surrounding each important highway. In the sky, has covered entirely various Surveying Soul Guidance Device. Entire one month of being frightened by the slightest sound.

Since one month, in Bright Capital City, various shops have closed door to go out of business all, entire Bright Capital City makes all people shiver in an intense grief and indignation aura.

Because, that has ruled shortly after Sun-Moon Empire, made the Sun-Moon Empire domain expand over one-third one generation of king Xu Tianran dead, inexplicable death.

The Sun-Moon Empire official has not announced the Xu Tianran cause of death, but announced to the outside that your majesty passed away. But following one month, the Bright Capital City internal chaos, particularly Imperial Family ancestor and relative, is chaotic in a complete mess.

Xu Tianran died, in the Imperial Family ancestor and relative, the direct line juniors are numerous. But according to the legal principle theory of law, should inherit the throne truly is actually the male offspring who Xu Tianran leaves behind only, is Sun-Moon Empire Crown Prince Your Highness Xu Yunhan. But the Xu Yunhan age was really too small. In Imperial Family ancestors and relatives heart can therefore not have other thoughts?

Suddenly, Bright Capital City internal chaos. All influence engages in factional strife mutually, particularly Imperial Family ancestor and relative, is so.

This confusion has continued half a month time, outside Bright Capital City, the massive private armed forces transfer, in the deliberation hall, is the mighty waves is more turbulent.

But was Ju Zi(orange) of empress actually remains silent, bringing Xu Yunhan to be Xu Tianran cannot mourn by the side of the coffin in the temporary palace. Consecrate Hall has also chosen silent. As if all people have tacitly approved, making in these Imperial Family ancestors and relatives decide final outcome depending on the skill.

Thereupon, strength strong Imperial Family start to engage in factional strife mutually, wins over all influence. But what made their surprised was, in process that they won over, many people chose maintained the neutralities, seemed is waiting and seeing anything.

Until half a month later, when Ju Zi(orange) brings Xu Yunhan to appear above the deliberation hall, places that moment in throne Xu Yunhan, in the deliberation hall, seethed with excitement immediately.

The process of this ebullition, has not continued to be too long.

The Consecrate Hall palace Lord Kong Deming to announce that Consecrate Hall only supports Imperial Family legitimate Crown Prince Your Highness, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp announces gives loyalty to the crown prince, Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp and Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp announced gives loyalty to the crown prince.

Is stationed carries on the army of recuperation and supplement to announce in the Sun-Moon Empire border that supports Crown Prince Your Highness.

Early in previous time Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp has been unable to do it alone by Huo Yuhao hits remnantly. In the deliberation hall, Ju Zi(orange) almost reversed the universe in the flash. But before noisy most ominous, these Imperial Family ancestors and relatives who particularly uses the private soldier, directly had all put on the hat of plotting a rebellion by her. Seizes its title, lifelong detains.

Then, Ju Zi(orange) fully showed the War-God Empress elegant demeanor, she has only used half a month time, has controlled the Sun-Moon Empire entire aspect, assisted Xu Yunhan to ascend the throne proclaims oneself emperor, but oneself by the empress dowagers and three services commander status, attended to state affairs.

Xu Tianran in many Sun-Moon Empire person eyes is one generation of clear(ly), but Ju Zi(orange), after is one generation of virtues? Is empire war-god.

The support that in many years of armed forces the profession, Xu Tianran nearly is outspoken in addition, the function completely appeared. All sounds of opposition are tranquil in the shortest time.

Once had the Sun-Moon Empire Imperial Family ancestor and relative to find Old Kong, expressed that to the Ju Zi(orange) disaffection, Old Kong was only asked his one lightly: If the empire gives you, you can lead the empire to unify Continent? Do you have the empress dowager in the status of military?

Not only Ju Zi(orange) empress, in the meantime, she also already became the military big shots. Dynasty change time, when regardless of the support of army is most important.

The Sun-Moon Empire new imperial palace completes also requires period of not short time. Ju Zi(orange) throughout in temporary palace work. Crown prince Xu Yunhan is young, but has actually done obeisance the Consecrate Hall palace to advocate Kong Deming for the master, since childhood starts to contact Soul Guidance Device, in the meantime, starts to make the Soul Power practice of most foundation. Under the assistance of top Soul Engineer, his future can be imagined. But Ju Zi(orange) also believes that own son, will certainly have the extremely high talent in the future.

Stands before the window silently, the goose yellow dragging place long skirt is serving as contrast her noble makings, on the forehead, brought to inlay the royal crowns of various types of gems, the front has revealed completely wipes the fair, white shiny smooth.

Both hands intersection, the palm inward, hangs in the lower abdomen position. The pupil light penetrates front window, looks into that pure nighttime sky.

She stood had the entire half double-hour here, throughout was maintaining this posture, not having the half minute to move. On the long eyelash, is bringing some water drops, looks like above the embellishment crystal.

“Why must tell me!”Her muttering in a soft voice.

“Why must tell me, your this walks is several years doesn't turn over to?”

“You may know, if there are you in side pressure, hatred in my heart will also be suppressed.”

“But, you are not, you throughout not side me.”

“Why do you want to believe me? Why?”

The tears, fall following the arc of face, drops following the fine lower jaw quietly, in her eye pupil, as if there is endless distress.

Long time, she has as if made a difficult decision. Closes the double pupil, the tears stops.

“Sorry, Yuhao.”

......

In the dark red, entire cavern, had been supported by dark red completely fully. Only then sits cross-legged to sit on there Tang Wutong is sending out light golden light, these dark red isolates with own body. Sits there, her tender body is ordinary just like the sculpture, back gold sun purple moon, the ray is partly visible, is incomplete. In depth meditate, to all of outside, already did not have any sensation.

The entire face of Huo Yuhao turned into dark red, dark red just like the tentacle terrifying trace, follow his face to hang into his neck, has extended to the chest place.

That has packed dark red in entire rock cave, is on him sends out, behind him, that huge dark red eye pupil, changed into the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler appearance completely, said accurately that reduced 1st Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler.

The Huo Yuhao whole person as if completely lost the consciousness, the breath becomes slight, several inaudible. Ice Emperor light shadow completely vanished. Only then chest following position, partly visible green jade light twinkle.

In spiritual sea, completely is piece of dark red sea, in dark red spiritual sea, only then some tiny golden traces are partly visible.

Our peerless Tang Sect entity book 25 th volume went on the market, everybody can dazzle the world Tang Sect shop to purchase in us, a series of peripheral products that we develop one after another will also go on the market, hopes that everybody likes. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-610-part-3





Volume 13

#611 - Recrimination


spiritual sea sky, huge vertical eye float there, looks like a dark red Sun, its tentacle, is disturbing around mind Soul Nucleus, has not oppressed inward, has actually completed surrounding. The terrifying mind fluctuation, making this spiritual sea increase at least over one time compared with before. But this no longer belongs to the Huo Yuhao strength obviously.

The Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler aura, had already filled here, the tyrannical mind fluctuation is similar to the essence is common.

The final time already approached, in this time Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler heart, full is the stimulated mood.

Such long, so was long, until he occupied entire spiritual sea, does not have the bitter experience to the Huo Yuhao any powerful revolt, to the present at this time, he wanted to revolt again, became the impossible matter. Occupied his entire spiritual sea, why does he also revolt? His mind Soul Nucleus cannot even condense any Spiritual Power. Once mind Soul Nucleus were also controlled by oneself, was entered by own Soul Source, this seizes the shed, has come to the end.

To this body, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler is very satisfied, at least in he has seen in humanity, but also never some people can compared at present this body.

Perfect body and spirit and perfect attribute. What is more important, young!

Once had 700,000 years to cultivate regarding one is, actually gradually old Soul Beast, even compares young formidable is more important! Insufficiently formidable, can practice by the experience, is, if not very young, all do not have the significance. Regarding be only over 20 years old, cultivate to actually be the Limit Douluo level, but must attack the Huo Yuhao body of that unprecedented third Soul Nucleus, what it can have not satisfied?

“Starts! Huo Yuhao, later the body was my.”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler in laughing wildly the sound launched the final attack.

In spiritual sea, the dark red ocean waves swarm, raises the dreadful wave, the terrifying mind thought has spread over each corner in entire spiritual sea instantaneously.

Survives not many golden traces, at an exceptional pace is vanishing, only time that needs several times to breathe, here will not be having a Huo Yuhao trace to stay behind.

All mind tentacles, tighten completely inward, has twined toward Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus, mind Soul Nucleus the velocity of whirl under their functions is dropping is revolving rapidly immediately, gradually changes slow.

Terrifying Spiritual Power simultaneously outward relief pressure, is suppressing Huo Yuhao Soul Power, does not make him have any opportunity of make a comeback, on the Huo Yuhao neck that are similar to the meridians general dark red trace also starts the downward spread, spreads toward his whole body.

vertical eye on Huo Yuhao forehead, turned into the Evil Eye appearance at this time completely, has filled evil different and ferocious.

Seizes the last step of shed, occupies!

Huo Yuhao own aura, to this time, already several inaudible, as if did not have any strength to change all these again.

But what is strange, sits well in Huo Yuhao opposite Tang Wutong, the corners of the mouth place outlines a gentle arc quietly.

The projection of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler in Huo Yuhao behind, that giant eye has been observing Huo Yuhao opposite Tang Wutong. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler pays attention to Tang Wutong must, although Tang Wutong is impossible to prevent in all that Huo Yuhao within the body has, but she can actually do a matter, that has killed Huo Yuhao.

In was seized in the process of shed, the body of Huo Yuhao is very frail, if at this time, Tang Wutong has killed Huo Yuhao, all that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler made before, will be not studious.

This why Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler does not hesitate to project and consume own Spiritual Power outward, must continuously the surveillant Tang Wutong important reason.

From beginning to end, Tang Wutong had not had any change, as if entered in the depth meditate condition really completely. In this state, naturally cannot the matter that prevents then to have. However, when this is most essential, why? Why did she smile?

A sense of fear beyond description appears instantaneously during Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler consciousness, it worthily is one generation of fierce and ambitiouses, at this time, why absolutely did not have to ponder that but spelled to try, promoted own Spiritual Power to the ultimate working capacity suddenly, has engaged in factional strife toward Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus. Only then occupies this Soul Nucleus, then, all can develop in the advantageous direction.

But also at this time, was maintaining tranquil Huo Yuhao, the body trembled suddenly. Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler felt a happy thought unexpectedly.

That likes, looks like the wedding festivities night, when or passes the palace examination, that is the joy of the heart, like this joyful, has been full of the power beyond description. But also this joyful existence, lets in Huo Yuhao spiritual sea, all dark red quietly have stopped. During that likes, these belong to Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Spiritual Power to be stimulated in the tremor, are jumping for joy. Suddenly, broke away from the control of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler to be ordinary unexpectedly.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler has a big shock, but in its heart is still actually flooding that intense happy thought that this? Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler does not understand what completely had, why at this time, will have this feeling?

In this time, that happy atmosphere suddenly changed, the anger has substituted for liking, making the dark red sea water in entire spiritual sea seethe with excitement suddenly.

Huge dark red water columns shoot up to the sky, as if went crazy, scatters in all directions the impact, including part, has fired into airborne Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler source Spiritual Consciousness unexpectedly. Also the part has fired into Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler was really terrified, while being panic-stricken, his oneself has also been full of the anger, why? Why can like this? Wasn't he completely gave up his spiritual sea? Why at this time, he actually likely suddenly can control own spiritual sea? Why? Why all these are Ah?

Nobody can reply that his issue, at this time, he can feel, is consciousness that anger.

After the anger, was sad, crazy seems melted in the next quarter, dark red spiritual sea was tranquil, but has actually been full of endless sad intent.

Under that sad thought that long mind tentacles fall from mind Soul Nucleus slowly, weak dangling, slight is twitching, looks like sobbed to sob the child.

In spiritual sea, all in this moment as if tranquil, but in that dark red, started flood point golden light.

After sad, is joyful, yes, that is the unequalled joy. However, this joyful does not belong to Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, but is Huo Yuhao.

That is the joy of the heart, has filled the joy of power, during this is joyful, Huo Yuhao mind Soul Nucleus, circles suddenly at the unequalled speed. The strong mind fluctuation, made on this mind Soul Nucleus send out radiant golden light immediately, has illuminated spiritual sea, making here gloomy the non- light dark red, shortly will turn into the brilliant golden red.

Frightened, in the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler heart, at this time only then endless fear. Unknown is most fearful. But all that at this time it faces, take it 700,000 years of cultivating of as, as before unknown.

The light ray glitters in the air, halos in airborne are reverberating unceasingly. Two light shadow, reappearing of being quietly by mind Soul Nucleus. They similarly are also releasing the joyful mood.

Daydream Ice Silkworm and Mermaid Princess.

The gentle mind fluctuation releases from them outward, they look in the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler look, filled disdained and despised.

But also at this time, a fierce cold current, did not have the omen suddenly emerges in Huo Yuhao spiritual sea, this cold current everywhere one visit, has almost frozen the entire dark red sea, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Spiritual Consciousness source, was frozen.

Appearance that the pretty form is quietly together in Huo Yuhao spiritual sea, the Bai Se (White Color) streamers, have surrounded the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler fountainhead. On the moving tender face is revealing the light smile, is ascending Bing Wu (ice mist) here all freezes.

Snow Emperor!

Bore patiently was so long, Snow Emperor began finally.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler does not even know that Snow Emperor not in Huo Yuhao within the body, looks like in him, Huo Yuhao all spirits were already suppressed with his spiritual sea. Only then Ice Emperor escapes outside, at crucial moments has rescued his life.

Snow Emperor? Snow Emperor outside, silently has been waiting, is waiting for oncoming of opportunity. Just, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler cannot see her. She beside cavern, under the Tang Wutong aura conceals, simply has not revealed least bit own aura. But at this time, she came back!

“Evil Tyrant, the matter developed here, you should see the result. I should, fuse in my spiritual sea all my thank you thank you. If not so, I want to expand spiritual sea to so the degree, supports the following three Soul Nucleus fusions. Perhaps also takes at least ten years can complete. Therefore, I must thank you.”

Huo Yuhao sound, after quiet was so long, finally appeared, his sound is gentle and tranquil, any mood fluctuation has not appeared.

“You! Are all these you plan?”Saying that the Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler startled anger occurred simultaneously.

The Magic Chef of Ice and Fire game back coupling big ritual, 1. new area opens announced that Magic Chef of Ice and Fire 17 areas: Oscar formally opened the area, had wants to obtain the award player to go, everybody do not fall behind, our 1 million back coupling activities must start quickly \; 2. the escape edition has gotten online officially, to celebrate new area opening and escape version gets online, I will extract 5 lucky fellows in the players in 17 areas, they can obtain 4 rewards that I bestow, if the player, will obtain the isometric the diamond, the player who therefore hopes to win an award, hurries to pass ** replies me in the role names of 17 areas, the closing date will be 12 : 00 pm.

Joins the game way to be very simple, please first join our prestige - platform, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is our families. Then clicks on the following hand tour to download, can carry on the game. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-611-part-1





Volume 13

#611 - Recrimination


Huo Yuhao light [say / way]: “At the beginning of you start, truly is I most difficult time. At that time, not only there is your Spiritual Power in my mind, there is huge Soul Power that the Long Xiaoyao senior left behind, because I used Soul Power to produce the rebellion excessively. That time I, truly was beset with difficulties both at home and abroad. Has the possibility of collapse anytime. By my strength, even was very difficult to change the course of events. But at this time, you appeared.”

“You biggest mistake lies, extremely treasured my body. Therefore, you do not have to attack my mind Soul Nucleus immediately, positive governing I. But influencing subtly assimilates my spiritual sea. Because you feared that you feared attacks my mind Soul Nucleus to make Soul Power of my within the body lose control completely, to that time, you only has been able to follow me together from exploding.”

“However in fact is also so. If you had attacked my mind Soul Nucleus at that time, our final results can only perish together. Luckily, you do not have to do, in this regard, I must thank you. You do not hate dead, I am also, I must accompany my lover, until forever. Thank you have given my this opportunity.”

“With the aid of the Ice Emperor strength, my temporary seal lived in Long Xiaoyao senior these manic Soul Power, simultaneously starts to adjust own physical condition. At that time, I radically not with the strength of your battle. But at that time, actually was also you had the biggest opportunity the time. If you have attacked my mind Soul Nucleus, then controls my body with the formidable controlling force as soon as possible, perhaps really has to seize the shed successful possibility. You were too oversuspicious, because my does not revolt, you under the inertia thought that only want to seize my spiritual sea stably. This generally, does not have any issue, what a pity, I and average person have some differences. My spiritual sea, early is not human category spiritual sea, because in him, has one, is another world aura. Therefore, from beginning to end, I did not fear that you occupy spiritual sea, because you are impossible become here actual master, you are impossible to write off my consciousness.”

“Therefore, I defer to such that you hope, after has struggled simply several next, no longer resists, but all changed own Soul Power mind, controls Soul Power.”

“After these days effort, I collects within the body scattered in disorder Soul Power finally completely, Soul Power that Senior Long leaves behind also controlled part. My situation has stabilized completely, but you have also given me a pleasant surprise. You fused in your Spiritual Source my spiritual sea thoroughly. I think, only then my good partner spirits such to do, originally you can also. Therefore, I must thank you. I can be absorb now ninth Soul Ring that you bring completely, my mind level, has surmounted at present on Continent completely all exists, even if Beast God Di Tian, cannot compare favorably with me in this level. I think, even if in your peak, is mediocre. Therefore, I must thank you.”

“I know that you want to ask very much, how I achieve. Now should also tell you, otherwise, you will die with injustice unredressed. You felt a moment ago, is happy, anger, sorrow and happiness. Is the mood, the mood strength. But in my spiritual sea, has one type not to belong to this world strength, that is the seed of Gods. My talent, was indebted God of Emotion to settle on, has given my this opportunity. Has existence of Gods seed, how my was spiritual sea possibly also occupied by you?”

“You......”Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler because of the excessive anger, huge Evil Eye in airborne has spilled over the intermittent black air current. But, wanted from burn similarly oneself Spiritual Consciousness, dissolved with Huo Yuhao as one Snow Emperor contends is also easier said than done? Do not forget, Snow Emperor is also Ten Great Ferocious Beasts ranks third existence, even if the Evil Eye Tyrant heyday, wants to defeat her is not an easy matter, say nothing was this situation gets down at present.

A handle is sending out the short blade edge of light weapon float in the midair, knife edge downward, ices the blue blade glow to point to that projection in airborne huge Evil Eye.

This time this only Evil Eye, completely lost nimble and resourceful, eye pupil deep place, were many piece of dead grey colored, that is desperate!

Falling that suddenly the ice-cold light blade edge is relentless, maliciously pricks in that Evil Eye. Since Huo Yuhao these many days, within the body has been bearing patiently Soul Power erupted finally.

That bunch is mixing Spiritual Power and Soul Power whirlpool energy rises suddenly, given mind Soul Nucleus, breaks in own spiritual sea rapidly.

Whirlpools present in dark red spiritual sea, selects point golden light to proliferate, happy, anger, sorrow and happiness, four different mood transform, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler own Spiritual Power that represses unceasingly are unable to achieve the active control. In this case, it can only look helplessly that golden ray integrates unceasingly. But the Morning Dew Knife ice-cold point actually and disintegrates its Spiritual Consciousness in the little freezing.

Sits cross-legged to sit in the Huo Yuhao opposite Tang Wutong opening eyes pupil, when she looks at the dark red trace on Huo Yuhao face to remove gradually, looks that his back Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler projection is defeated and dispersed quietly, this long air vent, again closed both eyes. This time, she true felt relieved that enters to depth meditate.

......

Three years later.

Star Lou Empire capital, Star Luo City.

The sky is grey colored, is flooding the gunsmoke flavor everywhere. The sky is cloudy, Wu Yun (black clouds) will momentarily bring heavy rain.

Star Luo City north city wall only remaining less than one-third, but actually as before can see that everywhere is the defense battlelines that Soul Guidance Device composes, other three city walls all so, this urban protection just likes a steel and iron forest.

But, beside this steel and iron forest, is densely covered broader big piece steel and iron forest.

The Star Luo City West, inside and outside 100, north Star Luo City inside and outside 100, has been everywhere full of the dense murderous intention, in the sky, is various dense and numerous Surveying Soul Guidance Device, the goal refers, is the Star Luo City direction.

In the ground, Soul Guidance Device of big piece composes the huge Soul Guidance Array places, like giant pliers, anytime may clamp to Star Luo City.

Star Luo City, belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries final defense lines. Yes, this is the final defense line.

Before more than three years, Sky Soul Empire destruction.

Shortly, Emperor Sun-Moon Empire Xu Tianran dies a violent death suddenly, crown prince Xu Yunhan succeeds to the throne, War-God Empress attended to state affairs with the name of empress dowager.

At that time, Continent welcomed less than one year of tranquil time. Believes when all people that the Sun-Moon Empire internal chaos, at least will make the war delay for several years to arrive. Two years ago, the Sun-Moon Empire army did not have launch of omen suddenly.

Sun-Moon Empire dispatches eight Soul Engineer Corp, being quietly is extending north original Sky Soul Empire continuously to east, penetrates from Dou Ling Empire, quickly, surprise attack Dou Ling Empire.

Has only used 18 days, this able to move unhindered invincible Soul Engineer Corp, has projected on Dou Ling Empire capital Spirit Dou City.

Before the Shrek City reinforcements arrive, Spirit Dou City was broken, Xue Lingxun leads the remnants of defeated troops to flee, convergence Shrek City Soul Engineer Corp, retreats in defeat again and again.

Meanwhile, War-God Empress Ju Zi(orange), leads personally another seven Soul Engineer Corp as well as the Sun-Moon Empire 400,000 armies, the soldier presses Star Lou Empire west border Bright Struggle Mountain Range, launches has been ten days of Soul Guidance Device wanton bombing, suppressed the Star Lou Empire main force to the westbound defense, is unable to extend the aid to Dou Ling Empire.

In order to destroy the potential of Sun-Moon Empire thing converging attack, Duke White Tiger Dai Hao leads personally three Soul Master legion, belongs to Sky Soul Empire from the Star Lou Empire northern border sneak attack, but actually encountered dealing a head-on blow. The soul of Sun-Moon Empire first batch of High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device support leads the defensive system in the Sky Soul Empire border area big show invincible might, has repelled the surprise attack of Duke White Tiger stiffly.

The Dou Ling Empire aspect, with the help of Shrek Academy, stabilized south Dou Ling Empire finally lived in the aspect, confronted with Sun-Moon Empire. The Sun-Moon Empire following 300,000 armies one month later, enter Dou Ling Empire from original Sky Soul Empire, the consolidated occupied area, occupies Spirit Dou City as well as Dou Ling Empire thoroughly surpasses 50% lands.

Hence, the Sun-Moon Empire aggressive war comprehensively launches. War-God Empress empress dowager Ju Zi(orange), assumes the post of three services commander.

One month later, Star Lou Empire west border Bright Struggle Mountain Range blasted out three gaps, the Sun-Moon Empire army enters outrageously, with the full support of Soul Engineer Corp, the breaking defense line stiffly, attacks and captures Bright Struggle Mountain Range, seizes it.

The Star Lou Empire army retreats in defeat again and again, the loss is serious. Five Soul Engineer Corp that just formed nearly were hit remnantly. The backwardness of Soul Guidance Technology, has become the principal factor of failure.

Another side, Dou Ling Empire with the support of Shrek Academy, although holds one's ground, but faces Sun-Moon Empire powerful Soul Guidance Array to be actually incapable of counter-attacking.

The Shrek Academy head and tail is difficult to attend, is unable simultaneously to support both countries, can only choose the Dou Ling Empire achievement of crisis to support the object.

During the Continent aspect fell into has been at a stalemate, but Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire actually do not know that the Ju Zi(orange) true goal did not accomplish the whole task at one stroke at this time. After occupying the Dou Ling Empire northern border, Sun-Moon Empire sends the massive artisans, under the protections of two Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, starts the rare metal mining area that mined that piece initially to discover in Sky Soul and Dou Ling two countries north region quietly.

The massive rare metals were shipped back Sun-Moon Empire, processes various Soul Guidance Device.

Sun-Moon Empire reduced to has installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely the research and development expense, many research and development funds and resources all incline to High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device. Unceasing reduces the High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device volume, in the meantime, as far as possible maintains its might.

Six months later, in the Sun-Moon Empire Consecrate Hall palace Lord under the management of Kong Deming, Sun-Moon Empire Soul Guidance Technology has made the breakthrough progress, mastered the energy of light storage technology, sunlight absorption and storage, as the High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device persistent effect power. Although the storage time is very long, equipment is also very unwieldy, but this was actually Soul Guidance Technology opened one leaf temporarily the new front door. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-611-part-2





Volume 13

#611 - Recrimination


Regarding this, Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire actually completely ignorant, can only with the support of Shrek Academy, vigorously develop Soul Guidance Device, will try to carry on with Sun-Moon Empire in the near future life-and-death wrestles.

One year ago.

Without any indication, Sun-Moon Empire initiated fiercely attacking from Bright Struggle Mountain Range to Star Lou Empire suddenly, invested 12 Soul Engineer Corp, as well as over 500,000 military strength. That side Dou Ling Empire, only retained four Soul Engineer Corp and 200,000 armies, depends on defends in High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device.

Star Lou Empire retreats in defeat again and again, although Duke White Tiger is one generation of famous commanders-in-chief, but under the absolute inferiority of overall strength, the resistance feels weak. Sun-Moon Empire has only used for one month, seized the Star Lou Empire West big lands, Star Lou Empire has surpassed one-fifth land areas to fall into the rival.

The crisis time, Shrek City three Soul Engineer Corp as well as a Shrek Academy powerhouse rushes, and brings high new Soul Guidance Device that massive Tang Sect have developed, resisted fiercely attacking of Sun-Moon Empire finally reluctantly.

However, no one has thought that at this time, population several hundred people of armies, looked like breaks the space to be ordinary, emerges out of thin air in Dou Ling Empire.

Said accurately that is 300 people, but these 300 people, have name in a legend, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp! The thumb in Sun-Moon Empire Hand of the National Protector, on Douluo Continent, only king level Soul Engineer Corp. Fully has equipped Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, cultivates to individually be eight levels of Soul Engineer levels. Under leadership of four nine levels of Soul Engineer, they have given the Dou Ling Empire garrison troops most serious attack.

The tactic of this using diversionary tactics not is extremely wise, but, in the overall strength occupies in the superior situation absolutely, is this kind of tactic, has actually made the huge progress.

The Ju Zi(orange) use, is the inertia thought of Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire. It looks like in all people, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, is the deterrent great power. They most vital duty, surrounds and protects Bright Capital City. But. No one has thought that in Continent under such aspect, Bright Capital City has not needed to defend at present. Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp under such background, quietly took away by Ju Zi(orange), put in the Dou Ling Empire battlefield.

A meritorious military service becomes, under the leadership of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, Sun-Moon Empire is stationed with several Soul Engineer Corp coordination of Dou Ling Empire, adds on engaging in factional strife of 200,000 armies again. Immediately made the Dou Ling Empire army flowing. It is not able to block the step that the Sun-Moon Empire army goes forward again.

But since Sun-Moon Empire most has had superiority, reconnoiters the control as before, is relying on the absolute suppression of superaltitude Surveying Soul Guidance Device, when Star Lou Empire and Shrek Academy obtain this news, is one month later. Dou Ling Empire remnant armed forces under the leadership of Xue Lingxun, only then evacuated Dou Ling Empire less than 100,000 people, has entered to the Shrek City range, the Sun-Moon Empire army stopped the pursuit.

Initially Ju Zi(orange) has kept a promise to commitment that Huo Yuhao made, selected ten that campaigns as if to give all people to make the extremely profound impression. Regardless of the war develops any degree, the Shrek students always do not have to be attacked again. These time is no exception. Expels in the Dou Ling Empire remnant armed forces Dou Ling Empire, after occupying entire Dou Ling Empire thoroughly, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp repulses the enemy immediately. Returns to Dou Ling Empire, simultaneously garrisons in the border, constructs the Soul Guidance Array place, hence, belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries, the Dou Ling Empire destruction, degenerates into the Sun-Moon Empire halfway thoroughly.

Knew that this sad news, Star Lou Empire whole nation with sad, everyone knows. Dou Ling Empire extinguishes richly, means. Sun-Moon Empire is going to assemble the compensation to cope with Star Lou Empire. By the Star Lou Empire present national strength, how possible to contend with Sun-Moon Empire! Extinguishes the country is only sooner or later matter.

Then has really confirmed this point. After Sun-Moon Empire occupies Dou Ling Empire, the war has slowed down once again, clearly, they in the savings strength, simultaneously completely control Dou Ling Empire.

Sun-Moon Empire aspect, starts to change tactic, no longer directly fiercely attacks, but disperses the army, separately from the Sun-Moon Empire native place, Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire three encirclements, suppresses to Star Lou Empire unceasingly. Does not plan to accomplish the whole task at one stroke, but actually unceasingly nibbles the Star Lou Empire land.

The Star Lou Empire overall strength truly belongs to in the Douluo Continent three countries strongest one, is, in such a case, how many can their strengths show?

Shrek Academy has used fully is supporting them, but the Academy strength is eventually limited, defends a city, but for the entire country defends, actually was really too difficult.

The war carries on now, is missing to start from Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, already entire three years passed, the Star Lou Empire southern big lands, already fell into the rival. Other places are also so. Now is controlled by Star Lou Empire only, only then Star Luo City is a core region, the entire national territory, over 80%, fall into the hand of Sun-Moon Empire.

To this time, everyone knows that Sun-Moon Empire unifies the potential of Continent to be irreversible, but Star Lou Empire is supporting as before by strenuous efforts, even if some last hopes, they have not been willing to easily speak to give up.

Half a month ago, the Sun-Moon Empire army completes the potential of present half surrounding finally, initiated three times to fiercely attack successively.

After these many years wars, Soul Guidance Device completely became the mainstream in the battlefield, the Sun-Moon Empire research direction, has achieved has not needed Soul Power, can use the Soul Guidance Device situation, in the near future, the ordinary soldiers might provide Soul Guidance Device. This is High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device and derivative of energy of light use.

Soul Guidance Device war, what spells is the consumption, what spells is the both sides' consumption in Soul Guidance Device aspect, the consumption of reserve. Although Star Lou Empire temporarily resisted, but the present situation, is actually they by strength of the city, resisted entire Continent!

The armies threaten the border, making in Star Luo City 1 million soldiers and civilians immerse in the depressing air every day. Star Lou Empire army only remaining less than 400,000, surplus either was annihilated, either goes, becomes Sun-Moon Empire part. But Sun-Moon Empire sieges the Star Luo City army to have 1 million fully, including Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp, Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp, Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp and Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp this Hand of the National Protector five big Soul Engineer Corp, altogether 18 Soul Engineer Corp is the main force of this campaign.

Massive Soul Guidance Array already arranged readily, includes eight small High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, for half a month has been stockpiling the energy of light, completed at any time has given the plan that Star Luo City was heaviest strikes.

Star Luo City. Imperial palace.

In the main hall, dies general silence.

The position of Star Lou Empire Emperor tall Ju ruler, at this time is actually a complexion paleness. Double pupil absent-minded, can see from he somewhat split lip and pitch-dark eye socket. He bore how huge pressure.

The head under him, some people are sit unexpectedly, came from Shrek Academy Old Xuan.

Although the Old Xuan complexion is tranquil, but the look is actually very gloomy, from him, is the Shrek Academy people, Sea God Pavilion Ancient Elder. Has a seat.

A Tang Sect powerhouse stands in numerous position Ancient Elder behind, is headed by Beibei, Tang Ya, Xu Sanshi, He Caitou, Jiang Nannan, Xiao Xiao, Ye Guyi, Ji Juechen, Nan Qiuqiu and Jing Ziyan, even including Xuan Ziwen and Gao Dalu and other Soul Guidance Hall people. It can be said that entire Shrek City powerhouses almost all got together here.

Another side is the Star Lou Empire civil and military hundred officers, the civil and military hundred officer's heads, are Duke White Tiger. Under Duke White Tiger the first side, is Princess Jiujiu of military garb.

The Princess Jiujiu complexion is similarly pale, and has filled exhaustedly, the war has continued for nearly two years. Saw that the national territory of country was nibbled by the enemy unceasingly, the pressure that only the innermost feelings bear can be imagined.

Duke White Tiger appeared old, two temples were graying. Must know. He this year over 50 years old, moreover is cultivating of Titled Douluo is, according to the normalcy, should be in full flower is right!

“Yeah......”Emperor Star Lou Empire heaved a deep sigh, stood up from own throne slowly.

“Your majesty!”The civil and military hundred officers also bow, in sound are many for several points to shiver.

Emperor Star Lou Empire Xu Jiawei beckoned with the hand, said: “We did not need to deceive oneself and others, Star Luo City broken, was only the time issue. The numerous positions love the minister. These years assist me, perform high service through hard work. The failure of this war. Is the time change takes to us. I self-examine assiduously, but for several thousand years are conservative and complacent the disparity of causing. Although we had discovered that is actually incapable of changing the aspect. I am Monarch of the country, these wrong, makes me undertake. The numerous positions love the minister, straightens up after bowing or performing the kowtow. You perform the portable family, leaves Star Luo City, goes to that Sun-Moon Empire, I do not blame you.”

“Your majesty!”White hair old minister sad Hu, knocks down, has tears streaming down the face, “your majesty, feudal official oath and empire altogether life or death!”

Numerous officials many people knock down immediately, but actually and excluding Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, the person who some have not knelt down, some look twinkles.

The Dai Hao look sinks to congeal, “your majesty, the morale of troops may the drum not be possible to release. Even if puts together completely the soldier, feudal official must protect your majesty to be complete.”

Xu Jiawei shook the head, said: “I said that we do not need to deceive oneself and others again, the situation that now we face is how dangerous, I am very clear, you are also clear. Dai Hao, passes on me to order, to open the east gate and south city door, puts the common people to depart, wishing falling not to stop.”

The words spoke of here, this Emperor Star Lou Empire gave up the final hope without doubt.

Tang Sect touring party! The award of mysterious activity before saying, today gives everybody to disclose again, the content of award was the Tang Sect touring party that was led by me personally, each played the Magic Chef of Ice and Fire friends to participate to draw, and there is an opportunity to win the award, I continued to keep secret as for the concrete place, but will make known with everybody for these days! So long as plays our Magic Chef of Ice and Fire also to reach certain rank, can participate to draw, has the opportunity and I travels together. Also waits for anything, comes quickly.

The downloading game welcome to our prestigious platforms, join the method to be very simple, prestige - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - search public number - searches Tang few three. Has the authentication.

I arrived in Chongqing, tomorrow and day after tomorrow, two days of bamboo slip sells. On December 6 15 points, Chongqing purchasing books center Large open area Time Shop. Address: Chongqing Yuzhong District large open area time Tian Street hall level.

On December 7, 13.30, Chongqing purchasing books center Jiangbei District Maoye Shop, address: Chongqing Jiangbei District Guanyinqiao Maoye general merchandise defeated/carrying. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-611-part-3





Volume 13

#612 - Forcing


Old Xuan is silent, anything had not said that in the heart of hearts, he even somewhat admires this Emperor Star Lou Empire. He is very sober, he said right, now this situation, even if this Limit Douluo, has been powerless. The final result was already doomed. All, is irreversible.

Duke White Tiger Dai Hao one generation are outstanding, but actually goes through life without a good opportunity, under the absolute suppression of Soul Guidance Technology, his commander ability is unable to display completely, can only see that Sun-Moon Empire is relying on overwhelming superiority Soul Guidance Technology to the empire crush.

Although Shrek City has Tang Sect, has Xuan Ziwen, but, Xuan Ziwen after is only a person! By a person of strength, is possible and compared with national several thousand years of science and technology background? Xuan Ziwen these years were also older, although he already achievement Titled Douluo, but the daily consumption actually was really too big.

Tang Sect Soul Guidance Technology has the great strides, even must pursue most mainstream really the Soul Guidance Technology standard, but the resources or the productivity, as well as the scale and research and development range, actually and Sun-Moon Empire has the disparity of essence as before. These are irreversible.

Can make Sun-Moon Empire unify Continent really? Old Xuan somewhat painful closing eyes.

Although Sun-Moon Empire has not launched the attack to Shrek City throughout, but, in the Old Xuan heart as before the looks like is actually pressing a big stone.

“Your majesty, the feudal official asks to be excused, next life will serve your majesty again.”A minister turns around suddenly walks, has tears streaming down the face.

A person, can be unafraid of death, but, can stand the official here, is impossible to have a person! For oneself, they do not consider for own family.

Had first, has second.

The free time of a while, the entire deliberation hall emptied the larger part.

Smiling that Xu Jiawei self-ridicules, arrives in front of Old Xuan gradually.

“Old Xuan!”He stooped, bows to salute to Old Xuan.

Old Xuan both hands inflate, gentle Soul Power picks up him, Old Xuan also has stood simultaneously, this is not a respect to king, but to an admiration of respect life king.

“Your majesty!”

Xu Jiawei sighed, said: “I represent Star Lou Empire, thanked Shrek Academy, thanked the support of Tang Sect. Without you, Star Lou Empire already did not exist. Thank you. However, things have gotten to this point, is powerless to save the situation. Old Xuan, you and Shrek Academy as well as Tang Sect, sooner leaves. Shrek Academy is independent, does not belong to any country, you for our Star Lou Empire achieves so the situation, showed extreme tolerance. Cannot continue again, to guard that Sun-Moon Empire to vent anger Academy. Star Lou Empire can perish, but Shrek Academy cannot extinguish, in Shrek, has our Douluo empire true inheritance to be.”

Old Xuan brow tight wrinkle, heaved a deep sigh, he knows Xu Jiawei said was very right. Is same just as the minister who these leave, Old Xuan can not be concerned for personal gains and losses, but he is actually Sea God Pavilion Pavilion Master, he must be the Shrek City 1 million people considers! Let alone, in Shrek City, enlistment of Dou Ling Empire, Sky Soul Empire final Imperial Family bloodlines, in Shrek City.

“Your majesty, Shrek, although is not enough to protect Star Luo, but if your majesty wants, we are also capable of leading Imperial Family to return to Shrek, later waits for the opportunity again, looks for an opportunity to turn round, how?”

Xu Jiawei smiled, shakes the head, said: “Is impossible. Sun-Moon Empire seizes trim Continent, Shrek is only strength of the city, Sun-Moon Empire only needs to repress by the army eventually, even does not need to attack, so long as cuts off various types of supplies, sufficiently makes Shrek City be incapable of contending. Old Xuan, I urged your one, after going back, let Dou Ling Empire Imperial Family and Sky Soul Empire Imperial Family, dispersed the soldiers respectively, such, lived on dishonorably in Shi the possibility. Otherwise, Shrek City is impossible to protect them to be complete.”

Here, Xu Jiawei knelt down suddenly in front of Old Xuan.

“Your majesty, is your this does do?”Old Xuan makes way half step, surprised looks at this Emperor Star Lou Empire. From him that words, Old Xuan can see a moment ago, this Emperor Star Lou Empire, truly must above Sky Soul and Dou Ling two countries emperors. This estimate was also Star Lou Empire is last extinguishes the most important reason of country's.

“Old Xuan, I have the incident to request.”At this time, Xu Jiawei has no longer said as me.

When said these words, his look was not only earnest, was flooding a firmness beyond description.

“Your majesty please says.”Old Xuan similarly earnest replied.

Xu Jiawei sinking sound track: “After Sun-Moon Empire unifies Continent, if they must change the name to our Douluo Continent are Sun-Moon Continent. Then, please belongs to the seed that for us the Douluo Continent three countries leave behind a retaliation, in the future, will happen one day, our descendants, must change the Continent name.”

Such remarks, presented the complexions of all people changes.

Douluo Continent, this had several thousand years of name, can change really?

Several just quietly went out of the ministers in main hall to stop the footsteps, their fists, unconscious gripping is tight.

The Old Xuan body shakes, in the pale yellow eye pupil, jumped suddenly projects the unequalled none remaining.

“If Sun-Moon Empire dares to change the Continent name, then, the old man takes an oath with the name of Gluttonous Douluo, must let the Sun-Moon Empire non- Imperial Family inheritance surely, even if the worldwide chaos, refuses to balk!”

Douluo Continent this name, inherits for several thousand years, was the load bearing earnestly hoping of all Soul Master innermost feelings. Can the name of Douluo, be deceived?

The country can break, but the name of Douluo, cannot change.

Suddenly, in entire main hall, popular feeling running high, all people as if by prior agreement has done obeisance toward Old Xuan.

In this time, outside is transmitting Boundless suddenly, but great sound.

“Passes on the War-God Empress command, in three day hands over Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, Star Lou Empire may fall, does not kill the soldier, does not grab, not broken city, Star Luo City all as before. Otherwise, chicken dog does not remain!”

Speaks of the chicken dog does not keep four characters time, entire Star Luo City of giant voice vibration is shivering.

Hands over Duke White Tiger to fall?

Why can be such condition? Even if Duke White Tiger in these years, has battled with Sun-Moon Empire, Japanese empire actually also will dread him in the situation of overwhelming superiority?

“Report”

The messengers ran from outside in a hurry, “opens reports your majesty, Star Lou Empire started to encircle, the south city gate and east gate also sealed off. Before planned to go to the Star Luo official and family, even the common people, all hurried back to by Star Lou Empire continually, did not make the surrender, not let go out of town.”

Listened to messenger these words, people on the scene look at each other to change colors, doesn't let the surrender?

Duke White Tiger has nearly bitten a steel tooth, the double fist grips tightly, “bastard!”

The face muscle of Xu Jiawei is also twitching, how regardless of he cannot think that he one day will reduce to wanting to surrender may not the situation unexpectedly.

The billowing voice transmits once more, is just the same as the beforehand words. Through amplifying Soul Guidance Device of upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device supplementary, entire Star Luo City can hear this sound.

“Your majesty!”Duke White Tiger Dai Hao on one knee knees down, “please permit the feudal official one person alone combat, the feudal official did not fall, before hoping dead in battle.”

“Nonsense!”Xu Jiawei drinks fierce greatly, “you are the empire hero, if no you, Star Luo already did not exist, I can hand over myself, will not hand over you.”

“Actually, we not necessarily do not have the opportunity.”In this time, a low and deep somewhat hoarse sound is suddenly resounding.

“Um?”Xu Jiawei subconscious turning head looks, a person, from Old Xuan behind crowd.

Sees him to walk, Xu Jiawei is also good, or Duke White Tiger, has gawked staring.

If that words said from others mouth a moment ago, they will certainly think little, but said from this population, made them look like catches the straw to grasp to be ordinary.

“Porch Hall Master, what good means do you have?”Xu Jiawei asked anxiously.

Right, this person who walks from the crowd, is Tang Sect Soul Guidance Hall Hall Master Xuan Ziwen.

Xuan Ziwen seemed before was older, since for these years, he has been studying diligently, actually little participated in the manufacture of Soul Guidance Device, particularly was recent for more than one year, he was almost in the research condition every time. Until this Star Lou Empire crisis increases, this talent and Tang Sect people come out together, has brought the Tang Sect Soul Guidance Hall elite, but his research had not actually stopped. But actually radically nobody knows what he continuously research is anything.

On the Xuan Ziwen face has not normal blood flushes, but in his look has actually been full of the stimulated color, sinking sound track \; “Leaves asks them to leave, the official who cannot share hardships, does not want. Your majesty, my research success, Sun-Moon Empire wanted to accomplish the whole task at one stroke, is not that easy.”

“Um?”Duke White Tiger has stood at this time, in tiger wonderful puts brilliantly, looks at Xuan Ziwen, in the eye has been full of the hope, he knows that this perhaps was the Star Lou Empire last straw to grasp.

Sun-Moon Empire army camp.

Ju Zi(orange) wears lust red war armor, standing silently in the commander tent front, is looking into the Star Luo City top of distant place.

Three years pass by, the years have not left too many traces on her, she as before is that beautiful, suffocating of beautiful.

The ultimatum has sent out, now waited for that side response, from currently the Star Luo City situation, they absolutely does not have other choice. Duke White Tiger is proud Zhongliang, such one compels after oneself, definitely will go out of Star Luo City. As the matter stands, the Star Luo City surrender, oneself also good little to make to kill the evil, if......

Thinks of here, the body of Ju Zi(orange) trembled suddenly trembling, a fear of difficult word spreads in the heart, secretly heaved a deep sigh: Three years, he had not really come back, had not appeared. But, when attack a city seizes territory, in the heart constantly because of his form is not afraid.

Afternoon bamboo slip sells to come, Shuai Shuai who I can put on, gives everybody to sign sells the drop, the little friends, in the afternoon sees. On December 6 15 points, Chongqing purchasing books center Large open area Time Shop. Address: Chongqing Yuzhong District large open area time Tian Street hall level. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-612-part-1





Volume 13

#612 - Forcing


Will be shortly soon of great success. So long as the Star Luo City surrender, this belongs to the Douluo Continent last country also falls into oneself hand, for sometime, a Star Luo series, the Continent reunification has completed again. To that time, even if he came back, nothing but is compensates this life to him.

Thinks of here, in the Ju Zi(orange) eye reveals color of the chilly fan, Yuhao, you may know, I not only fear you to come back, and hopes you to come back. Three years do not see, you fortunately?

Three days later.

Sun-Moon Empire, commander tent.

“Hadn't the Star Luo City aspect, responded throughout?”The Ju Zi(orange) sitting well position, phoenix contains the prestige.

“Yes.”The military officer who below kneels down replied respectfully.

With these three years war, the Ju Zi(orange) authoritative date was abundant, has great power, entire Sun-Moon Empire, regardless of the people civil and military hundred officers, all respected to this female war-god queen mother. Under her rule, Sun-Moon Empire domestic calm and steady, all in good order, resort to arms like the god, integrates Sun-Moon Dou Ling Empire as well as the Star Lou Empire majority of domains, this merit, will pass on the eternity sufficiently.

Ju Zi(orange) stands up slowly, in the eye the cold brightness twinkle, “good and good Duke White Tiger, I to misread you. Passes on me to order, starts the general attack from the Star Luo City north gate, I must have a look but actually, why this Star Luo City resists my army to engage in factional strife.”

“Yes!”The audiences will drink with one voice greatly, in entire commander tent is filling the strong stimulated mood. Some that they and other this day waited are impatient, golden opportunity that this is making a name for oneself! Star Luo City in these Sun-Moon Empire military officers eyes, radically is the meat of block, whatever butchers.

“And”Bugle sound gets up, low and deep buzz the whining noise, resounds through outside entire Star Luo City. Sun-Moon Empire several Soul Engineer Corp almost also start, is headed by Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp. Hand of the National Protector five big Soul Engineer Corp lift off successively, from the sky arranges the neat square formation, coldly remote to Star Luo City. In the ground, various Soul Engineer Corp have also prepared all-out attack. Various linkage Soul Guidance Device started to transfer Soul Power, prepares the linkage.

After these years evolutions, war to this time, has not needed the ordinary soldier to break through enemy lines. The broken city in front of formidable Soul Guidance Device at is not anything, even if one of big cities Star Luo City such entire Continent have several is also same. Hard possibly can resist the bombardment of linkage Soul Guidance Device?

In the Star Luo City top, Soul Guidance Device also presented piece by piece has been able sufficiently picture, under the city, city, was densely covered various Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery as well as Soul Guidance Device.

Shrek City three big Soul Engineer Corp have all completed the combat readiness. The fort Soul Engineer Corp process strengthens. Now had over 500 Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery, they have also resisted the Sun-Moon Empire main force. If not close right up against the formidable fire support, they already could not support.

The Star Luo City linkage defense guard shield has also prepared opening. In the Soul Guidance Technology aspect, Star Lou Empire must fall behind Sun-Moon Empire many without doubt, but must say that in the Soul Master quantity, Star Lou Empire even also has the superiority, moreover is the considerably large superiority.

Star Lou Empire at this time centralized may Soul Master that not only Star Lou Empire have, belongs to Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire some Soul Master.

In Soul Master of these two countries, truly the part has hired oneself Sun-Moon Empire, but more actually ran up to Star Lou Empire. This belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries final pure lands.

Therefore, the Star Lou Empire city garrison linkage defense guard shield has enough strength to support. This is also why Star Luo City can support to the present important reason.

Naturally, this also similarly is because the High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device also need more time of Sun-Moon Empire army carry on the sufficient energy. Although the energy of light is inexhaustible, but absorbs, transforms, filters and compresses, actually needs the quite long process. Especially this science and technology just applied.

Various Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp combats were very already skilled, approaches directly step by step, bunch of glares start from the sky to congeal.

But at this time, Star Luo City actually appeared somewhat quiet, looked like in the Sun-Moon Empire army, this was their final struggling, was puts up a last-ditch struggle.

Hand of the National Protector five big Soul Engineer Corp all rise into the upper air. Disperses in five regions, remote to Star Luo City. First round of attacks always do not need them to get rid, their functions are mainly the monitoring entire battlefields. As well as appropriates lost articles to fill a vacancy.

Ju Zi(orange) in commander tent, commander tent one side, is various souls leads the screen, these souls lead the screen to connect upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device, all projects the situation of entire battlefield to here comes, makes her be able according to the battlefield situation to make the judgment, about one step deploys troops.

“Strange, to this distance, the Star Luo City aspect, how to have installed the attack of Soul Guidance Cannon ball to appear surely?”Thinking aloud of some Ju Zi(orange) doubts.

Before Star Luo City, when is lower than the Sun-Moon Empire army to attack, Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery is the most important sharp weapon, is primarily launching installs Soul Guidance Cannon to shoot surely, decides to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball biggest superiority is the striking distance, is relying on this superiority, can control between Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp and Star Luo City as far as possible is away from, although the linkage attack is strong, but the striking distance and installs compared with the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, there is not a small disparity. Even if High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device is also so, after all, these science and technology are these years study gradually, but also is inperfect.

At this time, various Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp advanced to being away from Star Luo City about five li (0.5km) being away from, this distance surely installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to play the maximum might, simultaneously the range of linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device striking distance limit, forwards again, linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device can assume an awe-inspiring pose.

In this time, in the battlefield the aspect suddenly changed.

The Star Luo City direction, bunch of rays lift off from the city suddenly. These rays are dark green, after rising into airborne, actually blooms the deep green brilliance.

The light group are not many, has several, but each volume is very gigantic. The direction that flies to shoot is also scattered, can with scattering in all directions to flutter about simply to describe. The Soul Power fluctuation that but sends out is actually not too strong.

The strong and weak of Soul Power fluctuation, the nature is reconnoitered by fluctuation Surveying Soul Guidance Device. Even if the Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp strength is strong, facing nine levels of Soul Guidance Device is also very dangerous. Therefore, what once fluctuation Surveying Soul Guidance Device judges the opposite party to start is nine levels installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, then, various Soul Engineer Corp by the linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device long-range interception, can limit its prestige in the most mild degree surely immediately. Folds in the beforehand campaign, has fully manifested its superiority.

However, these time became some is not quite as if same. The Soul Power fluctuations of these green groups are not quite only strong, most is also seven levels surely installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball the might, but the attack of this level, even if most common Soul Engineer Corp can also resist by the linkage defense guard shield.

The linkage attacked can finish sufficiently, what waiting was strikes to Star Luo City heavily, after making judgment, various Soul Engineer Corp regimental head quarters naturally issued have not intercepted the order, but opened the linkage defense guard shield. This was for them enough.

However, was in Ju Zi(orange) in commander tent actually likely is induces anything to resemble, suddenly shouted to clear the way: “Quick, issues the order, the order interception......”

She spoke of here, looks that the look of screen actually suddenly became swift and fierce, because, this issuance of order already late.

When that bunch of deep green colored light groups fly to shoot various distance Soul Engineer Corp, has not continued to shell again, but in airborne voluntarily blasted out.

Green halos from the sky proliferate, then Ju Zi(orange) surprised saw, in front of oneself dozens souls led on the screen to present the fierce distortion ripple, all pictures became are not clear, was chaotic snowflakes.

What's the matter? Ju Zi(orange) has a big shock, in commander tent other military officers were also startled. Since such situation in Sun-Moon Empire has launched war, is first meeting.

Is more surprised than them, was Sun-Moon Empire at this time is in various Soul Engineer Corp in battlefield.

From the sky blooms with that aquamarine halos, the linkage defense guard shield that Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp just released, disintegrated unexpectedly rapidly. The linkage attack that before saved also instantaneously was becoming the disorder, ray lift-offs, were quite scattered in disorder.

At this time, they have not been enough striking distance, even if 12 attacks shoot in the Star Luo City direction, does not have any threat.

After these linkage attack disorder disperse, Sun-Moon Empire several Soul Engineer Corp shocking discoveries, the linkage attack, the linkage defense, at this time was unable to continue.

Suddenly, always able to move unhindered invincible Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp, fell into a confusion.

In the Star Luo City city wall, Xuan Ziwen stands proudly, the corners of the mouth place reveals to wipe to sneer.

“Linkage Soul Guidance Device, the most major characteristics above the linkage two characters, depend upon each other same level fluctuation Soul Guidance Device, focuses on after the special guidance, is used to attack and defense. But if, did I destroy your fluctuation? Make all chaotic, I must have a look but actually, why you display the linkage attack and defense again. This is you biggest superiority, now lost.”

Yes, this is the Xuan Ziwen latest research, changes the research of war sufficiently.

Is Tang Sect Soul Guidance Hall Hall Master, belongs to the Douluo Continent three countries, most formidable nine levels of Soul Engineer. In the Xuan Ziwen heart has been very clear, by own research force, is regardless of how compared with impossible and entire Sun-Moon Empire. In this case, actually how to turn around situation?

Direction that he found, is this at present.

The Sun-Moon Empire biggest superiority, is linkage Soul Guidance Device. Once forms the linkage, in having enough formidable Soul Engineer Corp situation, even if not fear facing Limit Douluo.

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket ( to be continued ) 752



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-612-part-2





Volume 13

#612 - Forcing


But if, doesn't have the linkage? Can't the concentrations of efforts of these Soul Engineer in the same place? Then, their battle efficiencies enormous degree weaken. Sole Soul Engineer, only if nine levels of Soul Engineer, otherwise at all impossible to contend with Titled Douluo.

The Sun-Moon Empire nine levels of Soul Engineer quantities are quite many, but, with belonging to compared with Titled Douluo of Douluo Continent three countries', actually must be short a lot.

Moreover, did not have the linkage attack and defense, Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp no longer is the invincible symbol.

In this case. The Xuan Ziwen investment research, how destroys linkage Soul Guidance Device.

In some time ago, him finally has succeeded, and own research place in operation during. All Tang Sect Soul Guidance Hall high level Soul Engineer, all invest now to the manufacture of this special Soul Guidance Device during.

This Soul Guidance Device, is called, Stationary Obstructing Bullet.

The has installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball long-distance special effect surely, in the meantime, can cover the enormous range, and maintains long time.

The disturbance of Stationary Obstructing Bullet is all-around, intense disorder fluctuation that has, sufficiently disturbance now upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device of Sun-Moon Empire almost all models, what is most important, all linkage Soul Guidance Device under its fluctuation disturbance, temporarily will lose the linkage special effect.

Xuan Ziwen felt only regret is, oneself this studied some late. If when initially Sun-Moon Empire just launched the war, he had this research results. Then, Sun-Moon Empire at all impossible destruction Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire. In order to belong to the strong Soul Grandmaster legion strengths of Douluo Continent three countries', coordinates Obstructing Bullet, can Soul Engineer is the suppression in the minimum degree.

This truly can reverse the research of war! Linkage Soul Guidance Device, in front of Stationary Obstructing Bullet, becomes incomparably frail. Naturally, if gives Sun-Moon Empire enough time. They can certainly study the anti-jamming device in the future, but that is not in one single day can complete.

The disturbance is easy, the anti-jamming may be much more difficult.

“Launch!”Duke White Tiger already very long not such stimulated. When he saw that linkage attack chaotic scattering in all directions launches, distant place Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp have the disorder time. The mood can be imagined.

Since Star Lou Empire by suppression firmly, has been one generation of famous commanders-in-chief, his some are only the dilutedness. But today, is relying on the function of Obstructing Bullet, he has to plant to wield finally the fist, meeting the tough head-on with toughness and enemy went all out a feeling.

Rays raise from the Star Luo City direction suddenly, has several [say / way] fully. The goal refers, is that several Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp.

Each glare, is having incomparably Xuan imposing manner. Almost every Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp, must face an attack of glare at this time.

All upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device now are disorder, therefore, is unable to evaluate the attack might of these glares. The counter-attack of Star Lou Empire, finally started.

These several glares, are Shrek City, Star Lou Empire and nine levels of Dou Ling Empire accumulation install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball finally surely!

Duke White Tiger resolutely in this first wave of attack, turned this biggest card in a hand.

He also has to so. The Stationary Obstructing Bullet at the beginning effect is best, at this time. Also is entire Sun-Moon Empire army most disorder time. Nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball not to have the linkage to defend the resistance of guard shield surely, can play the maximum might. If can succeed really comprehensively, that. Really must change the entire battlefield aspect.

Ju Zi(orange) flushed from commander tent at this time, in help of guard and under high level Soul Engineer, rapid lift-off. Just saw that several glares toward the picture that the Soul Engineer Corp direction launches.

Now wants to prevent completely, was impossible. She does not even have the means through subpoenaing Soul Guidance Device issues the order to all Soul Engineer Corp.

At this time, even if always calm she, the mind is also some confusions, she cannot think absolutely that Star Lou Empire can actually put out to disturb all linkage and Surveying Soul Guidance Device formidable Soul Guidance Device sufficiently. In her heart somewhat was also flurried. At this time, the Sun-Moon Empire aspect can rely on. Only then various Soul Engineer Corp own responses.

Sun-Moon Empire background is deep, fineness of Soul Guidance Device. As well as various Commander Soul Engineer Corp directions, in appeared the effect most in a short time.

First starts. Is the aerial flight five Hand of the National Protector Soul Engineer Corp. Glares, suddenly from Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp aspect suddenly to launch.

Although these glares have not undergone linkage attack, but actually as before from the sky collects the same place, changes into one is not the linkage attack, actually also nearly folds the glare that puts together, directly soars to conceive own that nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to welcome surely.

Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp worthily is the present age strongest military force. Each Soul Engineer, is relying on Humanoid Soul Guidance Device amplification, at least is eight levels of Soul Engineer cultivates is. The group attacks, although has 300 people. However, that powerful attack installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball from the sky to lighten that nine levels surely directly. Meanwhile, these Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp members, the body all shone the Soul Guidance Protective Cover ray, to complementary waves impact, but stood one's ground steadfastly.

Other four Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp have almost adopted the similar means that they separately in four directions, faces one nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely.

Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp shoots down nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball successfully surely. But their overall strengths have after all inferior, under the intense complementary waves function of explosion, some Soul Engineer Corp people was blown off. Also there are probably about hundred people to fall from the day. These people stand in the Soul Engineer Corp front line.

The Terror Claw Soul Engineer Corp situation and Fire Phoenix Soul Engineer Corp is similar, they always to defend to be famous. About 50-60 people from airborne were rumbled.

But Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp and Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp situation was quite dreary.

What Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp most excels is speed . Moreover, they by Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong hit remnantly several years ago, although has carried on the personnel replacement rapidly. But these supplemented the personnel, cannot after all with original compares!

The Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp situation and Evil Tyrant Soul Engineer Corp is also similar, they subordinate the Imperial Family ancestor and relative, Ju Zi(orange) after being in power, has carried on the suppression of considerable degree to the Imperial Family ancestor and relative, in addition in the past Emperor Dragon Soul Engineer Corp lost seriously, died including the regimental commanders.

Therefore, these two Soul Engineer Corp in the unexpected situation, are the loss is serious. Numerous Soul Engineer from airborne drop shortly, finally can survive, has about one-third.

The situation in ground compares in sky is more frigid.

The ordinary Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer quality, compared with Hand of the National Protector, was much worse. In them, although some people are resisting furiously, but under the function of Stationary Obstructing Bullet, even if wants to aim is very difficult.

The bunch glare, in airborne blasts out unceasingly. Terrifying energy storm, wreaks havoc in the entire space instantaneously crazily.

However, in this large explosion approaches beforehand flickers, eight glares, from distant place suddenly to launch, from the sky bloom successively light barrier, includes in which some Soul Engineer Corp finally.

Stationary Obstructing Bullet can disturb linkage Soul Guidance Device, is actually not able to disturb the attack and defense of sole Soul Guidance Device.

These eight light barrier origins, are Sun-Moon Empire army bring eight High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device.

High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device, is controlled by Sun-Moon Empire Worship Hall Hall Master Kong Deming Old Kong personally. A discovery decided the terrifying effect that makeup Obstructing Bullet brought, Old Kong has made immediately the response.

Although does not have the upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device of means by sky to carry on the positioning accuracy, but he is actually leaning on his experience and remembers that started High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device with the quickest speed.

High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device may attack to guard, he starts, is the defense strength. Because attacks now, cannot suffice that side Star Luo City. To intercept nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, does not have the means to take through upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device locking. Therefore, chose the defense at this time, was best.

Facts showed that prompt launch of Kong Deming, to Sun-Moon Empire, is the day falls the gospel simply.

The terrifying large explosion as if wreaks havoc in the entire space, crazy twinkle of various color rays outside Star Luo City, the terrifying explosive sound, making the soldiers in distant place temporarily lose the hearing. In this moment, as if became including the sky colored, the sunlight became gloomy.

This large explosion, continued to exceed the quarter the time gradually to end.

Since this war starts, this can be said as craziest one time, several nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball simultaneous firing surely! How terrifying aspect is this? Even if Sun-Moon Empire, absolutely does not have such luxurious forms of combat.

Passed the time of quarter, the entire battlefield becomes is clear gradually.

The High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device defense capability is truly good, but faces so numerous nine levels surely the effect that installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball to explode, although cannot say superimposes completely, but cannot also definitely have enormous amplification.

Finally also the well-preserved guard shield has four, another four complete to shatter. In the ground, 12 Soul Engineer Corp, five forever vanished, another seven, many have certain loss.

Is this round attack, entire Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp, lost one-third battle efficiencies! This is the war in history, Sun-Moon Empire biggest loss.

Ju Zi(orange) float in midair, the double fist grips tightly, even if when the energy storm fluctuates fiercely, she has not descended to evade temporarily. She has not thought that unexpectedly will have such situation. ( to be continued ) 752



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-612-part-3





Volume 13

#613 - Suppression


Star Lou Empire is almost relying on sole Soul Guidance Device, turned around the situation unexpectedly, takes to itself the so massive loss.

Not only Soul Engineer Corp lost over one-third battle efficiencies, since long time has saved can sufficiently the energies in eight High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device consume completely, this avoid as much as possible loss.

Not only Ju Zi(orange), flies upwards to his Sun-Moon Empire military officers at this time, is the complexion is all pale.

“Repulses the enemy!”Ju Zi(orange) almost clenching jaws said these two characters. Although she clearly knows that similar attack Star Luo City is impossible to duplicate one again time, but at this time, she did not have other choice.

Although the time is very short, but Ju Zi(orange) can also make the explicit judgment, the jamming effect of that green shell is impossible to continue, after this energy storm, weakened. Will vanish after a period of time.

What is more important, after the attack, to the morale influence was really too big. Now at this time, was not absolutely suitable to continue to launch the war to get down again. If Star Luo City also has any subsequent party, was very formidabe.

The signal flare of withdrawing troops in airborne shines, but, simultaneously shines, is Shrek City direction Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery.

Before Ju Zi(orange) had anticipated installed the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, was similar to rains drops from the clouds generally. Crowded shell just like raining general, wide scope covers.

Five Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, had the huge function at this time particularly.

Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp 300 Soul Engineer under the order function that Ju Zi(orange) issues, is in full bloom to disperse general rapidly just like the fresh flower, changes into rays, descends in the battlefield direction. On everyone, is dozens glares jumps to shoot, with the strength of individual is intercepting airborne installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely.

In the sky, bunch of brilliant fireworks bloom unceasingly, glare twinkle, ray during jumping shoots, each eruption, will give people a dazzling and intoxicating feeling.

Other Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp also successively responded that could not attend to is sad for the companion of dying, put into during the fight in abundance, intercepted these to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely.

The war carried on was so long, the reserve of Star Luo City eventually was also limited, after this round attack. Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp withdrew from the attack range finally, but, has left behind over 400 Soul Engineer corpses.

Saw Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer Corp dingy retreated, the entire Star Luo City top, a piece cheers.

Regarding Sun-Moon Empire, this is an unprecedented heavy loss, in turn regarding Star Lou Empire, that naturally was unprecedented win.

During oncoming of victory, making the mood of everyone be is extremely stimulated. Xuan Ziwen is the complexion blood flushes, his Stationary Obstructing Bullet, after the test of actual combat, truly can turn around the situation exists formidable!

Duke White Tiger similarly in stimulated, this time, takes to loss such big of Sun-Moon Empire, has surpassed his estimate. If no these High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device guard shields that would be nice! In that case, ground that several Soul Engineer Corp, will certainly be annihilated.

However, this was good enough. Although Star Luo City were not many in the reserve material in Soul Guidance Device aspect. However, do not forget, here, the formidable Soul Master quantity are many! So long as there is existence of Stationary Obstructing Bullet, all these, become very meaningful.

The terrifying explosion from the sky glitters, each glare from the sky transforms enchanting brilliance. The war entered the quiet condition temporarily.

In the battlefield, is actually one piece in confusion.

These in Soul Engineer that in energy storm falls from the sky, is impossible to have the corpse remaining. This is the brutality of Soul Guidance Device war.

Sun-Moon Empire commander tent.

The Ju Zi(orange) complexion was pale silent enough the time of quarter, started to issue orders.

All nine levels of Soul Engineer, all gather in commander tent, includes Kong Deming Old Kong.

“This time, we do not prepare, the similar situation cannot occur again. The numerous positions consecrate, tomorrow will make war again, asking everybody to be responsible for these Obstructing Bullet intercepts, must unable to make them have today such influence.”Ju Zi(orange) said to numerous position nine levels of Soul Engineer.

Kong Deming brow micro wrinkle, sinking sound track: “Has not thought really that Star Lou Empire can study such Soul Guidance Device unexpectedly. Has existence of this Obstructing Bullet, truly is to our enormous weakening. I have examined carefully. The time that the disturbance fluctuation continues, surpasses the thirty minutes, although the production cost is not low. But is also equal to seven levels installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely the standard. By the Star Lou Empire ability, can carry on the volume production. But this Obstructing Bullet jamming coverage is very big. Therefore has created the effect in today's battlefield. To avoid disturbing completely, at least currently speaking is impossible. Our linkage Soul Guidance Device, will be affected. Now the best means that cope with Stationary Soul Guidance Device on the contrary.”

Ju Zi(orange) shook the head, said: “It is not good, without enough time. We for these years regarding the research and production of Stationary Soul Guidance Device reduced, wants to assemble enough installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, in the time insufficient. Therefore, we can do now, only then uses on hand on strength. Star Luo City, good Duke White Tiger. I must have a look but actually, is relying on the function of this Obstructing Bullet, can he resist the attack of my Sun-Moon Empire army? Old Kong, tomorrow, troubles you to direct Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp personally, how?”

Kong Deming nodded silently.

Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp is truly formidable, but, in this formidable behind also has the hidden danger. Humanoid Soul Guidance Device needs greatly strengthened Spiritual Power to control. To the Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp member, was not be initially impossible to achieve. Why can have the present strength? Is because Kong Deming studied a mystique, took consuming the vitality as the price, promoted Spiritual Power to the enough formidable degree.

Therefore, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp these Soul Engineer, the individual strength actually is also five rings and six rings. Is relying on formidable Humanoid Soul Guidance Device, can promote about cultivating to eight rings to be. But the hidden danger is, their lives be much shorter than ordinary Soul Master, cannot surpass 50 years old dead absolutely. Meanwhile, because of the excessive promotion of Spiritual Power, in addition the great strength of own strength, has fostered their haughty dispositions. It is not the absolute powerhouse, is very difficult to control them. Is controlled by Kong Deming personally, can display the Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp true battle efficiency. Especially in losing the linkage Soul Guidance Device situation is so.

Without existence of linkage Soul Guidance Device, must spell by the absolute strength hardly. Ju Zi(orange) does not believe that after having that Obstructing Bullet, Star Luo City can contend with the Sun-Moon Empire army.

After all, since for these years, the Sun-Moon Empire overall strength has inflated was too fierce, vigorously develops the military force, now the total military strength surpasses 3 million, invests this war has 1 million, at least is Emperor Star Luo ** over two times of team . Moreover, the Soul Engineer Corp quantity is numerous, even if loses seriously, but massive Soul Guidance Device and Soul Guidance Array also. Spells hardly, Star Luo City does not have the opportunity similarly. Only if they can also have the massive nine levels to install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, but that is impossible. Nine levels install the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely are not the cabbages.

The night is quiet and silent. Star Luo City excited been quietly vanished, in the city all appear very busy.

Since today a war, Star Lou Empire it can be said that obtained for three years the unprecedented big successful battle, but all people also understand that such successful battle means that death enmity between Star Lou Empire and Sun-Moon Empire has had, once the war ended, perhaps is very difficult some people able to escape by luck.

Crosses the rubicon, in this case, the Star Lou Empire person unites as one all, only has contends at risk of life, in addition the function of Obstructing Bullet, may find a way out.

This was the only opportunity.

That night, Emperor Sun-Moon Empire Xu Jiawei is sleepless, Duke White Tiger Dai Hao is sleepless, Old Xuan, sleepless......

In the morning, when first wipes sunlight to raise from the distant place, shines on grand Star Luo City, Star Luo City has as if covered light golden color. But Sun-Moon Empire army, the low and deep toot actually started to resound.

After yesterday afternoon and a rest all night, the entire Sun-Moon Empire big camp looked like awoke the lion is ordinary, that toot, looked like roaring of lion, indicates that the sharp lackey will soon reach Star Luo City.

Before Sun-Moon Empire sieges the Star Lou Empire army not immediately clashes, but four directions big camp actually all going into action aggressively.

Through looking at far Soul Guidance Device can see from the Star Luo City direction indistinctly, these Sun-Moon Empire armies, are disassembling their Soul Guidance Array.

Disassembles the Soul Guidance Array place, can only two situations, retreat, alternatively, marches!

Stands in the city, Duke White Tiger the Dai Hao complexion is very ugly, Sun-Moon Empire must accomplish the whole task at one stroke very much obviously, they are impossible to retreat. Disassembles the Soul Guidance Array place, for moves ahead Soul Guidance Array, the direct attack Star Luo City itself, simultaneously shields their Soul Engineer Corp.

Procedure that this does not leave a way out without doubt, if all Soul Guidance Array were routed, the Sun-Moon Empire army in any will not have based on, but, that really possible?

Over a million armies and military baggage simultaneously revolve, at this time outside Star Luo City, looks like a giant grinding pan starts slow revolving, moreover in unceasing acceleration. Must engage in factional strife Star Luo City, grinds the powder dust.

To this time, the soldiers and civilians in Star Luo City did not have other choice, they can only be ready that fights at risk of life. This war has won, they may live, if lost, then, surely is Star Luo City forever the destruction.

Sought the monthly ticket and recommendation vote support for our peerless Tang Sect last month. Here also thanked the enthusiasm of Chongqing book friends, you made me be moved, let me, because you liked the mountain city. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-613-part-1





Volume 13

#613 - Suppression


Shrek Academy and Tang Sect powerhouses also early arrived in the top. They are all centralized the north city gate, here is the genuine main battlefield, Sun-Moon Empire Hand of the National Protector five Soul Engineer Corp all here.

Does not rout these five Soul Engineer Corp, their opportunity does not have. Did not have the opportunity, but after Stationary Obstructing Bullet appears, the opportunity, as if came.

The low and deep toot gradually becomes sonorous, the skylight is greatly bright, late in the morning. The Sun-Moon Empire army leaves behind the ancient covered wagon with large army, starts slowly actually firm has oppressed in the Star Luo City direction slowly.

Emperor Star Lou Empire Xu Jiawei dresses up personally, arrived above the top. Stands in Duke White Tiger side Dai Hao, they stand shoulder to shoulder.

Xu Jiawei shows a faint smile, said: “Dai Hao, do you know? I once very much dreaded in you.”

Duke White Tiger gives a calm smile, “I know certainly. Otherwise, why can I keep west border? At my merit, already should be actually three services commander, not?”

Xu Jiawei sighed, said: “Yes! Is jealous of capable people, I do not match am Monarch of the country.”

Duke White Tiger shakes the head, said: “Cannot say that the king plan, each king, runs into my such official, can perhaps so.”

This Star Luo Emperor said with a smile: “Perhaps. Has not thought really that I really have with the opportunity that you fight side-by-side together, you know that what I am feel now? I am honored very much.”

Duke White Tiger also laughs, “I am also.”

In the Star Luo Emperor eye the ray puts greatly, “comes, makes these Sun-Moon Empire fellows come, I must have a look but actually, is my Star Luo City drops down first, good deed Emperor Sun-Moon ** the blood stream of team completely.”

The frontage, Hand of the National Protector, five Soul Engineer Corp separate slowly, in the sky, various Surveying Soul Guidance Device also slowly forward suppress. In the ground, after surplus Soul Engineer Corp carry on reorganizes, full Bian six Soul Engineer Corp follow the advance. Naturally, this is only north strength, in other three, has Soul Engineer Corp to coordinate the soldier vanguard similarly, prepares to construct the Soul Guidance Array place.

The Sun-Moon Empire tactic is very simple, must in the range, construct the Soul Guidance Array place. But such simple tactic, actually at this time was most fatal. Once because Soul Guidance Array constructs, relies on the Soul Guidance Array formidable destructive power, Star Luo City can disturb the opposite party to launch the linkage defense and attack, cannot certainly withstand.

Only is worth rejoicing is, yesterday these High Energy Compression Array Soul Guidance Device consumed enormously, at least in a short time could not display the complete prestige to be able.

“Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery, preparation. Obstructing Bullet, preparation.”

“Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery, launch!”With Duke White Tiger low and deep roaring, Star Luo City looks like a big hedgehog is ordinary, own sharp thorn completely outward ** however leaves. Suddenly, the Sun-Moon Empire army of Soul Guidance Cannon ball that is hard to count toward distant place projects.

This time, Duke White Tiger has not made Obstructing Bullet release immediately. The Obstructing Bullet quantity is limited, after the enemy knows Obstructing Bullet has smiled, if directly uses again, without doubt will be intercepted heartlessly. Dai Hao is very clear, perhaps in these Soul Engineer Corp, nine levels of Soul Engineer already had prepared, specifically is responsible for intercepting Obstructing Bullet. Therefore, he must immediately, the investment attack.

The Soul Engineer Corp linkage defense guard shield first haunches, without existence of Obstructing Bullet, these linkage defense guard shields in the battlefield simply is invincible existence.

The time that what a pity, they have is only the flash.

Green halos, being quietly spreads in the battlefield, rapid the entire frontal battlefield completely will have covered.

On the Kong Deming old face of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp front line reveals a surprised color, “good sly fellow.”Is the fathers of nine levels of Soul Engineer, he one understands that was swindled.

The previous time, Obstructing Bullet in launch, is all sending out the aquamarine ray, in battlefield that obvious, looks like the fireworks that puts is simply ordinary. But this time, Obstructing Bullet is actually the release of being quietly.

Very obviously, this type installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball not to need that aquamarine ray surely, reason that the previous time has that ray, inevitably is the Star Luo City aspect intentionally. But this time, under the function of this erroneous zone, Star Luo City aspect extremely good has used the interception thoughts in Sun-Moon Empire army. Is installing in these Obstructing Bullet mixtures the Soul Guidance Cannon ball directly surely, launches with the aid of Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery. Immediately played the unexpected effect, lets airborne upper air Surveying Soul Guidance Device, as well as all linkage Soul Guidance Device, lost the effect once more.

Ju Zi(orange) or Kong Deming, have to raise up the thumb, commended one.

Tang Sect, Beibei, He Caitou and Xu Sanshi three people are gathering, dark smiling. This idea not from Duke White Tiger, but came from this brother three. Because Obstructing Bullet, although is Xuan Ziwen studies, but is responsible for manufacturing and using truly, He Caitou that actually Tang Sect Soul Guidance Hall vice- Hall Master, in new generation Shrek Seven Devils is listed second.

Duke White Tiger is with smile on the face, turns around to give the thumbs-up to He Caitou.

The Obstructing Bullet display function, is all premises that Star Luo City resists the Sun-Moon Empire army. Cannot block linkage Soul Guidance Device, said that anything is useless.

“First, second, third, fourth, Soul Master legion, attack!”Duke White Tiger explodes drinks one, pulls out the waist long sword suddenly, the sharp sword glow, points to the Sun-Moon Empire army direction.

Forms leap instantaneously, changes into the flowing light, directly soars the Sun-Moon Empire army direction to fly to shoot to go.

Gives play to advantage, is in the war one of the most important essential factors. The Star Lou Empire aspect, the only superiority, possibly was the Soul Master quantity and quality.

After these light shadow fly to shoot, in the sky, suddenly resounds low and deep roaring, the roaring voice is giant, just like thunderous general.

Huge yellow light shadow appears.

This yellow light shadow is the kilometer, build is quite huge, is ordinary just like the great cow. Gluttonous Douluo Old Xuan Martial Soul avatar, Gluttonous Divine Bull.

That form, all stable falling on Gluttonous Divine Bull, reaches several thousand people. The Gluttonous Divine Bull personal appearance in airborne dodges, overran toward distant place airborne Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp outrageously.

Fights to win or die, no one had the escape route, Shrek Academy also similarly so. To achieve the success of this war, not only need put together the strength, meanwhile must put together the tactic, tactic that Duke White Tiger arranged last night, almost is the surprise-attack forces.

This did not conform to his forms of combat, he is always primarily the open and aboveboard open intrigue, when the strength is inferior to the match, overall strength disparity big time, he actually has to use the surprise-attack forces. Is one generation of famous commanders-in-chief, even if uses the surprise-attack forces, he similarly is extremely formidable.

Obstructing Bullet is the first wave of surprise-attack forces, then, at present these four Soul Master legion 4000 people, are the second wave of surprise-attack forces.

These four Soul Master legion, directly from Shrek Academy as well as Tang Sect powerhouse commander, their goals, must rout that total quantity also less than 2000 people of Hand of the National Protector five Soul Engineer Corp. Only then routs this most formidable five Soul Engineer Corp, they can win the opportunity.

Ju Zi(orange) at this time already not in commander tent, although she arranged has prevented the Obstructing Bullet measure, but she actually already judged, the Star Luo City aspect will not certainly hesitate at all costs made Obstructing Bullet play the role, otherwise this war they did not need to continue.

However, Ju Zi(orange) has not thought obviously, unexpectedly such easy * was harassed. However, now these were unimportant, more importantly at present this fight of meeting the tough head-on with toughness.

Huge Gluttonous Divine Bull must rush to the Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp near shortly, suddenly, one group of intense silver light bloom suddenly.

Towering that very this group of silver light present, looks like originally on there, was waiting for Gluttonous Divine Bull hits.

The silver light launches instantaneously, changes into huge light barrier, unexpectedly stiffly has covered Gluttonous Divine Bull.

Must know that the Gluttonous Divine Bull volume is huge, above also sits several thousand Soul Master! Unexpectedly one had been only installed by that silver. Even if linkage Soul Guidance Device, as if no this grade of prestige to be able existence, Old Xuan, but the powerhouse of Limit Douluo level!

Round silver moon, rises suddenly into airborne, in an instant, the sunlight in sky vanished unexpectedly. silver moon in the sky, that light barrier and silver moon complement each other fresh splendor. Actually stiffly lived in Old Xuan that fierce brunting containment.

Stood loses one's voice to call out in Xuan Ziwen of Star Luo City top: “silver moon Douluo, is Old Kong. Old Kong!”

Said him of Old Kong these two characters from the mouth, the complexion changed instantaneously, in the look was flooding fear beyond description unexpectedly. Yes, is frightened, Xuan Ziwen that is always fearless, has had the frightened mood unexpectedly.

In an instant, in the sky the innumerable rays go toward the Gluttonous Divine Bull concentrated fire, although does not have the ability of linkage attack, but, the prestige of over a thousand Soul Engineer all-out attacks can be able be imagined.

But is Limit Douluo Old Xuan, on pair of buffalo and cow horns Huang Guang da puts, wants to clash from that silver light barrier, but that silver illumination is similar to the sticky candy is ordinary, will be supported by him in a big way, is actually not able to run out.

In light barrier, all Soul Master are also various show its energies, is attacking silver light barrier whole-heartedly. However, their attacks, do not have one to be separated from the light barrier range.

Star Luo City head.

Xuan Ziwen dull looks at this, “has succeeded, his unexpectedly really success. Old Kong, Old Kong is existences of ten levels of Soul Engineer levels, is equal to Soul Master of Limit Douluo level! By the Transcendent Douluo strength, integrates in own Soul Guidance Device completely. This and this were initially Old Kong had proposed, only then in the idea existed the assigned Soul Guidance Device? By own Martial Soul, with the aid of the strength of world, dissolves with most formidable Soul Guidance Device as one. Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover, in front of this Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover, initially Grim Reaper Douluo Grim Reaper Tower, simply was a joke!”1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-613-part-2





Volume 13

#613 - Suppression


Only can the passive defensive, actually unable to attack, Gluttonous Divine Bull and several thousand Soul Master from Star Luo City, completely have become the target.

Is headed by Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, Hand of the National Protector five Soul Engineer Corp encircle rapidly, has launched attack whole-heartedly, in the ground, before Soul Engineer that clashes, constructs the Soul Guidance Array place rapidly, starts to airborne Gluttonous Divine Bull by the Soul Guidance Array formidable attack.

But Gluttonous Divine Bull Soul Master, can only by the respective ability goes passively resist the external attack, is actually not able to counterattack, suddenly, has been at the extremely disadvantageous position.

This is because of the situation that in linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device was contained unable to use, otherwise, these Soul Engineer Corp use the linkage attack, perhaps has taken to their giant casualties.

Duke White Tiger the complexion is quite ugly at this time, this silver light barrier never appears in the battlefield. Not only the card in a hand Star Lou Empire has, Sun-Moon Empire also has similarly. Several thousand years of Soul Guidance Technology background! At this time, burst out completely.

Old Xuan by strength of the, is impossible to protect the residence to have the person, cultivates for low Soul Master, started to fall from the sky.

Such aspect, Old Xuan is also first facing, in the roaring sound, the whole body yellow color ray started becomes more and more powerful.

In others opinion that is only silver light barrier, but is Limit Douluo he actually understands that in this silver light barrier was not has replied on the strength of moon radically, but has drawn support from Space Power. One as well as Soul Master attack, overwhelming majorities were unloaded into the space. Otherwise, these many people attack, let alone is ten levels of Soul Guidance Device, even if 12 levels of Soul Guidance Device, is impossible to resist.

Space Power?

Old Xuan roared, pair of buffalo and cow horns gradually turned into the silver, sky over his top of the head, one group of silver glares reappeared gradually, around this group of silver glares, but also has a black halo faintly, that clearly torn space.

Kong Deming sees this, in heart sighs one darkly, he discovers eventually early, was really has been a pity, if this time, did not have to grasp Space Power Limit Douluo, by own Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover, can make these Soul Master continuously by the concentrated fire lethal.

The Old Kong big hand wields, the airborne indistinct ray puts greatly, silver light barrier before Old Xuan launches the attack, quietly dispersing. However, the external attack had not actually stopped.

Old Kong has not thought must surround the people by own Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover, his only needing made the potential of formation present besieging enough.

Glares burst out from Gluttonous Divine Bull suddenly.

In the long dragon roar sound, a golden big dragon shoots up to the sky, the innumerable tears, like the prison, bloom densely suddenly, making a recent piece of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp member have to haunch the safety mask one by one, attacked one slow.

Light Sacred Dragon avatar, this is, Beibei!

The innumerable carapaces open, from the sky changes into the giant shield, has blocked the frontage big piece attack, the innumerable rays were rebounded to return. In the carapace surface, golden light sparkles, above a big snake circles, the blood red eye pupil is looking steadily at front enemy, as if must select the person to bite.

Eternal Defense Black Tortoise Shield, this is, Xu Sanshi!

The bunch ray welcomed air burst opens, accurate incomparable attacked various within diameter hundred meters range intercepts completely, that was a whole body is hidden the man in heavy armor, the body all was various Soul Guidance Cannon and Soul Guidance Ray muzzle, destruction beams crazy fell in torrents outward, prevented the massive attacks.

Source of Destruction, He Caitou!

A pink big snake from the sky launches the personal appearance, the pale golden halo haunches outward, cultivates one piece for weak Soul Master protection.

Paragon Golden Body, displays by soft muscle python, this is Madness Soft Rabbit, Jiang Nannan!

Low and deep flute sound from the sky reverberates, nine phoenixes soar, on them is glittering the different colors, any attack will fall on them crossing over naturally, but their place visited, various attacks deviated path originally naturally.

flute cauldron outstanding in both fields, Flute-Cauldron Douluo, Nine Phoenix Dancing Flute, Xiao Xiao!

12 wings launch, the big angel arrives, layer upon layer Saint light drops from the clouds, falls on each Soul Master, has brought strength of the golden protection to them.

Angel Douluo, Ye Guyi!

The pink big dragon from the sky launches the personal appearance, a layer upon layer pink halo spreads from it, any attack contacts with this pink halo, naturally disappears.

Rouge Dragon avatar, Rouge Douluo, Nan Qiuqiu!

The startled Sky Sword light curls up together, hundred meters great blade edge appears, first Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer, perishes in the sword light.

Sword Mad Douluo, Sword of Trial, Ji Juechen!

Yes, they, from, Tang Sect!

Eight Titled Douluo that Tang Sect currently has. Three years, were relying on the initial miracle cure as well as their assiduous effort, they are the Titled Douluo level powerhouses. Everyone is having the formidable strength.

This time they, have haunched Tang Sect completely, has haunched the Shrek younger generation. What a pity, in Tang Sect, most formidable two are not, otherwise, ten big Douluo get together, that is the Tang Sect true ultimate strength!

Besides Tang Sect eight Titled Douluo, came from Shrek Academy as well as Star Lou Empire, Dou Ling Empire and Sky Soul Empire Titled Douluo, is various show its energies, releases the formidable ability respectively, carries on the back from Gluttonous Divine Bull, flies to shoot just like Heavenly Woman Scattering Flower generally outward. Forms from the sky transform the enchanting brilliance, not only blocks the massive attacks, threw toward these Soul Engineer.

The Soul Engineer biggest superiority is linkage Soul Guidance Device, is, distance! So long as pulls closer the distance, the true Soul Master powerhouse, does not fear Soul Engineer absolutely.

However, the distance is not good to pull closer, even if there is powerhouse of Titled Douluo rank to front, Soul Master, actually as before some unceasing people die.

Follows these 4000 people that Old Xuan goes to battle with, is elite in Soul Master is, most at least is also above five rings cultivates is. Below seven rings, all relies on Flight Soul Guidance Device to fly, above seven rings part is also so, only then these are good at flying, relies on own ability float in airborne.

In this case, so long as from airborne falls from the sky, that also means to perish.

Fight in sky, the flash entered the superheating condition.

The Star Luo City direction, Zhuge God Crossbow Artillery was crying out crazily, glares jumped to shoot unceasingly, in the meantime, the Star Luo City aspect, the frontage three city gates also opened, in the city wall, huge forms also appeared, they used the quickest speed to rely on an only long foot outward to climb up.

Shrek City fort Soul Engineer Corp.

After these years enhancements, the fort Soul Engineer Corp battle efficiency compared before had the qualitative leap, any All Terrain Self Walking Artillery battle efficiency can compare favorably with seven levels of Soul Guidance Device. In addition internal three Soul Engineer control. Now entire fort Soul Engineer Corp altogether has 500 All Terrain Self Walking Artillery. Is coordinating the fire on top, their horsepower full, directly soars the opposite to flush away in construction Soul Guidance Array. Their duties, tear into shreds these Soul Guidance Array places, must unable to make them take shape.

Otherwise, once Soul Guidance Array completes, Soul Master that then, regarding sky in fought, is as for Star Luo City, will be the ruinous disaster.

Not only fort Soul Engineer Corp sent out, Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp also along with it touching.

300 forms, soar from the top, reason that they do not have to begin immediately, because they are in all teams the battle efficiency are strongest at present.

Three years of polish, Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp individual battle efficiency, had the enormous promotion, Tang Sect all most outstanding Soul Guidance Device, all assembles on them. It can be said that the Tang Sect Soul Engineer Corp single body battle efficiency, is Star Lou Empire, can compare favorably with Sun-Moon Empire Hand of the National Protector five big Soul Engineer Corp only.

Naturally, what this finger is Beast King Level Soul Engineer Corp, compared with Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, has the enormous disparity as before.

The ordinary soldier was unable to play anything to affect in the battlefield, Sun-Moon Empire, they assist the Soul Guidance Array place. But Star Luo City, is responsible for shipping the commodity.

Everyone knows that fight between this Soul Engineer and Soul Master, decided the entire war trend is most important. Other all, are unimportant.

Duke White Tiger continuously is carrying on direction, in the top, various Soul Guidance Device already in the maximum degree is falling in torrents the fire outward.

The fights of other Star Luo City three directions also started, but at this time, Duke White Tiger could not attend to the direction of that three direction.

The frontal battlefield is most important, that three direction equipment, only then certain Stationary Obstructing Bullet, as well as linkage defense guard shield.

Frontal battlefield, to guarantee to make enemy unable to use linkage Soul Guidance Device, the Obstructing Bullet investment quantity is extremely numerous, therefore, Star Luo City, oneself cannot use linkage Soul Guidance Device similarly. Other three directions, linkage attack not enough manpower, but starts the linkage defense, temporarily can stabilize stays in a brothel overnight the surface.

Duke White Tiger in the gambling, he also has to bet, the card in a hand on hand were too few, only then chooses all gambling stakes presses in the frontal battlefield, has the possibility of obtaining wins finally.

The aspect in battlefield is very frigid, Ju Zi(orange) in the rear area looks. She knows certainly that which people from Shrek Academy and Tang Sect, in her heart are also intertwining.

Only then she knows that two people have not appeared in the battlefield, but they, under existence of Obstructing Bullet, had the change war possibility! 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-613-part-3





Volume 13

#614 - You Dare!


She does not believe that that two people who three years have not presented will appear at this time. However, she feared very much that feared in the future that two people will appear!

If during Tang Sect and Shrek Academy powerhouses die in this fight at present, the dead enmity will have, again did not have other possibilities.

In the heart of Ju Zi(orange) is intertwining, in the pain, always resolute she, unexpectedly somewhat could not set firm resolve at this time.

“Marshal, orders.”Military officer somewhat anxious saying.

Ju Zi(orange) sighed, urged several in a low voice.

In the battlefield, entered the deadlock now, because fought just started, now both sides Soul Master and Soul Engineer Soul Power was in top form, the ability hardly spells, after only then consumes the certain extent, the casualties speed will increase suddenly.

What is most intrepid is Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, they under suddenly contact, several people die, but under the direction of Kong Deming, withdraws immediately, spreads out, simultaneously striking power full. On Kong Deming shines the bunch of powerful silver light unceasingly, suppressed Old Xuan is unable unexpectedly the near.

At this time, the great strength of Shrek Academy Soul Master individual strength has appeared, Ancient Elder from Sea God Pavilion, the Shrek Academy Inner Court powerhouse as well as Tang Sect powerhouses, rushes to the Soul Engineer near first. In the entire battlefield, had been covered by various enchanting wedding rays completely.

In this time, suddenly, the strange ray is raising from the Sun-Moon Empire army together suddenly, this ray comes very towering, without any omen. The ray place visited, regardless of the enemy and ourselves, Soul Master and Soul Engineer in big piece of battlefield was swept immediately.

Moreover, this ray main goal, unexpectedly is Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp.

Resists Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, is Star Lou Empire here Soul Master most powerhouse, therefore, they immediately were also covered by this ray.

The intense weak feeling, spreads over the whole body instantaneously, Soul Power has not received anything to affect, but the vitality actually suddenly becomes feeble. Airborne is fighting Soul Master, stagnate.

Originally violently offensive, in this case, attenuated several points immediately.

Phoenix Douluo Ma Xiaotao is releasing Phoenix Meteor Shower, after this beam, body in airborne in a flash, the intense fatigue made her fighting intent one reduce unexpectedly, Phoenix Meteor Shower also broke along in.

Another side, Sun-Moon Empire Soul Engineer, although also same that ray, but actually raises a light light membrane, that matter ray isolation outside, had not been affected obviously.

Weakening Ray? So wide scope? This at least is also nine levels of Soul Guidance Device . Moreover, is not ordinary nine levels of Soul Guidance Device is right.

The card in a hand everyone has, Sun-Moon Empire card in a hand, to be how less than Star Lou Empire. But they do not have the Obstructing Bullet this rarely seen immediate influence war card in a hand.

This Weakening Ray, truly is nine levels of Soul Guidance Device, reason that can one cover that huge range, because, it is disposable Soul Guidance Device.

A little looks like installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely, but with installs the Soul Guidance Cannon ball surely some differences. Controllable. The striking power was inferior, but control is much stronger. But such Weakening Ray, not only but together!

Weakening Ray from the sky have swept, Soul Master in more than 4000 Star Lou Empire aspects, had the majority immediately the move. In this case, the Soul Master battle efficiency weakens immediately large scale.

This has not calculated that is also another color beam appears, this time, then shines Soul Engineer completely on Sun-Moon Empire aspect.

Immediately, Soul Engineer shapes have hit chicken blood, not only Soul Power strengthens, becomes the imposing manner is different. This is, Stimulating Ray effect. Promotes Soul Power 10%, strengthens the mind concentration degree, has certain bloodthirsty effect. Similarly is also disposable nine levels of Soul Guidance Device.

Weakens the match, amplification. These two nine levels of Soul Guidance Ray, changed the aspect in entire battlefield immediately. Originally also some rubber situation, had the reversal immediately.

The situation in ground is also so, Sun-Moon Empire comes prepared after all, was started to construct by Soul Guidance Array, with the Shrek City two big Soul Engineer Corp mutual correlations, although is also inferior, but has also stabilized. In process that many Soul Guidance Array are in construct. Under is in inverse proportion, in less than too for a long time, Sun-Moon Empire will certainly have the absolute superiority.

The airborne war retreats in defeat again and again, in the ground gradually was also changed the inferiority by the opposite party. In top, Duke White Tiger a pair of tiger claw according to above embattlement, painful has closed eyes.

In the face of the absolute strength, surprise attack no longer had the effect. In his heart heaved a deep sigh, was the good fortune makes the person really! If can be earlier to study Stationary Obstructing Bullet, the result of war is not this will be certainly right. Even if were extinguished later to study in Dou Ling Empire, with enough time. At least that time Star Lou Empire most flourishing condition.

But now, only remaining was headed by Star Luo City this territory, Star Lou Empire enough strength has not contended with formidable Sun-Moon Empire finally. Has not supported, not following. If not the support of Shrek Academy, even the present situation is impossible to have.

Late, all late. Ended, all ended.

In this time, a powerful big hand is falling on Duke White Tiger the shoulder. Duke White Tiger opening eyes pupil, turns head to look to Star Luo Emperor Xu Jiawei.

On the Xu Jiawei face, he saw the light smile unexpectedly.

“Your majesty, sorry, the feudal official and feudal official cannot maintain the Star Luo final hope.”Duke White Tiger tiger is red.

Xu Jiawei actually shook the head, sighs, said: “This result I already had guessed actually correctly, can make me the one day of hope, I actually already very satisfied. Evidently, this Sun-Moon Empire will not let off in any event your. Perhaps same will not let off me. This is also good. Ordered to withdraw troops. In any event, Shrek Academy and Tang Sect elite cannot damage. They are the hopes of future Continent. Still remembers I had spoken yesterday words?”

Duke White Tiger nodded silently, Xu Jiawei said right, at this time, is the preserved effective strength that can do. At least so far, Sun-Moon Empire has never attacked Shrek City, had not attacked to the Shrek Academy person whole-heartedly. So long as Shrek Academy and Shrek City as well as Tang Sect still, belong to the Douluo Continent three countries have the opportunity.

“Withdraws troops!”Duke White Tiger clenches the teeth, roars to make noise suddenly.

The signal of withdrawing troops raises in the Star Luo City direction, when that strong signal ray from the sky sparkles, Soul Master of front combat, are the Star Lou Empire soldiers and military officers in city, all heart big change.

Everyone understands, the order that this withdraws troops means anything, perhaps this war, really must end, forever finished. This was also announcing, unified the Continent empire, finally must appear.

Old Xuan heaved a deep sigh, the huge personal appearance in airborne changed the human form, vision brilliant looks at not far away silver moon Douluo Kong Deming, “your my outcome has not divided, if for Academy, which abilities today surely do not try your ten levels of Soul Engineer also to have.”

Kong Deming said indifferently: “In the future some are the time, certainly will consult. Let your people stop.”

Old Xuan nod of silently.

The battlefield stopped in minutes, Sun-Moon Empire has not continued to attack again, Shrek Academy and Tang Sect, as well as Star Luo, Dou Ling and Sky Soul Empire Soul Master, has not continued to display Soul Ability again.

The war carries on at present this degree, all became irreversible. Had finished, all finished. Then can do, to all people, is waiting for the arrival of result.

Old Xuan has not persisted in battling, similarly also to grasp Shrek City and Academy strength! Put together already not any opportunity hardly. Shrek Academy after is independent existence. Sun-Moon Empire do not die the meaning of Shrek Academy putting together.

Even if were they have seized entire Continent, must care about the Shrek Academy strength. Does not consider that missing Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, must consider that numerous powerhouses who graduates from Shrek Academy. In these powerhouses who Sun-Moon Empire surrenders, does not know that has many people to graduate from Shrek Academy, Shrek Academy is the Soul Master sacred place, if Sun-Moon Empire dares to brave public opinion attacks Shrek City, massacres Shrek Academy all high levels, will directly vacillate then them to rule the Continent basis.

But at present such situation, Sun-Moon Empire does not need to do, such will not have any significance, they only need to control Continent completely in their hand, Shrek City is then independent, at is not anything, could not affect the general situation. Has Shrek City to exist, but can also make these powerhouses who graduates from Shrek Academy not continue to revolt.

Must leave behind a ray of hope belonging to the Douluo Continent three countries'. This is Sun-Moon Empire all high-level mutual recognition.

Therefore, after Old Xuan ordered to call a halt, Kong Deming also immediately orders, making Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp completely call a halt, to Shrek Academy and Tang Sect, as well as Soul Master in Star Luo City aspect retreated slowly.

Ju Zi(orange) under the protection of guards, flies the front, arrives at side Kong Deming. During her expression is somewhat strange, is excited, not normal blood flushes, anticipate this moment, her waited for a long time was too too long, to not rule Continent, but to bury that bitter hatred in heart!

Ju Zi(orange) takes a deep breath, looks to opposite, sinking sound track: “Passes on me to order, making Star Luo City hand over Duke White Tiger, may make Star Luo surrender.”

Kong Deming looked at Ju Zi(orange) one, on the old face reveals a smile, nodded.

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-614-part-1





Volume 13

#614 - You Dare!


Also had the military officer to question that the order of Ju Zi(orange), various Soul Engineer Corp regimental commanders, after all, in this time war, Soul Engineer Corp lose particularly seriously, many Soul Engineer died during yesterday's fight.

But after, they saw the Old Kong nod has approved the Ju Zi(orange) words, again also nobody dares to raise the objection.

Has the Old Kong support, War-God Empress does not have anybody to dare to defy in Sun-Moon Empire eventually. Also because has the support of Kong Deming, Ju Zi(orange) can be so smooth regarding the rule of entire Sun-Moon Empire.

“Passes on the War-God Empress command, my Sun-Moon Empire, thinks of gratefully the friendliness of world, is not willing to make to slaughter, so long as Star Lou Empire hands over Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, allowing Star Lou Empire to surrender. If there is revolt again, massacres city!”

The huge sound through amplifying Soul Guidance Device passes on to the Star Luo City direction, quick has covered entire Star Luo City.

In the top, Star Luo Emperor Xu Jiawei lowered the head silently, the double fist grips tight, said in a low voice: “Dai brother, the hell, must have me to accompany.”

At this time, did not have other to choose, for the Star Luo City 1 million soldiers and civilians, even if he, cannot prevent Dai Hao to walk again. This truth, everyone understands.

The Star Luo City top, dies general silence, all people silently are waiting.

The generals kneel down one by one, is the soldiers, again, is the common people. From top to city, dense has knelt a piece.

Duke White Tiger has turned around slowly, on the somewhat old face, has revealed a light smile, the sinking sound track: “My Dai Hao, goes on an expedition the life for the country, self-examines to do one's best. Today, for my Star Luo City 1 million soldiers and civilians, why Dai Hao wants stingy this excellent head. The numerous positions, Duoduo takes care, Dai Hao, goes!”

At the same time was saying, he turns around to soar.

At this moment, the form threw together fiercely, effort holds in the arms the waist of Dai Hao, “the father, you cannot go, you cannot go!”

This throws, is Dai Hao personal guard, is his youngest son, Dai Louli.

Because Dai Louli the combat is fierce, military exploit, now is also a general, is Duke White Tiger Dai Hao personal guard commands. At this time throws, already had tears streaming down the face.

Dai Hao sighed one lightly, touches his head, “Chi'er Chi'er, does not need so, not to want weakly my Dai Clan power and prestige. Yueheng, pulls open him.”

Nearby Dai Yueheng stride walks, on pulls open Dai Louli obeying the father by oneself, another side Dai Huabin also walked. With the Dai Yueheng same place, supports the younger brother.

“Lets loose me, you let loose me. You must look helplessly the father does die?”Dai Louli both eyes are red, struggling of going all out, but how his cultivating for two phase differences to be too far with Dai Yueheng and Brother Dai Louli, how regardless to struggle, is unable to work loose.

A Dai Yueheng palm of the hand pulls out suddenly on the face of Dai Louli, similarly is tiger is red, “fool, I am willing to look that the father does die? magnificence Bin, you favors him, later, you must inherit my Dai Clan bloodlines, this bitter hatred, always does not forget.”

Then he changes Duke White Tiger suddenly Dai Hao, “father, I am my eldest son, please permit me, accompanies your together achievement loyalty.”

At the same time was saying, he moved suddenly like lightning, the double palm is uneven, when Dai Huabin and Dai Louli are surprised, pair of tiger palm has cut successively on their nape of the neck. Knocks down his two brothers in place.

Then Dai Yueheng changes Old Xuan, respectful bows a ritual, has not said anything, the stride arrives at side Dai Hao.

This is holding finally the lofty one.

The Dai Hao eye puts strange light, “good, worthily is my White Tiger lineage/vein man. Good child!”At the same time was saying, he lifts hand, holds in the arms the shoulder of Dai Yueheng, in the eye full is the proud color.

However, his hand actually suddenly pressed above the Dai Yueheng pate artery, Dai Yueheng one dull, then the body slipped slowly in the place, he cannot think obviously that the similar method, such will quickly fall on oneself.

Dai Hao changes Old Xuan, “Old Xuan, my these three good-for-nothing sons, asked to you.”

Old Xuan sighed, “Duke White Tiger felt relieved that Shrek existed for day, decided will not make the person injure them.”

“Good!”Some guarantee of Shrek Academy, Duke White Tiger in the eye the ray won, the tip of the toe on the embattlement, face upwards to bellow, “Duke White Tiger came, who takes my life! Ha Ha!”

He tears armor suddenly, even the coat also together tears continually, has revealed the upper body stark naked muscle. The majestic body, to the person the feeling of a strength and beautiful, that strong firm aura, seems infecting entire Star Luo City.

Knees down the officers, lowered the head all, cried. Nobody dares to look how this generation of war-gods die.

On the contrary is Emperor Star Lou Empire Xu Jiawei appears very tranquil, he searches the hand to enter the bosom, has gripped in the bosom silently a handle short blade edge. For Monarch, cannot protect the official, cannot protect the country. In his heart early has dead will. Dai Hao gives life for one's country, cannot be contemporaneous, but asked with dying. Moment that Duke White Tiger falls from the sky, will be he moment of the empire dying.

The sky is cloudy, were many several points of cloudy and cold, ice-cold, is in Star Luo City the hearts of all people. The clouds looked like constrain above the people heart big stone. Shrek Academy and Tang Sect powerhouses, the fist grip tightly all.

Everyone knows that the present situation does not have the leeway of choice, is, in their hearts, how can also be resigned?

Only can look helplessly Duke White Tiger brings death, this is the what kind shame! But this shame, has the possibility life unable to report.

Duke White Tiger against the wind rapid flight, majestic body, stiff wainscot, look proudly. This time he, looks like Dominating the World is common, where has the appearance of half minute loser?

Ju Zi(orange) under surrounding and protecting of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, flies the front slowly, her look similarly has also filled stimulated, because of the excitement of mood, body even in slightly is shivering.

Old Kong Kong Deming side her, this Sun-Moon Empire first ten levels of Soul Engineer mood similarly is not tranquil at this time. Can witness national unification entire Continent, is his wish?

He is willing to help Ju Zi(orange), actually more reasons are because this War-God Empress compared in initial Xu Tianran is better to control. Moreover, to his present strength and status, the authority is not anything, he desired, is Sun-Moon Empire unifies Continent, then carries forward Soul Guidance Technology of research his entire life, in this regard, Ju Zi(orange) definitely whole-heartedly will also support him.

Both sides are away from were not far, quick, Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, arrived at the Sun-Moon Empire army front.

The silver electro-optic shoots together, covers on Duke White Tiger, Dai Hao has not resisted, whatever that silver light will fetter, pulls in front of the opposite party.

Near at hand, this in fact is also his first time so short distance sees the Sun-Moon Empire this War-God Empress appearance. Stayed, Dai Hao has not thought that can defeat own, unexpectedly is such an age such light female.

“Are you Sun-Moon Empire War-God Empress?”Asking of Dai Hao coldly .

Ju Zi(orange) nodded, said: “Good, I am. Duke White Tiger, Dai Hao?”

Dai Hao cold [say / way]: “Line does not change the name to sit does not change surname!”

Ju Zi(orange) takes a deep breath, “you may still remember, 20 years ago, in the Sun-Moon Empire border, you leads the army, breaks my city, kills my subjects?”

Dai Hao light [say / way]: “Old man goes on an expedition the life, kills the enemy innumerably, who still remembers how many people had killed? The war, where has the non- deceased person.”

Two lines of tears flow following the face of Ju Zi(orange) slowly, “but, that time, you have actually killed my father. My father is only common people, a chef. Our family, originally live joy. I most like eating the father to make the meal. But, after on that day, he again has not actually come back. The mother is also sad shortly after dies excessively. I, have become the orphan.”

Duke White Tiger Dai Hao has gawked staring, “originally you to revenge to come?”

Ju Zi(orange) nodded, hates the sound track: “Good, this bitter hatred, hid for 20 years in my heart, entire 20 years. In the twenty years, I constantly do not want to cramp to skin you, to console my parents soul in heaven. Also because of this hatred, supports me to live.”

“Kills you directly, that was too cheap you. I must ruin all that you are proud. Aren't you being proud war-god? I defeat your army, invades your country. Today, you lost all, I must use your blood and soul, holds a memorial service my parents.”

Hears the Ju Zi(orange) angry sound, Duke White Tiger actually to laugh.

“War, has the non- deceased person? This duke did not remember the past matter. However, have your Sun-Moon Empire these years attack a city to seize territory, how many people also killed? You are one of them that wants to ask me to revenge, but in the future, does not know that has many people to ask you to revenge. Do not revenge? What do you also wait for? This duke excellent head here, although takes away and that's the end.”

Even if hostile both sides, Duke White Tiger but who, facing goes to generously, Sun-Moon Empire military officers, reveals the color of admiration. Good blood and iron marshal. Even if under such aspect, pride in his heart, has not been broken at present as before.

Looks at his appearance, why does not know, in the Ju Zi(orange) heart is very uncomfortable. She suddenly thought that she as if has not defeated Duke White Tiger, had not seen in imagination appearance that he is in deep sorrow.

Ju Zi(orange) cloudy narrow [say / way]: “Does Duke White Tiger, you believe that I order to attack now, clean that your Star Luo City all people slaughter?”

“You dare!”Duke White Tiger the discoloration, a tian eye of anger exclaimed finally: “You dare to brave this great misdeed, did not fear that has the retribution?”

Ju Zi(orange) coldly visits him, “my this life, only lives for the hatred, so long as can revenge, the retribution is anything, I have not considered.”1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-614-part-2





Volume 13

#614 - You Dare!


“Marshal, please three think.”Old Kong said in side in a low voice.

Ju Zi(orange) looked out a Star Luo City direction, if Star Luo City does not have Shrek Academy and Tang Sect person, perhaps she will do. But now, just frightens Duke White Tiger.

Ju Zi(orange) pulls out a oneself waist handle long sword, the sword points to Duke White Tiger sharp, “Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, I must dig Heart Blood to offer a sacrifice to my parents you today.”

“Come!”Dai Hao roars.

In the Ju Zi(orange) eye the cold brightness puts greatly, she truly does not dare to massacre city, but, kills Dai Hao actually to. Has killed this Duke White Tiger, the also big enmity must report, even if a little slight defect, was not anything. Has killed him, can death ends all troubles. In the future, the enemy comes back, how regardless of he treats oneself this time being perfidious, to him and that's the end.

Before the long sword refers, remote to Duke White Tiger chest, sword glow twinkle, little chest approached the past toward Duke White Tiger. She hopes to see, under the pressure of death, the appearance that Duke White Tiger mind collapsed, that was she most desired situation.

What a pity, she was doomed to be disappointed. In the look of Duke White Tiger filled was rigid and proud, absolutely did not have the least bit timidly with dreading.

Ok! Has killed him, death ends all troubles.

In the Ju Zi(orange) look, kills intent suddenly greatly Sheng. Must in long sword the hand promote shortly, understands this hatred thoroughly.

In this time, suddenly, in the sky is resounding one just like thunder general roaring.

“You dare!”

Simple two characters, only then two characters, made the entire space fiercely tremble. The terrifying voice is mixing the unequalled mind pressure, has been covering a surrounding area hundred li (0.5km) range unexpectedly instantaneously.

The ordinary soldier listens in the ear, what feels is only an incomparably loud and clear sound, but listens in Soul Master and Soul Engineer ear, such as the great awl is common, cultivates to be higher, the influence that comes under is also bigger, Ju Zi(orange) only thought that in the brain transmits intense dizziness, this sword has not punctured unexpectedly actually.

The cloudy sky had shone suddenly, a bright golden Sun, that sparkles in the sky. The intense ray appears, glare each twinkle, the air as if fiercely is twisting.

The unequalled mind pressure, making the Ju Zi(orange) side mood be similar to the Old Kong face of widow who does not remarry also changed the color, lost the sound track: “Limit Douluo. How to have so formidable Limit Douluo?”

By one voice control hundred li (0.5km), even if in legend, has never had formidable picture! But at present this battlefield, actually suddenly appears.

Although that sound is angry, but also clear, does not come from Shrek Academy Sea God Pavilion Pavilion Master Old Xuan. Besides Old Xuan, presented Limit Douluo?

Must know, in war, if were not Kong Deming blocks by own ten levels of Soul Engineer strengths is Limit Douluo Old Xuan, who won who defeated/carrying was very difficult to say. Under the Stationary Obstructing Bullet function, the individual battle efficiency appeared the huge function in the battlefield again. In this case, if the Star Luo City aspect are many Limit Douluo. Even if then, they are unable to gain the victory of this war as before, definitely will lose finally also seriously! Old Kong facing so situation, can on the non- face change color?

Moreover, he is ten levels of Soul Engineer, Sun-Moon Empire most powerhouse, through, comes person of strength this sound can listen, but also above Old Xuan, is not ordinary Limit Douluo. Such the powerhouse of level, even if he, an assurance of achievement does not have.

complexion changed is bigger, is his War-God Empress.

After Ju Zi(orange) hears this calls out, after the short dizzy past, the complexion became a paleness, her body uncontrolled shivers once more, these time no longer because of excited, because, frightened!

Yes! Frightened. Who because she listened to that sound master is, because of so, her will be having the frightened mood, at this time, she most feared to bump into, was this person!

Intense gold sun ray the sparkle of earth photo, but the air actually suddenly becomes cold, the snowflake falls gently from the sky piece by piece, is covering the entire battlefield.

Must know that now is just the early fall. But the temperature at an exceptional pace is actually dropping, but the snowflake that these from the sky dance in the air, actually does not fall to the ground.

The silver light has as if glittered in the distant place, the first twinkle time, as if also in horizon. But when this twinkle, actually arrived at the near.

Two forms, simultaneously appear in the midair, appears in the Sun-Moon Empire army front.

Is he, is really he?

The Ju Zi(orange) body shook shaking, in eye is one piece with amazement.

Kong Deming subconscious lifts the hand, draws Duke White Tiger entrains before own, by Soul Guidance Device it controls.

At this moment, that arrived suddenly, drinks to stop Ju Zi(orange) two, was a man and a woman.

The man, a pale blue long gown, a long hair flutters after the brain, the look is handsome, what stranger is, his body has to plant the dust the makings. Around his body, the snowflake continuously presents the bunch spiral-shaped to circle quietly. Each snowflakes hidden reveal swiftly swiftly, when they vanish, snowflake surface adhesion a pale silver brilliance, carefully is not looking unable to distinguish.

But in that female of his side, appeared brilliant. The pink-blue color big wave long hair from behind has hung the under foot, beautiful tender Yan made the world change colors. Similarly is in the eye pupil of pink-blue color, is lingering the light halo. Around her body, the gentle golden ray is glittering unceasingly, each twinkle, has the slight dragon roar sound to appear.

Side Ju Zi(orange), some people have called out in alarm make noise.

“This is, Huo Yuhao? That once selected ten Huo Yuhao, Ice Spirit Douluo Huo Yuhao. In his side should be Dragon-Butterfly Douluo Tang Wutong.”

Yes, this presents the person in battlefield suddenly, is Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong!

After three years of self-torture, they before, went out soon finally.

Three years, in the depth meditate process, as if were only the flash. Huo Yuhao has absorbed Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler complete Spiritual Power finally successfully, is relying on already the far ultra Limit Douluo level, formidable Spiritual Power of close half god level, controlled within the body Soul Power to complete the practice of third Soul Nucleus, fused within the body all Soul Power thoroughly. Meanwhile, has controlled space strength. His third Soul Nucleus, is space Soul Nucleus.

Originally six months ago, the practice of Huo Yuhao has been completed. But Tang Wutong because actually does not have he that formidable Spiritual Power, encountered the bottleneck in the practice process, Huo Yuhao takes both sides intimate Soul Power and Spiritual Power of own formidable strengths as well as the hauling, for her protector. Finally one day ago, helping her also complete the final breakthrough, achievement third Soul Nucleus.

They under the human unprecedented Yin-Yang Supplement Dual Soul Nucleus premise, achievement third Soul Nucleus, has created the miracle of humanity once more.

Although they as before are the Limit Douluo this level powerhouse, but actually absolutely is in the Douluo Continent history, most formidable Limit Douluo.

After going out, because Huo Yuhao has been a more profound level to the sensibility of destiny, immediately felt some are not wonderful. They fly nearby city slightly to inquire that has a big shock.

They only know that Ju Zi(orange) has not kept the initial commitment unexpectedly, started the war outrageously. And extinguished Dou Ling Empire in the war.

Knew that this news, Huo Yuhao flies into a rage. In this time, he suddenly was feeling that heart one tight, during is dark, felt one fear beyond description. Under the internal combustion engine hauling, bringing Tang Wutong to break the space, catches up with the quickest speed.

Used the sword that to flicker in a moment ago Ju Zi(orange), Huo Yuhao returns 500 miles away actually, he felt that frightened Absolute, this first broke the space by the sound, broadcast the sound, drank to stop Ju Zi(orange) outrageously. Then short is counting breaths in the time, through the control of space deep meaning, bringing Tang Wutong to stretch across hundred li (0.5km), arrived here.

Looks in front of Ju Zi(orange), ** Duke White Tiger of upper body. Huo Yuhao at this time in the heart incessantly is angry, has mixed emotions.

Ju Zi(orange) visits him, is the mood so? Four items of relative, the eye socket of Ju Zi(orange) was red immediately.

“Why? Why do you want to come back at the present this time? Why?”In the Ju Zi(orange) hand the long sword lifts, suddenly thorn to nearby Duke White Tiger.

She knows, if oneself do not get rid, the opportunity of perhaps again not having gotten rid. This time, she whole-heartedly, own Soul Power has promoted Absolute. She must kill him, so long as has killed him, can report that intense and deep-seated hatred.

“Biting”in crisp whining noise, the long sword stabs, but is actually not able to penetrate.

Ju Zi(orange) dumbfounded seeing, Duke White Tiger, changed into that long-awaited person unexpectedly.

Black Tortoise Replacement, Huo Yuhao most likes Engraving Soul Ability, in this moment, has saved father's life.

He is relying on own formidable Spiritual Power and Soul Power, has broken Kong Deming Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover stiffly, has completed Black Tortoise Replacement.

Duke White Tiger appeared in his position originally, side Tang Wutong.

The long sword stabs the Huo Yuhao chest, after expressing that crisp cry, rapid cuns (2.5cm) disruption.

Kong Deming is surprised, controls own Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover to contract subconsciously inward, wants suppressed Huo Yuhao stiffly.

“Go away!”Huo Yuhao shouted angrily, in an instant, the body of his whole person turned into the scarlet golden color instantaneously. Intense golden light erupts outward. The terrifying mind storm fills the air in the flash in body surrounding one foot range.

That once including Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover that Old Xuan temporarily controlled, in front of this dazzling golden light, one was torn the fragment unexpectedly. golden light of Huo Yuhao release turned into the silver instantaneously, the next quarter, before that Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover returned to the Kong Deming body, covers in which his body.

Asked the monthly ticket and recommendation ticket. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-614-part-3





Volume 13

#615 - Invincible!


Kong Deming this time mood was unable to describe with surprised, he is shocked looks at Huo Yuhao, is almost the earliest possible time backward draws back, has pulled open the distance with him.

Were this person and this person's control to the Space Power in this degree unexpectedly? He had sealed up periphery all spaces in the flash a moment ago unexpectedly.

The Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover biggest deep meaning, with the aid of Space Power, regardless of the bitter experience how formidable attack, can induct in the space it.

But this person stiffly has actually sealed up the surrounding all spaces, making Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover not have to hide, then relies on unequalled formidable Spiritual Power, stiffly must tear into shreds this Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover.

If not Kong Deming according to the circumstances quick, this life coincides the assigns Soul Guidance Device, must be destroyed thoroughly. If so, not only he will drop from ten levels of Soul Engineer instantaneously, itself also will suffer heavy wound.

Huo Yuhao looked radically continually has not gone to look at Kong Deming one, his vision, but falls on Ju Zi(orange).

“Why this, should be I asked that you are right. Why? Ju Zi(orange), why did you tell me? I believe you, you are perfidious unexpectedly. When I close up, launches war!”

The Huo Yuhao sound is very low and deep, but each character puts out from his mouth, from the sky has a strange mind fluctuation.

At this time, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp has encircled rapidly, him and Tang Wutong, sieges in which with Tang Wutong Dai Hao.

The Star Luo City aspect, sees sudden Huo Yuhao, Shrek Academy powerhouses Tang Sect people, all in being surprised back of the body wild with joy.

Perhaps others could not feel that Huo Yuhao this time condition, Old Xuan can actually the clear feeling, present Huo Yuhao, surmount itself in the strength, this means that he already achievement Limit Douluo! Moreover, certainly has third Soul Nucleus. Because does not have third Soul Nucleus, he cannot achieve Limit Douluo that level. Although does not know how he achieves, but this time Old Xuan, truly saw the hope.

“Xuan Ziwen, launches Obstructing Bullet. The Shrek subordinate and Tang Sect are respective, welcomed Yuhao and Wutong to come back with me.”Old Xuan issues an order, already since the impatient Tang Sect people, immediately first flew from the Star Luo City top, directly soars not far away Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong direction to fly.

Ju Zi(orange) dull looks at Huo Yuhao, has not actually retroceded, “why? Why you must tell me, will you close up long time? You may know, if has had your deterrent, I do not dare to continue to launch the war. Why did you ask me? Good, why I told you. You should remember that I initially will choose why to marry Xu Tianran. In order to hate, for the hatred of my parents. Is he, is he!”

At the same time was saying, her taishou refers to Duke White Tiger the Dai Hao direction, “he is my killing father personal enemy, is he, is leading the army, has attacked and occupied our land, is his soldier, has killed my father, making my mother sad and dies. The harmonious family, because of him, making me an orphan. My all living hope, to take revenge, to kill him. You do not make me launch the war, waits for ten years, ten years, I and others not. Do you know? I am fearing you, because, you were too formidable.”

“I was not worried that ten years later Star Lou Empire and Dou Ling Empire will grow to any degree. Soul Guidance Technology, so is can it be that easy to pursue? But I fear you, fears your strength inflation. You were so formidable, I with own eyes have witnessed the Limit Douluo strength. Ten years later, you will be formidable to any degree, I am unable to judge. At that time, if I launched war again, won't you prevent me? But has your impediment, how also makes me take revenge? How to kill my personal enemy? Therefore, even if perfidious, I must kill him. So long as can report this intense and deep-seated hatred, even if were you comes back to kill me, how can also? Yuhao, helping me, making me kill him, I guaranteed, after having killed him, no longer moved Star Luo City every bit of property. You came back, I even can no longer seize this Star Luo City. However, Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, must die, must die!”

Speaking of finally, the Ju Zi(orange) mood became the hysteria, the body of her whole person fierce was shivering, in look, only then endless hate.

Huo Yuhao coldly visits her, “Ju Zi(orange), has not thought that you turned into so the appearance unexpectedly. For the one's own selfish interests, launches the Continent war. You are perfidious, ignore ten years, Anything was needless to say. Immediately repulses the enemy, will withdraw all your Sun-Moon Empire all soldiers belongs to Sun-Moon Empire. Returns Sky Soul Empire, Dou Ling Empire and Star Lou Empire land. I forgive you not to kill. Otherwise, my slaughter completely your Sun-Moon Empire how? Right, your fear is right, I came back, I will not allow your Sun-Moon Empire to unify Continent!”

“Joke!”Nearby Kong Deming anger instead smiles extremely, “ignorant young child, you thinks that relies on your strength, can change the course of events, lets my Sun-Moon Empire army, isn't able to unify Continent? Even if pays certain price, you also will certainly die in this today.”At the same time was saying, he lifts right hand, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp rapid dispersing, becomes an arc, faintly regarding Huo Yuhao.

But Huo Yuhao actually looks like has not seen them to resemble, has turned around, Tang Sect as well as the Shrek Academy that people facing flying shouted to clear the way: “Everybody do not come, this matter, is solved by me.”

In Beibei heart one anxious, must speak. May fly actually unexpectedly really to stop in forefront Old Xuan, and stretches out the arms, has prevented the advances of other people.

“Everybody stops, making Yuhao process.”

Beibei urgently said: “Old Xuan, they have two people. Sun-Moon Empire that side......”

Old Xuan shook the head, said: “Population, if can play the decisive effect in overcoming the enemy, we belonged to the Douluo Continent three countries will not lose to Sun-Moon Empire. Don't forget, Yuhao is Ultimate Soldier that our Shrek Academy trains. Present he, is truly able to move unhindered invincible Ultimate Soldier! Believes him.”

Listened to the Old Xuan words, people are peaceful, but actually all vision brilliant looks at Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong direction.

Huo Yuhao coldly looked at Ju Zi(orange) one, the silver light dodged, he returned to side Tang Wutong, similarly, was Duke White Tiger side Dai Hao.

“Huo Yuhao!”Dai Hao somewhat surprisedly visits him, wanted to say anything, does not know that should say anything was good.

Since this war starts, Huo Yuhao baseless vanished, the Shrek Academy people do not know where he went. Meets once more, he unexpectedly already so formidable, this lets Duke White Tiger is also in the heart surprised. He died from Fu Bi, who knows, at crucial moments, Huo Yuhao catches up to rescue unexpectedly. Moreover, why does not know, this time he, in the heart has an unusual feeling. As if, at present this young people become are different from original some.

Huo Yuhao vision tranquil looks at Duke White Tiger, nodded to him, said: “You withdraw first. I handle at present these matters, among us, some matters need to carry on to mediate.”

Duke White Tiger has gawked gawking, but nodded, has not said anything again, turns around flies toward Shrek Academy and direction of Tang Sect people.

Ju Zi(orange) shouted to clear the way suddenly fierce: “And It is not good, he cannot walk. Cannot walk!”She knows that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong came back, misses this time, opportunity that she forever has not perhaps revenged.

The attack of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp while Ju Zi(orange) shouted angrily, started!

Dazzling glares, instantaneously go toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong concentrated fire, that fierce ray appears. That is close 300 eight levels of Soul Engineer cultivate for the powerhouse! Really under guidance and direction of Old Kong.

The glare covers instantaneously. Submerged the body of Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong.

The body of Ju Zi(orange) has shaken shaking, she wants to revenge freely, when she saw that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong were led the moment that the ray embezzles by that powerful soul, the heart leak jumped a racket, as if has come across any fearful matter.

They cannot......

Her worry has continued in fact also the flash. The glare after the twinkle, disappearance that was quietly. A leaf of silver front door, the silent appearance before Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong body, swallows that all the rays of attack completely.

The formidable attack, is unable to fall on the tangible, what also there is to affect? When Huo Yuhao dealing method with former Kong Deming facing the Star Luo City aspect Soul Engineer attack is almost same.

Just, in the control of Space Power, he obviously even better.

Kong Deming as if already had a premonition the right hand that this point, has lifted wields suddenly, this time, Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover has covered toward Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong by a broader direction. Has covered the big piece region.

Originally Huo Yuhao and silver shutter before Tang Wutong body, suddenly vanished in the Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover range unexpectedly.

As ten levels of Soul Guidance Device, the mystery is not only that simple! The blockade space, Kong Deming can also achieve . Moreover, he can also the blockade space of wide scope.

Kong Deming is the Soul Guidance Technology most outstanding representative, he always believes that man will conquer nature. A strength of person in formidable, facing total quantity formidable attack, does not have the means to contend eventually. Space guiding, but if lost the control to the space? How do they come to direct the powerful offensive of that 300 eight levels of Soul Engineer? That is impossible to achieve is right.

Therefore, his goal is very simple, wants the closed room at the same time, strikes to kill Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong with the strongest attack.

【Super explosive good news】 At the suggestion of my, the gizmondo agrees to extract a group of book friends, jointly organizes the Tang Sect ten years with me, under the poly Sanya line the tourism activities, the activity can extract 30 book friends to lead by me, goes to Sanya traveling together, lucky fellow who can participate in free extraction in my new game «Magic Chef of Ice and Fire» player, every week 5 quotas, besides the traveling, some of our also massive good gifts to give to everybody, carries on the drawing link. Including 6 as well as our Tang Sect peripheral wait / etc.. Drawing will start this afternoon probably. Address that the game downloads, everybody can search “the Magic Chef of Ice and Fire tour”with cell phone hundred degree celsius, chooses first downloading of hundred degree celsius prompt then, or comes my public prestige, the click tour to download also to gain secure packaging. Joins our public prestige to be very simple, prestige - the top right-hand corner plus sign, increases friend - search public number - searches Tang three few, has first of authentication is I. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-615-part-1





Volume 13

#615 - Invincible!


About 300 glares sparkle once more, but this time, the goal actually directly is not Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, unexpectedly is Kong Deming oneself.

On Kong Deming, a strange silver mail-armor and helmet shines suddenly, this silver mail-armor and helmet presents for the mirror surface style completely. The front, is one has extended from the chest place to the giant gem of lower abdomen. This gem also presents for the bright silver. After the back all rays emerge, is rapid enters in that giant crystal stone under the guidance of Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover unexpectedly, the powerful silver light, making him at this time seem looks like a silver small Sun.

Sun-Moon Empire Soul Guidance Technology is so developed, is the card in a hand also not only has one to be so simple?

At this time Kong Deming lifts, is another card in a hand.

Right, was affected by Obstructing Bullet, general linkage Assault Soul Guidance Device was unable to use. However, at present Kong Deming displays, is not the simple linkage, but guides the linkage.

His oneself as a stopover station, came from these Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer Soul Guidance Ray carries on the guidance, to compress and fuse through oneself, erupts the formidable attack again. Related to complex space control knowledge.

Such attack does not have means to duplicate on others, because needs formidable Soul Power and Spiritual Power simultaneously, needs enough to know about these strengths.

Humanoid Soul Guidance Device that on Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer put on, all came from the design of Kong Deming, in addition the control of his Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover to Space Power, can complete such strikes, in Kong Deming looks like, such attack, has dominated above Limit Douluo completely, said that is the miracle does not have anything not.

This is also most strikes, to deal with Star Luo City here Limit Douluo that he can achieve. Before had not used facing Old Xuan, for does not want to kill Old Xuan. Initiates death enmity that the Shrek Academy aspect cannot be melted. But at this time facing Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, their existences has threatened Sun-Moon Empire, Kong Deming has opened a oneself biggest card in a hand immediately without hesitation. Formidable attack. Also will shortly show.

Huo Yuhao unemotionally looks at the present all. Stands with Tang Wutong shaking hand there. His left hand lifts slowly before the body.

A strange ray, appears on him.

The aquamarine halo is mixing ice blue color light shadow. In the distant place upper air, golden Sun originally turned into the blue full moon in this moment unexpectedly. Yes, full moon, but is not crescent moon.

The tyrannical incomparable ray locates suddenly to launch from the Kong Deming chest, that ray was unable to describe with the color, flash when it presents, the world must be gloomy. Terrifying prestige energy, making not far away Ju Zi(orange) call out in alarm makes noise. Must know. Kong Deming the card in a hand, even if is War-God Empress she, does not know.

So formidable attack, lets present all people to look at each other to change colors.

The sky was instantaneously gloomy, as if no anything to be able with this ray to vie. The Kong Deming corners of the mouth place has revealed a self-satisfied smile.

If with the Soul Guidance Device level described that this strikes, he is willing to call 11 levels of Soul Guidance Device it, yes, never has had 11 levels of Soul Guidance Device.

In fact, even if he, has strength of the striking. Because of so far, but also does not have what material quality to continue to withstand such huge energy. Even if there is Space Power not to be good as the guidance. When at this moment, this bunch of ray launches. On his front armor that huge silver gem started to collapse. Once the ray launch is completed, the mission of this gem also will be completed, thorough damage.

However, the Kong Deming smiling face, almost flickered below coagulates on own face. His some do not believe their eye.

What did he see?

He saw, as if in front of oneself, presented Extreme North Tundra, snow white white snow. Pure ice surface.

That is huge Ice Mirror, Ice Mirror itself presents for the pale blue. Is sending out the gentle halo, in upper air. Light of one bunch of full moon drop from the clouds, shine above this mirror. Make it is similar to the radiant sapphire is together ordinary.

The powerful ray that the Ice Mirror surface, the incomparable smoothness, the gentle halo and opposite comes has the sharp contrast.

The ray shines above Ice Mirror, mirror sidelurch, 45 degrees. Then the powerful ray, is guided unexpectedly instantaneously, high air-launched goes toward the distant place.

The ray of refraction, looks like can support the great column of world to be common, what it flies is that far, is unable to look at the end.

The Huo Yuhao complexion was only slightly pale. In him behind, one white one green, appearance that two forms are quietly, all stretches out the double palm, arrives in his back.

In the sky, the temperature is dropping at an exceptional pace, opposite, on each Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Engineer, started to present incorruptible of silver Bai Se (White Color), their bodies also start some out-of-control, in airborne is unable to consolidate the flight to be ordinary unexpectedly.

“No, this is impossible......”Kong Deming to lose one's voice to call out in alarm, by his status, unexpectedly some mood out-of-control, it can be imagined, at this time his mood is what kind is not tranquil.

Regards as the powerful offensives of 11 levels of Soul Guidance Device by him, like this was melted unexpectedly and unexpectedly. But what the opposite party uses will be only any ray will reflect this simplest principle.

“Bang and Bang!”Two fulminations also resound.

Kong Deming front crystal stone, Ice Mirror before Huo Yuhao body almost simultaneously to shatter. Changes into the innumerable detritus, from the sky flies upwards.

“Happy”drinks from the Huo Yuhao mouth lowly resounds. blue moon instantaneously changes gold sun. In the sky, golden light is radiant.

Meanwhile, a resonant dragon roar sound resounds from his Tang Wutong mouth.

Her tender body revolution, changed into a giant Purple gold color Light butterfly dragon, picks up the body of Huo Yuhao. The unequalled mind pressure, and on Huo Yuhao simultaneously bursts out from her.

The strange mind thought has covered entire Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp instantaneously. The attack that they should follow on somebody's heels, stops. On everyone shone the dazzling ray, that clearly was the mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device brilliance.

In order to build an invincible master, Sun-Moon Empire on Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp does not know that has poured into many Heart Blood, all dispositions are most high level other. On each Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp Soul Master, is equipped with mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device, this was initially Ju Zi(orange) raised. Now really played the extremely vital role.

However, they can block the mind attack, actually cannot block the mood in the mind attack supplementing to fluctuate.

“Anger!”Also is one drinks to resound lowly. Bodies of Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp about 300 Soul Engineer as if by prior agreement shivers, with the mood disorder, the happy anger back and forth is attacking their innermost feelings unceasingly, within the body Soul Power also becomes chaotic, they do not even know one should make anything at this time, the attack method originally, unexpectedly became lenient.

“Soul Shaking Burst!”The Huo Yuhao ice-cold sound resounds through the entire sky.

The sky collapsed!

Yes, when he shouted Soul Shaking Burst these four characters, looked like to the feeling of person the calamity generally. Terrifying shake strength erupts instantaneously. That already, not only came from the mind level, even is the entire space.

In the Soul Shaking Burst range, sky for it one dark, Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover fierce shivers. Moreover, another gold sun shines behind Huo Yuhao, this belongs to Tang Wutong.

The melodious singing sound is fluctuating in that gold sun front. Second round Soul Shaking Burst appeared.

Two rounds Soul Shaking Burst successively, if Huo Yuhao displays, among these two rounds, many also has a crevice. Even if Mermaid Double Chant, is impossible to let the similar attack, when the second release produces the overlay results.

But, after Tang Wutong Spiritual Power pours into, actually becomes different, similarly is the formidable Spiritual Power support of three Soul Nucleus, moreover under nearly pours into with Spiritual Power of Huo Yuhao a common origin, merpeople second level played Soul Shaking Burst that produced to burst out the unequalled strange effect immediately.

second level Soul Shaking Burst almost breath that in first level erupts has produced, the first wave has not fallen, latter wave already, overlapping, superimposes amplification!

The grating to shatter sound resounds unceasingly, all Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer mind Defensive Soul Guidance Device completely to shatter, to shatter, is their head and Humanoid Soul Guidance Device.

Naturally, Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover!

Kong Deming wants to prevent Huo Yuhao, is actually not able to achieve. When he prepares to control own Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover, the front actually shines one group of dazzling black glow.

That black glow not is extremely gigantic, only then ruler odd|surplus Chang, is a handle black hammer, but on that hammer, is actually glittering the strange dark golden brilliance.

Sees this handle hammer time, Kong Deming first felt is the fatal oppression strength. The terrifying pressure, making his entire soul tremble.

Then that hammer shelled before his body in not far away air. The terrifying pressure, making him one lose balanced, under body and mind big change, Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover cannot completely control. That flash, he only thought one fell into the space of collapse completely, cannot control own body.

With amazement, in the eye full is with amazement. The Kong Deming personal appearance explodes draws back, at this time, he also can only achieve the self-preservation.

to shatter Silver Moon Divine Ray Cover draws in once more, appears before his body, the surrounding space control, although mouth and nose hemorrhage, in the range that but this ten levels of Soul Engineer cover from Clear Sky Hammer finally ran away.

300 corpses, drop from the clouds, drop dust.

In battlefield, solemnly silent!

In Sun-Moon Empire army eyes, in Star Luo City came from in belonging to the powerhouses eyes of Douluo Continent three countries', Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp, is nearly in not existence that is possible to defeat. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-615-part-2





Volume 13

#615 - Invincible!


Initially, because of their entering the war, will make Dou Ling Empire die in that short time. Soul Master, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp simply is a legend, but, at this moment, this legend, forever was falling from the sky, looks like has not appeared.

The legend falls from the sky, only for them!

Sun-Moon Empire biggest relying on, in light of this to shatter. Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp before them, has resisted two rounds, then the formidable attack, cannot make them die. The result of this war, as if has been doomed.

Ju Zi(orange) has tarried completely, although she in the heart understands, Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, if comes back again, their strengths will certainly be the extremely terrifying degree. However, some many also comforts in her heart, she has also believed that is relying on the Sun-Moon Empire overall strength, at least resists them not to have the issue.

But, now her in heart this thought already to shatter. Resists? How to resist? Without linkage Soul Guidance Device, how also possibly to resist these two became Limit Douluo, moreover strength far ultra Limit Douluo powerhouse!

“Why? Why you can refract my silver moon god light wave, this is impossible! The might of silver moon god light wave, did not belong to this world, that is the strength of close gods!”In the Kong Deming heart has filled unwillingly, he somewhat crazily was crying out, was asking to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao coldly visits him, “because, my Ice Mirror is, Absolute Zero!”

“Absolute Zero?”The Kong Deming delay, the concept of Absolute Zero, he had also heard, but, isn't that is only in the legend has exists? Even if Absolute Ice, is impossible truly to be the Absolute Zero level!

Absolute Zero, forms Ice Mirror by Absolute Zero, carries on the refraction.

His some not willingly asked again: “If, if resists directly, even if you are Absolute Zero, cannot block my attack.”

“Weak!”Huo Yuhao disdains snort|hum, why “I must resist directly. Are you willing to resist directly my strike fully? You have 300 people, we are only two people. The application of small skill, sufficiently makes them sink to the abyss. If, you can also use a moment ago the attack hundred times of that level, perhaps, has to be able really with the possibility that we contend with. As for the present. Finished!”

At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao raises head to look at the day, is golden light greatly puts on Tang Wutong under his body.

In the sky, two rounds gold sun simultaneously shine, complements each other fresh splendor in the upper air, all exaggerated the golden color the entire battlefield, the formidable mind fluctuation, has covered the entire Sun-Moon Empire army, even if had the least bit slightest sign of trouble, will fall into during their controls completely.

“Sorrow!”Huo Yuhao light saying.

Strange appeared, in the ground, all Soul Guidance Array in Soul Guidance Device, start to melt unexpectedly, melts into the metal liquid, spreads in the ground.

The sorrowful mood, affects, not only person, but is all. This is the mood strength.

Simple Ai Word, makes entire world shiver. That the prepare Soul Guidance Array place, almost will vanish shortly into thin air.

Huo Yuhao coldly looks to Ju Zi(orange) in enemy position, “now, you should not suspect my words. You should understand that I have the ability that makes you be annihilated. Returns all territories that Sun-Moon Empire invades, get lost Sun-Moon Empire to go. I have forgiven these 1 million lives, otherwise, you must shortly 1 million ghosts, in this to shatter.”

The Ju Zi(orange) complexion became a paleness. Looks has fallen back on Duke White Tiger in far place, she knows that her big enmity, forever was perhaps impossible to report.

Effort that many years, make, drains in light of this.

“Not, not! I must revenge, I must revenge!”Ju Zi(orange) exclaimed toward the Huo Yuhao anger suddenly: “Right, you can kill us, how even if you can kill us? I have issued the order, if my Sun-Moon Empire army collapses in light of this. Then, our country guards is belonging to the armies of Douluo Continent three countries all cities, will launch the massacre same place, can kill many, kills many.”

“You are fierce! However, can you save entire Continent? Can you? When the time comes, thousand ten million ten thousand people, die because of you. You kill my 1 million people, I extinguish kill you belong to the Douluo Continent three countries thousand ten million ten thousand people. Let them be buried along with the dead. You do not make me take revenge, I will hate fall in torrents above this entire Continent.”

Is listening to the crazy words of Ju Zi(orange) hysteria, not only the Huo Yuhao complexion big change, the Shrek Academy high levels in distant place, the Star Luo City high levels, as well as Dou Ling Empire and Sky Soul Empire powerhouses, all are the complexion drastic changes.

If Ju Zi(orange) such has done, then, entire Continent will therefore turn into the blood red! Is this how terrifying aspect?

Such disaster, is hard to imagine, at least is anybody is not willing to imagine.

Huo Yuhao gets angry: “What did you say? You how dare so?”

Ju Zi(orange) coldly visits him, “to take revenge, my anything can do, do not think that you won. Hands over Duke White Tiger, so long as has killed him, I repulse the enemy. Leaves behind Star Luo City to you, so long as you are living for day, my soldier will not send Star Luo City. I have controlled entire Continent, I must make anything, naturally can achieve. Your individual strength is strong, wants to save entire Continent, is impossible.”

The Huo Yuhao complexion at this time became a paleness, right, he by with the Tang Wutong powerful strength, turned around the situation. At present although 1 million enemies, but in the face of their powerful strengths, but is the range chicken earthenware dog. But, Ju Zi(orange) said right, Sun-Moon Empire has controlled entire Continent, in this case, if she really crazy carries on to slaughter, Huo Yuhao could protect several cities, but absolutely is actually not able to protect entire Continent! That is impossible to complete.

“Ju Zi(orange)!”Saying of Huo Yuhao coldly .

Ju Zi(orange) begins supinely, coldly visits him.

In this time, the form from Huo Yuhao behind is flying to shoot together suddenly, but, arrives at side him. Duke White Tiger Dai Hao.

“She must kill, made her kill. So long as can protect the Douluo Continent thousand ten million ten thousand lives, my life, what was also considered as?”Dai Hao said generously. This time he, in the eye full is the gratified color, is commander, he never has also thought that actually some people can rely on strength of change entire battlefield a oneself aspect.

Moreover, from Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong god, he saw the hope truly, saw the hope of Star Lou Empire, he still clearly remembers that Huo Yuhao had told him, oneself are the Star Lou Empire person, such being the case, Star Lou Empire had the future!

In the future, Star Lou Empire under the leadership of Huo Yuhao, can't regain to lose? Flagitious that Ju Zi(orange) said that must slaughter entire Continent, she is also not necessarily able to realize immediately. So long as died, her determination also broke. Isn't wants to revenge? Let her kill itself and that's the end. For the Star Lou Empire future, for Douluo Continent, he thought that own death is worth.

“It is not good.”Huo Yuhao shouted angrily, held the shoulder of Duke White Tiger, did not make him fly.

The Huo Yuhao look becomes profound, the powerful mind fluctuation, covers the entire Sun-Moon Empire army, in his look, were then many anything. Struggles, but quick set firm resolve.

“Ju Zi(orange), since your so recklessly unseemly behavior, do not blame me.”Huo Yuhao coldly snorted, the right hand in the body previous stroke, immediately, the silver light from the sky has delimited together, revealed a silver gateway to come out.

Ju Zi(orange) has gawked staring, looks at his look, suddenly, one fear beyond description appears in her heart. Because she guessed correctly suddenly that Huo Yuhao must do.

“And Does not want!”Ju Zi(orange) yelled makes noise.

But the hand of Huo Yuhao, actually searched into that silver shutter, the next quarter, seems six and seven years old, the well-dressed boy, appeared in his hand.

Towering that the boy presents, but, made all military officers of Sun-Moon Empire side is the complexion big changes.

Some boy also delay, have a look at Huo Yuhao, mother who has a look at not far away again, somewhat is suddenly vacant.

However, under such big change, he can also maintain calm unexpectedly, doubts looks to Huo Yuhao, “who are you? How do you catch me?”The thought is systematic.

“Huo Yuhao, you cannot, you unable to injure him, does not want, does not want!”Ju Zi(orange) stubborn finally after this child appears was defeated, she is almost choked with tears, yelled to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao coldly visits her, “you can let Continent loss of life, why I cannot. Yes, I am not willing to threaten you with a child, but, you, since threatens me with entire Continent, do not blame me.”

At the same time was saying, he boy in hand holds into the bosom. Face close Huo Yuhao of boy, the look somewhat is in a daze, is actually not afraid, even also puts out a hand, touches his face.

Huo Yuhao has moved aside slightly, but as before was actually touched by that boy.

“Why, I thought that you a little look familiar!”Boy curious asking, he as if really did not fear. Then has a look at mother's direction, “mother, you do not cry! This uncle's flavor heard well that he should not injure Yunhan!”

Yes, boy Sun-Moon Empire in Huo Yuhao this bosom now emperor, Xu Yunhan!

Huo Yuhao is relying on formidable Spiritual Detection, easy had found Xu Yunhan in the army in the position, then by oneself the control to Space Power, directly catches in him oneself hand, this is Ju Zi(orange) has not thought. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-615-part-3





Volume 13

#616 - Son


This matter of Xu Yunhan in army, in the entire Sun-Moon Empire army also only then few people know, reason that is leading him, because Ju Zi(orange) did not feel relieved that a son person stays in the empire. After all, she has carried off almost Sun-Moon Empire all strongest strengths, moreover before the son, has had the matter, she is worried about the story to repeat, therefore leads the son in the side, in her opinion, some these many formidable Soul Engineer Corp, Old Kong taught personally, naturally is safe cannot be safe, who knows that can encounter to at present so the situation unexpectedly.

Listened to the Xu Yunhan words, Huo Yuhao is also the mind slightly shakes, remembered initially first time with the appearance of this child meeting time. Lowers the head looks to him that Huo Yuhao sees, this child attractive black short hair, the pitch-black big eye is very bright, his skin has looked like mother, is fair and delicate. He who magnificent clothes serve as contrast is very noble. Those who touch the person is on his face is having the light smile. Six and seven -year-old children, actually did not have the least bit to be flustered at this time, instead curious looked up.

Can Huo Yuhao really to this child being able to get down hand? Answer inevitably negative, that radically is impossible. But, was forced this situation by Ju Zi(orange), he does not have the matter of means.

Ju Zi(orange) trembling sound track: “Huo Yuhao, you and you cannot start to Yunhan, cannot!”

Huo Yuhao takes a deep breath, returned to normal the somewhat depressing mind, “that you condition that promises me to say a moment ago. Person who is bringing your, withdraws Sun-Moon Empire to go.”

In the Ju Zi(orange) eye the ray twinkle, bites the mandibular joint tightly, looks at Huo Yuhao, she somewhat could not speak. For her, revenging is her lifetime wish, is. In her heart, the most important person has two. Was this has been missing for three years, appeared stands in oneself to inside man. Another, is he cherishes is holding young villain!

Huo Yuhao was better, said that was not her man. But, Xu Yunhan is her son, only son, even can be said as she goes on living the biggest significance. Ju Zi(orange) does not even dare to imagine, if his son had the matter, oneself will turn into any appearance. Perhaps, will make entire Continent hold a memorial service for the son with the blood.

Although she knows that Huo Yuhao is always tenderhearted, can guess correctly that Huo Yuhao at all impossible to begin to the son, but, she actually does not dare to bet, that simply was the too fearful situation.

“Why? Why can you protect that Duke White Tiger? Why didn't make me kill him? You should know that now our country unifies Continent, at present the so excellent situation, is not I can take responsibility, you threaten me with him. Is the empire marshal, I, I......”

Here. Ju Zi(orange) somewhat could not be justified, because of her scared seeing, hand of Huo Yuhao, gently is touching son's head. By the Huo Yuhao strength, only needs among the moment, can want that small life!

“Does not want, Yuhao, does not want! ten million do not injure Yunhan.”The Ju Zi(orange) entreaty said.

The Kong Deming complexion at this time became extremely ugly, not only Xu Yunhan emperor. Moreover is also his disciple. Although this young disciple also has six -year-old age, is. The talent that he displays has made Kong Deming like extremely. He has the confidence to train Sun-Moon Empire one generation of Great Emperor in the future.

At this time, the emperor fell into the rival. Obtained the situation of rolling victory completely to change immediately, let alone, Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp also has been annihilated. Is develops rapidly after a sudden turn simply!

The strength that Huo Yuhao shows was too fearful, Sun-Moon Empire, basic can he contends in the frontage on nobody, in this case, was naturally impossible to retrieve Xu Yunhan.

Huo Yuhao is listening to the Ju Zi(orange) words, turns head to look to own Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, Duke White Tiger is also visiting him, four items of relative. Duke White Tiger in the eye is revealing the temperate ray, but the Huo Yuhao look, actually becomes incomparably complex.

“You asked why I can protect him? Why didn't make you kill him to revenge? Good, I work as all people to tell you today.”Huo Yuhao takes a deep breath.

In he cherishes Xu Yunhan to be very honest, any has not struggled.

“Because!”Huo Yuhao has turned the head, vision brilliant is looking steadily at Ju Zi(orange), “he is my kissing! Fresh! Father! Kisses!”

When this simple several characters put out from the Huo Yuhao mouth, just like thunderclaps, explosion maliciously above two person hearts.

Although his voice is not loud, but under the formidable Spiritual Power conduction, audience any place can clear hearing.

In the top, Dai Yueheng, Dai Huabin and Dai Louli three brothers sobered, happen to hears all that Huo Yuhao said. Besides Dai Louli, Dai Yueheng and Dai Huabin two brothers already complete delay.

Especially Dai Huabin, since entered Shrek Academy on that day, his in diligently chased a person, has been resisting with him. Regardless of how he cannot think that this person, can be his brothers unexpectedly and unexpectedly. Looked from the age that is his younger brother is right.

The Ju Zi(orange) vision has stagnated instantaneously, she looks at Huo Yuhao, the red lip has not opened on own initiative, dumbfounded looks that has the innumerable years in her heart, actually never thinks that can be this unexpectedly, can be this unexpectedly! Duke White Tiger, own big personal enemy Duke White Tiger Dai Hao, unexpectedly, unexpectedly is his father. That said that Dai Hao......

Thinks of here, Ju Zi(orange) just like was been ordinary in the top of the head by a trough ice water pouring, the whole person from the sky shook shaking, nearly cannot control the personal appearance, falls down.

Similarly shock unequalled, naturally also has float in Huo Yuhao Duke White Tiger.

“What did you and you say?”Duke White Tiger the sound completely changed.

In his heart, young people, are the outstanding person of younger generation, Shrek Academy most outstanding candidate, because of his reason, Star Lou Empire can during several Great Tribulation are difficult the broken tribulation. He and he actually said that he is his son?

“Right! You is a my father.”Huo Yuhao turns head to look to Dai Hao, his vision already no longer tranquil, the sound somewhat is shivering slightly, because his own mood fluctuates, one type beyond description sad is also affecting all people.

“But simultaneously, you are also my personal enemy!”Huo Yuhao said these words, the complexion is a paleness.

“This is impossible. How are you possibly my son?”Duke White Tiger loses one's voice to say.

Huo Yuhao takes a deep breath, constrains the mood that are surging reluctantly, “that. I reminded your, my mother. Surnamed Huo. You may also recognize it.”At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao lifts the hand, takes out a handle dagger from own Storage Soul Guidance Device, hands in front of Duke White Tiger.

“This is you give my mother's presenting a gift faith token, believes that you will not forget.”

Duke White Tiger the Dai Hao look one coagulated, coagulates above White Tiger Dagger in Huo Yuhao hand, his subconscious that White Tiger Dagger with, in the hand, his hand started not on own initiative shivers.

“You, you and you are the Yun'er children. Yun'er and Yun'er had a child to me unexpectedly. Did not say that Yun'er she is when I go to battle fell ill dead? How can how be able like this?”

Huo Yuhao coldly [say / way]: “Told your my mother dead, should be that duchess. In your heart, my mother died more than 20 years ago.”

Dai Hao dull is looking at White Tiger Dagger in hand, “I am busy with going on an expedition, after I knew Yun'er dead, is actually not able to go home to take care. At that time, when the border area became serious. My ten years have not returned to Duke's Estate. When I go back, sees, only then cultivates the loess, I can be Yun'er do. Also only then repairs the grave. You and you unexpectedly are the Yun'er sons, that and that you should not call Huo Yuhao, should call Dai Yuhao is right!”

Huo Yuhao makes an effort has flung under. The anger exclaimed: “No, I did not call Dai Yuhao, I called Huo Yuhao, I was also only Huo Yuhao. I am my mother's son, is not your son. From infancy to maturity, can you take care of my one day? You do not even know that has my existence? I in childhood, but also distant has visited you. At that time, you had also come back, is. Why haven't you gone to see my mother? Whatever the duchess does humiliate my mother?”

“Have I gone back? I every time go home, in a hurry departs. My military affairs were extremely busy. Was I, is I have neglected Yun'er.”The Dai Hao complexion starts becomes pale, even if in sharp sword facing the Ju Zi(orange) hand. He like, so has not been out of sorts at present.

Huo Yuhao has turned the head suddenly, suppressed the tears in eye pupil forcefully, “after and other solutions at present these, I to Duke's Estate, to you and to the duchess, will demand return you to owe my mother's all.”

At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao once more vision goes to not far away glassy-eyed Ju Zi(orange).

“Understood? You understand now! How although I am not willing to acknowledge, on me is flowing his bloodlines. Although he harmed miserably my mother, but he was the Star Lou Empire hero, I not, because had his bloodlines to be shamed. In any event, I will not make him die in your hands. Now you should understand why I can protect him?”

Constrains this enough several years of words when own innermost feelings says, Huo Yuhao only thought that in the chest opens greatly, must finish, after waiting to process the Sun-Moon Empire army, is he returns to Duke's Estate.

Tang Wutong drawing close to gently side Huo Yuhao, grips his arm, using the temperature of oneself palm to comfort him. She is only one not, because Huo Yuhao said the word surprised person, because she already knew these.

He also deep remembering, several years ago when leave Duke's Estate pledge that distributes, if no support of that pledge, practice that he so will not go all out.

Several years later today, in his heart, the hatred became desalinated, but, mother's matter he must solve.

Wipes bitterly and astringently, appears above the corners of the mouth of Ju Zi(orange), “cannot think that I cannot think, the matter can be this unexpectedly, you can be his son unexpectedly. Yuhao, actually, I must thank you. You said right, I cannot kill him, I cannot kill him. Regardless of I have resenting how, I cannot kill him. Gives back to me the child, gives back to me Yunhan. I promised you, my anything promised you. I withdraw troops, we evacuate, gives back to Star Luo Star Lou Empire. However, Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire were already seized, I am unable to return, this has surpassed our Sun-Moon Empire land area more than 50%, I do not have the qualifications of restore, I can achieve, returns Star Lou Empire throughout to Star Lou Empire. Including Bright Struggle Mountain Range. This is the maximum degree that I can make concessions.”

Is listening to the Ju Zi(orange) weak words, Duke White Tiger shook shaking, in the eye the ray has put greatly. Sun-Moon Empire is willing to return Star Lou Empire throughout, this is the happiness of accident.

As for Dou Ling Empire and Sky Soul Empire, the strength of two countries Imperial Family and control was already on the wane, even if returns to them, was incapable of controlling the country. This without doubt is the best result.

Huo Yuhao hesitates after long time, nodded, said: “Good, depends on you to say. You lead Emperor Sun-Moon ** the team, withdraws from Star Lou Empire. However, you initially were perfidious, ignore ten years, then, takes hundred times of repayments. In the millenniums, Sun-Moon Empire can not attack Star Lou Empire again.”

Ju Zi(orange) heaved a deep sigh, “good, I promised you. I promised you. But if Star Lou Empire attacks us, we must counter-attack. Gives back to me the child, I walk immediately.”

She gives the compromise finally, is also related with Old Kong, this final bottom line, Old Kong gives her. Really is the strength that because Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong show was extremely formidable. In addition existence of Obstructing Bullet, by the Sun-Moon Empire present strength, if resists again, if Huo Yuhao does not hesitate at all costs launching attacks, then, will be annihilated really! Now only then evacuates here first, then finds the way to study more formidable Soul Guidance Device to resist Huo Yuhao, has the practical significance.

Huo Yuhao said indifferently: “You withdraw first. As for Yunhan, I will look after well his. You had a record of being perfidious, how do you make me also probably trust you? Ten years later, if Sun-Moon Empire has not had any trend, I naturally will return him to you.”

“What?”Ju Zi(orange) loses one's voice to call out in alarm, “can you carry off the Yunhan ten years? No, this is impossible, this is absolutely impossible!”

Heard that Huo Yuhao must carry off Xu Yunhan, Ju Zi(orange) one was anxious.

Huo Yuhao cold by right, “you were perfidious, ignore making of past years, launched the war outrageously. I am impossible to trust you again, such being the case, makes Xu Yunhan follow in my ten years, lightens a punishment and watches subsequent behavior. You can walk.”

4000 character big chapters, asked the recommendation ticket!

Today I in 18 area black Wu Huang all the players of debarkation, will extract a lucky player to gain we newest Tang Sect peripheral Tang Sect exclusive Wei Yi, on picture is our Wei Yi picture, these days every time opens a new area, I will deliver one to give the player in new area, as their battle dress, wanting the reader who obtains to search “the Magic Chef of Ice and Fire game”with cell phone hundred degree celsius, edition downloading of choice correspondence can enter to play \; Wei Yi the appearance, everybody arrives at my new and wave, micro, to have a look abundantly, the model who your San Ge are personally, your sister-in-law is a guest performer. Hey. Likes also being able to come to our shop to dazzle world Tang Sect to buy, for these days happen to was the pair 12, had the preferential activity. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-616





Volume 13

#617 - Imperial Sacrifices Position


“It is not good, this is not absolutely good, you give back to me the son, gives back to me the son!”At the same time was saying, Ju Zi(orange) does not have the acceleration of omen suddenly, flushed from Sun-Moon Empire.

She was not far from Huo Yuhao, moreover these is also quite towering, Humanoid Soul Guidance Device that her body puts on is existence of most top, Soul Guidance Thruster assumes an awe-inspiring pose, is almost is similar to Teleportation is ordinary, rushed to front of Huo Yuhao, in Xu Yunhan toward Huo Yuhao hand grasps directly.

Huo Yuhao lifts the hand, strength of the formidable fetter fettered Ju Zi(orange), limited in which her firmly. At this time Kong Deming wants to rescue again, already without enough time.

Short distance looks at Ju Zi(orange), the Huo Yuhao coldly [say / way]: Person who “is bringing your leaves, since I have made the decision not to change, has made the mistake, must pay the price. Initially I that trusted you, tells you including the matter that oneself closed up, how did you treat my trust? Now, I did not have the means to believe you again. I will not injure you, you walk.”

“Gives back to me, give back to me the son. I cannot let him with you, in your eyes, he is Emperor Sun-Moon Empire, you well will certainly not teach his, the son is in my life the final hope, Yuhao, I asked you, gave back to me the son, gave back to me!”Ju Zi(orange) was entreating desperately.

If before trading does, Huo Yuhao already was definitely tenderhearted, but, Ju Zi(orange) this betrayal, making entire Dou Ling Empire perish, even was almost also invaded including Star Lou Empire, and what is more, almost died including Duke White Tiger in her hands.

Huo Yuhao is hard the feelings, effort swung, “you walk! Does not need to talk too much.”

“”Ju Zi(orange) does not cry, “Huo Yuhao, you cannot like this, you unable like this. Yunhan and Yunhan he is your son!”

The space collects suddenly, said the instance of these words in Ju Zi(orange), the surroundings. In a diameter hundred meters range, space did not have the collapse of omen suddenly. Her sound also completely submerged during that space dent. Only has several people within these hundred meters scopes to hear.

The time and space, as if completely coagulated in this moment.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong, on the face completely are the astonished colors, nearby Duke White Tiger also similarly is so. Their expression coagulations on the face, Ju Zi(orange) are also maintaining appearance that because has tears streaming down the face anxiously. Little Yunhan is also surprised of face, is gaining ground, looks to Huo Yuhao.

Hundred meters coagulation, this strange. In airborne that static.

A dignified sound, does not have omen resounding of suddenly, resounds through in their ears.

“I have said that never say this secret. Said this secret, I will want your son's life. It seems like that you had forgotten I said urging all, then......”

Powerful golden light shines together suddenly, Huo Yuhao, Tang Wutong, Dai Hao as well as Ju Zi(orange) and Xu Yunhan, only thought that the eye is dizzy a while ago, next one flickers. They went to another place.

When the present all become is clear, they surprised discovered that they appeared above golden fog unexpectedly.

Even if Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong such cultivating is. In this moment, actually was unable sensation to oneself to be where.

Just, this time they, have not gone to think these, the Huo Yuhao vision one coagulated on Ju Zi(orange), lost the sound track: “What did you and you say a moment ago? You said that whose son he is?”

Ju Zi(orange) at this time the complexion is a paleness, that dignified sound, made her mind big change, her fierce seized from the Huo Yuhao bosom Xu Yunhan. Then baseless kneels down. “Does not want and ask you, do not injure my son. I did not say really intentionally. Really is not. I feared that they injure my son! Asked you. Asked you, do not injure my son.”

Huo Yuhao with enough time looks up at this time to surroundings. Spiritual Detection also releases. However, what making him be startled, he that formidable Spiritual Detection, when released outward, all changes of basic around on feeling, looked like the clay ox entering the sea is ordinary, did not have the mark without the trace.

What situation is this? Actually is this where? The Huo Yuhao shocking feeling the surrounding all, are not understanding completely had anything.

In this time, golden light, is glistening in the people front together quietly. Formerly that dignified sound once more resounded.

“You feared that has injured own child, did not fear that has injured others' child? I tolerated existence of this kid, is the year has under the premise of care for all living things in the heaven. However, you actually as before cannot bear say, the hatred, has hoodwinked your eyes, the mood of out-of-control, making you probably move toward the destruction. Such being the case, I help in you.”

The golden form is gradually clear, seems the 20-year-old handsome man appears before the people slowly.

He has a Touwan water blue color long hair like a waterfall, has hung the under foot, if not his great personal appearance and broad shoulder, perhaps thinks that he is a female.

On magnificent and expensive blue long gown as if there is wave to ripple, if carefully looked, look instantaneously that deep attracts deep blue, even the entire soul will be inhaled that is similar to the sea profound and endless blue color.

It seems in the 20-year-old handsome facial features has a pair of profound eye pupil, his look seems like the cavity, but actually likely is comprehensive, occasionally flashes through together purple aura, is the moving heart and soul. Will have the sense of reality that Fang magnificent and instantaneous life and death die out an instant.

In his right hand, is grasping a handle giant gold trident, the style of this trident in the Huo Yuhao eye that familiar.

He and he are......

“Father!”Tang Wutong cries suddenly, the personal appearance dodges, during was similar to the young swallow throws the bosom to jump into that youth to embrace generally.

Sends the youth to open the arm blue, hugs into her the bosom. On the face full is kind and color. Gently is stroking the Tang Wutong pink-blue color long hair, “clever daughter, you could rest assured that the father will certainly not make you be wronged.”

Tang Wutong has turned around, looks to Huo Yuhao, her look completely became is at this moment different. She is extremely intelligent, from the beforehand Ju Zi(orange) words, in addition father's anger, she understands, all that perhaps Ju Zi(orange) said a moment ago real.

“Father, this, this child is really, is really Yuhao and Ju Zi(orange)?”Said these words time, her sound somewhat shivered.

Sends the youth to nod blue, “good.”

In beautiful pupil of Tang Wutong. Were instantaneously many dense mist, looks at Huo Yuhao, the tender body somewhat is shivering slightly. Asked with the heartrending sound: “Is, what?”

Huo Yuhao dumbfounded [say / way]: “Wutong, you listen to me to explain. I do not know! No, this child possibly is not my. Is impossible! I and Ju Zi(orange) anything has not occurred, has not had anything really! I acknowledged that in the past, when has not known you are the female body, had liked her, but I and Ju Zi(orange) are only the friend have related, not true is crossing together. This not real. This child is not my.”

Sends the youth to sneer blue, “isn't your? Xu Yunhan, you know why he did call Xu Yunhan? Because, you called Huo Yuhao. Cloud to rain, vast to Hao. Just and your name coincides. You think that this is only the coincidence? Ju Zi(orange), you told him, was his child?”

Ju Zi(orange) tight is hugging Xu Yunhan, has a look at Huo Yuhao, has a look at Tang Wutong again and that sends the youth blue. Whole person already some delay could not speak.

The master of that dignified sound, unexpectedly is the Tang Wutong father, no wonder and no wonder he was not said by himself. He does not hope own daughter knows this matter!

“Asked you, to ask you do not injure my child. Asked you, I was only a pitiful mother, I feared that my child was injured! Asked you, asked you.”Ju Zi(orange) had not explained that but is holding Xu Yunhan, unceasing sends the youth to kowtow to that blue.

The tears, flow following the face of Tang Wutong suddenly, she looks at Huo Yuhao, a pair of beautiful pupil became red.

Any woman. Was impossible to forgive own man and other woman had the child outside! Even if she likes him again, at present in this case. Her innermost feelings only then endless grief and indignation.

Sends youth look ice-cold blue looks at Ju Zi(orange), “I have spoken words. Since you treat as the neglected advice. That pays the price!”At the same time was saying, his fierce uphold hand, the blue light flashes through together, Xu Yunhan in Ju Zi(orange) bosom disappeared from the scene, when appears again, already in his hand.

Ju Zi(orange) insane wish throws, but, the surroundings entire space instantaneously is congealing. Sends youth coldly blue looks at Ju Zi(orange), his hand, fell on the neck of Xu Yunhan.

“Lets loose him!”Shouted angrily to resound, before form rushed together suddenly, pair of tiger palm, the direct racket sent the youth to that blue.

Getting rid impressively Duke White Tiger Dai Hao.

From just both sides' conversation, he understood, this child perhaps is really Huo Yuhao. Although he knows why now has not made clear Huo Yuhao to turn into own son unexpectedly suddenly, but he actually understands, if Huo Yuhao is own son, then, at present this child who called Xu Yunhan, was own biological grandson! No wonder a moment ago this War-God Empress said that cannot kill itself, originally the foundation unexpectedly is here.

In his heart, did not have Sun-Moon Empire and Star Lou Empire at this time, only then own blood relative grandson. He can see that the grandson falls into manpower, was killed?

Double 12 activity fiery opening

Everybody kisses, we pair of 12 activity opened on December 11 officially! Has continued to 14 th! Below gives everybody under the introduction our festival detail

Enters the shop to give the red package.

Every purchases any commodity full 99 Yuan package to post.

New product issue: Badge, postcard, Wei Yi, playbill.

( 1 ) buys Wei Yi, delivers playbill( one) or the badge.

( 2 ) postcard( buys one and gets one free).

4.60 Zhang Ka( buys one and gets one free).

Every purchases the complete set book to deliver postcard one set,( purchase peerless Tang Sect delivers badge and postcard)

The limited edition card sign second kills 69 Yuan one, does not support the numerical selection.

The time is: December 11 to December 14 21 : 00 pm

Sells in advance the complete works 1-26 to deliver postcard one set, playbill two, badge.

Has the interior door member to make splendid activity to ask everybody to enter the shop to consult

What kind of? We give preferential benefit well! Hey, the excited words hurry to go to Taobao, I am dazzling world Tang Sect, etc. you...... Prepared?

Website:. Search shop: Dazzles world Tang Sect ( to be continued ) 752



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-617-part-1





Volume 13

#617 - Imperial Sacrifices Position


That sends the youth look to congeal blue, Duke White Tiger was also decided is in-situ. Meanwhile, Tang Wutong closely grasps him suddenly, “father, does not want, the child is innocent. Do not injure this child.”

Sends the youth to listen to her words blue, the look one became gentle, sighed: “But, my daughter is also innocent! Who comes to be take pity on you? My pitiful Xiaoqi.”

Tang Wutong Shelled Teeth bites the lower lip tightly, “father, we go home, I and I thought you, thought mother. We go home.”At the same time was saying, she has wept bitterly loudly.

“Wutong and Wutong!”Huo Yuhao responded at this time from the shock that must throw to go forward. But that sends youth actually coldly blue looked at his one eyes, his body was also stagnated is in-situ.

The blue light dodges, sends the youth and Tang Wutong blue changes into two light shadow, vanished in this golden fog without the trace.

The dignified sound from the sky reverberates, “Star Lou Empire must return, Sun-Moon Empire changes the name is Heaven Dou Empire. Otherwise, snort|hum!”

Xu Yunhan was remained airborne, happen to instantaneously was restored the ability to act Ju Zi(orange) to hug in the bosom.

Little Yunhan has not been afraid, is staring a sparkling big eye as before, having a look at this, to have a look at that again, a curious color of face. He will certainly not be afraid, because sent on the youth god from that a moment ago blue, he has not felt existence of murderous aura.

Huo Yuhao changes Ju Zi(orange) suddenly, the anger exclaims: “Why? Why you said that this is my child? Can he be my child? Why?”

Ju Zi(orange) holds Xu Yunhan to stand up, coldly looks at Huo Yuhao, “regardless of you think not to believe that he is your child. You think that what life child I will give casually? In the past, I already know that Xu Tianran must make me taking advantage of planting to give birth. Therefore, I can only early prepare. Still remembers in Extreme North Land? You fell into my hand to lose consciousness that time. You could rest assured that my Ju Zi(orange) did not have is so inexpensive, has anything with you. I have stolen your seed with Soul Guidance Device, afterward, when Xu Tianran forces me, implants my within the body that seed. Right, Yunhan is your flesh and blood, but, I do not have with your relations. He has not related with you, you have paid that seed, what hasn't your he made?”

Huo Yuhao delay looks at Ju Zi(orange), visits him to cherish Xu Yunhan, suddenly, in heart five senses mixed Chen, all sorts of feelings. Regardless of how he cannot think that matter unexpectedly is this.

All sorts that once had, were reverberating in heart unceasingly, initial all, he recalled quickly. Yes! That time, he once to lose consciousness in front of Ju Zi(orange) after a period of time, should be that time. No wonder and no wonder first time see this child time, has had the enormous favorable impression to him.

Is thinking again initially Xu Yunhan also small time had called his father's situation, suddenly, Huo Yuhao does not know that should say anything.

Ju Zi(orange) embraces tightly the son, whatever the tears flow, cold sound track: “I borrowed your seed, to influence that you have, I can only say that was sorry. However, I must tell you am, the child, does not have with your relations. He is only my son, the future will be the Sun-Moon Empire king. He is surnamed Xu, is not surnamed with you. You should understand now why I feared you will injure him. If, you have injured him, you will certainly regret life-long.”

Duke White Tiger Dai Hao has a look at Huo Yuhao, has a look at Ju Zi(orange) again, suddenly, he does not know that should say anything were good. All that today has, have subverted the cognition in his heart completely!

Huo Yuhao pain closes the double pupil, at this time, his heart was all chaotic.

Closes up after three years with great difficulty, achievement Limit Douluo, and strives to turn the tide, preventing Star Lou Empire to be destroyed thoroughly. But, own lover actually departs because of such matter.

Before Tang Wutong leaves, in the eye pupil that thick moved made him feel as if a knife were piercing heart. Because does not know the outcome what's the matter, he even including explaining cannot achieve.

Strange Ju Zi(orange)? Now he did not have the strength to blame. The son, oneself virgin, really had a such eldest son.

“Yunhan, releases your Martial Soul.”Ju Zi(orange) in Little Yunhan to bosom said suddenly.

“Good.”

Gentle Soul Power, releases from Xu Yunhan, the command is closing the Huo Yuhao again opening eyes pupil of double pupil. Duke White Tiger Dai Hao also went to him the vision.

On Xu Yunhan, shines a Bai Se (White Color) ray, his eyes pupil, suddenly becomes bright, what stranger is, his pupil turned into the double pupil unexpectedly, the small stature inflates several points slightly, opening that on the forehead, vertical eye is quietly, but the hair, actually turned into half black half white fierce appearance pattern appearance.

This is......

Three Eyed White Tiger? What Martial Soul is this?

Looks at double pupil in his eyes pupil, Duke White Tiger the Dai Hao body has shaken shaking, in this flash, he suddenly with amazement discovered that all heroic spirit in oneself chest are nothing left, looks at this Martial Soul, he confirmed without doubt, at present this child, is own descendant!

Huo Yuhao also similarly shook shaking, he has not inherited White Tiger Martial Soul, is, around that vertical eye, has the light sun mark halo impressively! That belonged to Spirit Eyes and Eye of Asura aura, the vacation not.

Although this child's Martial Soul is only sole, but, simultaneously had the White Tiger the mind fluctuation of powerful and Spirit Eyes. This absolutely is formidable Variant Martial Soul.

Surrounding golden color desalinates gradually, space reverses.

Xu Yunhan restored original appearance, walks arm in arm, in mother cherishes, but to the correlation in space, his vision is actually the audiences falls on Huo Yuhao, is somewhat curious, somewhat strange visits him.

Outside Star Luo City, is sky over the Sun-Moon Empire army, the surrounding all are coagulate as before, the time and space, stagnated completely.

Even if Huo Yuhao is ignorant, can guess correctly indistinctly own that father-in-law's status, Gods, certainly was Gods. Besides Gods, who can control this time and space strength? One think has stood in the world peak, but compared with this father-in-law Sir, actually differs is too far and is too far.

Originally Wutong unexpectedly is the daughter of god, no wonder and no wonder she will have such talent.

This time he, did not have thoughts to ponder more issues, because, the time and space of blockade, flicker below opened completely.

Under is in the glare of the public eye, Sun-Moon Empire army, is Shrek Academy and Tang Sect people, as well as distant place the Star Lou Empire high level on Star Luo City top, military officers, had not discovered that any is not right, for them, all also were just one absent-minded, then all returned to normal.

Only the discerning person can discover that the airborne person was short of one, Tang Wutong has disappeared.

The Ju Zi(orange) complexion is somewhat pale, child returned to her to cherish, the personal appearance dodges, she has spread out and between Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao look complex visits her, at this moment, even if he does not know how should process the present all.

“I will keep the promise, certain meeting. This time, bright testimony.”Ju Zi(orange) to saying that Huo Yuhao muttered.

Huo Yuhao makes an effort has selected under.

Ju Zi(orange) takes a deep breath, changes the Sun-Moon Empire military officers, drinks one tenderly, “withdraws troops!”

Words that blue clothes youth just before leaving time spoke, already deeply the brand mark in her heart, Huo Yuhao also believes that has a testimony of Gods, Ju Zi(orange) this time is how regardless of does not dare to violate the promise.

But in fact, what he and Ju Zi(orange) does not know, the words that Gods spoke, in other words said actually, is Gods, cannot disturb the world of mortals all easily. If not involves his daughter, he cannot even come easily.

Under Ju Zi(orange) commander, the Sun-Moon Empire army restrains slowly, is similar to the tide retreats generally. The Star Luo City direction, after short silence, erupted to cheer immediately shocking.

Had finished, the war had eventually ended, the previous quarter also thinks they who must move toward the destruction, latter the moment controlled their destiny, and obtained the final victory of this war, this is the strange change!

Huo Yuhao float in midair, turns head to look to Duke White Tiger. Duke White Tiger is also visiting him, at this time this blood and iron marshal, already did not have the past war, his look is gentle and complex, even regarding Sun-Moon Empire, the hatred became desalinates. Because, the emperor in that country, is his blood relative grandson! His grandson, is controlling on Continent unexpectedly the biggest country, this is what kind its wonderful one.

“We go back.”Huo Yuhao nodded to Dai Hao.

He has grown up, the powerhouse who can eagerly anticipate a time truly, departure of Tang Wutong, making him feel like a knife twisting in the heart, but at this time, too many matters was waiting for he processes. Only then all handles after these matters, he can seek for the Tang Wutong form.

The son, oneself really had a son. Besides the Tang Wutong form, at this time his in mind, never doesn't have Xu Yunhan that pair of bright eye pupil?

Sighed, Huo Yuhao flew toward the Tang Sect people.

Under the leadership of Beibei, the Tang Sect powerhouses welcomed go forward, arrive in front of Huo Yuhao, Beibei stretched out the arms, has given him a big hug. Assumes Tang Sect besides Tang Ya, Tang Sect other powerhouses almost all here.

“Little Junior Brother, Wutong? Where on Wutong?”After Beibei hugged Huo Yuhao, cannot bear ask.

Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong walk are three years, some of their many words want to inquire.

Huo Yuhao low-spirited shaking the head, said: “Had some conditions a moment ago, when here matter, I sought her. First Senior Brother and Old Xuan, we return to Star Luo City first.”

Under the crowding around of people, Huo Yuhao and Duke White Tiger return to Star Luo City together.

New book issue! My newest work «Day Hot Main road» started to upload in the beginning Chinese net, everybody direct search, or selected the direct bus on our peerless Tang Sect homepage to find. Troubles everybody to advance the collection and recommendation. Peerless Tang Sect will terminate in the 20 of the month, before then, the new book renews one chapter every day, after 20 th, every day renews restores to two. «Day Hot Main road» is I especially has wanted to write, has formed in one's mind a very long work. This time, I must break through, writes has never written theme. Got used to seeing the growth experience of pursuing a goal with determination, this time, I must make everybody has a look, what is invincible tall Shuaifu, this book has to be called tall Shuaifu to foster the plan. Inside has the much knowledge, is I quotes in the reality, believes that everybody looked, to some of your help. The different functions and machine armor and invincible class, the innumerable amusing things, will show to everybody in this work. We hope that you like. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-617-part-2





Volume 13

#617 - Imperial Sacrifices Position


When he falls above the top, obtains, greets cheering of hero. Yes, at this moment, he is the Star Lou Empire hero!

A hero of changing the course of events, because has him, Star Lou Empire can preserve. And has set making of millennium. Millennium Sun-Moon Empire cannot attack Star Lou Empire, making Star Lou Empire have enough time to pursue the Sun-Moon Empire footsteps. Let alone, has this invincible Limit Douluo, Sun-Moon Empire wants to be perfidious, perhaps does not dare to implement.

Emperor Star Lou Empire Xu Jiawei welcomed, has a look at Huo Yuhao, has a look at Duke White Tiger again Dai Hao. Before Huo Yuhao in the words that airborne spoke, he may hear clearly.

“Dai brother, has not thought that you have such a good son.”Xu Jiawei acclaimed was saying.

Duke White Tiger smiles bitterly, “I am also today know!......”He wants saying that but does not know whether he is willing to recognize my this father, but has words on the tip of the tongue, has not said eventually.

Huo Yuhao sinking sound track: “Your majesty, the matter, I also had other matters to process. If you had anything to with Duke White Tiger say, please as soon as possible, then, I must mediate some private affairs with him.”

The official business, should then processes the time of private affair.

Spoke these words, Huo Yuhao changes Old Xuan, the knees kneels down, has done obeisance toward Old Xuan.

Old Xuan surprised [say / way]: “Yuhao, do you do?”

Huo Yuhao lowers the head, said: “Perhaps Old Xuan, I cannot keep Shrek City, cannot keep Tang Sect. My some matters must be done. I must look for Wutong to come back.”

On the Old Xuan old face reveals a smile, “is so?”

Huo Yuhao nodded.

“Gets up, child.”Old Xuan has drawn from the ground him personally, racket his shoulder, “if the Old Mu soul in heaven can see your present achievement, will be very certainly happy. Does matter that you want to handle, you are Academy, is Continent does were too many and are too many. Although I do not know that between you and Wutong had anything. But you want to make anything, does. We support you. As for the Academy aspect, you do not need to be worried that has the Tang Sect people, moreover, Sea God Pavilion were also many a young blood.”

“Um?”Huo Yuhao surprised looks at Old Xuan.

The flame form walked from Old Xuan together, invests into the bosom of Huo Yuhao during directly, closely grasps him.

“Younger brother, you came back finally. For three years, do not have the message, you may know that we do ask you to look laboriously?”This walks, hugs the Huo Yuhao person, is Phoenix Douluo Ma Xiaotao.

Her that rush of blood to the head red long hair was even more bright, compared with before, she appeared gentle, but that rich fire element fluctuation, wanted formidable were too many and are too many.

In the past became the accumulation of Evil Soul Master, qualitative change that Flaming Mucilage brought, as well as her assiduous practice and comprehension, in these three years time, not only achieved mastery through a comprehensive study, but also still further. In Shrek Academy the first person of younger generation, Absolute Fire Transcendent Douluo, in the future can move existence of Limit Douluo that level inevitably.

Huo Yuhao held Ma Xiaotao, the mood is lit immediately, all sorts that after this initially and Tang Wutong left, has to narrate together.

When Old Xuan hears Grim Reaper Douluo Ye Xishui and Dragon Emperor Douluo Long Xiaoyao falls from the sky successively, looks the disappointed color. Limit Douluo of older generation, at present only remaining he. Initially hard to solve Dual Black and White Sacred Dragons and Grim Reaper Douluo, all passed away.

“......, The situation was critical at that time, I really do not have the strength to inform Academy again, moreover is thinking Ju Zi(orange) can guarantee ten years do not launch the war, this talent and Wutong close up together. But who knows that had such situation. Blames me, has caused this Continent disaster.”Huo Yuhao was saying at the same time, in the look full is the low-spirited color.

“Good fortune makes the person!”Beibei said: “Little Junior Brother, can this blame you? You have done to suffice. Strikes to kill Xu Tianran, to witness leaving the world of two Limit Douluo, kills Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, all that in addition just you made, you are we belong to the heroes in Douluo Continent three countries', by strength of the, preserved has belonged to the Douluo Continent three countries final hopes. You have done cannot be good.”

Huo Yuhao hear of he mentioned Sun-Moon Empire, on face revealed a light smile: “Sun-Moon Empire will not exist quickly. He will change the name is Heaven Dou Empire. Ten thousand years ago, on our Douluo Continent, is Heaven Dou Empire and Star Lou Empire fights. Ten thousand years later today, must as before so. Sun-Moon Empire no doubt subtly affected Sky Soul Empire and Dou Ling Empire with Soul Guidance Technology. But in fact, this two countries over ten thousand years of background, affects the Sun-Moon Empire person similarly again in turn. Assimilates anyone as for whom finally, but also was very difficult to say. So long as did not have Sun-Moon Empire this name, then, the final victor, not necessarily is they.”

He has not said with the Gods related matter, that somewhat will abstain after all from, but actually attended to carry out to speak the truth.

“Younger brother, what to do do you then plan?”Ma Xiaotao asked.

Huo Yuhao said: “I, if wants the means to look for Wutong. Where although I do not know her, but I believe that in a place, can certainly unable to find her to be right.”At the same time was saying, he gains ground, looks out the horizon.

Since the Tang Wutong father is Gods, then, she also certainly followed the father to return to God Realm. To retrieve her, naturally must go to God Realm to be good.

Regarding others, God Realm radically is illusory existence, may regarding Huo Yuhao, he actually touch the God Realm front door.

In the Ma Xiaotao eye reveals several points of low-spirited color, “this time walked, when can come back?”

Huo Yuhao is smiling bitterly shaking the head, said: “I do not know.”

Ma Xiaotao after short absent-minded, said resolutely: “Younger brother, you go. The Academy matter you do not need to be worried, that side Tang Sect, there are your good partners. Academy has me. I had decided that forever keeps in Academy. Sea God Pavilion Master of next generation, I, when decided.”At the same time was saying, she has smiled.

Sea God Pavilion Master this position representative, not only the authority and status, have a deep responsibility.

“Elder sister, thank you.”Huo Yuhao makes an effort has hugged her.

Ma Xiaotao said with a smile: “I can for be these many, looks Wutong that you do, must find her. If will have in the future if possible, you may probably come back to visit me.”

Although guessed that but in her heart also faintly understands Huo Yuhao will go to what kind of place. In her heart never hasn't yearned? She had not said. She believes that depending on own strength, will not necessarily have moved that world possibility in the future.

In this time, suddenly, the back is hearing one to call out in alarm.

“Your majesty, may not, your majesty!”The origin of this sound, unexpectedly is Duke White Tiger.

Huo Yuhao turns round to look that sees only Duke White Tiger on one knee to kneel down in Emperor Star Lou Empire in front of Xu Jiawei, but in the Xu Jiawei hand is taking a handle sharp knife blade, the sharp knife blade to his throat.

“Dai Hao, you get up. Do not compel me. If you did not agree that I die before you immediately.”At this moment, this Star Lou Empire emperor, unexpectedly very somewhat the makings of rascal.

Duke White Tiger Dai Hao at this time is a chaotic appearance, not only he, Dai Yueheng, Dai Huabin and Dai Louli three brothers also came at this time, all kneels in him behind.

Huo Yuhao brow micro wrinkle, walked subconsciously.

Xu Jiawei sees him, on the face smiling face were more several points, “Yuhao, urged your father quickly.”

Huo Yuhao looks to Dai Hao, “what happened?”

Dai Hao heaved a deep sigh, said: “Your majesty wants the Zen position to give me.”

“Ah?”Huo Yuhao has not thought that this Emperor Star Lou Empire will come such one unexpectedly.

Xu Jiawei is confident of face, looks at Huo Yuhao saying: Useless that “my this emperor works as . Moreover, in recent years, I also work as was too tired and is too tired. Our Xu lineage/vein, following not outstanding talent, but Dai Clan actually progresses day by day. Said honestly, so long as Dai Hao sits the throne, has your deterrent, Star Lou Empire can be as stable as the rock of Gibraltar. Let alone, in the past this throne was your Dai Clan. Now, just gives back to you.”

After the process that this country nearly perishes, in the Xu Jiawei heart regarding the authority already awakened greatly. Especially arrival of Huo Yuhao.

Saw Huo Yuhao by a strength of person has ruined Sun-Moon Empire able to move unhindered invincible Sun-Moon Royal Family Soul Engineer Corp the time, Xu Jiawei secretly pledged in the heart, if Star Lou Empire can pass this disaster, he rather gives Huo Yuhao his throne.

All that then has became have dramatized, Huo Yuhao unexpectedly was Duke White Tiger the Dai Hao son. Xu Jiawei gets a sudden inspiration, had idea.

Gives Huo Yuhao the throne directly, might as well give convenient that Dai Hao comes. First did not say Duke White Tiger influence in empire, in addition in the past the Dai Clan book was Imperial Family, was much easier. Regardless of between Huo Yuhao and Dai Hao have what kind of contradiction, rescued father's situation from him a moment ago, Xu Jiawei understands that Huo Yuhao will certainly be protecting Dai Clan. But Star Lou Empire is wielded by Dai Clan, really may inherit.

Therefore, he had such decision, being duty-bound not to turn back has handed over the position of king.

Will Duke White Tiger comply? Xu Jiawei threaten with deaths immediately, has performed at present this picture.

Huo Yuhao somewhat was also speechless, this Emperor Star Lou Empire, was really too astute!

“Dai Hao, the idle talk little said that you comply, doesn't comply?”In a Xu Jiawei tight hand the dagger, the tian eye loudly shouted to clear the way: “Does not comply, you are the treacherous minister who kills the king!”

Duke White Tiger face upwards to heave a deep sigh, “your majesty your majesty, why bother are you? I comply.”1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-617-part-3





Volume 13

#618 - Challenges The Beastly God!


With Duke White Tiger: “I comply.”Also means that exchanging ownerships of Star Lou Empire.

Xu Jiawei puts down in the hand with a smile short blade edge, draws from ground Duke White Tiger, implored the one breath lightly, said: “I can rest finally. I under the imperial edict, considers the world this matter imperial edict immediately, how then must do, that was your matter. However, the title of duke may probably give me one. We exchange, as if also very interesting.”

Dai Hao somewhat speechless looks at face jumping for joy color Xu Jiawei, he is the joy of sincerity. For these years, is Monarch of the country, the pressure that he bore was too big, is too big. Now the powerful enemy retreated, has downloaded responsibility, his whole person seemed to be young.

“Before you handle other matters, our matters should also make one to mediate.”The Huo Yuhao sound conveys.

Dai Hao has turned round, look somewhat complex looks to him. The Dai Clan three brothers are also same.

Dai Louli goes forward fast several steps, before rushing to the Huo Yuhao body, cries: “Brother!”

On the Huo Yuhao face reveals a smile finally, Dai Louli was initially bigger, the Soul Power fluctuation that the body sends out is also not weak, has cultivating of Soul Emperor close Soul Saint unexpectedly. Obviously these years his growth.

Huo Yuhao hugged his, “must continue to try hard.”

“Um.”Dai Louli excited nod.

Some Dai Hao doubts looks at Dai Louli, “Luoli, you know him......”

To this time, Dai Louli naturally did not have any concealment necessity, nodded, said: “Master who father, in my mouth said that is my brother!”

“Ah?”Dai Hao immediately surprised staring in a big way the eye, he also clear remembering, initially that by the person who Dai Louli called the master, more than once had saved own life. Originally and he has been protecting himself. But oneself this father, has such outstanding sons not to know.

“Yuhao......”closing eyes of Dai Hao pain, he knows that he has a deficit this son, was too many, are too really many.

Dai Yueheng and Dai Huabin are also the look vary, Dai Yueheng is better, after all he and Huo Yuhao is not the person of same time, but Dai Huabin this time expression actually appears incomparably strange, he as if indistinctly recalled to mind anything, particularly childhood situation.

Huo Yuhao light [say / way]: “You come with me.”At the same time was saying, his big hand wields, golden light raises suddenly, covers in which the Dai Clan fathers and sons four people completely, the golden light lift-off, directly soars the Star Luo City outside to go.

“Brother, where can you lead us to go?”Dai Louli felt that atmosphere some are not right, asked to Huo Yuhao in a low voice.

Huo Yuhao said: “Duke's Estate.”

Dai Louli has gawked staring, in this time, is standing in rear Dai Huabin said suddenly loudly: “Huo Yuhao, if you want to revenge, comes to me.”

Huo Yuhao body one stiff, has turned round to look suddenly to him.

Facing some Huo Yuhao shock actually ice-cold looks, Dai Huabin actually happy does not fear.

“I have remembered, you were in the past that boy. Originally you are also living.”Saying of Dai Huabin coldly .

“!”Dai Hao turns round suddenly, a palm of the hand pulls out on the Dai Huabin face, the violent anger said: “You know that you actually know his existence. Said, in entire Duke's Estate, only then I do not know that also had such a son?”

Dai Huabin pulled out by Dai Hao pours in place, kneels no longer stands there, actually lowers the head, does not say a word.

Dai Hao gains ground, looks to Dai Yueheng, the anger exclaims: “Said that you also do know?”

Dai Yueheng smiles bitterly is kneeing down, he knows certainly that knows including age immature Dai Huabin, how he possibly does not know shortly, “initially, Ms. Yun died, he was missing. Father, I......”

“You were needless to say.”A Dai Hao foot tramples to fall him to the ground, then firm he, has actually had tears streaming down the face at this time.

“Yun'er, I am unfair to you! Also is unfair to our sons. In others eyes, I am commander, is the hero, is, before you, I is actually an out-and-out bastard.”

Huo Yuhao has turned around, has not said anything, has not gone to look at Dai Hao. Controls golden light to fly silently.

White Tiger Duke's Estate in approaching the Star Luo City place, but when he arrived here, actually dumbfounded.

Original White Tiger Duke's Estate how grand magnificent! But this time here, actually turned into stretch of ruins.

Spiritual Detection swept off, occupies a land area of vast White Tiger Duke's Estate to turn into stretch of ruins, complete bricks did not have.

The Dai Hao forced smile said: “That War-God Empress takes me as the dead enmity, her anger, already vented here. Naturally anything will not stay behind.”

The Huo Yuhao sudden whole body shivered fiercely, gains ground suddenly.

Golden light barrier accelerates instantaneously, falls suddenly in a direction, the rapidness of speed, the surrounding scenery therefore became illusory.

Frightened, Dai Hao at this time, actually felt the frightened mood from oneself this son. Is he afraid? What is he afraid? Dai Hao surprised looks at Huo Yuhao.

Yes, Huo Yuhao is afraid, because he has thought a possibility, will make him lament possibility lifelong.

Finally, that place was already in sight, after Spiritual Detection scanning of Huo Yuhao in the past, his whole person body shook shaking, but tight mood, relaxed finally.

Five people dropped from the clouds, fall on there.

That is a piece of repair very good grave, although is lonely, but is independent.

Reason that Huo Yuhao will fear, is feared that mother's grave is similar to that White Tiger Duke's Estate generally is also ruined! After all on this tombstone, there are inscriptions of Dai Hao two characters. If so, he will certainly not let off Ju Zi(orange).

But now looks like, this grave is lucky, here does not have the trace that the army passed by, as if dark, had a strength to protect here.

“Pū passes”one, Huo Yuhao kneels down in front of the tombstone, the sound is shivering, “mother, I came to see you. I came.”

Dai Yueheng and Dai Huabin were kneeling, at this time looks up to that tombstone. Dai Yueheng sighed, Dai Huabin was the pursing the lips lip, the body is actually shivering, in the eye pupil, had the tears to flow unexpectedly.

Dai Louli kneels down side Huo Yuhao, has done obeisance to that tombstone directly.

Only then Duke White Tiger is also standing, is only, this time he, actually already choked with sobs.

“Yun'er, Yun'er I am unfair to you. My actually you had sons not to know to me.”

Huo Yuhao kneels there, the sound actually becomes incomparable ice-cold, the matter that “you do not know also has, your duchess, maltreats my mother, we were inferior including the servants in the palace. I had asked mother, when can eat to the full. I also deep remembering, mother at that time the pain on face. In order to made me eat the chummy sesame seed cake, mother does not hesitate just to leave the sesame seed cake of pot to put in the bosom, took to me to eat. But she was actually scalded.”

“Mother died, but, even if before she dies that flickers, I have not seen a regret from her eyes. I am not really clear, you have anything to be worth her liking. Mother, all dehumanizing is you give him. You are the Star Lou Empire good marshal, is actually not a good husband.”

In the Huo Yuhao sound, does not have anger, has ice-cold. But his body, actually in unceasing is shivering.

Waits for this day, his waited was too long and is too long.

He came back finally, although he is not a duke, does not have the lofty title, but present he, completely had the qualifications to keep the past promise.

“I once well hated, to hate the duchess, hates to injure my mother's Dai Huabin. May afterward, I not hate them gradually. Because, my mother can not receive the pain that they bring. In the final analysis, because she has fallen in love with you, because of you, my mother will receive that many painstakingly.”

Before Dai Hao absent-minded arriving tombstone, his firm knee is slowly curving, kneels down in front of the tombstone, “right, you said right. All these blame me. I cannot give her to be happy, actually must with her in the same place. Has harmed her eventually. Yes, all these blame me. Yuhao, I know you to hate, I do not have the face to make you call me a father. But asked you to allow me to live again for one year, when I the domestic matter will arrange, came here to build a simple hut to occupy. At that time, I finally can idle, every day accompanied your mother to speak, every day confessed to her. That day when I die, if you permit, thinks that I had that qualifications, I also buried here, was accompanying her, if there is a next generation, I will exhaust all my abilities to love her.”

Huo Yuhao look no longer ice-cold, the Dai Hao words, touched in his heart finally the softest place. He knows certainly in the past what mother most hoped to obtain is anything. It is not any status or is other, she is only one is hoping the husband can come back, can defend in husband concubine!

One wanted to do, doesn't make him confess before mother's grave? He said that in Huo Yuhao heart holds to read, gradually desalinated eventually.

To his present cultivating is, in addition to the control of Power of Emotion, already was not initially that because of hating to hoodwink the eyes age.

Stands up, Huo Yuhao arrives at side Dai Hao, held him.

“Hopes you to keep one's word, can achieve all that you say today.”Spoke these words, after he has thought deeply about one slightly next, said: “In the past I left, had sent the pledge, must revenge for my mother, must make her have the most honored status. I know that my mother most hopes actually, is your wife. Then, you received the Zen position of Emperor Star Lou Empire now, I want your to seal|confer my mother to be an empress, later can not set up the empress again in addition, particularly cannot make the duchess be the empress, looked that in share that you confessed that I no longer looked for the She enmity.”

Because of writing a book, cannot have anything to spend the time the hobby, therefore has fallen in love with the liquor. Weary, relaxes, will think slightly two cups, understood the liquor gradually. Therefore afterward had the Bacchus. But new book «Day Hot Main road» in alternative forms more specialized told the story about liquor to everybody. Including Bacchus story that in some true reality world has. The second chapter, the Goths old distillery, has sent! Everybody has a look quickly. The new book also troubles everybody to collect and recommend, thanks. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-618-part-1





Volume 13

#618 - Challenges The Beastly God!


Looks at Huo Yuhao becomes gentle many faces, Duke White Tiger smiles bitterly, “you wanted to look for the She enmity unable to achieve.”

“Um?”Huo Yuhao stares.

Dai Huabin bites the mandibular joint tightly, the [say / way] of having tears streaming down the face: “My mother already died. Five years ago died. If you want to revenge, clashes me to come.”

Did the duchess die?

Huo Yuhao stayed, yes! The birth and death, any person will die, at this moment, he suddenly thinks very relaxed, this is the relaxedness of heart. Since many years, have pressed a big stone on their heart to dissipate on such to shatter. Had finished, yes, all finished. Has hated, finished finally.

Dai Hao look complex looks at Huo Yuhao, “child, what do you then have to plan?”

Huo Yuhao said: The matter that “the matter, I wanted to handle, has basically achieved. This time, Sun-Moon Empire decides however does not dare to be perfidious again. Let alone also has existence of that relations. The Xu Jiawei Zen position gives you, absolutely is a move of good chess. Although cannot say that Star Lou Empire millennium without cause for grief, but in hundred years, should not have any dispute really again. Only needs to develop well is. I must handle the matter that I must handle.”

Duke White Tiger said: “Will you also come back?”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, said: “Should unable. I will go to a remote place.”

Dai Hao sighed, “I know that I did not have the qualifications to make you call me a father. However, I actually as before must say one, my son, takes care. If some day you tired, tired outside, comes back.”

His son called, the Huo Yuhao body shook shaking, the last hostility in look also melted. Is gazing at the tombstone, on the tombstone, mother's voice and face smiling face appears in the mind. As if mother full Han is hoping looks at itself.

“Father......”two characters gently. Puts out from the Huo Yuhao mouth.

Duke White Tiger tiger body shakes greatly, some do not dare to believe looks to him, fierce stretching out the arms. Effort hugs into to cherish him.

Yes! This is own son!

Huo Yuhao this “father”summon, naturally not because of Dai Hao. But is he knows that what mother most desired is anything. So long as can make mother happy, regardless of makes anything, he wants.

“You walk first, I want to accompany my mother.”Huo Yuhao said in a soft voice.

Duke White Tiger loosens the both arms, turns around to look to the tombstone, supple sound track: “Yun'er, you are waiting. I came back to accompany you quickly. I have a deficit your, uses my latter half of one's life to repay.”

“Brother”Dai Louli called out.

Dai Yueheng has also stood up, and has pulled up Dai Huabin.

Dai Yueheng arrives at side Huo Yuhao, has patted his shoulder.

Dai Huabin also walked, vision complex visits him, long time, somewhat difficult [say / way]: “Sorry.”

The Huo Yuhao corners of the mouth place reveals a forced smile, “whatever, my mother ressurection, your mother is not. In the past. Passed. Ok!”

Ok! These two characters said from his mouth, how difficult! But he said eventually, in this moment. He puts aside that hatred in innermost feelings finally completely.

Star Lou Empire Xindi Dai Hao, leading three sons to leave. Before the tombstone, only remaining Huo Yuhao people.

His kneeling silently before mother grave, on the face is revealing the light smile.

“Mom, this is you wants to see. You are so good. I have achieved, I made him return to your side finally, later, had him to accompany you, you will not feel lonely. Mom. I quite think that you, good to think you! If you are also living, that this good.”

He such kneels before the grave. In a low voice was pouring out, whatever time passed. In an instant, has knelt a one day night.

Light golden light, behind condenses in him, gradually takes shape.

“Had finished?”The gentle sound will immerse, to mother recalled that Huo Yuhao awakens, he gained ground suddenly, sees, is a familiar and kind face.

“Is you.”Huo Yuhao stands up, respectful salutes to oneself behind golden hair youth.

On the God of Emotion Rong Nianbing face is revealing the light smile, “your matter, I knew. Evidently, your present is not happy!”

The Huo Yuhao forced smile said: “This solution, was solved finally. But, are baseless many a son, Wutong went to me. Where I do not even know her.”

Rong Nianbing said: “What do you have to plan?”

The Huo Yuhao look instantaneously becomes firm, “I must look for her, regardless of pays what kind of price, I must look for her. Please lead me to go to God Realm, she certainly there. Where do you know her? Is the Wutong father, actually?”

Rong Nianbing said: “Nobody can lead you to go to God Realm, I am not good. To go to God Realm, can only depend upon own strength, but is not the external strength. You want to inherit my God Position, but also misses the last test not to complete. You need to become most powerhouse on Douluo Continent. As for your future father-in-law's matter, when you can inherit the position of my Gods truly time, I naturally can tell you.”

The Huo Yuhao look moves slightly, said: “What you said that Beast God?”

Rong Nianbing nods the head slightly, his body also starts gradually to desalinate, changes into the point golden light dissipation in the air.

“Goes, you defeat Beast God that moment, can inherit the time of position of my Gods.”

Huo Yuhao stands in same place, intention phonograph, on the face appears gradually a smile.

Although God of Emotion Rong Nianbing has not stated clearly, but can listen from his words, he and that future father-in-law should be the understanding. In other words, so long as can arrive at God Realm successfully, then, wants to seek for Wutong is not the extremely difficult matter.

Beast God, Di Tian! Finally to has can challenge your time?

Intense fighting intent bursts out from the Huo Yuhao god suddenly, only then defeats Beast God, can look for own Wutong. No one can prevent itself from going to God Realm!

Huo Yuhao has turned around, kneels down to mother's tombstone once more.

“Mom, I must look for your daughter-in-law, when I retrieve Wutong, certainly leads her to worship you.”

After kneeling three times and kowtowing nine times, Huo Yuhao sets out, soars, flies in the Star Luo City direction.

In Star Luo City, is brimming with a happy expression.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Detection easy covers entire Star Luo City, seeks person who he must find. Quick, he found the Tang Sect people stationed is.

Breaks the space, appears in front of the partners.

Must leave, he must say goodbye to his partners, says goodbye to Old Xuan.

“Can walk?”Beibei looks at Huo Yuhao, in the look, filled has not abandoned. Three years do not see, a dynasty returns, actually must leave.

Huo Yuhao be with smile on the face looks at Beibei, said: “First Senior Brother, you could rest assured that after I have retrieved Wutong, we will certainly come back. I must hold the wedding with Wutong in our Tang Sect and in Shrek City. Without your blessings, our happiness are incomplete.”

Listened to his such saying, Beibei, He Caitou, Xu Sanshi and other talented people to laugh.

“What do you also wait for? Quickly has not gone, must come back the Wutong belt, otherwise, you did not use.”Jiang Nannan said with a smile.

“Yes, certain!”

Said goodbye to the partners, Huo Yuhao leaves Star Luo City once more. After he rises into the upper air, immediately has not actually left, but turns around the personal appearance, is looking out the Sun-Moon Empire direction.

They already on road. Yunhan, Little Yunhan. Disappointed flows in his heart. Ju Zi(orange) Ju Zi(orange), I do not know how really should face you. Perhaps, is really, good fortune makes the person. You said right, I do not have the qualifications to be the Yunhan father, he is you, is your son.

Shaking of effort, abandons in the mind the last distracting thoughts, Huo Yuhao jumps, flies to shoot to go in the Star Dou Forest direction.

......

After January, outside Star Luo City, the original White Tiger Duke's Estate ruins were cleaned up cleanly, makes the ancient rite of making sacrifices stage.

Xu Jiawei informed the world, the Zen situated in Duke White Tiger Dai Hao. Xu Jiawei is cannozed as Duke Star Crown, after the ancient rite of making sacrifices ended. In the original White Tiger Duke's Estate site, construction mansion.

Dai Hao ascends the throne proclaims oneself emperor, seals Dai Louli as the crown prince, Dai Yueheng and Dai Huabin for the crown prince. Seals deceased better self Huo Yun as the empress. Presents Ice Spirit Douluo Huo Yuhao is State Master.

Shrek City relieves prohibits, Shrek Academy recruits students again outward. Tang Sect expands the Soul Guidance Hall R &amp\; D institution, Soul Guidance Hall Hall Master takes over by He Caitou. Xuan Ziwen joins Shrek Academy, appointed Soul Guidance Faculty Dean. No matter what Ma Xiaotao Martial Soul Faculty Dean.

Old Xuan passes on the position of Sea God Pavilion Master in Yan Shaozhe, crossed on the good wine to add the chicken leg the wonderful day.

No matter what Ice Spirit Douluo Huo Yuhao reputation Pavilion Master.

After March.

The Sun-Moon Empire army evacuates in Star Lou Empire completely. Returns Bright Struggle Mountain Range.

Also a half year.

War-God Empress Ju Zi(orange), resists opposition, under silver moon Douluo the support of Old Kong as well as military, announced that Sun-Moon Empire changes the name is: Heaven Dou Empire.

Starting from this moment, Douluo Continent restored for ten thousand years ago, the day fights, the Star Luo two potentials of big empire north and south confrontations.

Continent belongs to tranquilly. The wound of war in the rapid growth of Soul Guidance Technology, was smoothed gradually.

......

Instant thousand li(500 km).

As if only passed several instances, Star Dou Forest had already been in sight.

The silver glittering, Huo Yuhao breaks space, reappears in the midair, but this time he, actually already sky over Star Dou Forest.

Sky over Star Dou Forest, is always the famous airspace reservation. May at this moment, after Huo Yuhao appears, does not have any flight Soul Beast to dare to approach.

The sky is sunny, the blue sky such as washes. The beautiful sunlight shines on Star Dou Forest, making this big forest lend the thick life aura.

……

The «Day Hot Main road» third chapter already, although writes is very tired, but specially was stimulated for these days. Two years have not written the new book, write the feeling of new book, like protecting an immature baby, hoping him to be able perfect growing up slowly. Troubles everybody to collect and recommend, thanks. The new book will surely give you pleasantly surprised one. ( to be continued ) 752



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-618-part-2





Volume 13

#618 - Challenges The Beastly God!


Float in airborne, the Huo Yuhao body starts to shine a light halo, huge Spiritual Power, is centered on his body outward diffusion, flows swiftly general just like the mercury, spreads to entire Star Dou Forest.

“Di Tian, I came!”The simple five characters, change into the tidal thought that spreads to Star Dou Forest, in an instant, big forest complete coverage of this length and breadth, the mind thought of that terror, making the powerhouses including 100,000 years of Soul Beast, shivered all.

Star Dou Forest central area. Lake of Life.

The giant head raises from that deep green lake water suddenly, carries over the innumerable water splash. Rich life aura disperses to all around along with it.

The golden giant eye pupil opens slowly, the huge body raises gradually.

“Did you come finally? I and others you waited to be very long and be very long.”The low and deep sound from the sky reverberates, rises the wave to be billowing, sky over entire Star Dou Forest, immediately slight distortion. The sky gradually changed color, the beautiful sunlight, shortly will be covered by Wu Yun (black clouds).

Huo Yuhao float in midair, faces this Wu Yun (black clouds) to press the city to destroy the potential actually to remain unmoved.

“The day, I also waited for a long time and is very very long.”Huo Yuhao vision tranquil looks at a direction.

One group of smoke clouds from that direction lift-off, just started, only then small one group, but is quick, the smoke cloud enlarges rapidly, just like a giant smoke dragon general lift-off.

Full of vitality Star Dou Forest, unexpectedly becomes in this moment a silence, a sound has not sent out.

The smog condenses, Beast God Di Tian of a black clothed and long hair shawl, the double hand back after behind, that appears in front of Huo Yuhao.

His pair of profound eye pupil falls on Huo Yuhao, looks at front this as if unadorned youth, his slight bow. “That time cannot hold you, I know that will have such a day of arrival, but has not thought. On this day comes such rapidness. Power of Destiny has camouflaged all your, I have looked for your one year. But throughout has not actually sought for your trail. You dare to look for me today, thinks that had grasps certainly?”

Huo Yuhao shows a faint smile, looks at Beast God, looks like the old friend who long time does not see is common, said: “You are in front of me a palatial mountain, does not surmount, I will never move toward the peak.”

Di Tian smiles cold, said: “That has a look. Is I stays behind the Star Dou Forest destiny, you have stepped from me, pursues your God Position.”

Huo Yuhao not accidental Di Tian knows one pursue the God Position matter, if he has not felt, he was not Beast God.

“Comes up.”Di Tian drinks one coldly, one step steps forward, the silver glittering, he escaped into the space to disappear does not see.

Huo Yuhao gives a calm smile, is one step steps forward similarly, marches into the space.

To their this levels. Each other resistance arrived at the boundary of simplifying, but absolutely is more dangerous than any fight.

The clear and bright sky, almost flickered below darkly. The dim ray gives people a strange aesthetic sense. Has not constrained, instead has to plant to keep aloof an edition of sublimation.

Two silver light are almost simultaneously glitter in this Wu Yun (black clouds), Huo Yuhao and Di Tian simultaneously appear above ten thousand meters upper air.

Even if the powerhouse of Titled Douluo rank, is unable to hope to attain so the altitude. Not only here has the ultra-low temperature, the air is extremely thin, intense astral wind.

If the general biology suddenly appears here, then, the flesh and blood will change into flying ash withering away instantaneously.

But Huo Yuhao and Di Tian simultaneously appear in this level, seems actually likely on the flat land general. Not any change. Moreover, they simultaneously present time. Even continually distance, before, in airborne exactly the same.

Di Tian nodded to Huo Yuhao. “I very long had not had such fighting spirit like today. Also there is many year of nobody to challenge me. Actually, I am very lonely.”

Huo Yuhao said: “I can feel, actually, you that have not been attached to the life, why?”

Di Tian gives a calm smile, “if you also lived for several hundred thousand years, you will not ask my such question. I am familiar with each dust in Star Dou Forest, sees this in society to occur all slight. To here, I was already sick. Is a responsibility, making me persevere here, cannot leave. Otherwise, I rather use the future years to pursue a novelty.”

“? Beast God wants to pursue what novel is?”Huo Yuhao somewhat curious asking.

In the Di Tian eye pupil reveals one to yearn for the color, “world outside Douluo Continent. I, had swum around this world long ago. Do you know? Actually our world is a giant sphere, if flies in a direction, the final result circles a big circle, returns to the zero point. But on our world, the sea occupied the most region, genuine land only then few pieces. But has the highest civilization, is our Douluo Continent, in addition afterward Sun-Moon Continent. Naturally, now has Douluo, did not have Sun-Moon. I was born in Douluo Continent, therefore, to this point, I am is happy.”

Huo Yuhao visits him surprisedly, “our are world a sphere?”

Di Tian nodded, said: “Right . Moreover, star that we can see every night, is spheres, Sun and moon is also.”This time he, looked like precipitated several hundred thousand years of wise.

“Therefore, I want other planet besides us to have a look. I attempted to fly high. After exceeding certain altitude, the oppression strength and binding force in air will reduce, but, there actually barrier, only then runs out of that barrier, has to track down another world possibility. I do not know whether my this life can achieve, but I want to attempt really very much. Perhaps that wall barrier, is God Realm gives us the fetter of this world. If I can overrun, has to go to God Realm possibly also perhaps. I even thought that God Realm likely existence on another planet. Dominates above us existence. There, can control many strengths and mysteries.”

“Why don't you try?”Asking of Huo Yuhao doubts.

Di Tian shook the head, said: “I cannot. Among the life and death has the big terror, but this for me is actually not anything, but, I actually and is not only living. I must protect Star Dou Forest, must protect our Dragon Clan final pure bloodlines. Therefore. I cannot take risk, I must live, even if alone bored is living. Also is the same.”

“Said honestly, your appearance. Gave me pleasantly surprised. From you, before I saw some, other these humanity not to have. Over ten thousand years of nobody can go to God Realm through their practice, obtained God Realm to approve, but you, had this possibility finally. If not because on you are having our Star Dou destiny, I am even willing to help your helping hand, only hopes after you, can come back, the thing that sees in that side tells me you. For me, this is most meaningful.”

“Was a pity that you fused Three Eyed Golden Lion, this has been doomed, among us can only be the opposition. I will not kill you, if this time I can defeat you, I will get up your seal, making you keep Star Dou. Takes your present cultivating as and ** degree, the millenniums will not have the life issue. Moreover, I will also moisten your body with the Lake of Life lake water. And finds the way to let under your birth the descendant, then from your descendant, inherits this destiny.”

“I will look for 100,000 years of Soul Beast to be the wife to you. Like this your descendants will have the Soul Beast characteristics, the life can be long-time, but your destiny, the association inherits in the birth descendant's process. At that time, I killed you again, your Destiny Skull fusion having the descendant of Soul Beast bloodlines. His long life and destiny fuse, must be able to guarantee my Star Dou Forest to be safe. This matter I have thought is very long, thought that like this processes should be the best result.”

Di Tian said is very earnest, completely as if these matters have completed.

On the Huo Yuhao face does not have any look change. Silently listens to him to narrate.

“Has unbearabl chill in a high position, originally Beast God. Also is not joyful. Even tracks down own thing unable to achieve continually. However, I admire you very much. Perseveres for a responsibility, you are worth me admiring.”At the same time was saying, Huo Yuhao bows to Di Tian slightly, shows the respect.

After bowing, he slowly is also straight the body, the vision also starts with the change of movement becomes different. The gentle look started becomes bright, fills sharp bright.

“All that but, you conceive, must be based on matter. That is, defeats me!”The Huo Yuhao sound spreads by far, the billowing voice, rips open a crack airborne Wu Yun (black clouds) unexpectedly actually. The bright sunlight shines the earth once more, shines on him, making his whole person cover golden color.

Di Tian nodded, said: “Good, defeats you. Then, we start.”At the same time was saying, his right hand lifts slowly, remote to Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao also makes with his same movement, similarly is the right hand lifts, not only that on him is also bursting out the unequalled intense ray.

Round gold sun, behind suddenly shines in him, intense ray, far ultra space sunlight. Under the golden background, this time he, looks like the deity arrives general.

Di Tian behind, similarly shines a Sun, compared with the brilliance of Huo Yuhao, this Sun was actually the black, like black ink, in the jet black edge, has a purple halo jet black.

The purple ray slight twinkle, is rippling one just like the flame light mark.

gold sun and black sun, each other confront in the sky, Wu Yun (black clouds) originally, instantaneously was also turning into half golden color and half black. Moreover not in top of the head, but was subsides the under foot.

Tomorrow the chapter of renewal of new book can place early morning, after zero point, to list. The good novel feeling, to the list, is a little not for a long time disturbed, a little anticipated. I have not been reporting the too high hope, but I believe you. The 14 th work. I can also like Venerable Jin Yong, write an antithetical couplet. Hey.

Therefore, after 0 : 00 pm, accompanies our new book to clash the list! Cheered for it, the new chapter, will give everybody saying that the story of deity lost treasure, world liquor king! ( to be continued ) 752



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-618-part-3





Volume 13

#619 - Three Spirits Nucleus!


Di Tian has 800,000 years of cultivating of after is! His strength, such as deep pool like prison. Their palms, almost also glisten. golden light and black light, collide instantaneously together.

They, originally be only about hundred meters distance, but under this collision, the body of both sides is similar to receives an electric shock general, explodes instantaneously draws back.

Before them at the central point of position, one group of glares sticks out suddenly instantaneously, the terrifying energy storm made the entire space fiercely shiver.

Giant black hole appeared in that position instantaneously, the diameter has achieved about the hundred zhang (333m), crazy was swallowing the surrounding all, below clouds therefore ascended, poured into toward that black hole.

The strange picture also appears, under swallowing of that black hole, in the sky looks like presented the tornado that black and golden color mixed to blend to be ordinary, although this continued less than ten seconds, but actually world phenomenon.

Huo Yuhao and Di Tian are separated by several kilometers, each other confronts. In the Di Tian eye flashes through one startled to accommodate, “your achievement, third Soul Nucleus? Space Attribute?”

Huo Yuhao nods the head slightly, “good. Otherwise, why can I challenge you?”

......

Soul Power blends, the breakthrough arrived at the most crucial time. Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor strength already consumed being not much left, in the dantian, third Soul Nucleus already took shape, but actually in independent revolution.

Sits in the cave, Huo Yuhao in the heart senses at this time a great deal. He knows that the following fusion, is most essential one step, fused successfully, that reached the sky in a single bound. If failed, then, not only need destroy, sits in opposite Tang Wutong is also so.

If some choices, Huo Yuhao rather never will practice this third Soul Nucleus. Also is not willing to take risk with Tang Wutong.

But, their within the body has injected into that many Soul Power by Dragon Emperor Douluo and Grim Reaper Douluo, does not absorb. Means the death. Does not control, dying is quicker.

Therefore had this closing up.

Now. He must do, is lets this third Soul Nucleus and own another two Soul Nucleus fuses mutually, and in the collision process, forms a brand-new collision chain link.

To realizing from experience of Space Power, his completed was similar, but at present, is most important, realizes from experience this with own Soul Nucleus fuses completely. Also must control the processes of three Soul Nucleus collisions, this is what kind difficult!

If were not before has swallowed Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler complete Spiritual Power, Spiritual Power promoted another level, a Huo Yuhao point assurance not to have, but currently, he finally has certain assuring.

The mind thought transfers completely, three big Soul Nucleus velocities of whirl slow down in his control gradually. Slower, waits a minute process of fusion not to make a mistake on exceed easily. This without doubt is the best choice.

Three Soul Nucleus speeds are weaken, Huo Yuhao starts to carry on the trimming. He by mind Soul Nucleus of own between the eyebrows place, was the first Soul Nucleus velocity of whirl sped up. But the second, 2-3 rd Soul Nucleus velocity of whirl of chest place and dantian place weakened several points.

As the matter stands, first, 22 nd Soul Nucleus that blended mutually started becomes some disorder.

Their each other blending, are based on balanced. Then can complete Yin-Yang Supplement. At this time, a velocity of whirl quick, a velocity of whirl is slow. As the matter stands, balanced must be broken naturally.

The Soul Power fluctuation does not start steadily, but Huo Yuhao has actually made a strange choice, he extracts quietly Spiritual Power in spiritual sea.

mind Soul Nucleus in the spiritual sea core position, he extracts, while mind Soul Nucleus and spiritual sea division gradually.

Huge Spiritual Power in spiritual sea, is the mind Soul Nucleus source is, does not have the support of spiritual sea. mind Soul Nucleus cannot maintain steady. Also is Huo Yuhao this formidable mind controlling force dares such to do, trades Titled Douluo to carry on such attempt. Already death does not know where went.

Within the body Soul Power slightly ballooning. Huo Yuhao started his true difficult travel.

mind Soul Nucleus under his control, the huge Spiritual Power gable in subsides by spiritual sea pulls out to suddenly. Fell toward the chest place unexpectedly.

But second Soul Nucleus of chest place, actually under his Soul Power promotes, rise.

Right, he must do, is, changing positions!

To complete the practice of this third Soul Nucleus, the best method that he thinks is so.

After absorbing Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler huge Spiritual Power, in fact, Huo Yuhao two Soul Nucleus some were not balanced. Because mind Soul Nucleus is too strong, but Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus is more inferior. Therefore, when each other collides produces whirlpool Soul Power, will have the situation that the mind Soul Nucleus strength swallows the Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus strength to appear.

Therefore, before Huo Yuhao, has to separates part of spiritual sea and mind Soul Nucleus, the independent storage, this has not had problems. But at this time, he must rely on, is actually the mind Soul Nucleus superiority, carries on this fusion.

The Yin-Yang Supplement two big Soul Nucleus sudden universe invert, pain that this brings, looks like all moves out of the way the five main internal organs (entrails), places position again.

Although before, Huo Yuhao has prepared all, all routes arranged. But when he does truly, is bearing the huge pain as before.

Two Soul Nucleus each other interlock, in that flash, the Huo Yuhao whole body pore bursts out blood fog, at the tenacious degree of his body. Does not have the means to bear the so fierce pain. On the forehead, Eye of Destiny has opened uncontrolled, inside does not have gloomily up.

Eye of Destiny is in itself and mind Soul Nucleus mutually fusion! Now Huo Yuhao must move out mind Soul Nucleus, independent existence, this has the huge influence to Eye of Destiny obviously.

But he actually as before persists in such doing.

Two Soul Nucleus each other separate finally, Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus is upward, mind Soul Nucleus downward, they each other collide and energy in entanglement, Soul Power that produces was not already steady. Low and deep airing sound, continuously appears on Huo Yuhao, this is because Soul Power is not steady, in results that his within the body unceasing exploding produces.

Finally, Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus by extremely irritable push originally mind Soul Nucleus position, but mind Soul Nucleus also extremely irritably arrived at the chest place, two big Soul Nucleus each other were actually towing, wanted to return to the original position. Among them the Soul Power chain link, looks like has tightened the rubber band is common, so long as relaxes the control. They will immediately recoil place originally.

Also at this time, Huo Yuhao unexpectedly slowly has opened eyes.

If some people can see his present look. Will discover that in his pair of pupil, actually has the innumerable chaotic rays to glitter.

He is shivering, lifts own right hand, approached the Eye of Destiny place fitting on own forehead in the past.

Such usually is looking like in the simple movement, at this moment, unexpectedly becomes incomparably difficult.

Finally, the right hand of Huo Yuhao lifts played the enough high position. His fierce effort, right hand according to Eye of Destiny.

One group of strange rays glisten suddenly there, Huo Yuhao lowers roars, his voice was ordinary just like the wild animal at this time. Meanwhile, he remove the dantian place third Soul Nucleus final protection. Third Soul Nucleus is revolving strength appears immediately, the huge force of traction erupts suddenly there, space Soul Power whirlpool that produces instantaneously mind Soul Nucleus collision toward Huo Yuhao chest place in the past.

But also at this moment, unequalled huge Spiritual Power, instantaneously erupted in the Huo Yuhao Eye of Destiny position. The rubber bands that between first, 22 nd Soul Nucleus huge pulling strength, in addition tightened. Control that as well as Huo Yuhao lets loose suddenly.

mind Soul Nucleus and Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus, spring instantaneously, respectively toward position return originally.

But at this time. The third Soul Nucleus strength is towing on mind Soul Nucleus, under that huge pulling force function, this third Soul Nucleus was entrained the dantian by pulling immediately, left position originally.

At this time if with several characters described that the situation in Huo Yuhao within the body, the snafu, is then most appropriate.

Three Soul Nucleus, complete shifting, within the body Spiritual Power and Absolute Ice Soul Power or Space Attribute energy. All is in a confusion.

However, three Soul Nucleus in process of such revolving. A little is not chaotic. That is, mind Soul Nucleus toward originally the between the eyebrows position ball in the past. Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus wants the position.

This point. Because in Eye of Destiny has the function of formidable suction suddenly, becomes more rapid.. mind Soul Nucleus shot instantaneously, with the Eye of Destiny suddenly fitting, and erupted unequalled huge Spiritual Power, in that flash, mind Soul Nucleus, Eye of Destiny and Huo Yuhao spiritual sea, has completed the fusion instantaneously. Spiritual Power sublimates suddenly.

At that time, the mountain peak that Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong were, turned into the pure golden color because of Spiritual Power of this terror.

However, that force of traction was really too strong, Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus just returned to the position, pulled rebound. Third Soul Nucleus at this time, actually shot. The energy between their two, has had instantaneously the collision.

These two directions of Soul Nucleus revolving are clearly opposite, strange appeared. Under the precision control of Huo Yuhao, they almost in same instantaneously have also completed the effect of Yin-Yang Supplement mutually fusion. But actually in Soul Nucleus should not in position, but rises the place of Huo Yuhao close shoulder.

Three Soul Nucleus, have formed a strange triangle.

New week, is the peerless Tang Sect last week. Two years, had soon ended, are somewhat moved. I know that place some of ending are not entirely as desired, some everybody unsatisfied places, plot that also some have not shown completely. But a book has written for two years, a day has not broken, I was a little really tired. This is my first attempt writes so long big lengthy. We hope that everybody many selects time to me. Next time will write again is so long, this time will be certainly better.

Peerless Tang Sect last act, means that new world is going to open. I have adjusted the good condition, welcomes the arrival of «Day Hot Main road» with fullest mind, therefore, the new week, lets we taste Tang Sect at the same time, pays attention to our new books. The day hot main road, I to everybody a pleasant surprise, the theme will certainly inform my evolution with one type has never written! Sought the collection, to ask the recommendation ticket for the new book. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-619-part-1





Volume 13

#619 - Three Spirits Nucleus!


\; The controlling force that the Huo Yuhao previous quarter just let loose, came back at this time.

Has completed Yin-Yang Supplement two Soul Nucleus, the submersion, third Soul Nucleus returns to the dantian suddenly, that is its place, but second Soul Nucleus? Then returns to the chest.

Because of the Yin-Yang Supplement reason, two Soul Nucleus rays become especially powerful. But first Soul Nucleus huge Spiritual Power, subsided at this time.

Its arrival, is not sole and Soul Nucleus collides, but was the direct hit on the second, 2-3 rd Soul Nucleus chain link. Huge Spiritual Power, pours into to whirlpool Soul Power in that extreme twist in directly.

Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus and mind Soul Nucleus are Yin-Yang Supplement, among them naturally appeared fuses supplementarily. But Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus and that third Soul Nucleus is also Yin-Yang Supplement, under each other substitution, unexpectedly becomes the extraordinary harmony.

mind Soul Nucleus is most formidable, its strength drops to Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus, again through after Absolute Ice Soul Nucleus fuses, subsides to third Soul Nucleus. Excessively many Spiritual Power were melted through the fusion by third Soul Nucleus. By the second, 2-3 rd Soul Nucleus strength, just dominates mind Soul Nucleus above them the energy melts.

A strange balance, like this appeared. It looks like circles link of reciprocation, presents in Huo Yuhao within the body. But Soul Power of these process multiple fusions, condense in the Huo Yuhao dantian, through his law of Mysterious Heaven Skill daily practice, spreads to the meridians again.

The beforehand disorder, vanishes completely, the Huo Yuhao situation turned, the forehead is the Spiritual Power agglomeration. The dantian is the Soul Power agglomeration. In his Soul Power. Simultaneously had mind, Absolute Ice and space, three species.

Third Soul Nucleus, the fusion is completed!

The entire process said that so is complex, in the process of implementation, the complex degree can be imagined. Can finally complete the most important point, actually lies in Spiritual Power enough formidable, mind controlling force enough precise.

Right hand of Huo Yuhao. Puts down slowly, around his Eye of Destiny eye pupil, is glittering quietly the apertures of thorn shapes.

Yes, there, has special existence.

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler initially was struck by Huo Yuhao kills, stays behind not only one 700,000 years cultivate for Soul Nucleus, small one eye. That one eye is in itself the vertical eye shape. It is not the ornaments, but is Soul Bone that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler leaves behind. Unprecedented Soul Bone, External Soul Bone. Evil Eye!

This Evil Eye, normally, does not only have humanity to absorb, one is because implication Spiritual Power was extremely huge, another reason is because it is vertical eye, it cannot even say that is Soul Bone. But is a strange energy combining way. Above Soul Bone.

And storage. Is purest Spiritual Power, as well as some memories of Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler about own ability.

It when the choice seizes abandons Huo Yuhao, actually has also paid the huge price, after all the main body did not have, he impossible to inject in Soul Ring to fuse with Huo Yuhao all strengths. In this case, he kept in Soul Ability this part this small one eye.

But who knows that seizes the shed to be defeated, controlling force that in this one eye he kept naturally vanished. Huo Yuhao in the final moment, the use fuses in this Evil Eye situation, lets own Spiritual Power big eruption. Thus promoted Absolute the mind controlling force, had just the process of this fusion., The fusion is not so impossible to be completed.

After the fusion is completed, he rested for a long time, fully restored. Then, helping the Tang Wutong process, took his Spiritual Power to cultivate, in addition the controlling force, he was Tang Wutong that Evil Eye, no, should say that was Eye of Asura is right.

......

Hears the Di Tian surprised sound, in the mind to recall initially cultivated the difficulty of third Soul Nucleus, in the Huo Yuhao heart sighed. His success, has very big relations with the luck. If no Dragon Emperor Douluo huge Soul Power, Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler Soul Ring and that one eye, he is the basic opportunity does not have.

Only then has attempted truly, can know that the condensation of this third Soul Nucleus is difficult.

He is unprecedented first, Tang Wutong, although is second, but actually in his empirical base, and is helped to complete by him completely. Naturally, but must establish, under their Martial Soul Fusion 100% premises. Let Huo Yuhao help another person complete third Soul Nucleus again, that is also absolutely the impossible matter.

In the Soul Power total quantity, Huo Yuhao and compared with Beast God Di Tian, has the archery target disparity eventually, but, during collision. He actually relies on powerful Soul Power that three big Soul Nucleus fusions are producing, making Di Tian be also surprised, because, in the nature, Di Tian has actually lost to Huo Yuhao. Under is in inverse proportion, their first collision, unexpectedly is, shares half and half!

The gap by that black hole, remote looks, even if their cultivating is, does not dare to approach that black hole at this time. The strength of swallowing that transmits was really too fearful. Phenomenon that is the space completely torn into shreds. Once were involved, is irreversible. Also is impossible to know in advance where will be transmitted to goes.

The Huo Yuhao look moves suddenly, the body shifts suddenly like lightning.

Because in the space has the place of such huge to shatter, no one can utilize Space Power at this time. Therefore, can only rely on own speed.

He moves, Beast God follows closely to move, shifts, without doubt must go round that to shatter space.

The black hole closes gradually, but actually knows in the mind consciousness of Huo Yuhao and Di Tian that in that region, the space broke to pieces completely one piece by piece, wanted to heal completely, but also required very long time.

Hundred li (0.5km), they have the tacit understanding in a flash extremely almost simultaneously stopped. Eye of Destiny on Huo Yuhao forehead opens, the right hand toward Di Tian one finger, on oneself does not see Soul Ring to appear, above the Di Tian top of the head, left a whirlpool and Skeleton Skull.

Chaotic Mind and mind are weak.

The Di Tian corners of the mouth place reveals one to sneer, “useless, this grade of Soul Ability for me, simply does not have any function. Even if your Spiritual Power high is not again good. Only if you can achieve to dominate above me another degree. Our Dragon Clan, immunity most mind attacked.”

At the same time was saying, he toward Huo Yuhao one finger, immediately, around the Huo Yuhao body, in a diameter kilometer range, looked like has also burst with joy generally, the purple air bubbles emerged out of thin air, the rapid scrap, changed into the innumerable purple raging waves again toward the central big dragon, was circling again shooting up to the sky.

The terrifying dark element will corrode the incisiveness of characteristics display.

However, that purple region has stopped quickly, gradually was turned into Bai Se (White Color) by the purple, glittering and translucent carving snowflake starts to fall gently from the peak piece by piece, then the purple whirlpool originally gradually is defeated and dispersed, changes into the innumerable snowflakes to scatter in all directions to flutter about.

Cold the extremely air, the temperature unexpectedly once more reduced, the entire sky has covered mist of misty white, but Huo Yuhao is hidden in this mist.

“Good. It seems like that you comprehended the Absolute Ice true meaning.”Di Tian was acclaiming nod . The right hand wields, naturally disperses to his front snowflake, the right hand that he lifts has not taken back, but had the change, the joint rapidly becomes thick, then scales appear, changed into dragon claw impressively.

The Dragon God claw, once deterred many colleagues the Dragon God claw, Beast God Di Tian unexpectedly in this fights with Huo Yuhao, from the beginning prepared to use?

Dragon God claw, although did not have to attack, but in the world, actually as if gushed out a huge dignity beyond description, all snowflakes that Huo Yuhao evolves, in this flickers unexpectedly is simultaneously to shatter, changes into the powder powder, vanishes instantaneously does not see, he also reveals the personal appearance from that snow fog. Body slight shakes.

The Dragon God claw remote to Huo Yuhao, the Di Tian complexion also becomes dignified, in him behind, huge Black Dragon light shadow appears slowly, but above this Black Dragon light shadow, but also one group of seven color rays are glittering faintly.

Di Tian of this condition, Huo Yuhao is unprecedented, he only thought the great strength that is unable to contend with, is fettering own body and soul, the pressure is increasing unceasingly, as if must grind her thoroughly general.

Dragon God claw, although replies on the Dragon God strength, but this actually initially Dragon God truly left Di Tian. Also is relying on the strength of Dragon God claw, Di Tian can break through the bottleneck repeatedly, and deterrent many colleagues, become in the beast the god.

This is not the Gods strength, absolutely has actually surmounted the Limit Douluo level, half god!

The Huo Yuhao biggest problem is, he has not thought that the fight just started, after both sides slightly have also probed one next, Beast God will use the most ultimate strength. In contact that in this just started, he knows that he lost, has lost to the experience and paradox of Beast God.

In his heart, the status that Beast God Di Tian kept aloof affected his judgment. Beast God in the true fight, has not shown any a wee bit arrogance unexpectedly, instead is directly own strength most direct shows, with the most formidable ability, crush attacks to Huo Yuhao, for does not give him the cushion the opportunity.

This feeling appears in the Huo Yuhao heart very strange, he frequently had also done this, will not make the match the strongest strength display, will solve the match, this without doubt will be when any fight will be the best means.

But now, this situation falls on oneself, but was not that comfortable.

Huge oppression strength, making the entire sky as if twist, near the Huo Yuhao ear, was reverberating the low and deep dragon roar sound. That dragon roar sound is extremely dignified, dignified frightening mind.

The Dragon God claw of Di Tian the turning golden color bit by bit, in his double pupil, was actually burning seven color rays flame.( Not

Ends being continued

~^~) 1052



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-619-part-2





Volume 13

#619 - Three Spirits Nucleus!


Wipes the light happy expression to reappear in the Di Tian corners of the mouth place, cannot think that young people. In fact, when you dare to come to challenge me, I you have regarded the entire life archenemy. mind that if has not gone all out, do I possibly live the present?

Di Tian originally, is vertically and horizontally invincible, truly is extremely arrogant. However, before soon, receives Evil Soul Master to attack that time, he was injured, although is not serious, and completed has instead killed, but that time, has made the profound impression on him. Also reminded him, now the strength of humanity, might threaten him.

Therefore, when today he felt when Huo Yuhao actually had unprecedented third Soul Nucleus, he without hesitation launched the most formidable attack.

Although Di Tian does not know that what degree the third Soul Nucleus prestige can be, but, don't forget, he grasped the Dual Soul Nucleus time, at least was Huo Yuhao several hundred thousand times, didn't he also possibly have a point to realize from experience regarding third Soul Nucleus? Therefore, he does not make Huo Yuhao display the complete strength, comes up, used the most formidable strength.

The Dragon God claw, this itself does not belong to it, but dies from caring for of Dragon God. The strength of this half god frightened to compare it to want the formidable match innumerably. Helps it become one generation of Beast God.

But now, this strength uses once more, immediately suppressed Huo Yuhao completely.

Huo Yuhao halo twinkle, is fluctuating unceasingly, in the Beast God Di Tian eye, he as if indistinctly saw that the Huo Yuhao three Soul Nucleus rays are sparkling unceasingly. Each sparkle, his Soul Power outward overflows by the stance of rushing.

But, is this also useful? Even if three Soul Nucleus, that also belongs to the strength of humanity, as before and Gods strength has the disparity that is unable to overstep, regarding this point, Di Tian was really too clearly.

The Huo Yuhao look also becomes ice-cold gets up, in him behind, light shadow of spirit flashes through unceasingly, but each twinkle was maintains very brief time to carry on the replace.

He cannot feel Di Tian energy change, but Di Tian can actually feel him as if in using various Soul Power, tries to work loose from this fetter.

The Dragon God claw of Di Tian turned into the golden color completely, but in claw sharp position, is glittering seven colored halos.

“Useless, did not use in attempting the struggling money, in the face of the strength of half god, you can do, only then Soul Power exhausted gradually. You could rest assured that I will not kill you, I must carry on the complete plan that I said a moment ago. After your Soul Power consumption completely, I will lead you to return to Star Dou Forest.”

Huo Yuhao vision tranquil looks at Di Tian, Soul Power fluctuation was weaken suddenly. Him one is weaken, the seven color rays on Di Tian Dragon God claw greatly are immediately bright, the entire sky fiercely twisted. Body as if collected tightening of Huo Yuhao inward, has possibility to shatter anytime.

Di Tian has gawked staring, in his opinion, a powerhouse of Limit Douluo rank, should so not be easy to collapse!

But also in next quarter, suddenly, together ices the blue ray to dodge to pass. Front Di Tian only thinks. That ice blue color ray arrived in front of him.

“Bites!”In a crisp cry, the Dragon God claw lifted, has blocked the attack of that ice blue color ray.

But, that ice blue color ray is similar to the fresh flower blooms general, transforms the innumerable [say / way] ice blue color ray, Di Tian body complete coverage.

The method of half god level, is not only then Di Tian has.

Huo Yuhao was negligent, but, Di Tian also similarly had the issue. That is, he does not dare to kill Huo Yuhao. If a moment ago he, when uses the Dragon God claw, the direct all-out attack, Huo Yuhao likely will receive heavy wound. However, he actually wants to control.

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath, Morning Dew Knife! God of Emotion powerful weapons. Hasn't above never also belonged to the Gods strength? After Huo Yuhao has completed the condensation of third Soul Nucleus, can display finally completely these half god level prestige.

To his present level, Extreme Ice Battle God Armor too has not affected greatly, but Morning Dew Knife is different, even if he becomes Gods, Morning Dew Knife also same can be his efficient weapon.

Dragon Sacrifical Gathering Dancing Knife Technique.

Two forms after short several seconds, flash through suddenly, Di Tian breaks the space, appears beyond the kilometer, his Dragon God claw turned into seven completely colored. However, on him, has seven wounds. Each is not big, does not have the blood to flow out, but above is actually hoodwinking incorruptible.

May in fact, looks like the surface really seems that simple?

Huo Yuhao beyond the kilometer, some respites, Morning Dew Knife in hand is glittering slightly the blue tearful halo, the light mist and halo fuse to fluctuate mutually, extremely gods and ghosts.

Gaze that the Di Tian vision stagnates he, the complexion became the unprecedented dignity. Half god level, he actually also had half god level other strength.

Although Di Tian can judge, the round eruption, was huge regarding the consumption of Huo Yuhao. However, similarly, this round eruption, actually had taken a moment ago to him the injury. The Absolute Ice prestige energy, is attacking his body crazily.

No, not only Absolute Ice, has the mind thought of Huo Yuhao, as well as Space Power.

Space Power can melt, but the mind thought and Absolute Ice actually started to have the destructiveness. If not his Golden Eyed Black Dragon King formidable body and spirit. Perhaps already had the irreversible serious injury.

Has been injured, oneself were injured unexpectedly once again.

The Dragon God claw of Di Tian lifts slowly, suddenly, he raises head to the day, low and deep dragon roar phonochemical for innumerable strange voice resonances, huge Black Dragon light shadow explodes suddenly, changes into the innumerable black mist to emerge to that seven color dragon light shadow.

Immediately, seven colors brilliant Sheng, exaggerated the Di Tian form seven colored. The Dragon God claw makes the movement that empty stresses in the Huo Yuhao direction. Huge dragon claw emerges out of thin air immediately. Grasps suddenly toward Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao both hands grip tightly Morning Dew Knife, deeply inspires suddenly, around the body, strong Bing Wu (ice mist) fluctuates at an exceptional pace, changes into huge Bing Wu (ice mist) aura.

Morning Dew Knife lifts up high excessively, in this flickers, the Huo Yuhao whole person became has filled with the sacred aura. The sacred thought to the person a sense of reality beyond description, as if in this flash, he completely has merged into one organic whole with Morning Dew Knife.

His facial expression actually becomes gentle, Bing Wu (ice mist) closes up, Huo Yuhao vanished. Displaces, is actually together the slender form.

That is not Ice Emperor or Snow Emperor, is not Huo Yuhao and Tang Wutong in Goddess of Light that can display together. But ices blue form together.

This form has hundred meters high fully, the whole body lends the light Bing Wu (ice mist) aura, the face is not seeing clearly, can only see that she wears the ice blue long skirt.

“Yeah”a deep sigh resounds.

One group of ice blue mist, blow out from the position of her forehead, happen to welcomed the Dragon God claw.

Seven color light shadow that the Dragon God claw transforms from the sky stagnated unexpectedly instantaneously, and changes into the ice blue color.

Di Tian one dull, what ability is this? This has dominated the level above Absolute Ice! The strength of Dragon God claw, during the freeze of that ice blue color mist, is consuming unexpectedly at an exceptional pace.

He does not certainly know that this is Huo Yuhao has never used ninth Soul Ability, Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion ninth Soul Ability.

When his cultivating to promote nine rings, Huo Yuhao thinks that he obtained ninth Soul Ability to be OK from Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White) there directly. However, at that time had actually had variation. Ninth Soul Ability has not appeared directly, but had the ambiguous condition, looks like one group of dense fog, at that time his ninth Soul Ring, although is the red, but Huo Yuhao does not know that actually own Soul Ability is anything.

Until Ice Emperor and Snow Emperor the Spiritual Consciousness combustion, dissolves with him after one completely. This ninth Soul Ability appears.

100,000 years of Soul Ring, ninth Soul Ability has certainly two. But these two Soul Ability are not any spirit, but is the strengths of four big Ice Attribute spirits has, and unified the Morning Dew Knife strength. Changes into Absolute Ice two big ultimate Soul Ability.

At this time, Huo Yuhao uses, is one of them, takes Morning Dew Knife as to direct, strong capability that can display.

This Soul Ability, Huo Yuhao gives a name for it, is called: Ice and Snow Goddess Breath!

“Explodes!”Huo Yuhao ice-cold results in the sound from the sky to resound. The Di Tian body shakes suddenly, a strong black halo erupts from his within the body. For all this, has remembered a series of explosive sounds on him. Before that is, after Absolute Ice enters body freeze, by characteristics of Ice Explosion Technique detonation.

Was frozen the ice blue Dragon God claw to start to shiver, Ice and Snow Goddess Breath after is Huo Yuhao Soul Ability, does not ice the strength of Xue Nu god truly. But Dragon God claw of Di Tian inspiring, approached in the Dragon God prestige fully infinitely can.

At this moment, Huo Yuhao moved suddenly, he does not enter instead draws back, during the personal appearance twinkles, the person arrived at that freeze Dragon God claw front. A palm strikes directly above that Dragon God claw.

“Pū”in dull thumping sound sound, the Di Tian body of distant place has shaken shaking, because of inspiring of Ice Explosion Technique, making him unable to control to the Dragon God claw immediately, or is intercepts Huo Yuhao. Only can see that this palm pats.

The next quarter, the Di Tian pupil contracts suddenly, because his surprised discovery, oneself and relation of Dragon God claw energy, unexpectedly stiffly shut off.

This did Huo Yuhao, actually have so the strength?

Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion ninth Soul Ability, second of two big ultimate abilities, Absolute Zero! In addition in Snow Emperor Three Ultimate, Emperor's Palm, Great Coldness Snow.

Reinforces Ice and Snow Goddess Breath by Absolute Zero, pours into again Absolute Zero by Great Coldness Snow. The terrifying ultra-low temperature, the Morning Dew Knife Gods strength, bursts out completely, finally blocked Di Tian this to kill struck. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-619-part-3





Volume 13

#620 - Little Huo Throwing Knife


The Huo Yuhao complexion is somewhat pale, a series of eruptions, let the three big Soul Nucleus crazy revolutions of his within the body. Do not look at these as if easily, may in fact, he consume over 50% Soul Power. This after he becomes Limit Douluo, has never had situation.

“Good!”Di Tian gives a loud shout. One rumbles suddenly void, this time, is the left fist.

A thought of Wei ice world bursts out immediately, Huo Yuhao behind presents huge Black Dragon, opens mouth, swallows in which his body.

Di Tian rips open the space once again, changes into the silver light to vanish together does not see.

The huge fetter and corrosion strength of corrode inward, but under the function of Absolute Zero, instantaneously was frozen.

When Huo Yuhao wants to break this Dragon Head, suddenly, the intention moves, whole person body suddenly half revolution. Seven color rays passed over gently and swiftly from his side together instantaneously.

Huo Yuhao only thought that a half body hemp, the strength of that terror is leading his body fierce revolving unexpectedly, the Absolute Zero ultra-low temperature cannot affect that attack unexpectedly.

In this flash, Huo Yuhao finally truly felt the prestige of Dragon God claw to be able.

In the Dragon God claw, seems having one absolute strength, extremely terrifying strength. In this strength, but also mixes with more terrorist Yuan Suwit to be able.

What Huo Yuhao excels is the ice, but in this Dragon God claw, implication is actually nearly entire attribute strength.

Water, fire, earth, wind, Light, darkness and space, the element fluctuation also appears, and fully erupts by the extremely chaotic stance.

This strikes, Di Tian pursue is not the strength, but is the speed. The speed was really too quick, utilized Absolute the fusion of Space Power and Power of Darkness. Moreover happen to just consumed in Huo Yuhao greatly slightly has the flash of relaxation. Without locking, has not forewarned, Huo Yuhao cannot fend eventually completely.

The half body lulled, the Huo Yuhao within the body three big Soul Nucleus full plays, resisted that terror finally reluctantly the strength of Dragon God.

Swallows his Dragon Head to change into the powder powder to scatter in all directions to flutter about, Huo Yuhao one step steps forward, drills into the space crack, shunt Di Tian following attack.

The space twinkle, they continuously appear, collides unceasingly. Rays, from the sky glitter. Each collision instantaneously separates.

Looks to the sky from Star Dou Forest that sees, is sky of piece of complete distortion, the color of sky also in unceasing fluctuation, suddenly golden color, suddenly black, suddenly seven color ray twinkles. Although is separated by ten thousand meters, actually as before suppressed Soul Beast in entire Star Dou Forest do not dare to move slightly.

In central area.

Jade Swan, Myriad Monster King, Bear Ruler and Scarlet King, four Great Ferocious Beasts gather, in the eye is revealing the different looks.

Dark Gold Terror Claw unceasing popping of Bear Ruler takes back again, in eye ominous glittering.

Myriad Monster King is an appearance looking pensive.

Scarlet King and Jade Woman, what are more is the worry.

After is separated by ten thousand meters, they are formidable Ferocious Beasts, although as before suppressed fierce, but is also insufficient unable to move.

Scarlet King low and deep was roaring, “was actually, really had the so formidable strength, can spell to fight such with Beast God?”

In the Jade Woman eye the ray twinkle, “probably is a humanity. Does not know that is. Di Tian lift-off time I discovered that then saw indistinctly he and a humanity lifted off.”

“Is impossible. How to have the strength of humanity to be able with the Di Tian direction ratio?”Appearance that a Scarlet King face does not believe.

Bear Ruler hey said with a smile: “Can be that is only old Evil Eye to come?”

Myriad Monster King ill-humored [say / way]: “Thinks to be good? Evil Emperor is impossible to come, he cannot take care of oneself now, immediately must face Great Tribulation. Only if he breaks through to 800,000 years of boundary successfully, has the possibility of challenge.”

Bear Ruler anger snort|hum, “that he, if broke through?”

Myriad Monster King said: “Talks nonsense......”it just now to say these two characters, suddenly, the whole body shakes, four Great Ferocious Beasts, simultaneously look up to airborne, in the eye revealed color with amazement.

Sky of distortion suddenly becomes clear, unusual brilliance beyond description dodges to pass together.

“Really is Evil Emperor?”Jade Swan loses one's voice to say.

Myriad Monster King dumbfounded [say / way]: “That is, that is, Space-Time Ray?”

The upper air, turned into grotesque and gaudy world. On the Huo Yuhao forehead, Eye of Asura is glittering the profound and terrifying ray, in that flash, it as if lives.

Not far away, the body of Di Tian as if likely is slowing down the movement general, is moving slowly. The surrounding all time and spaces, in this flicker as if completely have stagnated.

Huo Yuhao Spiritual Power, bursts out just like the blowout generally outward, the body surface of Di Tian human form, was reappearing rapidly scales.

Just presented time, these black scales seemed are full of the gloss, but was quick, these gloss declined, became dim, then fell.

This time Di Tian, in the look has been full of the inconceivable color, looks at Huo Yuhao, body that even he shocks is still shivering.

“When, spatial, light! You, how can you display Space-Time Ray?”Di Tian delay looks at Huo Yuhao.

Continually collides when them, displays the half god level ability respectively, various Dragon God claw and Morning Dew Knife show it can, Di Tian strikes once more hit Huo Yuhao, is blocked by Absolute Zero that on him sends out. But, Di Tian saw dark blue that in Huo Yuhao Eye of Asura sends out.

In his eye pupil deep place, together dark blue ray suddenly suddenly to launch.

When this dark blue ray appears, Di Tian that the time as if static, has been preparing to pursue, in this flickers is imprisoned unexpectedly completely in the midair. Surrounding all spaces, at an exceptional pace in compressing, the dark blue ray seems like very slow is moving, in process that but, moves in it, the sky turned into the dark blue, the earth turned into the dark blue, all, in that flash, as if turned into the dark blue.

Space-Time Ray!

Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler ultimate deep meaning. Initially, it was relying on this formidable ability, can escape from the Di Tian hand ascends to heaven.

This is came from in Spiritual Source Power of Space-Time! Power of Space-Time can eliminate all living thing Spiritual Source, making its Spiritual Source weaken instantaneously.

Initially, Beast God Di Tian, although heavy wound Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, but Di Tian itself, because also this Space-Time Ray, recuperated the millenniums to restore in peak condition, obviously this Space-Time Ray was formidable.

But this time, Space-Time Ray appears again, appears on Huo Yuhao unexpectedly, what is more fearful, Di Tian can also feel clearly that releases Space-Time Ray that from Huo Yuhao, was unexpectedly more formidable than initially Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler. Because in this Space-Time Ray, the level of mind thought that wins that time.

Spiritual Power of half god level, this clearly is Spiritual Power of half deep level! His mind Soul Nucleus, has achieved half god level that the 700,000 years have not practiced unexpectedly. Originally, his strength, not only that handle blade is half god!

Di Tian understood, he understood suddenly, can have the Space-Time Ray strength, this can only prove an issue, before coming to look for itself, Huo Yuhao looked for Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, and that old match, changed into his Soul Ring.

No wonder and no wonder he so has confidence. Yes! Three Soul Nucleus and half god level mind Soul Nucleus, add the first half god level again Morning Dew Knife, Absolute Zero, Ice and Snow Goddess Breath. Can he not grasp?

The double pupil of Di Tian turned into seven at this time completely colored, he is stimulating to movement the Dragon God claw to take to his strength fully, can not let own Spiritual Source reluctantly in Space-Time Ray senile, collapse.

Also, at this moment, he saw a handle quiet blue ray in the Huo Yuhao hand, that ray is not powerful, but clamps in his fingertip. However, the flash when this gloomily blue colored light glow presents, wipes desperately, appeared in the Di Tian eye pupil deep place.

The double pupil of Huo Yuhao, in this moment, like the sea, next one flickers profoundly, he has closed the double pupil, even links Eye of Asura also to close. In the hand that quiet blue ray suddenly is powerful, even has substituted for the beforehand Space-Time Ray halo.

Was restrained by Space-Time Ray, in this moment, Di Tian is incapable of preventing Huo Yuhao radically, but this time Huo Yuhao, likely has actually merged into one organic whole with the world.

Suddenly, his arm wields, that group of blue glow collect instantaneously, a handle is glittering and translucent carving, carves the blue knife lightning flash that becomes just like the crystal, from the sky draws the Absolute blue ray, the instantaneous flash passes together.

The Di Tian look disastrous incident, he noticed that is that overlapping space wall bonds passes through instantaneously, this blade, has concentrated the Huo Yuhao complete vigor, is the work of perfect peak. More fearful, is that handle knife, above, Di Tian also felt half god level aura similarly.

Has not looked at that handle knife again, because knows perfectly well not to evade. Lowered the head, he stares to the ground, looks the direction that one raise, in the look, full is the attachment with does not abandon. Has an unwillingness beyond description.

Dragon God, can't I complete you to give my duty eventually? Wipes bitterly and astringently, appears in the Di Tian corners of the mouth place, perhaps, this is also the extrication.

The body shakes gently, the next quarter, Di Tian thought one flew. Like that handle throwing knife that it forward flight comes, under that impulse beyond description leads, his body, unceasing flying upwards backward, across overlapping space. Another world, as if has been waving to him.

In the ground, four Great Ferocious Beasts also saw this, their vision also similar delay.

That has ruled the Star Dou Forest several hundred thousand years, becomes Beast God, present age first Soul Beast can Di Tian, such depart, really?

At this time, airborne did not have the grotesque and gaudy impediment, Jade Swan Jade Woman, saw clearly the appearance of person of that blade.

Sought the collection and recommendation for the new book, the new book day hot main road, the week click list first, was very good to look. Moreover ** will get up! 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-620-part-1





Volume 13

#620 - Little Huo Throwing Knife


Huo Yuhao, was that has created Huo Yuhao of Spirit Transferring Pagoda organization unexpectedly.

Why, why can be he, why he must kill Di Tian. Did his strength, when become so formidable?

In the Jade Woman look, has filled puzzled, but has also filled sorrowfully.

Di Tian......

Sent out that blade, Huo Yuhao same place was also staying for several seconds, caught one's breath.

Goddess of Mercy Tear Goddess of Mercy tears. The hidden weapon technique of Tang Sect most top. Has not condensed the Goddess of Mercy tears, because the ordinary Goddess of Mercy tears are impossible to rout Di Tian. What he uses is the ghost axe finger of God quiet blue flame, carves Dragon Kefeng a blade to be cold, Demonic Engraving God Knife! God of Emotion Rong Nianbing gives his second handle blade.

This pierced feeling, but also never has. Several hundred thousand years of experience, changes into tip, reverberates in the chest unceasingly, making Di Tian completely immerse to recall. In this moment, anything seemed to be unimportant, all that all has occurred.

When childhood suffers caring for of Dragon God, Dragon God falls from the sky, changes into two Dragon King, then Dragon Clan moves toward declining, to the present, all, unceasingly has been reappearing in his mind.

The vitality is passing quietly, Di Tian closes one's eyes, the feeling of extrication he suddenly thinks special relaxation. Like this finished, although fills to regret, but also after all finished!

“Beast God.”The Huo Yuhao sound actually broke in the Di Tian mind at this time, changed into a dense chill in the air, awakened from own immersion him.

The Di Tian opening eyes pupil, he has gawked immediately staring, because he feels, although own vitality is passing, the speed of but passing seems not fast.

How can?

Di Tian subconscious looks to oneself that sees, is one side of the right chest the pierced wound.

This and this clearly are not the fatal injuries!

To this level, everyone knows. If wants to be fatal the match, attacks the forehead to be most appropriate. But. Why Huo Yuhao actually does not know, attack judgment his forehead. This cannot imagine simply. This injury, although that terrifying blade intends to oneself within the body able to move unhindered, Space-Time Ray is also harming own body, but, oneself completely are capable of continue counter-attack!

Di Tian does not certainly think that Huo Yuhao let slip, that is at all the impossible matter.

“Why?”Di Tian doubts looks at Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao smiles, “I must defeat you, actually do not kill you. Did you forget? I have sent the pledge. Did not kill any Soul Beast on own initiative.”

Di Tian coldly snorted, “that Evil Emperor how?”

Huo Yuhao somewhat helpless [say / way]: “That is because it wants to kill me, I have to counter-attack.”

On the Di Tian face reveals a bitterness and astringency, “good to counter-attack. You won.”

Huo Yuhao nodded, in this flickers, the facial expression of his whole person as if stretches, to Di Tian slight bow, “Beast God, said goodbye. Perhaps, this time leaves. Opportunity that we again have not met. However, I must thank you, you have rescued my life. Moreover, some comprehensions that if has not obtained on you, I probably have not had today's strength. Said goodbye, treasured.”

Spoke these words, Huo Yuhao beckoned with the hand to Beast God Di Tian, one step steps forward, escaped into the space, vanishes does not see.

Looks back that he is departing, Di Tian corners of the mouth place bitter and astringent suddenly became stronger several points. Because he suddenly discovered. Before the feeling of that extrication was very good. Without extrication, means. Own responsibility had not ended.

Falls gently slowly, returns to Star Dou.

Four Great Ferocious Beasts are also glassy-eyed looks at Di Tian. They do not understand before, actually in airborne what happened, the Di Tian injury is heavy, but aura actually as before such as deep pool like prison.

In the original conscience Bear Ruler of some ideas, had lowered the head immediately, feared that Di Tian discovers anything.

Di Tian beckoned with the hand to them, arrives by Lake of Life without consulting anybody.

After four Great Ferocious Beasts look at each other in blank dismay, quietly retreat.

“He does not kill me, he he, he does not kill me.”The expression on Di Tian face suddenly becomes rich, cries and smile suddenly suddenly.

At this time, suddenly, the light silver halo from all directions surged.

“He does not kill you, even if he must kill you, you were impossible dead. Your responsibility also needs to persevere.”The dignified sound resounds.

Di Tian awakens immediately, on one knee knees down.

“Because he has not killed intent, I have not gotten rid, otherwise, even if finished closing up ahead of time, I will also cut to kill him.”

Di Tian as if returned to normal, cannot bear ask: “But, on the Lord, why doesn't leave behind him? On him, load bearing Power of Destiny! That is Power of Destiny that our Star Dou Forest most needs. You also need.”

That sound said mystically lightly: “Power of Destiny only belongs to Douluo Continent, anybody impossible to carry off it. He must leave this world person, Power of Destiny can naturally return. Di Tian, I know that you are very alone. These years, were laborious you.”

“On Lord.”Di Tian kneels to bend down in the place.

“Endures patiently again for ten thousand years, ten thousand years, I then go out again, to that time, my internal injury completely will have made up. When I am born, you can roam through the world.”

“Yes, thanks on main.”

Silver light restraining, all return normally.

Ten thousand years, regarding humanity, are the incomparably long years, but, regarding had 800,000 years cultivate for Di Tian, are actually not anything. Ten thousand years, had an accurate deadline finally.

Wipes the excited color cannot help but to reappear on the Di Tian face, he is excited.

......

Silver glittering, Huo Yuhao baseless.

On this day, this place, in this moment, completely became seems to be different.

Huo Yuhao as if can the clear feeling, own spiritual sea seethe with excitement and sublimate, six big spirits are cheering.

He can feel, Soul Power of oneself within the body is transforming, one special makings, appears from him gradually.

Di Tian for him, is a mountain, is a fetter.

When this fetter is unable to become his hobbling again, the final bottleneck already opened.

Looks up the day, Huo Yuhao stretches out the arms, this time he, only thinks in the world, all start become different, his soul, seems ascending toward another world.

“You have succeeded, congratulates you, Yuhao.”The gentle sound resounds. Light golden halo drops from the clouds, condenses the forming in front of Huo Yuhao.

Rong Nianbing is original that dresses up as before, on the face is having the smiles of some feelings. He is clearest, at present this youth can arrive at present this step, is what kind is not easy! Tribulation that he undergoes, initially had experienced it is really is much more difficult.

“Teacher.”Huo Yuhao respectful has done obeisance to Rong Nianbing. In this moment, he thought that he has the qualifications to call these two characters truly.

Rong Nianbing shows a faint smile, said: “Said that I am not suitable to make your Teacher, your Teacher, has someone else. I happen to present, picked up a bargain. If not I, perhaps you have not needed to withstand these many misery. But how regardless to say that you finally were after the bitter comes the sweet. Did you prepare for?”

“Yes.”Nod of Huo Yuhao makes an effort. He prepared certainly, he must look for the beloved wife! At this time, what did not have to prevent his heart, flies toward that world, but in that world, Wutong, you fortunately?

Rong Nianbing nodded, the expression on face also becomes dignified, sinking sound track: “My Gods, named God of Emotion. The mood has the laughter, anger, sorrow and happiness, the world has the vicissitudes of life. The mood has well, to have the badness, you must control, is this Power of Emotion. Now something can also tell you.”

Douluo Continent that “you are, is planet, in addition, on this world, existences of many planet. On these planet, other human living thing, the energy of specific name worrying strength exists. Read the strength to ascend, gradually formed a special place. This place dominates above planet, but is closely linked with planet, looks like a piece opens alone, but space. Because this space is humanity opens, therefore, generally, only allows humanity to enter. This place, is called, God Realm.”

“God Realm holds, is these in each planet, own strength breaks the planet limit, is unable again by the person who the planet seal prevents. This is Gods that you said that I am so, that Tang Wutong father is also so.”

“Said accurately that I do not belong to your this planet, does not belong to Douluo Continent. But the Tang Wutong father belongs to here . Moreover, his name you should hear. He called: Tang San.”

Hears Tang San these two characters, Huo Yuhao whole body big change, how regardless of he has not thought that oneself deeply have been loving woman, can be the Tang Sect ancestor unexpectedly and unexpectedly, established Tang Sect the female of Tang San.

Looks at the Huo Yuhao dumbfounded appearance, Rong Nianbing shows a faint smile, said: “Tang San came from Douluo Continent, therefore has also paid attention in Douluo Continent. Tang Wutong is his daughter, Tang San loves to her extremely, therefore allows her to come in Douluo Continent to gain experience.”

“God cannot interfere human world, any planet is so. Therefore, even if Tang San, can only send in Continent own daughter, and seal she belonged to the memory of god. Then had among you meet. From beginning to end, Tang San has been observing you, will therefore have Tang Wutong seal. His has also played edge ball, because Tang Wutong was his daughter, the body was having a divine nature, therefore he can influence subtly affected Tang Wutong through some methods. Thus affects you.”

Asked the monthly ticket for peerless Tang Sect finally. ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-620-part-2





Volume 13

#620 - Little Huo Throwing Knife


“You undergo that many tribulations, including part is actually Tang San representative God Realm to your inspection, if not so, you do not need to experience these many. Still remembers Heaven and Earth Sentiment Query Valley? There is so. But also that time, I also see all that in Heaven and Earth Sentiment Query Valley had, has approved your existence. But at that time, Tang San actually experienced something in God Realm, temporarily does not have the leisure to continue to pay attention to you. I can afterward go to enter, making you comply, to inherit the position of my god place.”

“Therefore, you do not need to blame him, without him to your tempering, you are impossible to have today, my this Teacher, instead was inferior that he comes importantly to you.”

Huo Yuhao dull is listening to narration of Rong Nianbing, the past all were pacing back and forth in the mind unceasingly, the place that some could not think through, at this moment, gradually dredged.

No wonder, initially in Heaven and Earth Sentiment Query Valley, oneself had encountered the attack of that golden form, that golden form that formidable.

No wonder, the Wutong body will have seal, keeping oneself from being intimate.

No wonder, after Wutong returns to that Clear Sky Sect, will vanish does not see.

The Clear Sky Sect legend, initially did not start from Tang Sect ancestor Tang San?

Originally, unexpectedly is so and unexpectedly is so! Wutong unexpectedly is the Tang San daughter, but oneself this future father-in-law Sir, suddenly has been testing himself.

Rong Nianbing temperate [say / way]: “In God Realm, the god also divides the different levels. And, God Realm most powerhouse has five people, they form God Realm committee, including two Godking, separately are God of Kindness and God of Evil, three big Law Enforcer, separately are God of Asura, God of Ruin and God of Life. Tang San is one of the three Law Enforcer, is God of Asura. Because two big Godking both go to some planet rebirth, experiences the world to change in every possible way. During two big Godking of new generation are also growing. Therefore, present Tang San, it can be said that God Realm most powerhouse, is the person of management God Realm. Besides God Realm committee, is first-level Gods, I am one of the first-level Gods, because Power of Emotion fluctuates similarly with two big Godking good and evil mind, wants to be stronger than general first-level Gods, but compared with Tang San, actually wants the inferior point.”

“Under first-level Gods, is second-level Gods and three Gods, God Realm patrols extremely hunting for wait / etc.. These people, compose God Realm together. Because the God Realm itself space is limited. Therefore, only then has the position of Gods, can enter God Realm. These practice the Absolute person in the world, must undergo the verification of God Realm committee, in having free time in the situation in position of Gods, awards him the position of Gods, can after he breaks through, rises into God Realm. At present you must face is so the situation.”

Here, Rong Nianbing stopped, he knows, all these that oneself said that Huo Yuhao also required the time to digest.

The Huo Yuhao look gradually becomes limpid, he was quite intelligent, listened to narration of Rong Nianbing, bright God Realm, gradually presents in his mind.

Originally, God Realm is one dominates above Douluo Continent, world of powerhouse!

“To understand?”The Rong Nianbing smile asked.

Huo Yuhao nodded.

Rong Nianbing said: “Reason that told you these, again gave you a choice the opportunity. I exploited the Tang San loopholes after all, I pay for you, is far from him being many. You can carry on now choose, if you are also willing to inherit the position of my Gods, naturally. If you do not want, chooses Tang San, does not have the issue. He looks forward to some people to help him undertake. I can tell him your meaning, believes that he will be very happy. Moreover, retrieves wife regarding you helpful.”

Huo Yuhao actually silently shook the head, “did not need to trouble you, I hope that can inherit the position of your Gods. The real men should keep one's word . Moreover, I cannot depend upon to flatter the father-in-law to retrieve Wutong. Such I will look down upon myself. Please give me God of Emotion the position of inheritance of Gods.”

On the Rong Nianbing face reveals a gratified color, “good. But I must remind your matter, the life of God Realm is very alone bored, even if my like this first-level Gods, cannot leave God Realm at will, impossible the place stay in any world of human beings too longer. Once enters in God Realm, only if position of inheritance Gods to appropriate candidate, otherwise cannot leave. I and Tang San want to inherit the position of Gods, is actually not willing to treat in God Realm, hopes that can roam through world, by our strengths, performs to go to the remote place to seek to have existences of other God Realm, even is many splendors.”

Huo Yuhao look not because of the Rong Nianbing words, but has vacillated, firm [say / way]: “I am willing to inherit the position of your Gods.”Regardless of pays what kind of price, he must seek for Tang Wutong, this point, will not change because of any other matters.

Rong Nianbing said: “Good, should tell you, I told you, since you want as before, you are very good, is very good.”

Both hands also lift, immediately, is centered on his body, the pale blue and scarlet red, two different color rays simultaneously ascend.

Huo Yuhao only thought Absolute Ice Soul Power of own within the body was inspired instantaneously, when this flash, formerly sent out Demonic Engraving God Knife that type the feeling of the world merging into one organic whole transmits once more.

The Rong Nianbing big hand wields, the surrounding scenery passes and fluctuates rapidly. In a flash, they as if arrived in the starry sky.

The Rong Nianbing behind ice blue and fiery red two color rays gush out from within the body unceasingly. Shines on Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao can feel at this time, only then sublimates, within the body three big Soul Nucleus fiercely are all revolving at the unprecedented terrifying speed, each operation, bursts out the huge Soul Power fluctuation.

Halos from the sky drift about, on the Huo Yuhao face is sending out the strange thought.

Star light drop from the clouds at this moment, falls on him unceasingly.

The surroundings is a grotesqueness and gaudiness, but in Huo Yuhao own mind world, the lifetime experience is flashing through rapidly.

From initially in the unfair treatment that White Tiger Duke's Estate suffered, arrived again afterward met Daydream Ice Silkworm, absorbed first 1 million years of Soul Ring. Afterward met Tang Wutong in Shrek Academy, this all, continuously appeared in his mind world, seemed only an instance, he read one his life.

Has not known how long, the Huo Yuhao opening eyes pupil, saw again, is be with smile on the face Rong Nianbing.

Four items of relative, Huo Yuhao eyeground deep place, are many have wiped the vicissitudes, are many a clear(ly) to have become aware. Within the body all strengths were being sublimated had the earth-shaking change.

Three Soul Nucleus melt gradually, within the body Absolute Ice, Spiritual Power and Space Power in instantaneously completely fuse in together, the brand-new strength appears.

spiritual sea turned into a purer golden color, Spiritual Consciousness transformed, he once felt the Divine Consciousness aura that had been to bloom from his spiritual sea on Holy Necromancer and Slumbering Calamity Elux outward. Moreover during sublimation of continuing.

Rong Nianbing both hands lift slowly, from his top of the head, a strange royal crown floating, this royal crown itself presents for the ice blue and fiery red two colors, but in the above place, has the strange imaginary color aura to fluctuate faintly.

As soon as it appears, Huo Yuhao only thought that own various mood were transferred completely, happy, anger and sorrow, happy, love, hatred and wickedness, seven emotions transformation.

Huo Yuhao Morning Dew Knife flies, from the sky changes into together the blue light, returns to Rong Nianbing on, seven handle blades, are representing similarly also seven mood.

Starts to inherit the position of Gods, Rong Nianbing must take back the most important strength.

Seven handle blades, separately are representing the water, fire, earth, wind, Light, darkness and space. This is the God of Emotion Rong Nianbing seven handle blades.

Ice and Snow Goddess Breath Morning Dew Knife.

God of Flame Roar True Sun Knife.

The Wind of Freedom Gentle Hymn Proud Sky Knife.

Mother Earth Awakening Rhythm Longevity Knife.

Divine Mystery Hundred Transformation Hexagram Jade Pearl Knife.

Linking Heaven and Earth Dawn Holy Brilliance Knife.

Eternal Hell Curse Devil's Devouring Knife.

Seven handle peerless Divine Weapon, are sending out seven different brilliance, is representing seven handle different mood.

Suddenly, Morning Dew Knife starts, changes into ices blue light shadow together, shoots at the Huo Yuhao direction suddenly.

Huo Yuhao only thought that the whole body shakes, the blue light flashes through, one sad mood bursts out from own heart along with it, this is the sorrow, the sadness in seven emotions.

Is the scarlet red right noon time blade, just like the right noon time blade of kitchen knife shape, is bringing the blazing flame, broke through instantaneously.

The extreme anger appears, this is the anger!

Green light blade edge follows closely, but, that is representing wind proud Tiandao, The Wind of Freedom recites lightly, after anger, joyful being near body, this is happy.

Yellow calm long blade flashes through, the immortal blade, is representing the earth strength immortal blade. The yellow color halo integrates Huo Yuhao within the body, changes into the joyful aura, this is happy.

The silver ray bursts out, Divine Mystery Hundred Transformation six glow, Xuan Ji blade, wicked strength, but is actually not the simple wickedness, it is also a mood of repel.

Then is the curse of Eternal Hell, this is the true hatred, bites the demon blade, the black glow runs throughout, Huo Yuhao only thought that in the chest all negative mood transfer.

Finally, is that bright golden light, unequalled golden light enters from his top of the head, passes through instantaneously throughout, penetrates the entire body of Huo Yuhao completely.

Passes through the dawn of world, the Saint flash blade, the Light strength. In an instant, earth rejuvenation, all negative mood, finally by that love gable. Seven emotions, the true meaning of love.

The seven emotions run throughout, seven handle peerless god edges return side Rong Nianbing, on his face reveals one disappointed with not to abandon, but actually the big hand wields, that seven handle god edges change into play the ray, air-launched goes toward the star of distant place.

Some everybody once the familiar face soon will appear. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-620-part-3





Volume 13

#621 - Dai Mubai And Zhu Zhuqing


Nobody knows where their goals are, but in this flickers, they are actually escape into the space to vanish do not see.

Rong Nianbing arrives in front of Huo Yuhao, royal crown in the hand, has placed on him slowly.

In the Huo Yuhao eye pupil, the seven emotions glitter, finally, all belong to tranquilly, color of the shiny smooth, appears on him.

The royal crown integrates quietly, the seven emotions restrain.

Suddenly, a colored ray beyond description bursts out from Huo Yuhao instantaneously. His six big spirit 11 appear from within the body.

Daydream Ice Silkworm, Ice Emperor, Snow Emperor, Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass and Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White) and Mermaid Princess Li Ya, six big spirits, appear successively in his side.

The seven emotions decompose instantaneously, on Snow Emperor, inherited the sorrowful mood, on Ice Emperor, inherited the mood of anger, but Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass inherited the happy mood, Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White), inherited the happy mood. Mermaid Princess Li Ya is wicked, but final Daydream Ice Silkworm, the whole body has actually covered bright golden light. This makes Huo Yuhao have earth-shaking change truly, and had future 1 million years of Soul Beast, inherits, strength that loves.

Six big spirits, inherited one mood separately.

Rong Nianbing brow micro wrinkle, “also misses one type. The hatred, do you want to inherit the hatred the strength?”

At this moment, on the Huo Yuhao forehead, vertical eye opens slowly, together black ray from surges, float before him, the aura of hatred rises suddenly instantaneously, the final seventh mood was continued by it, is not just that Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler?

Although it is not one of the Huo Yuhao spirits, but the degree of it and Huo Yuhao union, actually absolutely does not compare any spirit to be bad.

Is feeling the surrounding all, Evil Emperor as if also understood anything, the intense hatred restrains gradually, finally changes into of diminished version, similarly as float as Huo Yuhao side, although on it is lending the hateful aura, but the look deep place, has actually belonged to tranquilly.

“Good.”Rong Nianbing nodded to Huo Yuhao. An intense white light erupts from him suddenly, and Huo Yuhao sweeps across in which completely.

Huo Yuhao with his seven big spirit, simultaneously closing one's eyes pupil. The seven emotions flow unceasingly, all, is being sublimated is changing.

How long has not known, when Huo Yuhao again opening eyes pupil, seven big spirits vanished to disappear, he discovered with amazement that he stands above a hill.

Around this hill, performing is the fog. The fog surges, in the air, full is various rich elements, is fluctuating marvelously.

The mood transformation, Huo Yuhao lowers the head to have a look at itself.

All as if have not changed, is only, in own mind, seemed to be many anything.

Suddenly, the surrounding fog turned into the golden color, gentle golden color. To person a strange sense of reality.

Forms appear slowly from fog, flies in the Huo Yuhao direction.

Their looks are handsome, the attire is the plain elegant cream color, is only several time of breath, arrived in front of Huo Yuhao.

Altogether is 12 people, simultaneously respectful bends the waist to salute to Huo Yuhao.

“Has seen Sir God of Emotion.”Is a man said.

[Say / Way] of Huo Yuhao doubts: “Are you?”

The man said: “We are the God Realm god officers, beginning you God Realm, we are make you see Godking and Sir Law Enforcer.”

Huo Yuhao nodded, said: “Had the work.”Also comes it, then settles it. Words that Rong Nianbing spoke, he still clearly remembers, oneself that father-in-law Sir, is the Tang Sect ancestor, is God Realm Law Enforcer!

The hand signal that the god officer makes invitation respectfully, flies in the front, other god officers disperse in the both sides, on the face the manner is really respectful and prudent.

Huo Yuhao is only the thought moves, body is flutters to forward, after to turn into a god, all as if became different. Spiritual Power and Soul Power originally, had the earth-shaking change.

spiritual sea has been full of the strange golden color now, that idioplasm feeling, looks like another space. In, so long as the thought, all things can the nature formation.

This made Huo Yuhao remember Teacher Elux to leave own undead Demi-plane, at this time his spiritual sea looked like brand-new plane is ordinary, was not Demi-plane, but was true plane. But there, oneself is all control. Perhaps, that is the feeling of true Gods.

Present spiritual sea, should call the god sea to be right. But within the body is flowing golden Soul Power, should call mental power.

Now his mental power, can follow his thought change to transform the attribute, can control all elements in this God Realm space to fluctuate easily. Naturally, this attribute transformation limits to several that he had as before, but actually no longer divides each other, pure, moreover transforms along with the thought that extremely rapid.

The light fog dispels, the scenery also unceasingly is fluctuating at present, grotesque and gaudy, Huo Yuhao thought dispersing.

He discovered with amazement that this God Realm as if has not been separated from the category of person, has the earth as before, has the mountains and rivers. Where regardless, is having rich heaven and earth elemental energy, at least is on Douluo Continent dozens and over a hundred times. Even if and so on breath, the meditate practice on Douluo Continent be bigger than to own promotion.

However, in this strange world, as if dark one special strength is also fettering anything.

Regarding this, he must in the future gradual going sensation. After all, what Rong Nianbing introduced was only some foundations, but in God Realm of this length and breadth, its magical thing, has not known that had many.

Does not know how long to fly, front brightens suddenly, the surrounding golden color also became rich. The gentle halo just like mother's hand, is touching the exquisite flesh of fog gently, the illusory space has the exceptionally moving substantive feeling. Indistinct, in not far away, as if has a palatial palace, caresses to touch to be unreal and real in this gentle halo.

Form that static standing and waiting for a long time in the fog, is looking into the endless distance together, does not know that is looking at anything.

He has a Touwan water blue color long hair like a waterfall, has hung the under foot, if not his great personal appearance and broad shoulder, looked from behind merely that perhaps thinks he is a female.

On magnificent and expensive blue long gown as if there is wave to ripple, if carefully looked, look instantaneously that deep attracts deep blue, even the entire soul will be inhaled that is similar to the sea profound and endless blue color.

It seems in the 20-year-old handsome facial features has a pair of profound eye pupil, his look seems like the cavity, but actually likely is comprehensive, occasionally flashes through together purple aura, is the moving heart and soul. Will have the sense of reality that Fang magnificent and instantaneous life and death die out an instant.

A god officer directs Huo Yuhao to fly in front of him, stopped, respectful bows to salute, “Sir Sea God.”

“Um.”Sends the youth to turn around blue, looks to Huo Yuhao, the gentle pupil light actually becomes piece of ice-cold.

The god officers draw back quietly, leaves them the space.

When with previous time meets compares, this time sends the youth blue looks like dignity, particularly the pressure of that keeping aloof, some Huo Yuhao breath of suppression are impeded.

“You and hello, Sir Sea God.”Huo Yuhao some do not know how should call him, called the father-in-law directly, he feared to enrage the opposite party, that cannot call the name. Only can call with these god officers a moment ago.

Tang San looks at somewhat cramped and disturbed Huo Yuhao, light asking: “You inherited Rong Nianbing the position of Gods, starting today, you were one in God Realm. The God Realm rule is numerous, later the bright officer will teach you. You will have small space in God Realm, two Godking and other two Law Enforcer in respective practice, later at the god congresses, you will have to see their opportunities. So long as you obey the God Realm rule, other matters, God Realm committee does not interfere.”

“Comes the person.”The Tang San sinking sound shouted to clear the way.

light shadow appears side him together rapidly, that is a whole body puts on the man of golden long gown, the mental power fluctuation that the body sends out, obviously compared with beforehand these god officer formidable many, “Sir Law Enforcer.”

Tang San waved, said: “Brought God of Emotion of new promote to go to his residence.”

“Yes.”[gold/metal] Yishen the officer replied again respectfully.

Tang San coldly looked at Huo Yuhao one, turns around to flutter to go toward not far away that palace.

“Sir Sea God, please wait a moment.”In the Huo Yuhao heart is greatly anxious, hurries to shout one. He comes God Realm, the most important goal is to retrieve Tang Wutong! Sees with great difficulty own this father-in-law Sir, if has separated again, in this strange God Realm, how making him seek?

Tang San stops the footsteps, [say / way] that does not return to: “What matter do you have?”

Huo Yuhao has gripped the fist, even if under Tang San that powerful power and influence suppression, he also as before supports were saying: “Please let me see Wutong, I want to explain to her.”

“Dissolute!”Tang San sinking sound shouted to clear the way suddenly, then has turned around suddenly, on the face full is the anger, “did you harm my daughter to be insufficient? Is because knew you, she has eaten that many in the world of mortals painstakingly. Do you also want to see her?”

Huo Yuhao braces oneself saying: “Yes, all are my mistake, but, I only want to see her. Please give me an opportunity, Ok?”

Tang San sneers, looked by a [gold/metal] clothes god officer, [gold/metal] Yishen the officer is understanding, floating draws back, changes into golden light shadow to vanish does not see.

“To see Wutong? Ok.”The Tang San sinking sound said.

In Huo Yuhao heart one happy, when he sees clearly the expression on Tang San face, the joy actually instantaneously sank.

Really, Tang San continues saying: “So long as you can defeat me, can see her.”

New book day hot main road latest chapter already, ** will get up, welcome everybody to collect and recommend. Clicks on list first in the member.

Also, tonight announced that Magic Chef of Ice and Fire plays first batch of five to draw a prize-winning ticket Hainan You Shuyou list, everybody remembers that looks in the evening the chapter or today's prestige - platform announcement information.

Has to want with the book friends who I go to the Hainan free traveling, in participates in us playing carries on to draw. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-621-part-1





Volume 13

#621 - Dai Mubai And Zhu Zhuqing


Did Huo Yuhao stay? Defeats him? Defeats God Realm most formidable Law Enforcer? Even if were inherits Rong Nianbing of position of Gods to confess Tang San that was inferior to? This ten thousand years ago rises into God Realm Douluo Continent, becomes the Gods powerhouse? Moreover own future father-in-law, this and are this possible?

“How I and can I begin with you?”Huo Yuhao somewhat crabbed saying.

Tang San gives a calm smile, “that you leave.”

The Huo Yuhao forced smile said: “You are the Tang Sect ancestor, are God Realm Law Enforcer, do I possibly fight you? How also possibly to defeat you?”

Tang San coldly snorted, “now I am not Law Enforcer, is not the Tang Sect founder. I am only a daughter was bullied the father. You had said to Wutong how many times, will protect her, to protect her, doesn't make her receive a wee bit injuries? But, did you achieve? You in time and time again unceasing injures her, lets abyss that she falls into the pain. Your children had, but also entangles my daughter to do?”

“It is not such. Sir Sea God, you listened to me to say.”Huo Yuhao urgently said: “The child, I do not know the circumstances of the matter. I do not shirk the responsibility, is, this matter, I really not clear what's the matter Ah? I and I to the present, virgin!”Said the virgin two characters, on his face red, white.

Wipes the happy expression to dodge not to have from the Tang San face, but in front of illusory the light fog by him was actually covered, Huo Yuhao has not looked to say.

Tang San sound ice-cold, “you me told as before anything is useless, wants to see Wutong, has a road. Defeats me!”At the same time was saying, the Tang San big hand wields, strong air current moves, departs about several hundred meters to after the body of Huo Yuhao.

“Wutong and Wutong, I come, I am Yuhao! You where? You where!”Huo Yuhao is shouting suddenly. Yelled loudly that the palace toward distant place was shouting.

“Shut up!”The Tang San sinking sound shouted to clear the way.

Suddenly, surroundings scenery big change. Sea of clouds fairyland originally vanishes does not see, displaces. Is stretch of a big forest of cover, the surroundings all also turned into the green.

The call of Huo Yuhao stops, his surprised looks at the surrounding all, the present picture so is why familiar, as if returned to Star Dou Forest to be ordinary likely?

In this time, suddenly, a nondescriptive terrifying murderous intention front surface is throwing, the strength of this murderous aura. Just likes the essence is ordinary.

Huo Yuhao was towed by the internal combustion engine, looks in a not far away direction that sees with amazement, in that direction, the form is walking together gradually toward him.

This and are this that Tang Sect ancestor?

At this moment, Tang San in Huo Yuhao look, formerly had no longer filled air/Qi of immortal spirit Gods, his long hair and magnificent long gown, all turned into the blood red unexpectedly.

What is more fearful, with his vanguard. In his behind cover big forest, turned into the scarlet unexpectedly, strong murderous aura. Essence general attacks unceasingly to him, but the surrounding all plants, gradually wither in the face of this murderous intention, in him behind, turned into a piece of bloodshed, as if there is innumerable ghosts in calling out, even if on worst Evil Soul Master, Huo Yuhao has not felt has been to so strong tyrannical murderous aura.

How can like this? Isn't he God Realm Law Enforcer? Why now seems, likely is the devil is ordinary.

The Tang San whole body is rippling the blood red seems even somewhat viscous. His ice-cold sound reverberates in the entire space.

“Since you must court death, I help you. Is Law Enforcer. I have the right to handle all contrary Gods. I already wanted to massacre you, making my daughter escape that suffering since then. Cannot affect world of human beings concerned about God Realm the rule. Therefore had not begun. Now, since you came God Realm, that happen to delivers, I also want to you an opportunity, but you dare to shout loudly before me unexpectedly, today, wants you to be buried in this.”

At the same time was saying, the Tang San right hand wields, suddenly, in the surroundings ground, the innumerable leaves of grass increase instantaneously, change into sturdy vines, disturbs toward Huo Yuhao. Each vine presents for the blood red, inside as if faintly has the appearance of leaf vein, looks like the blood red big snake that live is simply ordinary.

Does he want to kill me? In Huo Yuhao heart panic-stricken, that murderous aura is not false, moreover is he has seen strongest murderous aura.

He is not willing to begin with the Wutong father, must protect oneself at this time!

Gentle golden light from Huo Yuhao bright, golden light changes, changes into the ice blue color, outward diffusion.

The extremely cold aura floods in the air immediately, that blood red vine bitter experience to extremely cold, the speed immediately became slow several points. The Huo Yuhao personal appearance dodges, flies toward the place above, avoids the entanglement of vine.

However, at this time, the body surrounding scenery once more changed, day originally, turned into the earth suddenly, but earth originally, actually turned into the sky. Huo Yuhao actually that is flying to grips on the ground.

Such aspect Huo Yuhao first meeting, the person falls to the ground, that blood red vine has twined instantaneously, his body fetter firmly. Although his Absolute Ice mental power can make these vines slow, but actually cannot affect the prestige energies of these vines truly.

After that vine twines his body, immediately braves sharp thorns, grips to his within the body. At Huo Yuhao that formidable body intensity, actually does not have the means to defend in front of this sharp thorn completely, the intense stabbing pain spreads over the whole body instantaneously.

However, Huo Yuhao had experienced the innumerable painful men, was more painful than hundred times of matters he to experience this. Therefore, although the severe pain made his whole body one tight, but also made his state of mind sober completely.

To look for Wutong, must live to be good first. Whatever, cannot die here.

A huge form appears behind Huo Yuhao, impressively Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White). A joyful thought also outward blooms from him along with it. The happiness of seven emotions.

These disturbance tight blood red vines were stiff immediately, then slight swinging, they also looked like have the life to be common, danced because of the joy.

Huo Yuhao only thought that loosen, hurries Teleportation, has been separated from the fetter. But these time actually does not dare to fly again upwardly. That Tang San can actually make the universe invert. To be separated from his control is too difficultly and is too difficult.

In this time, a blood red big net is dropping from the clouds, covers toward his body.

Strong murderous aura also from the sky erupts. Huo Yuhao discovered with amazement, how regardless of dodge. As if impossible to fend the fetter of that big net. In this flash, that big net as if turned into an entire space, must him load resembles.

Cannot avoid, that can only shoulder hardly.

takes a deep breath, in Huo Yuhao pupil light none remaining twinkle, in order to sees Wutong, what kind of pain, oneself present must shoulder to be good.

Giant ice cones are centered on his body rapid formation. Then erupts to the surroundings, the innumerable ice cones shoot up to the sky just like the great column generally.

Is surprised including Huo Yuhao, Octagonal Ten Thousands Directional Thorns after oneself become Gods, unexpectedly already so formidable?

Moreover, a Bai Se (White Color) halo also along with it from his outward diffusion, Absolute Zero!

Absolute Zero this Soul Ability, should call divine skill now, it most major characteristics, have huge amplification to the Huo Yuhao all Ice Attribute abilities, in actual combat. Has the extraordinary significance.

That icicle rises straight from the ground, becomes fully has the hundred zhang (333m) to be high in a flash.

In the sky blood red big net falls, collides with the ice cones together. The ice cone is melting rapidly, but also made the speed that it fell slow down. At least strove to Huo Yuhao for several minutes.

The Huo Yuhao personal appearance retrocedes rapidly, he has never thought must defeat Tang San this matter, because he is very clear, that radically is the impossible matter. Therefore, he only then runs, first travelled said again.

Although Tang San is God Realm Law Enforcer, but in God Realm, not only also only then his Law Enforcer. Now only then flees his control first. Then thinks that other means ask the wife to be right.

Explodes rapidly draws back, Huo Yuhao has released Absolute own speed. Meanwhile. Has detonated these icicles.

Ice Emperor light shadow appears behind Huo Yuhao, the anger of seven emotions.

Under the function of mood of anger. The Ice Explosion Technique prestige can erupt Absolute instantaneously, seems the indignation of nature, the mood mix of violent anger in that innumerable Ice Explosion, changes into the fragment of ice, able to move unhindered dances in the air.

Halos burst out from Huo Yuhao unceasingly outward, are drawing support from the mood of anger, not only Ice Explosion Technique has inspired, following, is Snow Dance Extreme Ice Domain and Ice Bear Snowstorm. Huo Yuhao incisiveness of own range control release.

This big forest, as if completely turned into sheet ice blue world, terrifying ultra-low temperature Absolute Zero in that Snowstorm, the prestige can the power, even if is God Realm Law Enforcer Tang San, the footsteps have stopped.

In the blood red double pupil, reveals color of the surprise, muttered thought aloud: “Has not thought that this boy just now enters God Realm, has passed to his Power of Emotion and own ability union Rong Nianbing unexpectedly was so good. Really is fills the elasticity fellow, the pressure is bigger, the rebound is also bigger.”

Huo Yuhao cannot choose the exact way because of flurry is running away, when Ice Bear Snowstorm erupts, he felt obviously murderous aura weakened, secret relaxing., as if also had a feeling of control world. Is this level of god?

The first batch of traveling award has pulled out officially, the winner's list is:

Young 18 areas

Month 7 areas

Heart rain 16 areas

Is drunk to become common practice 14 areas

Simple .11 areas

This week of award winner is: Tang Xiaoyao 10 areas

Asked fellow lucky prize-winning players to relate our custom services: 800051345, they will register your materials, after the list all comes out, will inform you to prepare the traveling schedule.

The range of next week drawing is the rank first ten players in region entire clothing/taking strength ranking first five players and 19 areas, the names of 19 areas are the Saint masters, the player who wants to be selected can go to the new area to give a try \;

From this week, the material object reward of drawing gradually will also provide in the hand of fellow winners, therefore everybody many participation game, has the opportunity to win our rewards as far as possible \; ( to be continued ) 580



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-621-part-2





Volume 13

#621 - Dai Mubai And Zhu Zhuqing


\; The surrounding scenery fluctuates gradually, but actually throughout is the big forests, as if this big forest is inexhaustible. Huo Yuhao self-examines, at own speed, in so situation whole-heartedly, even if were true Star Dou Forest has completed to pass through, but this forest actually as before has not felt the end now, his Divine Consciousness released outward, felt, was only the infinite trees and vegetation.

Behind when to a wee bit cannot feel murderous aura that transmits, Huo Yuhao stops the footsteps, falls in the ground. When turns round to look, the back as before is the boundless big forest, but did not have that father-in-law's fearful aura.

Although did not have the danger temporarily, but on the Huo Yuhao face actually full was the forced smile, had such a formidable and strong father-in-law Sir, how this looked for Wutong by oneself! Moreover, oneself this father-in-law Sir or God Realm Law Enforcer, oneself just entered God Realm, completely ignorants regarding the surrounding all, is really difficult.

Then this does? In a completely strange place, and has in the situation of giant crisis anytime, cultivates to turn into a god him with great difficulty, feels no use.

Smiles bitterly is walking forward, how regardless to say that must go out of this big forest to say first again, he does not dare to fly sky over the forest to go, because such is too easy to expose itself. But in this big forest, as if has a mysterious strength, even if Divine Consciousness, is unable to investigate a farther place.

Does not know how long, front suddenly sees the light suddenly, a lakelet appears in front of Huo Yuhao.

Sees this lakelet, Huo Yuhao slightly stares, because he discovered with amazement. Here really looked like Lake of Life in Star Dou Forest.

Wait / Etc.!

Suddenly. In the Huo Yuhao eye reveals the surprised color, because he discovered that in this lakelet lakeside really small courtyards, in the courtyard has three log cabins, is not big, but is fine, particularly lakeside in this forest. Has several points of elegant taste.

Has the room naturally to have the person, Huo Yuhao hurries to walk toward that log cabin, although does not know what here lives is any god, but finds the person to inquire that the situation in this God Realm, must try to find out carelessly is much stronger, particularly in oneself offended under the premise of Sir Law Enforcer.

Before arriving at the courtyard, Huo Yuhao high sound track: “Has the person?”

So summoned three times, a log cabin central gate opened. Goes out of a person from inside.

This person of golden hair, stature is quite big and tall, the facial features are plain, seem the 30-year-old appearance, but stands there, plain atmosphere beyond description sends out from him. Just likes the palatial mountain is ordinary. Shakes the person heart and soul.

Why does not know, saw this person, Huo Yuhao thinks unexpectedly somewhat familiar, unexpectedly a little likely saw Duke White Tiger. His vision is sharp, slightly staring, startled sees, in this golden hair man eyes pupil, unexpectedly is also the double pupil.

“Comes.”The golden hair man voice is vigorous, but is having several points of sonorous sound.

The front gate opens, Huo Yuhao walked subconsciously. But his double pupil, actually throughout looks steadily on front golden hair man face, in the heart has as if guessed correctly anything, actually some cannot confirm.

“Did he come?”In this time, another sound is resounding, this sound is somewhat chilly, but is quite moving, in the chilliness, seems mixing with several points of gentleness.

In log cabin, goes out of one person, a black long hair hangs loose after the brain, the simple black long skirt puts in her is truly graceful. It seems 28 and nine -year-old appearances, the stature is really abundant, the facial features are also beautiful. In a pair of beautiful pupil, the chilly meaning caresses the face. But looks at the Huo Yuhao look, actually is really gentle, even is also having several points of gentle flavor.

“You are Yuhao.”The black hair female smiles was saying.

Huo Yuhao nodded, the look somewhat is vacant.

That black hair female turned head to look at a golden hair man, said with a smile lowly: “He may be stronger than you must much, is first-level Gods.”

The golden hair youth said proudly: “That is also my type.”

The Huo Yuhao look concentrates suddenly, immediately confirmed in oneself heart to guess that “you and you were?”

Golden hair youth vision brilliant visits him, in the double pupil, the none remaining glitters, “I called Dai Mubai, this was my wife Zhu Zhuqing.”

Dai Mubai? Zhu Zhuqing?

Hears these two names, even if Huo Yuhao had guessed, has the feeling of one's blood bubbles up to the brim as before.

Initially enters God Realm, actually encounters Law Enforcer to engage in factional strife, is the vacant no use time, actually met, has run into own ancestor!

Right, is the ancestor. Once, Douluo Continent 10,000 years ago, initially, Shrek Academy was also only small Academy of concept, only received the monster, but did not receive the average person.

At that time, that generation of Shrek Seven Devils appeared, making entire Continent shock, had afterward Shrek Academy, had afterward Tang Sect.

But in then Shrek Seven Devils, the leader without doubt afterward became Tang San that Sea God and Asura god double god unites, but, in seven devils other six people similarly are also outstanding.

seven devils ranks first, must call an elder brother's person including Tang San, the name is: Dai Mubai, is called Evil Eyes White Tiger, is first-generation White Tiger Douluo. White Tiger this title, has followed Dai Clan to inherit. The Huo Yuhao father, Duke White Tiger isn't Dai Hao, this lineage/vein descendant? In other words, front man, if is really Evil Eyes White Tiger Dai Mubai, he is the Huo Yuhao ancestor!

But Zhu Zhuqing, then ranks in that generation of Shrek Seven Devils sixth, is called Hell Civet. In initial Shrek Seven Devils, besides Tang San, individual strength was strongest, was Dai Mubai. In the legend, Dai Mubai also same to turn into a god, after the birth descendant, disappears from the scene. At this moment, Huo Yuhao has witnessed this legend without doubt.

When is most difficult, bumps into the family member, this feeling was really too wonderful, the Huo Yuhao subconscious release own Divine Consciousness, has covered toward Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing.

( To know the old generation Shrek Seven Devils story, for details sees does clumsily, «Douluo Continent»)

Dai Mubai knit the brows, anything had not said.

Although Huo Yuhao the mood surges, but will not always be at a loss, if has admitted mistakes the ancestor, that may too lose face. Therefore, he must feel clear is good.

The inheritance of bloodlines will not change because of the passage of time, the next quarter, Huo Yuhao has done to the end obeisance, knees down, sound because of excited, but somewhat is shivering the [say / way]: “Huo Yuhao pays a visit two ancestors.”

“You should say that called Dai Yuhao! Otherwise, what ancestor do you also recognize?”Dai Mubai reprimanded.

Dai Yuhao? These three characters explode into the Huo Yuhao heart, immediately made him stay. Yes, oneself should be called Dai Yuhao to be right. But, can oneself call this name really?

In the mind, past events reverberate, in childhood, how mother was pulls to grow up difficultly, how also to change into semifinished product loess finally, the intense stabbing pain burst out in the heart. Although told him sanely, should not offend these two ancestors at this time, but, he actually as before could not bear gain ground, the anti- sound said: “No, my name is Huo, is not surnamed Dai.”

“What did you say?”The Dai Mubai beard and hair all opens, an unequalled powerful imposing manner bursts out from him suddenly.

He clearly is second-level Gods, Huo Yuhao is actually first-level Gods, actually suppressed not gasping for breath, a little looks like before unexpectedly, facing Tang San time.

Huo Yuhao clenches the teeth, the support, did not speak with hardship. But the stubbornness in look, is actually his reply.

The Dai Mubai look is cold and gloomy, “don't you recognize the ancestors unexpectedly?”

Huo Yuhao expression also already cold, in this short time, he has set firm resolve. Some matters can change, but something, are also forever unchangeable.

“I have not recognized the ancestor. However, my surname actually can only follow mother. From infancy to maturity, is raises me who mother suffers great hardships, in the family|home wanted a little delicious thing, the mothers to give me, but she actually in the back silently ate at is not being the thing that the person should eat. Without mother, I already died, what discussed that recognizes the ancestor to return to the birth family? I can no longer hate, when I had the ability, mother was not already, I can only for the matter that mother handles, inherits her surname. Therefore, my name is Huo, this surname, will never change, only if mother ressurection, makes me change personally!”

At the beginning, Huo Yuhao said that these words somewhat were difficult, but more said that his own imposing manner was more powerful, spoke of finally, he has stood up from the ground, top Dai Mubai to take to his tremendous pressure, categorical that the words said.

Dai Mubai coldly [say / way]: “Your matter, I knew. You offended Tang San, if no us, Tang San is impossible to give you a wee bit opportunities, will strangle you, if you are surnamed Huo, you can get the hell out, is not my Dai Clan person, I will not help you be tiny bit. In this God Realm, you will be unable to take a single step forward, even was placed on trial by Tang San.”

The Huo Yuhao heart is piece of ice-cold, smiling that he self-ridicules, retrocedes suddenly two steps, then respectful bows with hands clasped, salutes to Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing.

When Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing think he must change the mind, he has actually walked tall, turns around to walk toward the courtyard.

He walks without hesitation, does not have the sluggishness of least bit. Rather with world artificial enemy, cannot change him a filial piety to mother.

“Yuhao!”At this moment, suddenly, a summon from behind resounds suddenly. In this sound, filled sobbed with anxiously, has endless feeling attached.

Hears this sound, the Huo Yuhao whole body shakes suddenly, in the double pupil, full is color with amazement, he looked like the immobilization by witchcraft was common, stood is motionless there, dull, has turned round slowly. But he that firm back, in this moment actually in unceasing is trembling, fierce is trembling.

On December 21, the Chengdu bamboo slip sold! Am I wear the western-style clothing to sign to you good, or wears Tang Sect Wei Yi, the little friends in Chengdu? Peerless Tang Sect last big result.

Activity subject: The Tang three few «Peerless Tang Sect 26» new product listing Chengdu bamboo slips sell will move the time: On December 21, 2014 14 : 00-15 : 30 operating location: Chengdu Bucher purchasing books center West Shop( Yingmenkou road 12 th)( not

Ends being continued

~^~) 1052



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-621-part-3





Volume 13

#622 - Big Result


In three small log cabins, leftmost that already opened, the entrance place, a cotton garment Jing Chai female stands there, on the elegant face, full is the tears. She is holding the doorframe, as if the next quarter, oneself will throw down. Her beauty, is delicate, but actually not in part of ones duty annoys the person to love tenderly. It seems has several points of vicissitudes slightly, but as before is the world is outstandingly beautiful.

“Mother”Huo Yuhao cried suddenly, flies to throw, his whole person who also resembled looked like was completely uncontrolled generally, threw to that woman in front of directly, closely grasped her leg, cried loudly.

Yes, this woman, at present this woman, is Huo Yuhao that pitiful mother Huo Yun'er!

Some Zhu Zhuqing rebuking stared Dai Mubai one, the eye socket micro red [say / way]: “Is you dislikes, must do the matter that this moves unnecessarily.”

Dai Mubai hey said with a smile: “Worthily is father's type, has the strength of spirit. I like such child, has not made me make an effort white. The young fellows, are good and good. The eye that then, Oscar that fellow must envy was red! Ha Ha Ha Ha!”

Huo Yuhao has not thought that here will see mother unexpectedly, suddenly, the mood has been hard completely self-made, under cries, since heart many years depressing emotion complete explosion, recently Wutong left, pain that also the bitter experience suppresses continually, as if also during these wept bitterly to release completely.

Huo Yun'er gently is touching son's head, the tears are the flood, wants to draw Huo Yuhao, but she also where has that big strength!

After Dai Mubai, etc. he had cried a while, the stride arrives at side him, has raised from the ground him.

“Man and real man, crying a while vented to be good, should not be endless. This is the celebration, should Gao Xingcai be right.”At the same time was saying, he has also patted the back of Huo Yuhao, vigorous mental power breaks in Huo Yuhao within the body, him the mental power disorder that because the emotion intense eruption causes has stabilized.

“Many thanks the ancestor helps.”If Huo Yuhao at this time yes what's the matter, he were not silly. Knocks down directly, numerous has knocked three knocks to Dai Mubai.

Dai Mubai such has also been made by him, on the face is actually look with a smile, even is also bringing several points of intense pride. Looks at such, is self-satisfied cannot in be self-satisfied. Yes! No matter what who has such a descendant, same self-satisfied.

“Gets up.”Dai Mubai waved, this time, was Zhu Zhuqing has actually drawn from the ground Huo Yuhao.

Dai Mubai said: “Now the mother and child have a reunion, did you also call Huo Yuhao? Yun'er, this matter I gave you.”

“Yes, ancestor.”Huo Yun'er sobbed is complying with one, in the beautiful pupil full was the endless gratitude.

Zhu Zhuqing said with a smile: “Your mother and child so are separately long, many words must say that said to the room. Goes.”

“Yes.”Huo Yuhao hurries respectfully complies with one, he only thought that at this time throat as if stem anything, the brain is a confusion. Mother ressurection, this regarding him, the influence was really too big. In this moment, he only thought that anything is unimportant, only wants to defend side mother.

Walks into the log cabin with Huo Yun'er, the Huo Yuhao fierce squatting down body grasps mother, actually suppresses not to make the tears flow.

Huo Yun'er gently is touching his hair, crazy tunnel: “My Little Yuhao has grown up, grew up really! The child, these years, you have certainly had many pain.”

Huo Yuhao shook the head, he has certainly had many pain, underwent countless tribulations, but in this moment, once misery was completely unimportant. Can let mother ressurection, even if again painstakingly again tired, what was also considered as?

In his heart many words wanted to say to mother obviously, was, in this moment, he anything could not say. Has been several years of orphan, suddenly also became had mother's child, this feeling, was really too preciously and is too for him precious.

The mother and child such are supporting, is gradually calm. Huo Yun'er related own matter to Huo Yuhao.

Originally, Huo Yun'er truly died more than ten years ago, but, Huo Yuhao is first-level Gods, has the ability that ordinary Gods does not have, that is, he can lead few family members to arrive in God Realm.

Even if Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing cannot achieve this point, because only then first-level Gods has such qualifications.

Tang San after is God Realm Law Enforcer, although cannot interfere the world matter easily, but involves Gods, being accommodating some places. Therefore, Dai Mubai after Tang San discussed that in the darkness seeks for the Huo Yun'er soul, making her ressurection arrive at God Realm, although Huo Yun'er three Gods were not continually extremely, but lived finally.

Huo Yuhao is the Dai Mubai posterity, Tang San, when tests Huo Yuhao, to whet Huo Yuhao, how to conceal to Dai Mubai? Therefore, Huo Yuhao all, Dai Mubai knows that he is also clear, Huo Yun'er is in the Huo Yuhao heart the biggest heart knot. Only has to untie this heart knot, can make him truly Gods. Therefore, had at present this occurrence.

However, Huo Yuhao this first-level Gods ability, cannot belt more people arrive at God Realm, quota merely remaining two, has given Huo Yun'er, another, naturally must give Dai Hao. God Realm was lonely, must make Huo Yun'er cavity true feelings report back.

All that on Douluo Continent has, other Huo Yun'er is could not see that but she can actually feel around her grave surrounding area hundred meters all. For serveral days, is she happiest day, because, she can hear every day, before that grave, the sound that oneself that beloved man poured out. The sorrow and vicious tendencies in heart, with this sound and son forthcoming good news, diverge finally gradually. Today sees Huo Yuhao, has her mood completely released?

Huo Yuhao naturally does not know had these many changes, but listened to Huo Yun'er to say after was Dai Mubai her ressurection, in the heart full is grateful. What also has to live importantly compared with mother?

After the Huo Yuhao mood returned to normal some, the matter that also has these years said to mother listens, these difficulties that naturally, receives naturally were neglected by him, but was narrating some happy matters.

God Realm as if no daytime the dark night, has not known how long, the knocking on a door sound has resounded.

Huo Yuhao hurries to stand up, opens the door, sees only outside to stand, is Dai Mubai.

“Ancestor.”Huo Yuhao must kneel down to salute immediately, actually held on by Dai Mubai.

“Was good, in this God Realm, some where that many courtesy. What kind of? Did Yun'er convince you? Was surnamed Dai? You could rest assured that when came after your father that brat to God Realm, looked how I tidy up him, gives your mother to vent anger. This mixes the boy, wholeheartedly is country right, how can actually neglect own family member?”

From beginning to end, actually Huo Yun'er had not said to Huo Yuhao changes surname this matter, but Huo Yuhao is intelligent, something, did not need to say again. Mother ressurection, in his heart resentment read already completely went.

“Ancestor, I am willing to recognize ancestor to return to the birth family.”At the same time was saying, he kneels down once more. This time, Dai Mubai has not prevented, laughs saying: “Good, good and good. Later, you called Dai Yuhao.”

Regarding Dai Yuhao this name, Dai Mubai seems satisfied very much, draws Dai Yuhao to go out of the door, arrives in the courtyard.

One table of food and wine already prepared, the whole family gathered round the table to sit, Dai Mubai took up jug liquor, to oneself one bowl, then has given but actually Huo Yuhao.

Huo Yuhao hurried to receive, to Zhu Zhuqing and mothers but actually, finally is one.

Dai Mubai takes up the liquor bowl, said: “Today this, is congratulates into Gods for you.”

“Xie ancestor.”Sees mother, Huo Yuhao the mood is greatly smooth at this time, in Yin Jin a Cup liquor.

Dai Mubai is also one drinks completely, Ha Ha said with a smile: “Is happy and happy.”

Shifting to a new subject, Dai Mubai asked to Yuhao: “You arrive at God Realm, can once see Tang San?”

Dai Yuhao the face, after will arrive at God Realm, immediately painstakingly the matter of bitter experience said in detail.

Listened to his such saying, Dai Mubai also to stare staring, Huo Yun'er was worry of face.

Zhu Zhuqing snort|hum, said: “Also counter- he! Turns head we to look for him. Looked that he can you be what kind.”

Dai Mubai stared Zhu Zhuqing one, signals with the eyes to her, said: “This matter I also listened to Tang San saying that he to your very much somewhat resentment, his such daughter, since childhood loved seriously, received greatly was so suffering from injustice, no wonder he can so. God Realm is the place of tasteful strength, you are first-level Gods, defeats him not to be certainly impossible, but, you must show your enough strength to him, only has so, may subside his anger, making him believe that you are capable of protecting his daughter. Other you do not need to be worried, if he proposed again makes you probably defeat him, you independently act, insists some time as far as possible, as for other, gives us.”

“Yes, many thanks ancestor.”Listened to the Dai Mubai words, in the Huo Yuhao heart Dading, thinks one and Beibei between them the relations, naturally understand close between old generation Shrek Seven Devils. Two ancestors support to oneself, naturally was much easier.

Having a good time that a meal banquet eats, has eaten meal, Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing make Huo Yun'er stay in the log cabin, they together, bringing Huo Yuhao to soar.

In God Realm, the fog is very low, above the kilometer, is not only that misty clouds. In the fog, has the thick heaven and earth elemental energy fluctuation, during the breath, within the body mental power can the to rush forth ebullition.

Had the urging of Dai Mubai, Huo Yuhao has restrained the mind at this time, transferred within the body mental power to revolve, simultaneously was feeling own body change silently.

Most the chapter, has wanted to say anything, is somewhat vacant, what are more will soon leave moved that. Two years of companion, 5.2 million characters. Thank you, two years in my life has been accompanying me, good happy peerless Tang Sect to accompany your two years in your lives. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-622-part-1





Volume 13

#622 - Big Result


Yes! One are first-level Gods, is God of Emotion. Wish makes the father-in-law approve, must show enough cultivating to be good. That is actually what kind, can insist a longer time before father-in-law?

Dai Mubai as if saw in his heart is thinking anything, light [say / way]: “If you are only want to resist purely, this fought does not need to hit you to lose, your opportunity did not have. Person or god, if did not have the heart of viing for supremacy, how can also display Absolute own ability? Since you can practice to turn into a god, this truth has no reason unclear.”

Listened to his such saying, Huo Yuhao immediately one startled, yes! If did not have including the heart of viing for supremacy, own battle efficiency can also display many, “may and be possible that to be the Wutong father!”Huo Yuhao somewhat bitter and astringent saying.

Dai Mubai disdains snort|hum, said: “You believe that was inadequate by my brothers who your ability can also injure? Believes me, you when the time comes wanted display whole-heartedly on the line. Let alone your impossible wound he, even if you can, that is at God Realm, instead was greatly meddlesome.”

Huo Yuhao has not said anything again, but the ray in eye has been short the beforehand several points to dread.

Initially when enters God Realm, here strangeness, making in his innermost feelings present some fears unavoidably, luckily, when this key has bumped into Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing, making his heart also gradually stabilize, own confidence gradually was also restoring. He after all once was most powerhouse on Douluo Continent, and has defeated invincible myth Beast God Di Tian, the God Realm two characters will take to him the pressure, but after he calmed down at this time completely, this pressure, gradually transformed the power.

The time is not long, the distant place, that palace was already in sight, sees that palace, the Huo Yuhao look immediately becomes earnest, because, Tang Wutong there! In any event, today two ancestors, oneself must see that Wutong is good, must explain to her personally.

Close palace, several golden forms have not blocked their way, but after seeing Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing, they immediately bow to salute.

Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing, although is second-level Gods, because relates closely with Law Enforcer Tang San, status in God Realm naturally also on to develop according to the situation.

Dai Mubai said: “Asked Sea God to come out, we had the matter to consult.”

“Yes, please wait a bit.”A [gold/metal] clothes person rapidly.

The time is not long, Zhen's blue ray drops from the clouds together, is Tang San, but, present he, did not have to chase down Dai Yuhao time that blood red today.

Sees Huo Yuhao, his look concentrates, cold murderous aura ascends immediately, but has a look at Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing again, in the heart murderous aura also weakened several points.

“Mubai, how did you come?”Tang San light asking, in the expression appears somewhat desolate.

Dai Mubai said: “Also not because of this kid. Little San, your also age, but also competes with the child? I know that you love Wutong, but must give me this descendant explanation the opportunity.”

Tang San coldly snorted, said: “Among friendship by our brothers, other matter how, but how this matter is not good. My such daughter, unexpectedly received such big injury in the world, I do not allow him to injure Wutong once more. Only if, he can defeat me.”

The Dai Mubai anger snort|hum, said: “How defeats you? You also really think one are invincible? Yuhao, on, making him have a look at your first-level Gods strength.”

The Dai Yuhao complexion slightly changes, he thinks that and Tang San depending on the relations between Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing, mediated to oneself, can perhaps see Tang Wutong. But who knows that this had not said several words, must begin unexpectedly. In heart immediately awkward.

Tang San coldly looks to him, “do you dare to fight with me?”

Dai Yuhao takes a deep breath, one step steps forward, before the personal appearance flutters, bows to salute to Tang San, “I only want to see one side Wutong. If the senior insists on testing the school, the younger generation is willing to try.”

Tang San has smiled suddenly, smiles disdaining that contemptuous, smiles, “good, I must have a look but actually, why you come to contend with me.”

Tao heavenly power presses erupts suddenly, blots out the sky general, goes toward Dai Yuhao to rush forth, the Tang San cold and gloomy sound reverberates in his ear, “your opportunity, only then this time, looks in the Mubai share, I will not kill you, but after this time, you dare to come again, I erase your memory. Let your forever forgetting Wutong.”

Dai Yuhao stared in a big way the eye suddenly, everyone had own Reverse Scale, he was also same, since arriving at God Realm, he has been withstanding the oppression of Tang San, he adjusted his mentality as far as possible, how does not dare to revolt facing Tang San. But listened to a Tang San such saying at this time, in the heart fighting intent flaming burnt immediately, for Wutong, in order to sees own beloved woman, now anything cannot attend.

A strange brilliance bursts out from Dai Yuhao suddenly, the aura of his whole person also changes. The aquamarine form behind shines together in him, is Ice Emperor.

Ice Emperor, in the Dai Yuhao mood, representing, angrily!

The powerful thought ascends, the Dai Yuhao double pupil shines, on the forehead Eye of Destiny opens, in Eye of Destiny, the strange halos are sparkling faintly, immediately, after Dai Yuhao brain, presents a corona, this corona addendum circle presents for the thorn shape.

Dai Yuhao Spirit Eyes initial ninth Soul Ring, Thorny Halo.

Although to turn into a god, but beforehand Soul Ability actually all exists, moreover had the sublimation, under the function of Divine Consciousness, this Thorny Halo blooms the strange brilliance, Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing of distant place feels the aura that lends, slightly is startled. Good strength big Divine Consciousness fluctuation! Worthily is the first-level Gods strength.

This Thorny Halo naturally came from Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler, even if initially were when facing Beast God Di Tian, Dai Yuhao has not used, that was because, he worried that Di Tian through own Soul Ability detected one have absorbed Evil Emperor Soul Ring, thus there is the heart of guarding. Afterward he started Space-Time Ray directly, Beast God really does not beat, because he hid the strength in front.

But now, facing the powerhouse of Tang San this level, where he dares to have hideaway Ah? of least bit

Tang San has gotten rid, he lifts toward the direction right hand of Dai Yuhao, the surrounding all turned into the blue color immediately completely, the terrifying oppression strength ascends instantaneously. The right hand receives, the finger springs outward. Immediately, one group azure bright light rolled to fly in the Dai Yuhao direction.

Although Dai Yuhao does not know what Tang San use is any ability, but by his judgment to Tang San strength, where dares to have the heart of least bit despising.

The Soul Power instantaneous transformation is Absolute Ice, the dark blue ray cuts together suddenly, is Emperor's Sword, Peerless Extreme Ice!

“Bites!”In the resounding sound, Peerless Extreme Ice unexpectedly instantaneous to shatter, changes into the innumerable fragments from the sky to scatter in all directions to flutter about, but that green light group actually as before flew in the Dai Yuhao direction, the speed is not fast, but in the entire flight, is having the extremely terrifying pressure.

[Say / Way] that Tang San disdains: “Visible atheistic ability, wants to resist my Azure Sky Nirvana Divine Thunder?”

Dai Yuhao takes a deep breath, he understands that perhaps any ordinary Soul Ability, before oneself this father-in-law Sir, does not have any function.

The mind receives suddenly, the back Ice Emperor form also instantaneously becomes clear, Ice Emperor look cold looks to Tang San, who no matter she match is, the intense spunk ascends instantaneously, is centered on the body of Dai Yuhao, green jade light shoots up to the sky together, unexpectedly stiffly breaks a slit in the surrounding blue space.

The Dai Yuhao left leg one step steps forward, the meaning of missing bursts out, on the forehead, Eye of Destiny turned into the black and white bi-color suddenly, two halos are the electricity shoot.

In instance that black and white bi-color projects, airborne blue color for it one gloomy, blue world turned into the black and white two colors unexpectedly instantaneously.

Huge vertical eye, as if haunched the entire sky to be ordinary, float behind Dai Yuhao, that black Bai Se (White Color) ray also instantaneously flooded in the entire space.

Tang San, was Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing, on the face reveals the surprised color, but the surprised degree was slightly different. Not is only they, even if Dai Yuhao, surprised inexplicable, Power of Destiny that oneself inspire, unexpectedly formidable in this way?

Soul Expropiation and Casualty of Destiny, two big divine skill in this God Realm, as if bloomed their true brilliance.

Two rays fell on Tang San instantaneously, although the Tang San whole body erupted the intense blue light, but did not have what the effect of impediment to these two rays. The body also turned into the black and white bi-color.

But that Azure Sky Nirvana Divine Thunder, arrived in front of Dai Yuhao at this time.

The Dai Yuhao right fist wields, in the double pupil, presented the Tang Wutong form unexpectedly.

Thinking Dong Fist, thinks of such as Quan Yong. Additional, the anger of mood.

All prevents me to miss the Wutong strength, must wither away in my anger. This is this time thought.

“Bang!”

The black and white bi-color in sky after Dai Yuhao two big divine skill erupt, is gloomy, but, the azure bright ray floods in the entire space.

Dai Yuhao only thought that as if the huge black dragon twined their body, then burst out the unequalled terrifying explosive force. That explosive force fully erupts to soul from the body, the fierce pain, as if must tear into shreds his whole person.

Aquamarine form transformation is Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass, the light joyful sudden gable lives in the body of Dai Yuhao, clouds heaven and earth elemental energy, immediately goes toward his body gathering at the crazy speed.

Octagonal Ice Source Concentration.

Huge heaven and earth elemental energy is washing the body of Dai Yuhao, restores on him to receive the injury that.

But the distant place, the body of Tang San has actually shaken shaking, in the mouth exudes one low stuffily, shivered. Black and white bi-color fluctuation also became fierce several points. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-622-part-2





Volume 13

#622 - Big Result


But under flickers, that black and white bi-color actually diverged, is only the Tang San complexion, seemed are unexpectedly many have wiped palely.

Was he injured? This is the first response of Dai Yuhao.

Yes, Tang San has been injured, has not thought including Tang San that the Dai Yuhao Thorny Halo effect so will be unexpectedly strong. He enough understands Dai Yuhao, but this Thorny Halo is actually his first use.

The Thorny Halo effect is, oneself many were greatly injured, will have 50% direct rebounds to change into the mind injury to the match.

If normally, Spiritual Power of this rebound is impossible to injure Tang San, but in that flickers, on Tang San actually Dai Yuhao Soul Expropiation! Own mind defensive power reduces suddenly.

“Good, you are very good!”Saying of Tang San coldly .

Dai Yuhao hurries the anxious [say / way]: “I am not intentionally, I do not know to be able like this.”

“Was needless to say.”The Tang San right hand lifts, the Huo Yuhao very familiar ray appears together during he grasps. The bright golden color along with it bursting out, is, golden trident.

In Dai Yuhao Azure Sky Nirvana Divine Thunder, although restored several points with the help of Octagonal Ice Source Concentration, actually as before the ache wants to crack. Sees the golden trident, complexion big change, the single is the thought that he can feel the terrifying prestige energy that in that golden trident bursts out.

The Tang San look changes has free time to hoodwink suddenly, the surrounding fog turned into the blue color once more, but this time, is actually the blue sea.

In the Tang San hand the golden trident moved, one after another, golden Halo flew toward Dai Yuhao.

The Dai Yuhao sensation ability is quite formidable, he knows that now most should do, continually is opening Thorny Halo, displays Power of Destiny once more. Only has so, can make Tang San dread.

However, he does not have such to do, that after is his father-in-law, is the Tang Wutong father! Can he injure him?

The personal appearance retrocedes suddenly, Dai Yuhao flies to escape rapidly backward.

However, that golden Halo actually closely associated flickers close.

Dai Yuhao discovered with amazement, when that golden Halo arrives above oneself top of the head, oneself all abilities originally, unexpectedly likely by complete seal generally. Any Soul Ability is unable to use.

That Halo fell, set on oneself. Golden Halo, live in his body tight band. Cannot move again.

“Tang San, do not go too far. You use the indefinite disturbance to a child unexpectedly! Do you want to do?”An angry sound resounds, the ray dodges, the form appears in front of Tang San together not far away, grasped him to prepare the thorn to the Dai Yuhao golden trident. Not is just former God of Emotion Rong Nianbing?

Tang San coldly has swept his one eyes, suddenly, in the hand the golden trident moves again, is golden Halo blooms, Rong Nianbing and he only in close, how regardless of not to have thought that Tang San will get rid to him unexpectedly, immediately by that golden Halo sets on the body, could not be moved.

Moreover, golden Halo also suddenly raise in the distant place, unexpectedly also wraps Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing.

Tang San vision dense looks to Rong Nianbing, said: “Do I want to do? I want to kill this boy. Now, you actually wanted to throw the responsibility to be actually far away, when I have killed him, has thought on reading of my daughter certainly that erases her memory again is. As for you, God of Emotion God Position will reply on you, gives me to keep God Realm to assist me honestly. You wait to look how he dies.”

“You”Rong Nianbing fly into a rage, he cannot think absolutely, Tang San can unexpectedly so. The whole body ray puts greatly, transfers mental power fully, wants to work loose from this golden Halo.

But, Tang San by the indefinite disturbance that the golden trident starts, was known as that God Realm first controls, so is can it be that easy to work loose? If Rong Nianbing also has the position of Gods in the body, and ahead of time is prepared, perhaps also has the possibility of contending. May at this moment, how whatever he stimulates to movement mental power, is unable to work loose from that formidable Halo.

This all looks in the Tang San eye, he only thought that Halo starts to contract inward, the speed is not fast, but is extremely firm, his within the body mental power all transferred, but as before is actually not able to prevent that Halo to the oppression that oneself start.

This pressure is increased rapidly, Dai Yuhao whole body skeleton already oppressed “ka ka”makes noise.

He and he must erase the Wutong memory unexpectedly!

He must kill me.

Wutong and Wutong!

Dai Yuhao was crying out in the heart crazily, within the body mental power and Divine Consciousness, were burning crazily.

But, how that golden Halo is really extremely formidable, how whatever he struggles, is unable to make the speed that golden Halo draws in reduce slightly.

The pressure is getting bigger and bigger, Dai Yuhao started somewhat to suffocate, he even noticed that his body starts, in that oppresses distorts.

Rong Nianbing of distant place, seemed crying out to Tang San anything, but Tang San actually like could not hear, leaned on the golden trident in the ground, coldly looks at itself.

Was dying?

Under the fetter of that terror golden ring, even if Divine Consciousness is inescapable, can only feel the proximity of death unceasingly.

Wutong and Wutong! In the Dai Yuhao heart was crying out crazily.

He does not want dead, he does not think that Wutong forgets itself. Two ancestors were fettered, Teacher was also fettered. If died, Wutong forever forgets itself, again could not see her.

Can't with Wutong in the same place, what significance my to turn into a god have?

No longer silent withers away, in silence, eruption!

Suddenly, Dai Yuhao fierce gaining ground, a gloss beyond description, erupts suddenly from him.

Happy! Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass light shadow appears, joyful mood blooms instantaneously, that strong mood fluctuation merges into one organic whole with his Divine Consciousness and mental power instantaneously, suddenly outward, making the pressure that he bore reduce several points slightly.

Anger! The anger erupts, at this moment, in his heart has many, is angry! Cannot with Tang Wutong in the same place, oneself regard as father-in-law's man actually must massacre itself.

Sorrow! The snowflake dances in the air piece by piece, endless sad bursting out, at this moment, Dai Yuhao as if returned to initially self-created Hao-Dong Three Absolutes time. Thinking Dong Fist, thinks of such as Quan Yong, Recalling Dong Sword, never forgets, Hao-Dong Palm, generation after generations.

Happy! The joyful memory so is always glorious, stormy times that once roommate, on Sea God Lake the Sea God Destiny beautiful pink-blue color surging waves fairy maiden, went through together, blending of heart and heart, this was many joy.

Hatred! The hatred is one painful mood, left Duke's Estate that day, he was hateful, lost Dong'er, Qiu'er and Wutong time, his hatred was dreadful. The hatred, making people crazy.

Wicked! Evil and sinister, this mood Dai Yuhao itself does not have, but he innumerable times had actually felt the wickedness of Evil Soul Master, in mood, this is gloomiest world, at this moment, as if heart of hearts dirtiest thing by this wicked ignition.

Six mood, six eruptions! The sublimation of blooming and state of mind of mood!

On behalf of happy Octagonal Mysterious Ice Grass, is representing angry Ice Jade Emperor Scorpion, is representing sorrowful Ice Heavenly Snow Woman, is representing happy Ice Bear King Xiao Bai (Little White), is representing hatred Mermaid Princess Li Ya, is representing wicked Evil Eye Tyrant Ruler!

Six light shadow, appear in Dai Yuhao respectively behind, light shadow blooms, suddenly superposition, suddenly dispersion, but between that superposition and dispersion, on Dai Yuhao also bursts out six color halos, this halo becomes incomparably powerful, unexpectedly stiffly opens that golden Halo slowly, but on Dai Yuhao, is blooming that six color rays.

At this moment, a huge golden form suddenly appears after that six big spirit, golden halo, just like appearing general, before six big spirits and six mood, will swallow completely. One type beyond description gentle, bold and wild, attachment instantaneous surge.

That is......

Strength that loves!

“Wutong! I, love, you”

Dai Yuhao cried out loudly, at this moment, his voice changes into together seven color halos, straight thrust distant place that palatial palace.

Thick light fog reverberates, fluctuates and dispels in the air. Body that golden color Halo, in his slogan, started to present the chaps traces.

The laughter, anger, sorrow and happiness like detesting! Finally, the strength that loves has defeated other mood, fused all mood.

At this moment, Dai Yuhao mental power and Divine Consciousness, his mind, complete is sublimating.

In his heart, did not have the impediment of Tang San, did not have any to worry with angrily, had, but with did not abandon to Tang Wutong endless being in love.

Tang San of distant place, in the hand the Sea God trident wields, golden light, floating circulation, but this time, actually no longer attacks to Dai Yuhao, but melted Rong Nianbing as well as Dai Mubai and Zhu Zhuqing fetter.

Wipes the light smile, appears on Tang San, he very natural uphold hand, holds in the arms the shoulder of Rong Nianbing, but this time Rong Nianbing, complexion actually gloomy as if must drop the water leakage to come, in the look, is flooding endless, grief and indignation!

“Bang!”Is fettering Dai Yuhao golden Halo loudly to shatter, he breaks the barrier, seven color halos change into seven Halo, composes a strange corona behind him, his own aura does not know that be more powerful than many times before, the fluctuations of seven mood are reverberating unceasingly, Divine Consciousness and mental power merge into one organic whole completely. After arriving at God Realm, he had the feeling of that control finally.

Visits him, Tang San is smiling nod, said: “This also almost, a little my son-in-law's appearance.”

Dai Yuhao still reverberates in own mood at this time, hears the Tang San words, stayed, somewhat is out of sorts.

“Dumb kid, has not paid a visit father-in-law.”Dai Mubai is ridiculing the sound conveys from behind.

Dai Yuhao is almost subconscious immediately knees down, has done obeisance to Tang San, “pays a visit the father-in-law Sir.”1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-622-part-3





Volume 13

#622 - Big Result


The Tang San big hand wields, said: “Gets up.”This time he, is smiling, the blue long hair is elegant, that appearance of outstanding ability, moving heart and soul.

Looks at his genial smiling face, Dai Yuhao just likes in the dream, is this that feels embarrassed own father-in-law Sir wholeheartedly? Among this moment, all as if become are how different.

“Dumb kid, if Tang San must feel embarrassed you, you think that you can also live the present?”Dai Mubai said with a smile.

Some Zhu Zhuqing actually enmities [say / way]: “San Ge, you were also too ruthless.”

Tang San shows a faint smile, said: “Me.”

He looks to Dai Yuhao, said: “You with that Ju Zi(orange) matter, I already knew actually. This matter, mistakenly not in you, but the good fortune makes the person. Although we are the gods, but the matter of world is unable to interfere. Past matter on the past, so long as your heart on Wutong good.”

“Reason that has felt embarrassed in you, naturally is some intentions. Initially, I selected you, has deferred also to inherit my God Position way to carry on all sorts of tests to you, that Wang Qiu'er, actually was also I branches out Wutong Divine Consciousness to be attached to that Three Eyed Golden Lion, otherwise, even if it were Destiny Divine Beast, was impossible to have that many spirit wisdom. Therefore, you do not need are the Wang Qiu'er matter feel again sad. She is Wutong part. Until after Wang Qiu'er offers sacrifices to give you, that some Spiritual Consciousness return on Wutong, making Wang Dong'er turn into Wutong thoroughly.”

“Afterward, certain people went to enter, allow you by the position of Gods, but you have actually done according to my test before, although afterward you inherited his God Position not any issue, but in the fusion of ability, many were also short. Just entered God Realm, your oneself ability and God of Emotion ability originally wanted to fuse completely is also very difficult. Therefore, I oppress you with this way, lets you self- fusion under the pressure. Now looks like, the effect is good. In the future, you should be able the pupil surpasses the teacher, to exceed that somebody.”

Rong Nianbing in side angry [say / way]: “Originally this was you plans, was your plot. Tang San, you are quite mean, you also deceived me to pledge a moment ago.”

A Tang San face cloud poor business conditions light [say / way]: “You think that secretly my inheritance, so is easy? Doesn't pay a price to be how good?”

Dai Yuhao asked to Rong Nianbing in a low voice: “Teacher, did you pledge?”

Rong Nianbing ill-humored [say / way]: “To not let him do not injure you, pledged that keeps the God Realm 30 years. Who knows that this fellow was appropriate, not only this play develops to you, develops to me looks. Dai Mubai, your couple already know that is?”

Dai Mubai innocent [say / way]: “Well, I do not know! How I know that I am second-level Gods.”

Rong Nianbing gets angry: “Nonsense, by your crabby, if the Tang San under cruel methods feel embarrassed your later generation, you so will be quiet? What non- achievement?”

Zhu Zhuqing disdains snort|hum, said: “Knows that you were also swindled? I suspect your intelligence quotient very much.”

“You and you......, Snort! Irritated me!”Rong Nianbing air/Qi big mouth and big mouth is panting for breath.

Tang San is hugging his shoulder, said: “Ok, should not be angry, remains to help me not be good? You are not do not know that recently our God Realm was not peaceful, you actually must travel at this time, did the brothers also do? Let alone, you snatched my inheritance, but also compensates my daughter, what do you have not to be unsatisfied? Yuhao this good seedling, was casual can find one?”

Dai Yuhao completely understood now, originally, from the beginning, oneself during the control of Tang San. Perhaps that is similar to the Star Dou Forest general place, is he creates, then sees two ancestors and mother quoted from oneself.

Dai Mubai Ha Ha said with a smile: “You do not have a look, whose type this is. Little San, quickly puts your daughter, had not seen that my this boy was quick anxious?”

Tang San shows a faint smile, said: “Goes, Yuhao, Wutong in the palace, you looks for her following this road. I do not blame you, does not blame you as for her strangely, I do not know.”

“Yes, many thanks father-in-law Sir.”Regardless of currently in the heart has any enmity mood, might as well find Tang Wutong to be important!

golden light spreads together toward that palace following the direction of Tang San finger, Dai Yuhao hurries to run rapidly toward that side.

Gazes after him to enter in the fog, in the Tang San eye reveals several points of disappointed color, “female does not keep, female not to remain greatly greatly!”

A Rong Nianbing face despises visits him, said: “Was good, do not result in cheaply has also shown off cleverness. Haven't I known you? The God Realm eventful time, your treasure son-in-law inherited my position of Gods, from now on is you one big helps inevitably. Does he have other place in God Realm? Your daughter will not leave you, what did you keep sighing here?”

Tang San sighed, said: “Nianbing, you know why I do want you to keep 30 years?”

Rong Nianbing has gawked, “is not these fellows was not convinced, wants while two big Godking not at the noisy point matter? We also feared that they are inadequate?”

Tang San shook the head, said: “Regarding them, I to was not worried, in any event, that is only our God Realm internal matter. What I am worried is another matter. Two Godking depart, God Realm master control power in my hands, therefore, only then I can feel all changes of God Realm. In 30 years, God Realm will perhaps have the big change, as for is anything, now I have not seen clearly. But I can actually feel that is one might make the God Realm destruction catastrophe.”

“Um?”Rong Nianbing look one cold, he knows that Tang San will not be aimless.

Dai Mubai sinking sound track: “Little San, regardless of any situation, we in the same place, worked as one, would going through the difficulty.”

The Tang San forced smile said: “Hope so. This disaster, is not very simple. Why this is I have not passed to the Yuhao reason position of the Gods. Nianbing, you believe that I do not know really you do see the Yuhao matter secretly? Even if busy, regarding own inheritance, has paid attention. I let go the opportunity of this inheritance intentionally, because I must maintain the complete strength, may resolve this future unknown crisis.”

Rong Nianbing said: “That this can Great Tribulation melt?”

Tang San eyes narrows the eyes, said: “Does not see clearly. It is difficult to melt, but also has a slim chance of survival. Does everything possible.”

Rong Nianbing said: “Good. However, a little I must remind you, domestic strength keeps away foreign aggression.”

“Um.”

Dai Yuhao has walked toward the fog deep place following that golden light, the present scenery gradually becomes clear, a palatial palace, appears before him.

Extends golden light to forward, he cannot attend to acclaiming grand of this palace, walks into fast.

Passes through the gate, he saw that a man and a woman two people sit in the hall, is playing chess.

They seem young, the man wears black clothed, the look is handsome, but that female also has the outstandingly beautiful looks, a white clothing, chastely like snow.

Dai Yuhao walks, as if has alarmed them, four vision have simultaneously thrown.

The man stands up, nodded to Dai Yuhao, walks to go forward saying: “Hello, I called Ji Dong. You are Yuhao. Welcome you to arrive at God Realm committee.”

“! Hello.”Is here God Realm committee? In the Huo Yuhao heart somewhat is surprised.

That white clothing female also stands up, Ji Dong said: “This is my wife Lie Yan.”

“Hello.”Dai Yuhao hurries to salute. Although he does not know that who these two people are, but if here is really God Realm committee, that these two status absolutely are not low.

Lie Yan shows a faint smile, said: “Looks for Wutong quickly.”

“Thanks two.”Dai Yuhao apologized two people, continued to go following golden light.

Looks the form that he leaves, Lie Yan says with a smile: “Yuhao is single-minded with the sentiment, looked like past you actually very much.”

Ji Dong he he smiles, said: “I suspected very much that big brother Tang San looks for husband for daughter according to my standard!”

Lie Yan “pū”smiles, said: “Beautiful stench.”

Ji Dong hugs into her the bosom, said: “Actually, the flavor of after the bitter comes the sweet, is most beautiful. I believe that he will experience quickly.”

( To know Ji Dong and Lie Yan story, for details sees makes «Bacchus» also «Yin-Yang Crown» clumsily)

The gold thread has spread to stop to the top layer. The front was a leaf of door, Huo Yuhao lifts the hand to knock knocking in the gate.

“Comes.”A temperate female voice resounds, is very interesting to listen, but the Huo Yuhao complexion actually slightly changes, because he listens, this sound does not belong to Wutong.

Pushes the door to enter, the Huo Yuhao vision actually suddenly contracts.

In the room, two people, stand sit, that station the female wears the pink long skirt, a long hair combs the long scorpion pigtail to dangle gently, can see her fine slender fair beautiful neck from the side, the long skirt beam place grasps gracefully, outlined perfectly her moving stature.

At this time she had turned around, the beautiful appearance, making Dai Yuhao look slightly one dull.

But that sits the person on bed, although can only see the profile, but Dai Yuhao is one recognizes, is that not just long-awaited person?

“You and hello.”Dai Yuhao subconscious gives regards to the female at present, but vision actually throughout on Tang Wutong.

The females arrive in front of him, careful is taking a look at him, but Huo Yuhao actually just likes unsettled.

“I called Xiao Wu, the dancing dance.”Xiao Wu smiles was saying that in beautiful pupil actually full is the color of satisfaction, that is mother -in-law looks at son-in-law's look. Has patted the shoulder of Dai Yuhao gently, then passes through from his side, and general's family takes.

“Wutong!”Does not have other people, where Dai Yuhao also to be able to bear again, says one, threw in front of Tang Wutong.

Tang Wutong sits there, actually unemotionally, the whole person looked like got down immobilization by witchcraft, motionless.

“Wutong. Is I am not good, was I makes a mistake. You make me explain that is good?”Dai Yuhao squats in front of Tang Wutong, grasps she somewhat icy cold both hands in own hand.

The Tang Wutong look seemed to be many several points of appearance, turns head to look to him, but in the beautiful pupil, is actually flooding being at a loss.

“Who are you?”

The simple three characters, are similar to three handle great hammers are ordinary, hammer maliciously in the Huo Yuhao heart. He immediately face whiten sits on the ground, one nondescriptive fear, raises instantaneously from the bottom of the heart. Loosened the hand of Tang Wutong subconsciously, body uncontrolled sitting has fallen to the ground.

His rather Tang Wutong gives scolding he, even drives away him, is not willing to hear her to say such words.

Remembers that she lost the memory, lost to my memory? Didn't know me? She did not know me Ah?

The unequalled fear, made in the Dai Yuhao heart is a confusion.

“Who are you?”Tang Wutong is crooked the head, visits him to ask.

Looks at the fear in his look, Tang Wutong has smiled suddenly, “I thought. You are Huo Yuhao, is Dai Yuhao. You are my man, my husband, my future child's father, that silly, was shouting outside loves my, fool! My fool!”

( The book ends)

Author language:

Lasts for two years, finally had finished this «Peerless Tang Sect», as second of Douluo Continent series, when just started to write, I really am somewhat disturbed. But I set firm resolve to write. Entire two years! More than 700 days and nights, perhaps, in the entire creation process, has not the entirely as desired place as before, but I can actually say that more than 700 days and nights, is the day that I work wholeheartedly.

Was old gradually, is not quite healthy, but whenever writes time, I am always enthusiastic. The sincere emotion of Yuhao to Wutong, from wanting to revenge for mother, to dispels the hatred along with the growth, although the thorn actually marches forward courageously. This is I must show to everybody, I always hope to write some energies the things. The justice is just, on this world can defeat all, only then love, the the love, men and women love and friend love of parents. This is in my heart holds to read, I also want to transmit to you, Tang Sect each brothers and sisters.

The conclusion of «Peerless Tang Sect», means the start of brand-new journey without a doubt. Our new book «Day Hot Main road» has uploaded comprehensively, and temporarily is clicks on the list first. «Day Hot Main road» is I especially has wanted to write, has formed in one's mind a very long work. This time, I must break through, writes has never written theme.

Got used to seeing the growth experience of pursuing a goal with determination, this time, I must make everybody has a look, what is invincible tall Shuaifu, this book has to be called tall Shuaifu to foster the plan. Inside has the much knowledge, is I quotes in the reality, believes that everybody looked, to some of your help. The different functions and machine armor and invincible class, the innumerable amusing things, will show to everybody in this work. We hope that you like.

As for a problem that the Douluo fans have cared about, now I can also answer everybody officially. Everybody has wanted to look, the related Douluo Continent God Realm story, I will write, will write a single issue specially, about 200,000 characters about, will meet with everybody next year. Story background after peerless Tang Sect, in the meantime, takes the upholstery for our future Douluo Continent third.

In this God Realm legend, everybody will see the familiar face, Tang San, Xiao Wu, Dai Yuhao and Tang Wutong, Ji Dong and Lie Yan, they will appear.

Believes that everybody looked at the peerless Tang Sect ending, very much wants certainly to know that actually the God Realm crisis is what, can Tang San lead the gods to melt? These, in the God Realm legend, 11 will reveal for everybody. We hope that you like.

Asked everybody to pay attention my **, I will inform everybody God Realm legend concrete publication time there and serialize the time. With day hot main road conflict, this after is not only a short article, this is a welfare of our Tang Sect.

Joins us ** the method is very simple, ** - top right-hand corner plus sign - increases friend - public number - searches Tang three few, has the authentication, is our Tang Sect family|home!

Wishes Tang Sect to be happier, wishes book friend peace and good health to be pleasant. I love you, exceeds to love itself. 1152



Source: https://lnmtl.com/chapter/douluo-dalu-2-the-unrivaled-tang-clan-chapter-622-part-4
